
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46571 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Arms, Military Equipment </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Vympel' State Machinebuilding Design Bureau Proposes </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Vympel' State Machinebuilding Design Bureau Proposes </PHRASE></F></HT>
  Cooperation 

<F P=102> 94UM0312D Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, 
KONVERSIYA in Russian No 2, 1993 (Signed to press 12 May 93) pp </F>

22-28--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0312D </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, 
KONVERSIYA </F>

<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by "Vympel" State Machinebuilding Design Bureau </F>
Lead Designer and Executive, RIA [Russian Engineering Academy] 
and MIA [International Engineering Academy] Corresponding Member 
Gennadiy Aleksandrovich Sokolovskiy and Candidate of Technical 
Sciences Valeriy Yakovlevich Kozhinov: "`Vympel' State 
Machinebuilding Design Bureau Proposes Cooperation"] 
  [Text] Gennadiy Aleksandrovich Sokolovskiy began to 
work at "Vympel" GosMKB [State Machinebuilding Design Bureau] 
immediately after graduation from Moscow Aviation Institute. In 
1974, he was appointed Deputy Lead Designer and, in 1981, Lead 
Designer -- Executive of "Vympel" GosMKB. G.A. Sokolovskiy is a 
corresponding member of the Russian and International 
Engineering Academies, a doctor of technical sciences, has been 
decorated with orders and was awarded the rank of USSR Council 
of Ministers Prize Laureate. 
  Valeriy Yakovlevich Kozhinov graduated from Kazan 
Aviation Institute in 1963. He has been working at "Vympel" 
GosMKB since 1975 and has been a department chief since 1983. He 
is a candidate of technical sciences. 
  "Vympel" GosMKB is one of Russia's leading enterprises that 
develops aircraft weapons and guided missiles for air defense 
missile complexes. It has highly-skilled cadres and good 
technical tools for drafting, designing, and manufacturing test 
models and small series, and ground and flight tests of the most 
modern weapons models. The GosMKB's main product is air-to-air, 
air-to-surface and surface-to-air guided missiles, aircraft 
launchers for guided missiles and unguided rockets, various 
electromechanical, electrohydraulic, and pyrotechnic onboard 
devices for aircraft and helicopters and electronic warfare (EW) 
systems. "Vympel" GosMKB has its own KB [Design Bureau] and test 
plant. The KB consists of several departments: future 
developments, design critical analysis, and ground optimization. 
The test plant manufactures models for tests and small series 
for sale. 
  The firm's products have long enjoyed a good reputation in 
many of the world's countries. For example, the French magazine 
PARIS MATCH wrote the following about the "Kub" Air Defense 
Missile Complex's 3M9 missile (NATO designation SA-6 Gainful) in 
October 1973 during the intensification of the Arab-Israeli 
Conflict: "Sometime the Syrians will erect a monument in honor 
of the inventor of these modern missiles. He is deserving of 
that. Surface-to-air missiles not only played a decisive role in 
the defense of Syria from air raids but also had an enormous 
psychological impact on the population. Residents of Damascus 
and its suburbs were witnesses to the missile shootdowns of a 
dozen Phantoms, Sky Hawks and Mirages, the aircraft crashed to 
the ground and the pilots were forced to eject." 
  Today there is practically not a single CIS-produced 
aircraft 
or helicopter that would not have "Vympel" GosMKB items on 
board. The firm's products were supplied to various countries 
for many years but no one knew who had developed them. The time 
has come to talk about that. 
  "Vympel" GosMKB was formed in 1949 as a developer of 
aircraft 
machinegun-cannon and bomb weapons. This direction of work has 
been preserved until the present day. Designs of guided missiles 
became a priority in the 1950's. Ivan Ivanovich Toropov was 
assigned as the first Lead Designer at the GosMKB. The Tu-4 
aircraft's bomb and cannon systems were developed in 1955 under 
his leadership. 
  At the same time, the GosMKB conducted the development of 
radar seekers for air-to-air missiles, K-7 air combat missiles 
with semiactive radar guidance, air defense missiles with solid 
fuel engines and R-13 missiles. 
  The R-13 (AA-2 Atoll) -- this is a short range missile 
(approximately 7.6 km) with infrared guidance that was developed 
as an equivalent for the well-known American Loral Aeronutronics 
AIM-9B Sidewinder missile. It is in the inventory of MiG-21 
aircraft of many of the world's countries. The R-13 is the first 
air-to-air guided missile that was accepted into the fighter 
aircraft inventory of the USSR and the people's democratic 
countries in 1962. 
  In 1959, "Vympel" GosMKB began developing the "Kub" Air 
Defense Missile Complex's 3M9 missile. Its development was 
completed under the leadership of new Lead Designer Andrey 
Leonidovich Lyapin who headed "Vympel" MKB in 1961. 
  The 3M9 is the first Soviet air defense missile with 
semiactive radar guidance and a combined rocket-ramjet solid 
fuel sustainer engine which permitted providing it with 
relatively long range with the missile's comparatively small 
dimensions and weight. The missile has a flight range of 24-28 
km and supports the interception of airborne targets at low (to 
30 m) and medium altitudes. The missile weighs 600 kg. The 
rocket-ramjet solid fuel sustainer engine employed on it was 
developed by the GosMKB for the first time in the world. The 
missile has been repeatedly modernized, as a result of which 
jam-proofing of the guidance system was increased, its 
power-to-weight ratio and accuracy were improved, and design and 
operating specifications were increased. The missile, as part of 
the "Kub" Air Defense Missile Complex, is in the inventory of a 
number of countries until the present time. The 3M9 missile is 
installed on a self-propelled mount. 
  Later, "Vympel" GosMKB concentrated its efforts on the 
development of second, third and fourth generation guided 
missiles (primarily air-to-air missiles), launchers, and also 
bomb racks, turret machinegun-cannon systems and chaff cartridge 
and infrared decoy dispensers. Lead Designer G.A. Sokolovskiy 
has headed this work since 1981. 
  The idea of modular utilization of interchangeable infrared 
and radar seekers on the missile's basic design that has been 
set forth in the R-13 missile has become one of the fundamental 
ideas in the GosMKB's work. This idea was utilized during the 
design of other elements of the missile which permitted us to 
substantially expand the capabilities of the aircraft weapon 
platforms of the R-23 (24) (AA-7 Apex), R-40 (AA-6 Acrid) and 
R-27 (AA-10 Alamo) missiles during attacks against targets at 
various speeds, ranges, altitudes and under conditions of 
natural and man-made interference. At the same time, many other 
engineering tasks were carried out, the urgency of which has 
been preserved until the present day. For example, the R-40 
missile, designed to destroy high-speed, high-altitude targets 
and in the inventory of Su-15, MiG-25 and MiG-31 aircraft, with 
relatively high weight (470 kg) and medium range (up to 70 km) 
as before remains the highest altitude air-to-air missile. It 
permits the destruction of targets at altitudes of up to 32 km. 
The issues of the employment of passive and active thermal 
protection have also been worked out on it (the latter is 
ensured using freon that is supplied from a tank that is located 
in the launcher), jam-proofing of a combined radar-optical fuze 
and the technology of the utilization of titanium alloys in the 
design (including the body of the missile engine). 
  The R-60 (AA-8 Aphid) missile with infrared guidance is the 
organic weapon of the Su-15, Su-17, Su-24, Su-25, MiG-21, 
MiG-23, MiG-25, MiG-29, MiG-31, and Yak-38 aircraft. This highly 
maneuverable air combat missile weighs 44 kg and permits the 
destruction of targets at ranges from 200 m to 15 km. During the 
design of the R-60, the firm's engineers resolved the task of 
ensuring the destruction of targets maneuvering at maximum 
G-loads at very short distances. This was a unique technical 
breakthrough in world practice in the sphere of close combat 
air-to-air missiles. Based upon the assessments of foreign 
experts, the lead totaled approximately 10 years. 
  Later the GosMKB developed the following air-to-air missiles 
in this direction: the R-73, R-27, RVV-AE, and the R-33 with 
which the Russian Air Force is equipped today. 
  The R-73 (AA-11 Archer) -- the light (it weighs 
approximately 
105 kg) close air combat (up to 30 km) missile utilizes combined 
aerodynamic command and control. It is designed to destroy 
aircraft, helicopters and cruise missiles under conditions of 
heavy jamming. Protection of the infrared seeker from jamming is 
ensured through the selection of a photo receiver range and 
utilization of time-pulse modulation and the employment of a 
digital signal processing unit with independent channels. The 
missile has a reverse launch mode to protect the aircraft weapon 
platform from the rear hemisphere. According to the opinions of 
Western experts that were published in JANES DEFENCE WEEKLY 
magazine in June-September 1989, the R-73 missile "has 
outstripped" the ASRAAM missile "by 10 years". Superiority in 
maximum launch range is nearly a factor of two. 
  The R-27 -- is a multirole medium- and long-range (72...130 
km) missile that was developed in a modular design. It has two 
engine variants (normal and enhanced power-to-weight ratio) and 
two seeker variants (infrared and semiactive radar). The weight 
in the heaviest variant totals approximately 350 kg. A 
combination of modules permits obtaining four types of missiles 
with various technical specifications. The missile has combined 
guidance: command-inertial in the initial phase of the 
trajectory and homing in the terminal phase. 
  The R-27 missile is designed to destroy aircraft, 
helicopters, cruise missiles and antiship missiles. 
  The RVV-AE (AMRAAM-ski) is a medium range (90 km) missile 
that was developed to intercept various types of targets, 
including aircraft, helicopters, air-to-air missiles (such as 
the Hughes Aircraft AMRAAM and Phoenix missiles) and 
surface-to-air (such as Patriot air defense complex missiles) 
and also cruise missiles in complex meteorological conditions 
and under conditions of heavy electronic jamming in the 
background of the earth or water surface. The missile weighs 
approximately 175 kg. It has a combined guidance system: 
command-inertial in the inertial phase of the trajectory and 
active radar in the terminal phase. High jam-proofing is ensured 
through spatial-time signal processing, Kalimanovskiy filtering, 
continuous resolution of kinematic equations and the 
availability of the inertial phase of the trajectory. The 
missile has two modifications: M and M2. The second variant has 
a greater target interception range, enhanced seeker 
jam-proofing, and a greater target destruction probability at 
super-low altitudes (up to three meters) due to the utilization 
of a radio altimeter. The RVV-AE missile is being installed on 
tactical and strategic aviation aircraft. In accordance with the 
conclusions of experts that were presented in articles in the 
August-October 1992 issues of FLIGHT INTERNATIONAL magazine, the 
RVV-AE, while beating the AMRAAM missile in weight-dimensions 
specifications, has an entire series of advantages, including 
greater launch range (by approximately 20%) and a higher 
maneuvering target and low-altitude target interception 
probability. 
  Employment of latticed control surfaces controlled by an 
electric drive on the RVV-AE is an original technical solution 
that has been utilized on an air-to-air missile for the first 
time. Holding back the adjacent flow using a large number of 
planes, these control surfaces retain their effectiveness up to 
large angles of attack at limits of 40ë. The lattice's 
separate lifting surfaces provide a total lift force that is 
several times higher than a monoplane control surface 
(approximately a factor of three for the missile's maximum speed 
that equals Mach 4). The dependence of the lift force 
coefficient on the angle of attack remains constant in all 
flight speed and altitude ranges. Furthermore, the latticed 
control surfaces, having significantly less chord, permit the 
use of a less powerful drive. "Vympel" Design Bureau, jointly 
with the Ukrainian Institute of Electric Welding imeni Ye.O. 
Paton, has developed a unique technology for manufacturing these 
latticed control surfaces. 
  The R-33 (AA-9 Amos) -- is a long-range missile (120 km) 
that 
is designed to intercept aircraft and cruise missiles. It weighs 
approximately 490 kg. It has a combined guidance system: 
command-inertial in the initial phase and semiactive radar in 
the terminal phase. A catapult launch technique from a 
semi-recessed position under the MiG-31 aircraft fuselage was 
employed for this missile for the first time in world practice. 
That positioning of the missile permitted a substantial 
reduction of the frontal resistance of an aircraft weapon 
platform with a combat load. 
  Along with air-to-air and surface-to-air missile 
developments, "Vympel" GosMKB has the experience of developing 
air-to-surface missiles. Today Su-17, Su-24, Su-25, Su-27, 
MiG-23, MiG-27, and Mirage F1 aircraft are equipped with Kh-29 
(AS-14 Kedge) missiles that were developed at our KB. 
  The Kh-29 missile is designed to destroy hard to hit 
ground-based (large bridges, powerful concrete shelters, and 
airfield runways) and naval surface (surface combatants and 
submarines in the surfaced position) targets. It weighs 660-680 
kg. The missile was developed in two variants: with television 
and laser guidance systems. The television seeker ensures target 
lock-on prior to launch at ranges of 10-12 km. After the 
appearance of the image of this target on the cockpit display, 
the pilot conducts the launch and autonomous guidance is carried 
out from then on. The semiactive laser seeker carries out target 
lock-on at ranges of 8-10 km and requires target illumination 
either from a ground set or from the aircraft weapon platform 
which must be equipped with "Klen", "Kayra", "Smerch" or ATLIS 
type systems. Work that is being conducted at the present time 
to increase the jam-proofing of the Kh-29 missile's seeker will 
permit an increase of its operating range to 25-30 km, having 
preserved a circular deviation of approximately 1-2 m from the 
center of the target being destroyed. 
  Two types of launchers have been developed at the firm for 
practically all of the listed missiles: using rail launchers 
from which missile separation is ensured using the missile 
engine's energy and using catapult launchers, which support 
missile separation from the aircraft with push rods that utilize 
the energy of pyrotechnics or hydraulic systems. 
  In contrast to a number of foreign firms such as, for 
example, Frazier Nash (Great Britain) or ACMA (International 
Consortium) which have recently been developing rail launchers 
utilizing easily removable modules, "Vympel" GosMKB is following 
its own path. At the firm, we think that with all of the 
positive qualities of a launcher with easily removable modules, 
they have an entire series of shortcomings. They are more 
complex in design and require more highly skilled maintenance 
personnel in operation and additional buildings for work with 
and storage of the modules. The reliability of the launchers is 
reduced and the amount of equipment for the aircraft weapon 
platform is increased. 
  As a rule, "Vympel" GosMKB conducts the development of rail 
launchers for definite weapon platforms which permits the 
production of the assembly of the launchers under conditions of 
the plant-manufacturer and simplifies operation. In the process, 
the tasks of optimizing the launchers for weight, aerodynamic 
resistance, and the manufacturability of the design are 
resolved. The kinematic diagrams of fasteners and other 
mechanisms are original and have been simplified to the maximum 
extent possible which increases the launchers' reliability. 
Their standardization is being conducted along the following 
directions: for various weight groups of missiles, for one 
weight group of missiles for various types of aircraft, for 
various weight groups of missiles for one type of aircraft, and 
also according to the connection points (for example, the APU-13 
is easily mounted on hardpoints or on bomb racks). In a number 
of cases, the firm is resorting to the installation of up to 
three types of lugs on the missiles to mount them on various 
types of launchers. 
  Similar approaches are also being employed during the 
development of catapult launchers. The original design solutions 
of catapult mechanisms and synchronization of movements of the 
forward and aft push rods permit providing the required speed of 
separation while observing safety for the aircraft weapon 
platform. For example, the catapult launcher for the RVV-AE 
missile, having a similar fundamental operating scheme with the 
Frazier Nash launcher for the Sky Flash missile (British 
Aerospace) and the AMRAAM, is distinguished from it by its 
simpler and more reliable catapult mechanisms and 
synchronization of the operation of the push rods through the 
utilization of special hydraulic compensators-batteries. This 
significantly simplifies the launcher itself. The issues of the 
placement of the self-contained power source, the designs of the 
catches that reduce aerodynamic G-loads on the missile, and the 
readjusted hardpoints were also resolved in an original manner 
on it. 
  "Vympel" GosMKB has also developed launchers for 50-122 mm 
unguided aircraft rockets with 5-20 barrels. They are also 
disposable or reusable and are equipped with one or multichannel 
launch systems. 
  Launchers for small caliber guided missiles have tubular 
launch rails, for example, the APU-8 and the PU-O-25L, and 
support launches of air-to-surface missiles with semiactive 
laser and radar seekers. 
  All CIS-manufactured frontal aviation, antisubmarine 
warfare, 
and long range aviation aircraft are equipped with "Vympel" 
GosMKB bomb holders. The holders support suspension of 
conventional and guided bombs, canisters with machinegun-cannon 
weapons, guided missile and unguided rocket launchers, 
torpedoes, rescue equipment, canisters with submarine detection 
equipment and other cargoes weighing from five to 25 kg. They 
are designed both for external and internal employment. Based 
upon critical analyses, the holders have a different number of 
fasteners and are distinguished by a high degree of 
standardization. It is attained through the employment of a 
large number of standard circuits from which, like from separate 
units, the design is assembled. The firm's latest achievement is 
a bomb holder that is loaded independently prior to its 
installation on the aircraft. 
  In the sphere of EW systems, "Vympel" GosMKB has developed 
and introduced into operation several generations of passive 
jamming and decoy dispensers for all classes of CIS aircraft and 
helicopters. Since the beginning of the 1980's, they have been 
developed on modern microcircuitry and according to the modular 
principle. 
  At the present time, there is a broad selection of 
internally 
and externally mounted functional-design units with manual, 
semiautomatic and automatic control for dispensing 26-, 50-, and 
140-mm infrared decoy and chaff cartridges. The dispensers' 
software permits creation of a cloud or a trail of jamming that 
varies by assigned or random laws with the following parameters 
in accordance with the flight modes and the directions of 
attack: the number of cartridges in a salvo, the number of 
salvos in a series, and the number of series and the intervals 
between them. 
  At the present time, the firm is developing a special air 
target based upon the 3M9 missile that is equipped with jamming 
dispenser systems for fire rehearsal of ground-based and 
shipborne air defense missile-gun complexes. 
  Each design that comes out of the design bureau today, as a 
rule, contains dozens of inventions. More than 800 of the firm's 
original technical solutions are protected by patent documents. 
Among them: common layouts of items; various systems; the design 
of individual compartments, assemblies, mechanisms and 
connections; stands for modeling and ground work, and also 
technological devices and accessories. 
  For many years, "Vympel" GosMKB was among those enterprises 
that was financed from the state budget. Since 1987, the 
situation has changed. The enterprise is gradually transitioning 
to contract relations. A number of developments were initially 
financed from the state budget and, later, through contracts. 
  At the present time, the firm is experiencing financial 
difficulties caused by the overall state of Russia's economy, 
the disruption of ties with contractors and series-production 
enterprises, the absence of a new military doctrine and the 
totally illogical conversion program of industry's defense 
sectors. During the last two years, the firm's strength has been 
reduced by 25%, however, its creative potential has been 
preserved. Additional difficulties are also arising as a result 
of the fact that the Air Force is not utilizing an integrated 
approach to ordering aircraft, helicopters and their weapons but 
is ordering them from separate chief and lead designers. 
  The new economic situation is compelling the firm to 
increase 
the rates of scientific-research and experimental-design work: 
to develop new models of equipment, modify already existing 
models to impart greater flexibility and effectiveness of 
employment to them and to expand the spectrum of weapon 
platforms, including foreign weapon platforms. At the present 
time, "Vympel" GosMKB's engineers, jointly with foreign experts, 
are conducting work to determine the possibility of mating the 
firm's missiles with foreign aircraft. Negotiations are being 
conducted to equip aircraft from Brazil, the United Arab 
Emirates and China with "Vympel" GosMKB missiles and also for 
the firm's participation in the modernization of MiG-21 aircraft 
that are in the United Arab Emirates, India, China, and Syria. 
"Vympel" GosMKB has developed a method and has conducted 
research that demonstrates the possibility to utilize bomb 
holders that have been developed at the enterprise to suspend 
foreign aircraft bombs on combat aircraft manufactured in the 
CIS. 
  A series of additional measures is being conducted for the 
standardized employment of items on the whole, their elements 
and individual systems. Special attention is being paid to 
standardizing different types of air-to-air and surface-to-air 
guided missiles. In the process, three well-known approaches are 
being utilized. The first approach consists of realizing the 
advantages of modern air-to-air missiles on the whole and their 
separate systems, first of all active seeker systems. For 
example, the AMRAAM missile is being employed for the Norwegian 
NASAMS Air Defense Missile Complex. The second approach consists 
of expanding the capabilities of air-to-air missiles that have 
proven themselves in a surface-to-air variant through a certain 
amount of reconfiguration and by increasing their power plant 
capabilities. That is what Raytheon is doing for the American 
Sparrow missile in the Ivolvd [transliteration] Sparrow variant. 
The third approach consists of a combination of the first two. 
For example, they plan to utilize the AMRAAM missile in the 
ASAM-1 Air Defense Missile Complex. 
  Right now the GosMKB is developing designs of fourth 
generation missiles that have many fundamentally new scientific 
and technical solutions that include the missile's external 
appearance, its aerodynamic specifications, methods for forming 
its command and control, guidance and engine thrust control 
systems, and also optimization of all components based upon 
their standardized or, on the contrary, based upon their 
specialized employment and based upon cost-effectiveness 
criteria. According to the assessments of the firm's experts, 
the new designs do not lag behind such future foreign 
developments as the American Loral Aeronutronics and 
Ling-Temco-Vought HAVE DASH and Hughes Aircraft, Raytheon, 
General Dynamics, and Westinghouse AAAM air-to-air missiles and 
also such developments as the French Aerospatiale "Aster", the 
Franco-German Euromissile Association's Roland RM5 and the 
American Ling-Temco-Vought ERINT air defense missiles. 
  In the sphere of electronic warfare systems, the enterprise 
has begun developing complex systems that consist of missile 
attack warning sensors, automatic dispenser command and control 
subsystems and canisters with chaff and infrared decoy 
cartridges. 
  The deterioration of the economic situation has compelled 
"Vympel" GosMKB test production to shift to operating modes for 
the production of small lots of series-produced products for 
export deliveries as part of combat aircraft complexes. 
Furthermore, "Vympel" GosMKB is expanding the sphere of civil 
production which today totals approximately 10% of the 
total 
volume of developments. Preference is being assigned to 
scientific-intensive and specialized models that permit us to 
utilize the enterprise's potential to the maximum possible 
extent. 
  "Vympel" GosMKB demonstrated its products at the Central 
Exhibition Field in Moscow in 1989, and also at the "Le 
Bourget-91", "Kubinka-92", "Mosaeroshow-92", "Athens-93" and 
"IDEX-93" exhibitions. 
  The firm is most qualified to resolve the following issues: 
theoretical research, drafting and design; compilation of 
algorithms and computer programs; calculations; modeling; 
testing for durability, vibration, strikes and on environmental 
impact; flight testing; development of 
electro-pneumatic-hydromechanical systems and pyrotechnical 
devices; development of telemetry equipment; technological 
processing of designs and others. Having a great deal of 
experience in the development of weapons systems, "Vympel" 
GosMKB is working jointly with many CIS enterprises and proposes 
cooperation to all of the world's firms. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46572 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Geopolitics and Security </F>
<H3> <TI>   The Military Interests of Russia </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    The Military Interests of Russia </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0311E Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 1, 1993 (Signed to press 5 Jul 93) pp 27-37--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0311E </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by S.M. Rogov, deputy director of the Institute of </F>
the United States and Canada, under the rubric "Geopolitics and 
Security"] 
  [Text] Sergey Mikhaylovich Rogov is a deputy director 
of the Institute of the United States and Canada of the Russian 
Academy of Sciences, President of the Center for National 
Security and International Relations of the International 
Affairs Committee of the Supreme Soviet of the Russian 
Federation, and a member of the Presidium of the Association to 
Assist the United Nations. Sergey Mikhaylovich is a prominent 
political scientist, and is well known from his features in the 
press and on television on issues of military policy. 
  The end of the Cold War has led to the destruction of the 
bipolar system of international relations. The world climate, 
however, faces new and unforeseen threats--the uncontrollable 
development of events in the former Soviet Union, the 
uncertainty relative to the role of the new power centers, the 
increased tensions between North and South and the absence of 
effective, regional systems of security oriented toward the 
needs of a multipolar world. 
  The collapse of the Soviet Union has led to sharp changes in 
the global balance of forces, dominated for years by the United 
States and the USSR. The Soviet Union, as the "second 
superpower," was able to maintain strategic parity with the 
United States for several decades, countering the actions of the 
United States with regard to the nuclear arms race. The 
strategic stability was largely a by-product of this approximate 
parity. 
  The new Russian leadership, although a continuation of the 
Soviet Union and the Russian Empire that had existed before it, 
differs from both of them politically (striving to become a 
democracy), economically (moving to a market economy) and 
geographically (Russia has never existed within today's 
borders). The new Russia still has to define its essence, 
nature, national interests and place in the world. 
  The principal threat to the security of Russia comes from 
internal rather than external factors. Russia could encounter 
external threats in the future, but today its security could be 
threatened by explosive internal problems. 
  Another factor is the fundamental difference in the system 
of 
international relations in which Russia is operating today from 
the bipolar system that existed for 45 years. In a multipolar 
world against a background of such power centers as the United 
States, Western Europe, Japan, China and India, Russia could be 
at best one of the great powers, but not a "superpower." 
  Russia, with only about 60 percent of the GNP of the former 
Soviet Union and roughly the same percentage of its population, 
could continue the arms race that was such a heavy burden for 
all 15 republics of the USSR. 
  This would not signify, however, that Russia can and should 
disarm unilaterally. Military power remains an important factor 
in ensuring national security, but the necessity hardly remains 
of continuing an arms race in which the Soviet Union tried to 
counter the entire rest of the world by itself. Russia, from the 
standpoint of international relations, needs not a rivalry with 
former Soviet republics and the principal power centers such as 
the United States, Western Europe, China and Japan, but rather a 
search for reliable partners and allies. The vital interests of 
Russia require a re-orientation of its efforts away from a 
useless arms race to economic reconstruction and improvement in 
the standard of living of the population, which demands 
cooperation with the United States and Europe as a whole. 
  The national interests of Russia in the military sphere (or 
the interests of military security) could be defined as averting 
the use of force on the part of other states threatening the 
territorial integrity, economic and social prosperity and human 
rights of citizens of Russia or the democratic political system 
in Russia. 
<H8>  The Military Interests of Russia in the Former Soviet </H8>
Republics 
  The interests of the national security of the Russian 
Federation may be represented in the form of three concentric 
circles. 
  The first priority of Russia should be its relations with 
the 
other former Soviet republics. The greatest threat for Russia 
today arises out of the possible territorial and national 
conflicts with those republics that have become independent 
states. Conflicts in Moldova, Abkhazia, South Ossetia, 
Nagorno-Karabakh and Tajikistan are already threatening to spill 
across the borders of Russia. 
  The resurrected Russian state has run up against its own 
first foreign-policy crisis. The agreement on the creation of 
the Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS), composed of 11 
former Soviet republics, could prove to be just paper devoid of 
any substance. 
  It is vitally important for Russia to establish friendly 
relations with the former Soviet republics and, if it is able to 
do so, to create a union at least with the largest new states 
such as Ukraine, Belarus and Kazakhstan, where tens of millions 
of Russians reside. 
  The whole system of defense of the former Soviet Union 
collapsed as well. The Russian potential in conventional arms in 
Europe will be 4--6.5 times less in the number of types of 
surface weapons, restricted by the Paris accord, and half as 
much in aviation weapons. All Soviet short- and medium-range 
missiles that could have been aimed at Europe are also being 
destroyed in accordance with the INF Treaty (Table 1). 


Table 1 -- Conventional Arms of the USSR and Russia in Europe (1988-90) 

Country                 USSR               USSR               Russia 

Year                    1988               1990               1995 

Tanks                   41,580             20,725             6,400 

Armored combat          45,000             29,890             11,480 
vehicles 

Artillery systems       42,400             13,938             6,415 

Combat aircraft         6,682              6,611              3,450 

Attack helicopters      2,220              1,481              890 


  Russia, in the opinion of experts, has also lost the first 
and second echelons of its "forward lines of defense" in Europe. 
In the words of General L. Kuznetsov, "We were oriented toward 
the English Channel, created strike groups, and all the best 
officers, warrant officers and extended-service servicemen were 
sent to the West, to the first echelon: WGF, CGF, NGF, SGF and 
the Belorussian, Baltic and Ukrainian military districts. If you 
take the three Ukrainian military districts (today the armed 
forces of Ukraine) and our three military districts of Moscow, 
North Caucasus and Volga-Urals, the correlation of forces will 
be three to one in favor of Ukraine. Both in hardware and in 
arms. Especially in combat-ready divisions in the ground forces. 
The troops that were advanced far to the west of the Northern, 
Western and Baltic groups of forces, as well as the units of the 
Belorussian district, are in a state of withdrawal, and one 
cannot count seriously on their combat readiness. A minimum of 
troops has been left to Russia on European territory" (Table 2). 


Table 2 -- Distribution of Arms Among the Republics in Accordance with 
the Tashkent Accord (15 May 1992) 

Republics     Tanks     Armored     Artillery    Combat      Attack 
                        combat      systems      aircraft    helicopters 
                        vehicles 

Armenia       220       220         285          100         50 

Azerbaijan    220       220         285          100         50 

Georgia       220       220         285          100         50 

Moldova       210       210         250          50          50 

Russia        6,400     11,480      6,415        3,450       890 
(European 
portion) 

Belarus       1,800     2,600       1,615        260         80 

Ukraine       4,080     5,050       4,040        1,090       330 

TOTAL:        13,150    20,000      13,175       5,150       1,500 


  The ceilings stipulated by the CFE Treaty do not give Russia 
the opportunity of having more than 20--25 tank and 
motorized-rifle divisions in Europe. But even the placement of 
those forces could run into serious difficulties. Some of the 
Russian troops from Germany, Poland and the Baltic states could 
be withdrawn into isolated Kaliningrad Oblast, which is 
separated from Russia by Lithuania. But it hardly makes sense to 
keep too many divisions there. Kaliningrad Oblast, aside form 
everything else, is part of the "extended Central Europe 
(subzone V.2.)," and the placement of a large quantity of arms 
restricted by the Treaty could lead to Russia's violation of the 
CFE Treaty, if Ukraine and Belarus take the entire quotas 
established for them by the Tashkent accord. 
  An agreement on the placement of some Russian troops on the 
territory of a number of the former Soviet republics that are in 
the flank zones as stipulated by the CFE Treaty could gain 
particular significance in this regard, since the quantity of 
Russian arms in the flank zone for Russia was cut back sharply 
under the Tashkent accord. 
  The levels for the flanks were quite tight even for the 
Soviet Union. The Soviet Union could maintain no more than three 
fully deployed motorized-rifle divisions in its flank zone 
(including four military districts--Leningrad, Odessa, North 
Caucasus and Transcaucasus). This factor played a role, forcing 
the Soviet leadership to transfer three motorized-rifle 
divisions from the ground forces to the composition of the three 
fleets of the USSR in Europe--the Northern, Baltic and Black Sea 
(a fourth division was transferred to the Pacific Fleet). These 
divisions were renamed coastal defense divisions (DBO). This 
step was deemed an attempt at "a deception" in the West, and the 
USSR agreed to count the arms of those divisions under the 
ceilings stipulated by the CFE Treaty under pressure from the 
West. 
  The situation became even more complicated in Russia's case 
after the fall of the Soviet Union. Russia, under the Tashkent 
accord, has the right to place no more than two fully manned 
regular motorized-rifle brigades in the flank zones. This could 
make inevitable the disbanding of the DBO in Arkhangelsk. The 
same decision could also be made by Ukraine with regard to the 
DBO in the Crimea. 
  The flank zone for Russia, meanwhile, includes the 
extraordinarily unstable region of the Caucasus, where a many 
armed conflicts are already underway. The northern flank for 
Russia includes a region with the "second Russian capital"--St. 
Petersburg--and the most powerful Russian fleet, the Northern 
(where approximately 1/3 of all Russian strategic warheads will 
be located after the fulfillment of the START-1 and START-2 
treaties). The possibility of warehousing the arms (in 
particular the BBM [armored combat vehicles]) for three 
additional motorized-rifle brigades could prove to be 
insufficient to ensure the necessary level of military security 
for Russia. 
  At the same time the Russian arsenal in Asia, including the 
arms of the regular forces and in storage areas, total no less 
than 20,000 tanks, 15,000 BBMs, 30,000--40,000 artillery systems 
and one and a half thousand aircraft, according to the estimates 
of experts (not counting the former Soviet arsenals in 
Kazakhstan and Central Asia, which are still under de 
facto Russian control). While the correlation between 
Soviet conventional arms in Europe and Asia was roughly 2:1 
before the CFE Treaty, it is changing for Russia and will now 
evidently be 1:3 or 1:4, excluding aircraft. 
  The geographical location of Russia, on the one hand, does 
not permit the construction of a new "Maginot Line" along its 
territorial borders. The restoration of the "forward defense" 
the Soviet Union had is impossible as well. Russia needs to have 
friendly surroundings, and should avoid any confrontation or 
arms race with its closest neighbors. 
  The new independent states, on the other hand, can scarcely 
pose any threat to Russia in the traditional sense. It is very 
difficult to imagine a situation where the former Soviet 
republics would "make an incursion" into Russia. 
  This signifies that the armed forces of Russia should not 
create major force groupings on the borders with Ukraine, 
Belarus and Kazakhstan. There is no need to preserve enormous 
ground forces with a hundred or more "heavy" tank and 
motorized-rifle divisions. Quite limited forces will be 
sufficient for Russia to cover its western and southern borders. 
  A high risk of "local" or "border" conflicts exists at the 
same time. Specially prepared "light" troops could thus be 
required, which (as was demonstrated by the war in Afghanistan) 
could prove to be more effective in low-intensity conflicts than 
heavy divisions. 
  The most favorable variation in relation to the former 
Soviet 
republics would likely consist of an agreement for joint 
defense, which would make it possible to expand markedly the PVO 
[air-defense] zone of Russia and effectively rule out any 
possibility of a land attack on the Russian Federation from the 
west or south. This variation would make it possible for Russia 
to preserve inviolate the SPRN [missile attack warning system] 
strategic system, which would facilitate a strengthening of 
strategic stability. Russia would also thus remain the sole 
inheritor of Soviet nuclear weapons. This variation could lead 
to the creation of an integrated organization for collective 
defense along the lines of NATO. The high command of the CIS 
combined armed forces would be converted into a truly joint 
structure therein, with equal participation of the 
representatives of the CIS member nations and rotation of the 
important posts in command and staff structures. 
  If this scenario proves to be impossible, Russia could try 
to 
reach bilateral agreements, especially with Ukraine and Belarus, 
with the aim of streamlining military collaboration and using 
some military facilities on their territory in the interests of 
Russia. Russia would likely have a vested interest in seeing its 
gigantic military industry become the chief supplier of weapons 
and military hardware to those nations. 
  In the extreme case, Russia would like to rule out the 
participation of the newly created states in any hostile 
military blocs and the placement of foreign forces or the 
creation of military bases of other nations on the territory of 
the former Soviet republics. Russia could hardly consent to the 
receipt of de jure nuclear status by any republic. 
  The agreements of the CIS as a whole could lead to various 
results, from a military-political alliance of Russia and some 
other nations to a "civilized divorce," i.e. the 
peaceful division of the Soviet nuclear arsenal. The military 
differences between Russia and Ukraine, unfortunately, could 
have highly serious, negative consequences. Although the 
greatest attention has been gained by the dispute on the Black 
Sea Fleet, the significance of which has been fanned beyond all 
measure, the real problem could be connected with the strategic 
nuclear forces that are located on the territory of Ukraine. 
  It appears that Ukraine is trying to become a nuclear power, 
and Kazakhstan could also take that route. It cannot be ruled 
out that Belarus would follow them. If the Soviet nuclear arms 
were to be divided among three or four republics, it would 
provide an impetus to the ambitions of India, Pakistan, Iran and 
some other Third World countries. This would lead, in the worst 
case, to a collapse of the regime of the non-proliferation of 
nuclear weapons at the conference to review it in 1995, and 
could have an effect on the attitude toward toward nuclear 
weapons of even such nations as Germany and Japan. 
  All of the former Soviet republics that have become 
independent states are striving to ensure their own legitimacy 
and security. Ukraine, however (on whose territory are 176 SS-19 
or SS-24 ICBMs with MIRVs), has undertaken active measures to 
possess the former Soviet nuclear weapons. Ukraine sees nuclear 
weapons as a kind of means of restraining possible Russian 
intervention in its internal affairs and the collapse of 
Ukraine, which has never been an independent nation within its 
current boundaries. 
  Ukraine made use of the lack of clarity in American policy 
to 
attain important concessions on the part of the United States 
that are recorded in the Protocol signed in Lisbon in May of 
1992. This Protocol (if we do not count Article 5) was a major 
victory for Ukrainian diplomacy: 
  Ukraine and two other republics are deemed to be equal 
successors to the INF Treaty along with Russia; 
  Ukraine attained equal rights with Russia in the 
implementation of the INF Treaty, acting as an independent 
participant in it; 
  Ukraine and the other former republics should 
themselves determine, on an equal basis, how the restriction 
levels stipulated by the INF Treaty should be distributed; 
  Ukraine independently fulfills all of the obligations 
connected with cutbacks, and their monitoring and 
verification. 
  Ukrainian diplomacy successfully "sold" to the United States 
its own, extremely murky obligation, having received in return 
substantial confirmation of its nuclear pretensions. Article 5 
moreover does not indicate the time frame for joining the 
Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty. And Ukraine and the other 
nations have undertaken no steps whatsoever to join that treaty, 
and references to a proper ratification process by legislative 
bodies provide grounds to assume that the Ukrainian parliament 
could block ratification or make it conditional with amendments 
that would transform non-nuclear status into a fig leaf. 
  The question of the nuclear status of the former Soviet 
republics is potentially the most acute among all of the issues 
connected with the collapse of the USSR, and in the event a 
solution to it is not found, it could lead to unpredictable 
consequences. 
<H8>  Russian Military Interests in Eurasia </H8>
  The second circle of security interests of Russia is 
connected with such regions as Europe and the Near and Far East, 
which have traditionally had important strategic significance 
for our country. Russia is currently separated from those 
regions of the world, with the exception of the Far East, by the 
newly appeared independent states. But the development of events 
in those regions of the world cannot be ignored, for both 
economic and geopolitical considerations. 
  This circle includes, at least, three of the most major 
centers of power in the postwar multipolar world. It also 
includes the interaction of Russia with the heart of the Islamic 
world. The former Soviet republics in Central Asia could become 
a bridge between the Russian Federation and Western and Southern 
Asia, or they could be transformed into an area of collision of 
existing interests. 
  Some of the former Soviet republics could be drawn into the 
sphere of influence of such global or regional power centers as 
Germany, China, Japan and Iran. Russian control over Siberia and 
the Far East could be threatened if Russia is drawn into 
conflict with such great neighbors as China and Japan, which 
have territorial claims against the Russian Federation. 
  Russian-Chinese relations are developing very well today, 
but 
China could theoretically pose a serious military threat to 
Russia. A large-scale conventional conflict with China is a 
nightmare for Russian strategy. The population of Russia is one 
eighth that of China, and China is outstripping Russia 
economically. 
  Although no real military threats to Russia exist today 
within the second circle of its military interests, the 
appearance of such threats is possible in the near- and 
long-term future, and Russia can scarcely count on its own 
qualitative or even quantitative military supremacy in a clash 
with the new power centers. 
  The CFE Treaty and the Tashkent accord on the division of 
the 
Soviet quota for conventional arms have created a new balance in 
Europe. There will be no serious imbalances among the European 
nations, as Table 3 testifies. 


Table 3 -- Final Variation for Distribution of Types of Arms Reduced in 
Accordance with the Paris Treaty 

Countries         Tanks     Armored     Artillery    Combat      Attack 
                            combat      systems      aircraft    helicopters 
                            vehicles 

Belgium           334       1,099       320          232         46 

Canada            77        277         38           90          13 

Denmark           353       316         553          106         12 

France            1,306     3,820       1,292        800         352 

Germany           4,166     3,446       2,705        900         306 

Greece            1,735     2,534       1,878        650         18 

Italy             1,348     3,339       1,955        650         142 

Netherlands       743       1,080       607          230         69 

Norway            170       225         527          100         0 

Portugal          300       430         450          160         26 

Spain             794       1,588       1,310        310         71 

Turkey            2,795     3,120       3,523        750         43 

Great Britain     1,015     3,176       636          900         384 

United States     4,006     5,372       2,492        784         518 

NATO total in     19,142    29,822      18,286       6,662       2,000 
Europe 

Bulgaria          1,475     2,000       1,750        235         67 

Czechoslovakia    1,435     2,050       1,150        345         75 

Hungary           835       1,700       840          180         108 

Poland            1,730     2,150       1,610        460         130 

Rumania           1,375     2,100       1,475        430         120 

Total for         6,850     10,000      6,825        1,650       500 
former Warsaw 
Pact countries 

Ukraine           4,080     5,050       4,040        1,090       330 

Belarus           1,800     2,600       1,615        260         80 

Moldova           210       210         250          50          50 

Georgia           220       220         285          100         50 

Armenia           220       220         285          100         50 

Azerbaijan        220       220         285          100         50 

Total for         6,750     8,520       6,760        1,700       610 
former union 
republics 

Russia            6,400     11,480      6,415        3,450       890 


  The ultimate distribution of conventional arms, agreement on 
which was reached in 1992, completely alters the military map of 
Europe. Whereas the Soviet Union dominated the continent at the 
end of the 1980s, now NATO is becoming the predominant military 
force in Europe. Half of all conventional arms on the continent 
belong to NATO, which allows the NATO members to have three 
times more ground weapons and twice as many aircraft and 
helicopters as Russia. This evidently explains why the NATO 
countries did not object to the excessive demands of Ukraine and 
the other former Soviet republics during the negotiations on the 
division of the Soviet quota for conventional weapons. The West 
had a clear vested interest in seeing that Soviet arms be cut 
back as much as possible (Table 4). 


Table 4 -- Correlation Between NATO, the Former Eastern European Warsaw Pact 
Countries, the Former Union Republics and Russia 

Countries     Tanks      Armored      Artillery     Combat       Attack 
                         combat       systems       aircraft     helicopters 
                         vehicles 

Total for     20,000     30,000       20,000        6,700        2,000 
NATO in 
Europe 

3.13          2.61       3.12         1.94          2.25 

Total for     6,850      10,000       6,825         1,650        500 
former 
Warsaw Pact 
countries 

1.07          0.87       1.06         0.48          0.62 

Total for     6,750      8,520        6,760         1,700        610 
former 
union 
republics 

1.05          0.74       1.05         0.49          0.69 

Russia        6,400      11,480       6,415         3,450        890 

1             1          1            1             1 


  Russia has lost its supremacy in conventional arms and, 
although it remains as before a major military power, it has 
been "squeezed" into a position where its capabilities are 
balanced by the forces of the other former Soviet republics, the 
Eastern European countries and the NATO countries. 
  This means that it will be very difficult for Russia to act 
alone in the foreseeable future. Russia thus has a vested 
interest in multilateral agreements, both within the 
European-wide system of security that is taking shape and within 
the framework of the Commonwealth of Independent States. 
  This trend is strengthened by the Final Act on the levels of 
the armed forces that was reached in Vienna in the summer of 
1992. The armed forces of Russia will have a ceiling of 
1,450,000 personnel, which is 40 percent lower than the size of 
the armed forces of the USSR in Europe in 1989. 
  Ukraine, meanwhile, seems to be turning into one of the 
"European superpowers." It is acknowledged to have the second 
largest (after Russia) armed forces in Europe, exceeding those 
of the United States by 11 percent and Germany by 27 percent. 
Belarus is roughly equivalent to such great powers as France, 
Great Britain and Italy. Ukraine will surpass them twice over in 
many types of weapons. The size of the armed forces of Ukraine 
(450,000 men) is second only to Russia, and considerably 
surpasses that of Germany (345,000), France (325,000), Italy 
(315,000), Spain (300,000), Great Britain (260,000) and the 
United States (250,000). Ukraine is equal in the size of its 
armed forces and quantity of arms to its three Western 
neighbors--Poland, Czechoslovakia and Hungary. 
  Even though the CFE Treaty reduces the quantity of 
conventional arms in Europe considerably, too many arms remain 
on the continent as before. The ceilings established by the 
Treaty make it possible to conduct large-scale military 
operations. Even after the fulfillment of all of the provisions 
of the Treaty, there will be more tanks in Europe than there 
were in 1945. 
  This situation makes it possible to conclude that Russia 
requires a strategic reserve of highly mobile conventional 
forces located close to the Urals that would make it possible to 
"project" force within its territory. This approach could also 
include the preliminary stockpiling of some heavy weapons and 
hardware in the three most important theaters, but rules out the 
permanent placement of large-scale, fully deployed forces close 
to the border. 
  The conclusion could thus be drawn that the consequences of 
the Cold War have still not been entirely overcome. Potential 
risks remain that threaten a resurgence of military 
confrontation, including the possibility of an arms race among 
the former Soviet republics. The CFE Treaty should thus be 
considered a first step, rather than the end point, in a radical 
transformation of military structures and policies "from 
Vancouver to Vladivostok." 
  The geopolitical position of Russia makes impossible the 
successful regulation of international relations in a multipolar 
world without the participation of Russia. And although Russia 
may not be a "superpower," it will be one of the most important 
participants in efforts to maintain international peace and 
stability. 
<H8>  Russian-American Interaction in the Military Sphere </H8>
  The third circle of interests encompasses the relations of 
Russia with the West, and first and foremost the United States. 
It should be emphasized that the participation of Russia in 
European and North Atlantic integration, aside from the military 
aspects of these ties, could prove decisive for the development 
of democratic institutions and a market economy within the 
Russian Federation itself. If Russia ends up outside the 
boundaries of the integration processes, its economic progress 
will be called into question, and the "Euroasian nature" could 
take on an Asiatic coloration. 
  Russia has virtually no vitally important interests of a 
global nature beyond the limits of these three circles. It is 
doubtful that events in South America or Africa have any direct 
consequences for Russia. The Russian Federation, however, as one 
of the great powers, cannot evade its responsibility to 
participate in activity to maintain peace, or even to establish 
peace, under the flag of the UN. 
  Russia, of course, should not disarm unilaterally. In 
sharply 
reducing its military efforts, is will nonetheless preserve a 
substantial military potential that should be re-oriented toward 
countering the dangers than could arise in the future on its 
southern and eastern borders. The military threat on the part of 
the United States is in need of reassessment. 
  Russia will be able, even after radical cutbacks in 
strategic 
nuclear weapons (by 75--80 percent compared to today's levels), 
to maintain conditions of mutually assured destruction with the 
United States. This gives a special nature to Russian-American 
relations. 
  Extremely delicate joint management of the brittle strategic 
balance that the United States and Russia have inherited from 
the prior historical period is consequently necessary. Russia 
will maintain sufficient capability in the next decade to 
guarantee retribution against the United States. But the forms, 
and even the substance, of mutual nuclear restraint between the 
two countries could be fundamentally altered. Russia and the 
United States, in the long run, have a host of points of 
coincidence of interests in relation to questions of 
military-political stability, and Russian-American strategic 
relations could potentially be markedly different than the 
relations between the United States and the USSR. 
  The national security interests of Russia and the United 
States would not seem to be mutually exclusive. 
  The disappearance of the ideological sources of the Cold 
War, 
on the one hand, will hardly lead to a clash of the geopolitical 
interests of Russia and the United States. In a multipolar world 
these two countries, on the other hand, could share such 
fundamental interests as averting the proliferation of nuclear 
weapons and the means of delivering them, or restraining the 
challenges of new power centers. Russia will of course remain 
the sole power in the foreseeable future able to threaten the 
national existence of the United States (and vice versa). That 
ability, however, should not necessarily be a cause of rivalry 
between the two countries. The common and parallel interests of 
the two states could help not only to control, but also to 
reduce and ease, the elements of rivalry in relations between 
them. 
  The process of military disconnection of Russia and the 
United States that has started in Europe could also affect the 
Far East. Even though Russian-American interaction in this 
region as a whole lags behind their interaction on a number of 
other problems in world politics, it cannot be ruled out that 
the conclusion of the INF, CFE and START treaties will have a 
positive effect on their mutual relations in that area of the 
world as well. 
  Russia and the United States could acquire certain parallel 
interests under the new conditions, connected with the specific 
forms of collaboration to maintain strategic stability and 
reinforce international peace. 
  Possible components of a future Russian-American regime of 
mutual security are: 
  the uncoupling of armed forces in those regions where 
they are immediately opposing each other, and where a danger of 
the outbreak of military operations exists; 
  the restriction of some types of military activity, 
including the scale and areas of military exercises etc.; 
  transparency measures, including confidence-building 
measures and the monitoring and verification of international 
agreements; 
  quantitative cutbacks in armed forces and armaments; 
  limitations on the qualitative arms race; 
  a transition to military doctrines of a defensive 
nature; 
  the creation of a multilateral mechanism to reinforce 
global and regional security. 
  The goal of the next stage could be achieving maximum 
predictability in the behavior of the nations, through practical 
collaboration in the sphere of security. This task requires 
joint decision-making to dismantle the mechanism of military 
confrontation inherited from the Cold War. Even though cutbacks 
in the accumulated arms will remain an important task in the 
future, the main goal will become the creation of a mechanism 
for joint decision-making, not only on cutbacks or bans of 
existing armaments, but also limitations on military scientific 
research and experimental design, coordination of cutbacks in 
military spending and organization of the profound conversion of 
the military industry. Mutual security will require the 
coordination of Russian and American plans for the deployment of 
new arms, i.e. the joint determination of which types 
of new arms could be deployed and which not. Interaction in the 
military sphere should lose its threatening nature and begin to 
be based on cooperative and non-confrontational principles. 
  The creation of a mechanism of mutual security will require: 
  the institutionalization of the negotiation process; 
  the joint assessment of threats; 
  the adoption of mutually acceptable criteria for the 
deployment of new arms systems (negotiations before rather than 
after deployment); 
  collaboration in assisting in the development of 
regional plans for arms control, utilizing the experience and 
some methods of the agreements between the USSR and the United 
States and European arms control treaties. 
  The nature and intensity of the interaction between Russia 
and the United States in the sphere of military security could 
thus move in the future beyond the framework not only of the 
Cold War, but of detente as well. The new model of mutual 
relations will be reminiscent in many respects of collaboration 
between allies. Arms control, however, cannot and should not be 
aimed at creating a military alliance of the traditional type. 
Such an alliance, after all, would require a common enemy, while 
the new international situation makes a search for common 
enemies unnecessary. The task arises in a mutually dependent 
world of joint counteraction to common threats in such spheres 
as global ecological catastrophe, hunger, disease and the like. 
  Let us consider the prospects for concrete collaboration 
between Russia and the United States in this decade. 
  A. The joint resolution of common problems of the nuclear 
inheritance 
  The paramount task is the creation of a mechanism for the 
resolution of problems connected with the joint resolution of 
common problems of the nuclear inheritance. The strategic arms 
that both countries have today are of an inherently competitive 
nature, they are opposed to each other. A dangerous policy of 
rivalry in the realm of strategic weapons could thus force both 
sides to continue the arms race even under conditions where both 
sides do not have hostile intentions or a clash of interests, 
and could lead to a resurgence of political tensions between the 
United States and Russia. 
  It is clearly impossible to get away from the mutual nuclear 
restraint that was institutionalized during the Cold War, 
insofar as both sides today possess forces that have been 
optimized for just such a form of strategic interaction. The 
problem thus consists of whether it is possible to strengthen 
strategic stability qualitatively within the framework of the 
system of mutual nuclear restraint in the short run, as well as 
whether Russia and the United States will move beyond the model 
of mutual nuclear restraint and move toward relations that are 
based on other principles. 
  The START-2 Treaty could largely facilitate an improvement 
in 
strategic stability under conditions of the end of the Cold War. 
The decision to destroy a large quantity of strategic arms of a 
counterbalancing nature and able to destroy heavily protected 
targets in a short time, together with the decision last year to 
destroy or put away a large quantity of tactical nuclear 
weapons, provides an opportunity for a considerable 
strengthening of mutual nuclear restraint not only through 
cutbacks, but through fundamental changes in the structure of 
the strategic forces as well. 
  Russia has agreed to eliminate MIRVed ICBMs, which was a 
significant concession to the United States since Russia is 
deprived of the opportunity to make a pre-emptive counterforce 
strike. All of the missiles in Ukraine and Kazakhstan are being 
destroyed under that decision as well. The United States will 
thus be left with 500 ICBMs in single-warhead versions, and 
Russia with up to 500 SS-25 road-mobile ICBMs and approximately 
400--500 single-warhead ICBMs in launch silos. 
  The United States has also made a significant concession in 
agreeing to cut back the quantity of warheads on its 
submarine-launched ballistic missiles to a level identical with 
Russia (1,700--1,750 warheads), to reduce the number of warheads 
on the D-5 submarine-launched ballistic missiles by half and to 
halt production of the W-88 warhead, which would have converted 
the D-5 missiles into an excellent counterforce weapon able to 
destroy heavily protected targets in a short time. 
  This agreement will make possible a substantial 
strengthening 
of strategic stability. The new structure and composition of the 
Russian and American nuclear forces rules out a series of former 
scenarios of escalation, and gives no advantages in a preventive 
strike. This signifies that the United States and Russia will 
move toward more stable mutual relations. Even though mutual 
nuclear restraint remains, it will be altered in substance, 
being redirected toward averting war and not controlling 
escalation. 
  These new mutual relations in the strategic sphere provide 
an 
opportunity to reject the concept of the reciprocal strike, 
reduce the degree of combat readiness of the strategic forces 
and move to a clear-cut stance of adherence to an exclusively 
answering strike. Such a transformation could be accompanied by 
broad, bilateral verification and monitoring measures. 
  A whole series of possible steps exists in this sphere that 
could be taken by Russia and the United States on a bilateral 
basis: 
  1. The creation of a permanent mechanism of political and 
military consultations to observe the everyday activity of the 
strategic forces. 
  This could include the creation of permanent liaison 
missions 
at the General Staff of the Armed Forces in Moscow, at the Joint 
Chiefs of Staff in Washington and the command-and-control 
centers of the strategic forces of the respective countries. 
  Regular meetings could also be held by working groups to 
discuss issues connected with interaction in the realm of 
strategic forces, and to exchange information on nuclear 
planning (including question of the distribution of targets) and 
procurements of nuclear arms. 
  2. Both countries could strengthen currently existing 
national means of early warning of a missile attack through 
certain joint measures. 
  This could include the joint launching and use of 
early-warning satellites that could provide both sides with 
information in real time, and could also become the core of a 
global surveillance system. 
  Collaboration in the realm of early warning could include 
automated or non-automated radar stations or sensors (optimized 
exclusively for the detection of missile launches) at missile 
bases and ballistic-missile submarine bases. This would create 
unprecedented mutual openness in the most sensitive realm of the 
national security of both nations. 
  3. It is also possible to reduce the degree of combat 
readiness for all or most of the strategic forces of Russia and 
the United States through: 
  removing from combat alert duty, as soon as possible, 
all arms whose destruction is envisaged by the START-1 and 
START-2 treaties; 
  removing all nuclear charges (cruise missiles, 
non-guided bombs, short-range missiles) from heavy bombers and 
storing them separately from the aircraft; 
  removing from combat alert duty all except a small 
quantity (100, for example) of single-warhead missiles in the 
future; 
  reducing the number of ballistic-missile submarines 
that are on combat patrol; 
  reducing the degree of combat readiness of ballistic 
missiles on the ballistic-missile submarines that are at bases; 
  restricting the combat-patrol areas of the 
ballistic-missile submarines. 
  4. The restriction of dangerous military action against 
strategic facilities of both countries could also have a very 
important stabilizing effect. The sides could agree to certain 
"rules of the game" relative to those general-purpose forces 
that could cause serious losses of the other side. It could be 
agreed, for example, not to conduct air force or naval exercises 
close to the bases of strategic forces, which would create 
additional guarantees. 
  The creation of "security zones" for ballistic-missile 
submarines (areas into which the ASW forces of the other side 
could not enter) could also be a useful and important step. 
  5. Collaboration in the realm of the safe servicing, 
storage, 
transport and dismantling of nuclear warheads. Continuing 
efforts in this area could help resolve a serious problem 
connected with the fact that both sides are to destroy, within a 
relatively short time, a total of up to 30,000 tactical and 
strategic nuclear warheads. The large expenditures for these 
purposes should not force Russia and the United States to slow 
this process. The absence of Russian-American collaboration in 
this realm, aside from this, could be made use of by Ukraine and 
other former Soviet republics in order to keep the national 
warheads on their territory from being withdrawn. 
  6. The necessity also exists of coordinating efforts in the 
realm of national research. The development of new types of 
nuclear arms does not seem necessary today, which makes it 
possible to halt nuclear testing entirely. This is necessary in 
order to preserve and strengthen the regime of nuclear 
non-proliferation. 
  These agreements will clearly give Russia and the United 
States an opportunity to move beyond the framework of relations 
of mutual nuclear restraint. The possibility of mutual 
destruction is preserved, but it does not necessarily require 
being locked into a confrontational system of mutual relations. 
The example of the relations of Great Britain and France shows 
that mutual restraint is not the sole possible variation even 
with the availability of nuclear weapons. 
  B. Monitoring the transfer of arms and military technology 
  The transition from a bipolar to a multipolar world entails 
processes of diffusion of military force. The cutbacks in 
strategic and conventional arms of Russia and the United States 
are eroding the enormous advantage that they had over all other 
countries during the Cold War. The cutbacks in this excessive 
force potential are inevitable and play a useful role, giving 
the United States and Russia an opportunity to be occupied with 
more important domestic priorities. Neither the one country nor 
the other wants other nations to replace them as "superpowers," 
or to reach a level of military might equal to them. That is why 
they they want to limit the augmentation of the military 
potential of other power centers, and to establish monitoring of 
the global process of the diffusion of military force. The two 
countries thus have one field of overall fundamental security 
interests as pertains to controlling the new, multipolar balance 
of forces. 
  1. The first challenge in this case is connected with the 
necessity of preventing the destruction of the Nuclear 
Non-Proliferation Treaty. The restraining nature of nuclear 
weapons could make them a unique means of a "great equalizing of 
opportunities" that does not correspond to the interests of the 
United States and Russia. The non-proliferation treaty played a 
very important role in limiting the number of members of the 
nuclear club. The new situation, however, creates a threat to 
the treaty. 
  That is why it is important to achieve the inclusion of 
Ukraine and the other republics of the former Union in the 
treaty as non-nuclear states as soon as possible. Such an 
understanding could be expressed by an invitation to those 
states by the United States, Russia and Great Britain to sign 
the Non-Proliferation Treaty by a certain date. If they refuse 
to do that, the rise of political and economic pressure is 
possible. 
  2. The strengthening of the non-proliferation regime could 
also require measures to improve the system of guarantees of the 
IAEA, which could include much tighter monitoring of the whole 
cycle of existence of the plutonium and other radioactive 
materials necessary for the production a a nuclear weapon. The 
violators of that regime should be subjected to sanctions by the 
world community. 
  The deep cutbacks in the current arsenals of strategic and 
tactical nuclear weapons that exist in the United States and 
Russia leaves at their disposal an enormous quantity of 
components necessary for their production, although neither of 
the sides will have any need for it. Since there is currently no 
regime for monitoring the dismantling of warheads, both 
countries could without difficulty come to an agreement relative 
to the procedures to verify the the fact that the radioactive 
materials extracted are not being used to produce weapons. 
Sealing and inspection at warehouses could provide substantial 
guarantees of this. 
  This will make it possible to achieve tighter control over 
plutonium by the IAEA over other countries. 
  3. The necessity exists for Russian-American collaboration 
to 
eliminate the possibility of the proliferation of other types of 
weapons of mass destruction [WMD], which are easier and cheaper 
for the non-developed countries to obtain. 
  The financial and technological problems in implementing the 
Soviet-American agreement on chemical weapons that face Russia 
should not postpone the destruction of chemical weapons. A 
global ban on chemical weapons is impossible without this. 
  The United States should consequently grant Russia the 
necessary assistance in order to destroy its chemical arms at 
the stipulated times. The Americans should also be more flexible 
with regard to commercial secrets in the chemical industry. 
  4. The control of the proliferation of ballistic missiles 
that are potential means of delivering WMD is yet another 
important area in the collaboration of the United States and 
Russia. 
  Russia, on the other hand, is still not yet a full-fledged 
participant in the multilateral control regime for the transfer 
of technology for the creation of ballistic missiles. This lack 
of clarity relative to the Russian stance is leading to the 
appearance of problems such as the sale of missiles to India. 
Russia must thus officially become a member of that regime. 
  The current regime is imperfect, however. Iraq and some 
other 
countries were able to increase the operational radius of 
short-range missiles successfully. It is clearly necessary to 
cut back the maximum possible range of the missiles being 
supplied to 100 km or even less. Otherwise a whole series of 
countries will be able to bring their range to 500 km by 
improving the missiles. 
  A great deal of attention should also be paid to the problem 
of cruise missiles, especially short- and medium-range 
sea-launched cruise missiles, whose proliferation started with 
the substantial build-up of the naval forces of many countries. 
  5. The end of the Cold War in Europe and the Treaty on 
Conventional Forces and Weapons in Europe have reduced the 
requirements of the industrially developed countries for many 
types of conventional weapons (tanks, armored personnel 
carriers, artillery systems, combat aircraft and attack 
helicopters). 
  This will provide a significant impetus for the defense 
sectors of those countries to expand exports of products in 
order to avoid shutting down enterprises. The importance of the 
arms market in the Third World will thus increase, and new and 
modern conventional arms will end up in the most explosive 
regions, such as the Near East. 
  The coordination of Russian and American policies thus seems 
essential in order to avert the military strengthening of such 
centers of power as China, India and some of the countries in 
the Near East. 
  The necessity of some common approaches exists for Russia 
and 
the United States. This could lead to the appearance of an 
agreement to split the market. Other weapons exporters could 
also be included in this system of collaboration. 
  The necessity of cutbacks and restructuring in the armed 
forces and the regulation and monitoring of the transfer of arms 
and military technology signifies that military production 
should be cut back radically, and that a considerable number of 
personnel be discharged from the armed forces. This requires 
taking the appropriate socio-economic steps, which are moreover 
extremely expensive. 
  C. Collaboration in maintaining international peace 
  The end of ideological confrontation, with its mutual 
negation, has opened up the way to a new partnership in the 
interests of maintaining international security. The principal 
tasks in the sphere of international security and arms control 
at the global level are: 
  not permitting the proliferation and use of nuclear, 
chemical or biological weapons and the means of delivering them; 
  taking confidence-building steps and creating a regime 
of transparency in the military sphere in order to prevent a 
surprise attack; 
  strengthening regional security for the purpose of 
reducing military tensions; 
  restraining the quantitative and qualitative arms race 
in order to reduce the possibility of broad-scale military 
conflicts; 
  averting the escalation of regional conflicts and 
border clashes; 
  reducing the influence of internal political conflicts 
on international relations; 
  creating conditions for the political settlement of 
regional conflicts. 
  The resurrection of the role of the United Nations makes it 
possible to hope seriously that it will be able to perform its 
functions in the sphere of security as defined in the UN Charter 
more effectively, and which were blocked during the Cold War 
years. The UN, in a multipolar world, could become the most 
effective means of ensuring global and regional stability and 
peace, if it is supported in full by the United States, Russia 
and the other great nations. The functions of the UN could 
include: 
  giving security guarantees to all regional nations on 
the basis of Security Council resolutions; 
  exercising the functions of monitoring and tracking the 
military situation in a region; 
  regulating the deliveries of arms and military 
technology; 
  serving as a political intermediary between 
participants in a conflict; 
  offering diplomatic and technical assistance to carry 
out regional measures to build trust; 
  observing the fulfillment of those provisions of 
regional agreements on arms control that go beyond the bounds of 
the region; 
  sending in UN multinational forces, if the nations of 
the region consider it necessary. 
  An effective role for the UN in maintaining international 
peace will likely require the resurrection or the de 
facto creation anew of the UN Military Staff Committee and 
the organization of its subordinate structures, which could 
include three levels. 
  The first level will evidently consist of 
permanent peacekeeping UN forces, with the participation of 
chiefly neutral and non-aligned nations (such as Ghana and 
Fiji). These forces could be financed by the UN and placed 
partly by agreement of the concerned parties in a region. The 
stationing of the troops of the great powers is hardly expedient 
for these purposes. 
  The second level could include a system of staff 
and rear support for sea and air transport and communications, 
which could be used in the event UN troops are necessary. 
  The third level could include the formal 
allocation of certain national armed forces of the great powers 
among the permanent members of the Security Council, which could 
be put into action by a resolution of the Security Council in 
the event an emergency situation arises. 
  The participation of Russia and the United States in UN 
forces could be limited principally to staff and rear support 
and the like. It should be clear on a political level, however, 
that the UN multinational forces could count on the full 
military might of those nations and the other permanent members 
of the Security Council if an aggressor decides to use force 
against the UN permanent forces. This role assumes the automatic 
participation of the great powers in the event of an escalation 
of aggression. This does not, however, require the stationing of 
major forces in the regions. 
  In the event of a large-scale aggression along the lines of 
the Iraqi attack on Kuwait, forces that were allotted in 
advance--including, for example, airborne assault forces and 
U.S. Marines, Russian air-mobile forces and those of other 
nations--could be put into action quickly so as to halt the 
aggression and establish peace. The creation of small, standing 
multinational naval forces under the UN flag is also possible, 
so as to guarantee the freedom of sea lines of communication. 
American and Russian participation could be more substantial in 
that case. 
  Regular interaction, including the holding of maneuvers with 
the participation of the forces placed at the disposal of the UN 
for emergency situations, is naturally essential for the 
effective functioning of such a mechanism. Russian-American 
interaction under a multilateral aegis could prove more 
effective than on a bilateral basis. 
  COPYRIGHT: Vooruzheniye, Politika, Konversiya 1993 No 1 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46573 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Geopolitics and Security </F>
<H3> <TI>   Some Issues of Military-Technical Policy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Some Issues of Military-Technical Policy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0312E Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 2, 1993 (Signed to press 12 May 93) pp 29-33--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0312E </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Marshal of the Soviet Union Viktor Georgiyevich </F>
Kulikov and General of the Army Makhmut Akhmetovich Gareyev: 
"Some Issues of Military-Technical Policy"] 
  [Text] Viktor Georgiyevich Kulikov is a participant 
of the Great Patriotic War, he completed the Military Academy 
imeni M.V. Frunze in 1953 and the Military Academy of the 
General Staff in 1959. He was Commander-in-Chief of the Group of 
Soviet Forces in Germany in 1969-1971, Chief of the General 
Staff in 1971-1977, and was Commander-in-Chief of the Warsaw 
Treaty Member-States Allied Military Forces from 1977 through 
1989. At the present time, he is an advisor under the USSR 
Ministry of Defense. Viktor Georgiyevich is a Hero of the Soviet 
Union and has been decorated with many orders of the USSR and of 
foreign states. 
  Makhmut Akhmetovich Gareyev is a participant of the 
Great Patriotic War, he completed the Military Academy imeni 
M.V. Frunze in 1950 and the Military Academy of the General 
Staff in 1959. He was Urals Military District Chief of Staff 
from 1971-1973. He was Chief of the Military-Scientific 
Directorate -- Deputy Chief of the General Staff Main 
Directorate in 1974-1984, Deputy Chief of the General Staff in 
1984-1988, and Chief Military Advisor to the Republic of 
Afghanistan in 1989-1990. 
  He is a doctor of military sciences, professor, member 
of the Academy of Natural Sciences, author of 60 scientific 
works, including the books "M.V. Frunze -- voyennyy teoretik" 
[M.V. Frunze -- Military Theoretician], and "obshchevoyskovyye 
ucheniya" [Combined-Arms Exercises]. M.A. Gareyev has been 
decorated with orders of the USSR. 
  There were definite achievements and serious shortcomings in 
the military-technical policy of the Soviet state. In our 
country, concern about arms development and the technical 
equipment of the army and navy was considered to the most 
important state task and all national economic activity was 
subordinated to the interests of carrying out that task. 
However, for some time expenditures for military needs exceeded 
all reasonable limits, as a result of which not only the economy 
but also the technological base of defense itself turned out to 
be undermined. The absence of a systems approach to the 
resolution of defense problems was one of the primary causes of 
this: political, economic and military-technical issues were 
resolved in isolation from each other in a number of cases. The 
absence of an integrated military-technical policy concept that 
takes into account all of these factors resulted in the fact 
that many arms development issues were resolved without the 
proper foresight and were extremely extravagant in an economic 
sense. And the fact that a military-technical policy concept is 
being developed for the first time in the Russian Federation is 
a definite guarantee that the task of the technical equipment of 
the army and the navy in subsequent years will be carried out in 
a more intelligent, purposeful, and rational manner. However, 
the problems that must lie at the foundation of 
military-technical policy so far remain unclear. Let's cite two 
examples. 
  The 7th Russian Federation Congress of People's Deputies 
Decree tasked the Armed Forces with the following main missions: 
  deterrence from unleashing any wars that are directed 
against 
Russia through the presence of strategic nuclear forces; and, 
  efficient neutralization of military conflicts using highly 
mobile general purpose forces. 
  The decree does not provide for the readiness of the Armed 
Forces to repel large-scale aggression. But under that approach, 
the armed forces must be capable of inflicting a retaliatory 
strike with unacceptable losses for the enemy for deterrence 
"from unleashing any wars". This will be impossible with the 
planned strategic nuclear forces reductions and the weakening of 
our antimissile warning system and especially in the event of 
the development of an antiballistic missile (ABM) defense system 
on the territory of the United States. Therefore, we will have 
to, as some people suggest, shift to the concept adopted in the 
United States and in NATO as a whole which envisions that a 
nuclear first strike will be inflicted in response to any 
aggression (including with the employment of conventional 
weapons). Then we need to review our military doctrine and 
military-technical policy which is inadvisable for political and 
other considerations. It is advisable to also take into account 
the readiness to repel large-scale aggression in order to 
prevent having to resort to such extreme measures and at the 
same time to guarantee the country's military security. Even 
though the direct threat of large-scale aggression does not 
exist right now, it is impossible to completely exclude it. 
  Another example. The draft military reform program is 
unambiguously oriented toward the preservation of the 
five-service system of the Armed Forces and the shift to three 
Armed Forces services is envisioned only at the second-third 
stages of military reform. But each Armed Forces service will 
develop command and control systems and equipment for all of 
these years, while proceeding from the existing organization. 
Already right now the Air Force, PVO [Air Defense], and the 
Ground Forces automated command and control systems do not 
connect to each other. What will occur in the future? The more 
time that passes, the more difficult it will be to emerge from 
these dead end situations. Therefore, already right now we need 
to lay the foundation for and develop a command and control 
system for the future Armed Forces organizational structure and 
we don't need to accomplish that task by Armed Forces service, 
but centralize it in the hands of the General Staff and the 
first deputy minister of defense staff. 
  These and other examples attest to the fact that not 
everything is being coordinated with military-political and 
strategic considerations in the military-technical policy that 
is being developed. Therefore, we need to precisely define some 
military-political tenets on some issues (for example, from the 
point of view of Armed Forces readiness to repel large-scale 
aggression) and on others -- bring military-technical policy 
into compliance with these precepts. Special scientific-research 
work is needed to comprehensively research what kind of real 
threats to Russia can emerge, what missions its Armed Forces 
must be prepared to accomplish, and what the nature of armed 
combat could be. Only while taking this into account will we be 
able to judge what kind of Armed Forces are needed and what 
their technical equipment should be. 
  It is impossible to judge the criteria of the sufficiency of 
defense and the substantiation of the military-technical policy 
in the abstract. We can specifically resolve these issues only 
once we have determined what strategic missions the Armed Forces 
will have to accomplish. 
  While proceeding from the future missions and actual 
economic 
capabilities of the state, it is advisable to concentrate the 
primary efforts in military-technical policy on the resolution 
of two interrelated tasks. First of all, in the near future we 
must make our main emphasis on the creation of a cadre nucleus 
of well-equipped, flexibly-commanded and controlled, and 
professionally trained Armed Forces that have been reduced in 
effective combat strength and, in military-technical policy -- 
on increasing the effectiveness of scientific-research and 
design work that is targeted at the development of highly 
effective types of weapons and military equipment. 
  Second, in the future we need to be prepared to mobilize and 
deploy larger Armed Forces, to create the required reserves of 
weapons and to transition the defense industry to a wartime 
footing for the technical equipment of the army and navy with 
the calculation of ensuring readiness to repel large-scale 
aggression. 
  While considering the incomparability of our national income 
with the world's leading states, in military-technical policy it 
is important not to embark on a course of weapons and equipment 
development that is dictated by other states and not to attempt 
to develop everything that they have as it frequently occurred 
in the past. It is desirable to determine our own, more 
advantageous for us, path based upon a scientific prediction of 
arms development. The primary task in this sphere is to 
determine the direction of development and the primary 
specifications of new generation weapons which will occupy a 
dominant position in the future. While taking this into account, 
as a minimum we need to terminate the development and design of 
those types of weapons, command and control and support systems 
that do not meet contemporary effectiveness requirements. We 
also need to gradually retune the production of the defense 
sectors of industry in that direction and, naturally, there must 
be a thorough accounting of military-economic considerations to 
achieve a decisive concentration of our technical and production 
efforts to priority future weapons. 
  In our country, there previously was an obvious 
overestimation of the effectiveness of our defense industry, 
especially from the point of view of the economic indicators of 
new types of weapons and equipment and unjustifiably large 
expenditures for the maintenance of numerous KB's [Design 
Bureaus], NII's [Scientific Research Institutes] and test 
ranges. And the lag behind the NATO countries that exists right 
now in intelligence, communications, navigation and weapons 
guidance systems and in computer and electronic equipment in 
general is still not being properly assessed. There has long 
been a need for a comprehensive study of the state of affairs in 
the defense sectors of industry by a special qualified 
commission with the subsequent adoption of the appropriate 
measures not only with the goal of conversion but also for 
increasing the effectiveness of the operations of enterprises 
for the country's defense. Defense enterprises could earn more 
resources for the resolution of future defense tasks, without 
resorting to additional state appropriations, with the rational 
implementation of conversion, the reduction of the gross output 
of weapons being produced, and an increase of the production of 
scarce civilian goods. 
  We first of all need to eliminate the lag in circuitry and 
other modern technologies in order to overcome our lagging 
behind in the sphere of electronics, computer equipment, 
detection and command and control systems, and precision-guided 
weapons. To do that, major government decisions are needed on 
the concentration of financial resources and scientific forces. 
  At the present time, the scientific-research institutions 
that operate in the defense sphere are dispersed and not 
powerful. Major research centers are needed with the 
concentration in them of the most talented scientists and the 
provision of the maximum material incentives for their 
activities. We also need new organs in the system of government 
and the military industrial complex (MIC) which would head this 
work. In a word, half measures or the ordinary improvement of 
existing structures are inadequate in this sphere. Such 
fundamental steps and such a concentration of financial, 
material, administrative and scientific efforts are needed that 
would ensure a quantum leap in the sphere of mastery of the most 
important technologies for the development of future types of 
weapons and military equipment in the next 5-10 years. 
  We would like to once again direct attention to certain 
aspects of military-technical policy. First of all this is the 
improvement of military-technical information, coordination of 
the process of its extraction, and dissemination of innovations 
in the sphere of promising technologies and weapons both within 
the country and abroad to scientific and industrial 
organizations. In the developed capitalist countries, many 
private firms and corporations, along with the intelligence 
services, conduct industrial espionage. In our country, we will 
not be ready to do that very soon. Therefore, we need to step up 
work to extract needed information in the sphere of leading 
technology. It is impossible to collect information in an 
abstract manner. Military-technical information is needed to 
resolve certain tasks for the development of industrial 
technology and arms. The most qualified special organs are 
incapable of completely knowing and taking into account all of 
the information requirements on various spheres of activity and 
of ascertaining to which question they need to provide an 
answer. All the more so that general information (which is 
occurring right now) is not needed in scientific and practical 
work but information is needed first of all on such problems, 
the resolution of which comes up against the absence of new 
knowledge and the search for ways to resolve them. The need for 
such information, its deep essence and various nuances are 
revealed only with the specific examination of some or other 
issues in the course of their scientific research and practical 
resolution. And they are best of all seen by those who are 
directly involved with them. 
  While considering all of this, it is exceptionally important 
that the interested organs of rule and NII's, while proceeding 
from actual requirements and in accordance with their 
competence, assign the tasks, define the requirements or 
requests, and submit requests for the kinds of information they 
specifically need. 
  Further, in contrast to the United States, the 
underestimation of the modernization of existing types of 
weapons, the production and supply of spare parts to the troops, 
and the coordination of technical support and operation of 
weapons and equipment was a weak spot in our military-technical 
policy of past years. The number of failures, accidents and 
catastrophes significantly increased, weapons and equipment 
operating periods were shortened, and their combat effectiveness 
was reduced as a result of the inadequate training of compulsory 
service military personnel. 
  With the examination of the issue on the coordination of 
Armed Forces technical support, it is desirable to ensure that 
we overcome the main deficiency in this sphere -- the artificial 
interruption of the development of weapons, weapons orders and 
responsibility for weapons operation and maintenance in the 
troops and in the fleets. This permitted the military industrial 
complex to force everything that they produced on the army and 
navy. We need the organs of rule that are involved with the 
development of weapons to be responsible for the operation and 
maintenance of weapons and equipment. Then they will more 
responsibly and strictly approach their orders and purchases. 
  Right now a quite well substantiated policy is being 
conducted toward the formation of a Russian Federation 
independent military-technical policy. At the same time, we need 
to take into the account the cooperation that has developed in 
the production of the most important types of weapons within the 
CIS. Therefore, it is advisable for the military-technical 
policy concept to provide for, on the one hand, measures for the 
maintenance of cooperation and the founding of joint ventures 
with the CIS countries and, on the other hand, to conduct, in 
the future and when possible, a policy toward the restoration on 
Russian territory of the most needed enterprises without which 
we cannot get by. The creation of new shops under plants which 
need component items that were previously supplied from other 
republics appears to be most advantageous. 
  While considering the enormous significance of 
military-technical policy, the Russian Federation President -- 
the Supreme Commander-in-Chief of the Armed Forces and the 
Government -- needs to define it in accordance with the state's 
military policy and economic capabilities based on the Law on 
Defense and the Law on National Security that were adopted by 
the Russian Federation Supreme Soviet. 
  The primary military security issues must be resolved while 
taking into account national security interests as a whole and 
be examined in the Security Council within these limits. The 
problems of defense are scattered and cannot always be 
adequately resolved in a purposeful manner in the overall mass 
of many issues (economic, information, ecological security, and 
others). Therefore, besides the Security Council, it is 
advisable to have a Defense Council under the Russian Federation 
President that is made up of the highest officials who are 
responsible for defense matters. We could have, under the 
Defense Council, a team of consultants (experts) to render 
skilled assistance from among the experienced military leaders 
who lead designers and scientists. 
  We should also preserve state rule of the defense industry. 
Obviously, it will be impossible to totally transfer to a market 
economy in the defense industry in a short period of time. The 
primary defense enterprises will remain state property for a 
long time yet as it is being done in certain Western countries. 
Therefore, a government organ is needed (of the military 
industrial complex type with more limited functions than 
previously) which would be involved with the coordination of the 
activities of defense enterprises. The Russian Defense Industry 
Committee that exists at the present time is incapable of 
accomplishing this task in a full-fledged manner. The Ministry 
of Defense, jointly with other state organs and representatives 
of the defense industry, should actively participate in the 
development of the military-technical policy and play a leading 
role in the determination of the prospects for arms development, 
their production programs, and the priorities for the technical 
equipment of the army and navy. 
  Right now, in principle, the correct course has been taken 
that the Ministry of Defense is becoming the customer of all 
types of weapons and equipment. This will permit it to overcome 
the former weak spot in the implementation of military-technical 
policy when the military industrial complex in a number of cases 
forced on the Armed Forces not those weapons and command and 
control systems that were needed but those that were more 
advantageous to produce. The monopolistic position of the 
industrial enterprises and the absence of competition resulted 
in price increases for military products and a technological lag 
behind the leading Western countries. 
  Under conditions of the market economy, the transition to 
the 
new system, when all arms orders will be carried out through the 
Ministry of Defense, requires a more powerful and ramified staff 
which would develop the arms program, coordinate 
military-technical research and development of new types of 
weapons, track the work of various design bureaus and the 
production capabilities of enterprises, distribute orders, 
conclude contracts, participate in the testing and selection of 
new models of weapons, implement financing of NIOKR [scientific 
research and experimental design work] and military orders, and 
resolve many other issues. For example, in the United States, 
the staff that accomplishes these tasks numbers over 25,000 
people and, along with lawyers and temporarily hired experts -- 
up to 50,000 people. 
  For decades we have proceeded from F. Engels' provision that 
the development of weapons and equipment determines the 
development of military art. In principle, this provision is 
correct. However, now when weapons are increasing in cost, a 
more active role of military science itself is required which 
must more objectively determine the main directions of arms 
development and substantiate specific operational-strategic and 
tactical requirements and the description of the weapons of the 
future. The impact of the operational-strategic aspect must 
increase. 
  Therefore, at the present time, one of the most important 
problems consists of organizing coordinated work on the 
elaboration of the operational-strategic and military-technical 
ideology of arms development while taking into account the 
military-economic considerations. Only on this basis can we 
implement real program planning of arms development which has 
never occurred in our country and which, unfortunately, still 
hasn't occurred. 
  As we know, in the United States the assignment of 
program-target tasks is carried out at the strategic planning 
level. The Joint Chiefs of Staff, jointly with the leaders of 
the Armed Forces services and other Department of Defense 
agencies and while relying on DARPA (a strategic planning 
agency) research, accomplishes that task. 
  Under our conditions, it is desirable to consolidate the 
leading role of the General Staff in operational-strategic 
aspects and the role of the First Deputy Minister of Defense and 
the chief of weapons on military-technical issues, which must be 
continuously resolved while taking strategic considerations into 
account. 
  With this goal, it appears to be advisable to: 
  have an Armed Forces High Scientific Council in the Ministry 
of Defense under the leadership of the Minister of Defense which 
would examine the most important operational-strategic and 
military-technical problems; 
  unified planning of scientific work in the Armed Forces is 
needed while taking into account strategic, military-technical 
and economic aspects. The General Staff's military-scientific 
directorate, jointly with the chief of weapons directorate and 
other organs of rule, should accomplish this task. 
  In the sense of the implementation of scientific research, 
the High Scientific Council must rely on the Armed Forces 
Structural Development and Reform Directorate, on the General 
Staff Strategic Research Center and the lead military-technical 
scientific-research institute. Reorganization of the entire 
network of scientific-research institutions is also needed. As a 
result of the elimination of the former ministries of the 
defense sectors of industry, we should study the feasibility of 
uniting the more important NII's of industry with the Russian 
Federation Ministry of Defense NIU [Scientific Research 
Directorate]. 
  According to the data of League of Defense Sectors of 
Industry President A.N. Shulunov, at the present time there are 
approximately 3,000 defense enterprises, scientific research and 
design organizations in the Russian Federation. Right now all of 
them to some degree or other are experiencing difficulties with 
finances and are conducting a struggle for survival. This is 
leading not only to the dispersal of resources. Gradually the 
entire defense industry could collapse. Therefore, no matter how 
painful it might be, we need to painstakingly weigh everything, 
assess actual capabilities and make fundamental decisions: what 
NII's, KB's and enterprises to retain and, consequently, to help 
them more and to completely terminate the financing of which 
enterprises, NII's and KB's. Then we can at least save the most 
important. 
  Several words regarding the formation of the military 
budget. 
In the Soviet Union, it was customary that Gosplan, the Ministry 
of Finances, the Ministry of Defense and other sectors 
associated with defense production would compile the requests 
(proposals) on the formation of the defense budget. Then, after 
a complex system of processes and a struggle among themselves 
for the priorities of the various Armed Forces services, the 
proposals that were coordinated with the appropriate departments 
of the CPSU Central Committee and military industrial complex 
were submitted to the Politburo (Defense Council) where the 
decision was ultimately made on the amount and allocation of the 
defense budget. But many expenditures for defense needs (for 
example, on nuclear power engineering and others) went to 
different ministries and were not included in the defense 
budget. Therefore, it would be difficult to judge just how much 
is actually being spent on defense. Only four men practically 
knew the true picture of the military budget: the General 
Secretary, the Council of Ministers Chairman, the Minister of 
Defense, and the Chief of the General Staff. 
  This has impeded a correct assessment of the cost of defense 
and has resulted in each department attempting to grab as much 
as possible for itself. The military industrial complex managed 
to gradually place its own people on the staff of the Central 
Committee, the Council of Ministers, Gosplan and other organs 
and they defended the interests of their "native" sectors of 
industry in isolation from the interests of the matter as a 
whole, sometimes without taking into account the General Staff's 
proposals. 
  The procedures for the formation of the military budget that 
were recently established mainly ensure that the former narrow 
spots are being negotiated and, in principle, appear to be 
acceptable. But three weak spots still remain. 
  First of all, an integrated and substantiated assessment of 
defense expenditures that encompasses all needs and requests has 
not been totally attained; quite a few incidental, unanticipated 
expenditures are emerging; the criteria for accounting for the 
rate of inflation and indexing planned expenditures have not 
been elaborated which disorganizes the entire budget system and 
impedes the conclusion of contracts with defense enterprises. 
  Second, the policy that is being conducted, that is oriented 
first of all on sending resources for the maintenance of the 
army and navy and only that which remains is utilized to 
purchase arms, is implementable in practice only until certain 
limits are reached, and exceeding those limits will result in 
the destruction of the defense industry's viability. We need to 
take into account not only the current but also the future needs 
of the army and industry. 
  Third, and the most dangerous -- is the reduction of 
expenditures for NIOKR. Despite the recognition of NIOKR 
priorities in words, as before we are not attaining the 
concentration of scientific forces and finances for priority 
tasks associated with the development of future weapons. 
  In the United States in the 1970's, the advanced research 
agency's (DARPA) budget was doubled every four years and, in the 
1980's, every two years. The widespread involvement of the most 
talented civilian scientists on contract only for the time of 
the accomplishment of specific research tasks permitted them to 
increase the volume of research work without expanding 
appropriations. 
  In the United States, a new weapon is developed only when an 
existing weapon is not subject to modernization. This provides a 
great savings. For example, the installation of cruise missiles 
on an obsolete B-52 aircraft transformed it into a new strategic 
weapon with minimal expenditures. It is also desirable to 
separate a weapons and equipment modernization program in our 
country, having tied it to the tasks of repairing and supplying 
spare parts and in general with the problem of extending the 
operating periods of weapons and equipment. 
  In our view, these are some considerations and steps that 
should facilitate the improvement of work on the formation of 
the military-technical policy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46574 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Geopolitics and Security </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russia's Security Concept and Military Doctrine </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russia's Security Concept and Military Doctrine </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0312F Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 2, 1993 (Signed to press 12 May 93) pp 34-36--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0312F </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Russian Federation Ministry of Defense </F>
Information-Analysis Center Chief Pavel Semenovich Zolotarev by 
an unidentified VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA 
correspondent: "Russia's Security Concept and Military 
Doctrine"] 
  [Text] Pavel Semenovich Zolotarev completed Kharkov 
Higher Command Engineering School and the Military Academy of 
the General Staff, and he is a candidate of technical sciences. 
After completing the academy, he was assigned Russian Federation 
Ministry of Defense Military Structural Development and Reform 
Directorate liaison chief. The RF Ministry of Defense 
Information-Analysis Center was founded in 1992. Pavel 
Semenovich became its Chief -- Deputy Chief of the Military 
Structural Development and Reform Directorate. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] Pavel Semenovich, I 
recently had the opportunity to meet with many leaders of 
defense enterprises. We all know that the defense industry is in 
an economically difficult position that is associated with the 
reduction of orders. The leaders understand the need for these 
reductions, however, they are making complaints against the 
state which has not defined what it will buy from them. This, as 
I understand it, is associated with the absence of a military 
doctrine in the Russian Federation and with the uncertainty of 
the future structure of our Armed Forces. There probably should 
be an Armed Forces structural development program that will be 
supported by an arms program. What is the situation in the 
Russian Federation on this issue? 
  [Zolotarev] You are correct, the absence of an officially 
adopted Russian military doctrine is already making itself 
known. There never was a military doctrine in the Soviet Union 
as an integrated, officially adopted document that reflects the 
system of fundamental views on the possible nature of war, the 
methods for conducting it, military structural development and 
preparation of the country and the Armed Forces for war. It was 
thought that these issues found adequate reflection in the 
speeches of Party and state leaders and in Party and government 
decisions. Therefore, the question on the need to formulate a 
military doctrine as a separate document was practically never 
raised. All the more so that the opinion existed and exists that 
this approach can also be preserved in Russia. However, that 
point of view is erroneous. And the fact is not only that the 
speeches of the representatives of the federal organs of rule 
are frequently contradictory in nature and cannot permit us to 
compile an integrated picture of views on issues of military 
doctrine. The essence is something else. The period of global 
confrontation of the two ideologies and the two irreconcilable 
systems has quite naturally resulted in adequate clarity of 
doctrinal positions. 
  Now the state's policy in accordance with the RF Law "On 
Security" must be structured while proceeding from the need to 
ensure the protection of the interests of the individual, 
society and the state. Military doctrine must also be 
subordinate to that goal. This approach is characteristic for 
the majority of the world's developed countries. However, it 
suggests the presence of an established mechanism of activity of 
the organs of state rule for the analysis of vitally important 
interests of the individual, society and the state and the 
detection of existing and potential threats to these interests, 
the determination of directions for their neutralization in all 
spheres of security -- economic, military, ecological, etc. 
  These directions are normally reflected in the national 
security concept. In turn, the national security concept must 
serve as the basis for planning the state's activities in the 
spheres of politics, economics, military policy, ecology, etc. 
  In the military policy sphere, the security concept serves 
to 
form the military doctrine and the Armed Forces structural 
development concept. While considering that changes of the 
above-named interests and threats to these interests are 
sufficiently dynamic in nature, the security concept is made 
more precise each year. When necessary, changes are made to 
military doctrine and to the Armed Forces structural development 
concept. 
  Unfortunately, that mechanism of activity of the organs of 
state rule has not yet been formed in Russia. However, we do 
have the fundamental law for the realization of that mechanism. 
That is the Law "On the Security of the Russian Federation". The 
key organ in that system -- the RF Security Council -- is 
building up its capabilities. Therefore, I suggest that in the 
near future our organs of state rule will also operate along 
that same classic scheme as other of the world's most developed 
countries. 
  Nevertheless, in Russian Armed Forces structural development 
we cannot wait until they give us a Russian security concept and 
military doctrine. We are also not waiting. 
  The RF Ministry of Defense Military Structural Development 
and Reform Directorate was formed practically simultaneously 
with the decision on the formation of the Russian Armed Forces 
in May 1992. This was the very first directorate in the Russian 
Ministry of Defense. 
  Two months after the issuance of the RF Presidential Edict 
on 
the Formation of the Russian Armed Forces, their appearance in 
the immediate future and long-term was discussed in the Security 
Council. The Ministry of Defense was assigned the task of 
submitting an Armed Forces structural development concept to the 
RF President by 1 September 1992. 
  The Military Structural Development and Reform Directorate, 
jointly with the General Staff and other Ministry of Defense 
directorates, developed that concept and submitted it for the 
review of the Russian President on 31 August 1992. It did not 
receive official approval but Armed Forces structural 
development is proceeding in accordance with its primary 
provisions. Active work on the military doctrine began during 
the spring of this year under the aegis of the Security Council. 
The Ministry of Defense very actively participated in this work. 
The primary provisions of the Russian military doctrine should 
have been reviewed in the Security Council in October 1993 in 
accordance with the President's task. At the same time, work is 
proceeding in the Ministry of Defense to make more precise the 
previously developed Russian Armed Forces structural development 
concept. So, toward the end of 1993, we will have all of the 
primary documents that define military policy and Armed Forces 
structural development. However, in your question, you linked 
military doctrine and the Armed Forces structural development 
concept with the plan for weapons and military equipment orders. 
The interrelation is obvious but the difficulties with the 
defense order are associated not so much with these documents as 
with the absence of a defense budget and with inadequate 
financing of the Armed Forces. Requirements for weapons and 
military equipment are known but the order is being determined 
not by our requirements but by the state's capabilities. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] Can you note some of 
the 
distinctive features of the draft military doctrine? 
  [Zolotarev] Yes, I can. It encompasses not only the Armed 
Forces, the concept of military force is being introduced which 
includes the Armed Forces, the internal troops, the border 
troops, and all other military security support men and 
equipment which are prescribed by the Law "On Security". 
Therefore, aspects of not only external but also internal 
security are reflected in the military doctrine. 
  The experience of recent years has taught us that the Armed 
Forces should not participate in the resolution of internal 
problems with the exception of participation in the elimination 
of natural disasters, catastrophes, and the transportation of 
required men and equipment to reinforce and supply the internal 
troops but no more. However, it provides for the accomplishment 
of peacekeeping missions by the Armed Forces as it occurred in 
South Osetia, Moldova, and also within the framework of the UN 
decisions in Yugoslavia. 
  The military doctrine is based upon the concept of the 
state's defense capabilities and not on defensive sufficiency. 
Right now we have been compelled to utilize this concept due to 
the severe economic situation in the country. When the economy 
is stronger, then we will probably return to the concept of 
defensive sufficiency. 
  While assessing possible military threats to the state, the 
draft military doctrine views local wars and armed conflicts as 
more probable than a large-scale war. A large-scale war is 
viewed only as a possible variant of the undesirable development 
of an armed conflict or local wars. 
  Primarily deterrent functions are assigned to nuclear 
weapons, that is, they are seen not as a weapon for conducting 
war but as a political weapon that is designed for deterrence 
from unleashing a large-scale war. 
  A section dedicated to the political goals of the 
utilization 
of military force and the state's missions in the sphere of 
defense in peacetime, in a threatened period and in wartime is 
contained in the first portion of the draft military doctrine. 
The new issues of socio-political support of military security 
are included in this section. 
  The second section contains the doctrine's purely military 
bases which reflect the purely military aspect. This section 
characterizes the possible nature of wars and military 
conflicts, the goal of the employment of the Armed Forces, the 
distinctive features of the initial period of war and the 
missions of the Armed Forces in a large war and in military 
conflicts. The principles and directions of military structural 
development are reflected in classic form. The draft doctrine 
does not provide for revolutionary structural changes of the 
Armed Forces. The task is assigned to scientifically 
substantiate, by 1995, military reform until the year 2000, 
while taking into account the state's material and financial 
capabilities. 
  The section on military-technical policy reflects the 
principles of its conduct while considering the fact that the 
form of ownership is changing in our state. The RF 
military-industrial complex's principles of development are 
reflected here. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] What is the fate of the 
Unified Armed Forces that the CIS previously planned to have? 
  [Zolotarev] The cooperation of the RF Armed Forces with the 
armed forces of the states that we call the "near abroad" is 
being carried out both on a bilateral basis and on a 
multilateral basis within the CIS and now within the framework 
of the Treaty on Collective Security. We think that it is this 
Treaty that can and should become the center of 
military-political cooperation of all CIS states. 
  Right now, when all 15 states that signed the treaty on 15 
May 1992 have ratified the Treaty on Collective Security, we 
face the task of more rapidly stepping up the mechanism for its 
implementation. Definite steps in that direction were undertaken 
at the Council of Ministers of Defense and Foreign Affairs 
sessions that recently took place. Specifically, decisions were 
made to reorganize the CIS Unified Armed Forces High Command 
into the CIS Member-States Military Cooperation Coordination 
Staff. We have in mind that this staff will become the working 
organ of the Council of Ministers of Defense. Its functions will 
specifically include summarizing the proposals of the ministries 
(committees) of defense of the Commonwealth states on issues of 
military cooperation, preparation of draft agreements on these 
issues, development of the plans for their implementation and 
monitoring the accomplishment of these plans. Decisions were 
also made on initial steps for the implementation of the Treaty 
on Collective Security and on preparation of a draft Agreement, 
in accordance with which the member-states of the Treaty on 
Collective Security will --in the event of the emergence of the 
appropriate threat -- create Coalition Defense Forces. 
  So, a separate decision was made on the creation of 
Coalition 
Defense forces on Tajik territory and the mission, composition 
and functions of the Unified Command Authorities of these forces 
were defined for the purpose of adopting urgent collective 
measures to stabilize the situation in the Republic of 
Tajikistan. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] How do you assess 
Russia's interests in the south of the CIS? 
  [Zolotarev] First of all we are interested in the stability 
of these states and the restoration of economic ties with them. 
Unfortunately, we still haven't been able to totally preserve 
stability. Therefore, interests arise that are associated with 
the Russian Federation's military security. We have been 
compelled, along with the other CIS countries, to provide not 
only protection but also defense in a number of sectors of the 
state border of the former USSR. The last CIS Council of 
Ministers of Defense session was dedicated to providing security 
of the border in the south of the CIS. 
  I think that the CIS countries have very many, first of all, 
common economic interests. Already right now these interests are 
beginning to objectively facilitate integration processes and 
strengthen stability in the CIS and also dictate positive 
progress in politics. It is easier to negotiate the economic and 
political crisis together than to get out of it alone. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] Do you propose to have 
a 
document on military reform in the near future? 
  [Zolotarev] There will not be a separate document. These 
issues will find reflection in the Armed Forces structural 
development concept. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46575 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Geopolitics and Security </F>
<H3> <TI>   The Military Industrial Complex and Arms Sales </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    The Military Industrial Complex and Arms Sales </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0312G Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 2, 1993 (Signed to press 12 May 93) pp 37-41--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0312G </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by "Oboroneksport" Deputy Chairman Eduard </F>
Viktorovich Maksimov and Doctor of Technical Sciences, Professor 
Yuriy Georgiyevich Sizov: "The Military Industrial Complex and 
Arms Sales"] 
  [Text] Eduard Viktorovich Maksimov completed the 
Military Artillery Academy and served in the Main 
Missile-Artillery Directorate. He has worked at "Oboroneksport" 
since 1976 and has been deputy chairman of this organization 
since 1992. 
  Yuriy Georgiyevich Sizov completed the Military Academy 
of Communications, is a specialist on air defense weapons, and 
is editor of VPK magazine. 
  At the end of his political career, U.S President D. 
Eisenhower introduced the term "MIC" -- military industrial 
complex. Since that time, this term has become acclimated in 
many countries. The president thought that the U.S. military 
industrial complex was a monster that was increasingly 
subordinating the country's political and economic life to 
itself. 
  With the initiation of perestroyka and M.S. Gorbachev's 
energetic steps that were directed at arms reduction, in our 
country the term military industrial complex became an expletive 
in the mouths of a number of deputies and certain irresponsible 
politicians. They presented the matter in such a manner that we 
only had to reduce appropriations for the needs of the military 
industrial complex and, if prosperity did not come, then in any 
case, great material and financial possibilities would appear in 
the country to resolve various internal problems. In the 
process, conversion was understood simply as the appearance of a 
large quantity of consumer goods which would be manufactured by 
military plants instead of weapons. For some reason they were 
silent about the fact that conversion initially requires large 
capital investments and only later will it provide a yield. 
  After the breakup of the Soviet Union, the Commission on 
Military-Industrial Issues under the USSR Council of Ministers 
Presidium, which coordinated the work of the country's defense 
sectors, was eliminated. In the Russian Federation, 
appropriations for the defense industry were drastically reduced 
and total uncertainty has arisen with state orders for arms: in 
1992, expenditures for the purchase of arms and military 
equipment were reduced by 68% and were practically 
reduced to 
zero in a whole series of directions. The level of production of 
certain types of arms fell so much that it became unprofitable 
for enterprises which "began to refuse defense orders", said 
First Deputy Minister of Defense A.A. Kokoshin (IZVESTIYA, No 
23, 23 January 1993). The majority of defense enterprises were 
left to their own devices. 
  How was that reflected in the lives of the people? Did the 
people's material welfare improve as the politicians had 
previously assumed? It turned out that nearly half of the 
country's population was linked with the domestic military 
industrial complex and the most qualified portion of the workers 
worked in the defense complex. The collapse of the military 
industrial complex painfully struck these people and resulted in 
a drastic reduction of their standard of living. For the state, 
this signified a substantial reduction of hard currency earnings 
because, prior to 1991, for each ruble spent in defense 
production the country received $2 in arms sales on the world 
market (IZVESTIYA, No 137, 12 June 1992). 
  The Russian Federation is sustaining large losses from the 
reduction of arms sales. There were at least two causes for the 
reduction. The first is associated with the lessening of the 
attention of state organs to military issues in 1990-1991. Some 
politicians turned out to be uncomfortable that the country was 
earning money on arms sales. Furthermore, the collapse in the 
administration of the state resulted in a collapse in this 
sphere. Some time passed before the government arrived at an 
understanding of the importance of the international arms market 
for Russia. By the middle of 1992, it became clear that the 
country would be able to obtain more hard currency through arms 
sales than through Western credits which our children and 
grandchildren will have to pay back. 
  Right now in Russia the Commission for Military-Technical 
Cooperation is involved with the fundamental issues of arms 
sales. The six first directors of the main departments are 
members of the Commission: the Ministry of Defense, the Ministry 
of Foreign Affairs, Roskomoboronprom [Russian Committee on the 
Defense Industry], the Ministry of Economics, MVES [Ministry of 
Foreign Economic Relations] and the Foreign Intelligence 
Service. A Russian Federation Supreme Soviet special deputies 
group carries out oversight functions. 
  The second cause of the reduction of arms sales was the 
intensification of competition on the world arms market which 
crowded Russia out. Our competitors skillfully took advantage of 
the defeat of Iraq in the 1991 war. It was presented like this: 
Iraq had primarily Soviet-made arms which turned out to be 
uncompetitive with the arms of the Multi-National Forces, that 
is, Western arms defeated Soviet arms. Hence it followed that 
all purchasing countries need to acquire only Western arms. 
Unfortunately, the idea of the backwardness of Soviet weapons 
was energetically spread in our country and was used for attacks 
against the Soviet Armed Forces. 
  What is the real state of affairs? Aircraft make up the main 
part of Russian arms exports. Air defense weapons are part of 
the second group, then come Ground Troops weapons (tanks, combat 
infantry vehicles, and artillery). The fourth group is naval 
weapons (IZVESTIYA, No 137, 12 June 1992). 
  Right now it has become clear that many models of Russian 
aircraft do not lag behind Western aircraft but often surpass 
them. The MiG-29 fighter aircraft has been recognized as the 
best in its class in the world. In 1991, after a thorough 
examination by experts, the Bundeswehr accepted 24 MiG-29 
aircraft into the inventory that had belonged to the GDR [German 
Democratic Republic] (IZVESTIYA, No 178, 27 July 1991). The 
S-300V Air Defense Missile System does not have any equivalents 
and, in the opinion of foreign experts, will exceed Western 
complexes until the end of the century. The BMP-3 combat 
infantry vehicle became the winner in comparative tests of 
similar vehicles. We can cite other cases but the superiority of 
our weapons is best discussed in the articles of the chief 
designers of weapons that are being presented to readers of VPK 
magazine. 
  Recently, we can note substantial changes of the views of 
the 
country's leadership on arms sales. The doctrine that 
predominated in the USSR that we could only sell obsolete 
weapons promoted the discrediting of Soviet arms. Right now, 
many unnecessary procedural restrictions have been removed. The 
leadership finally realized that the arms that are in the troops 
should not be secret with the exception of certain technological 
issues. Therefore, the latest arms must go to market and yield 
the needed money, including for the development of even more 
improved weapons. 
  However, arms sales are not only an effective source of hard 
currency receipts, they are also an effective foreign policy 
tool. Previously, the USSR sold many weapons at reduced prices. 
This primarily pertained to countries that were Warsaw Treaty 
allies. Arms were sold to a number of countries on credit and 
the loans were not always repaid and no-cost transfers were 
carried out to some countries. Right now arms sales to Iraq, 
Kuwait, Libya, Yugoslavia and Ethiopia have been completely 
terminated. 
  Russia is attempting to step up its involvement on the 
international arms market. In 1992, the "Mosaeroshow-92" 
International Exhibition, at which the latest aircraft and air 
defense systems were displayed, was conducted in our country for 
the first time. Approximately 200 CIS firms and 82 firms from 
the far abroad displayed products. At the last moment, the 
Americans refused to participate in demonstration flights in 
F-15, F-16, and F-18 aircraft. For the first time, Russia 
demonstrated that it is a great air power (IZVESTIYA, No 183, 13 
August 1993). 
  In 1993, Russia made a serious attempt to conquer new arms 
markets by actively participating in the "IDEX-93" Exhibition at 
Abu Dhabi. More than 550 firms from 34 countries displayed 
modern artillery systems and ammunition for them, close combat 
weapons, PVO [air defense] complexes, armored vehicles and 
aircraft, optical devices and navigation systems, various 
classes of missiles, shipborne weapons, and servicemen's full 
gear at this exhibition. 
  The Russian exposition was quite impressive: more than 370 
models of modern weapons were displayed, nearly half were 
displayed abroad for the first time and, many types of weapons 
-- in operation. Our country had never previously displayed such 
a vast arms exposition. The Russian delegation received prizes 
for best firing and the largest demonstration of modern military 
equipment. 
  From missile weapons, Russia displayed the "Tochka-U" 
tactical complex which, although developed more than 10 years 
ago, is distinguished by its high tactical-technical 
specifications, first and foremost, for firing accuracy and 
mobility. The "Msta-S" 152-mm Self-Propelled Howitzer did not 
have any competitors. It is capable of firing 10 50-kg 
projectiles per minute. It can destroy a point target at a 
distance of 12 kilometers using the "Krasnopol" projectile with 
a laser-guided seeker. The howitzer does not have any equals in 
maneuverability and off-road capability. The comfort conditions 
developed for its crew also merit attention (IZVESTIYA, No 65, 8 
April 1993). 
  Tank weapons -- the T-80 tank and the BMP-3 combat infantry 
vehicle -- made a big impression at the exhibition at Abu Dhabi. 
The T-80 was named the "flying tank" for its high maneuvering 
capabilities. The BMP-3 is distinguished not only by its high 
off-road capability but by its high fire power (a 100-mm gun and 
a weapons guidance system have been installed on the vehicle). 
The T-80 and BMP-3 are distinguished by good habitability and 
they beat American, French and German vehicles in tests on the 
Arabian sands. 
  The Russian air defense weapons that had already been 
displayed at the "Mosaeroshow-92" exhibition and at the 
"Oborona-92" exercises reaffirmed their high qualities. Models 
of the S-300 PMU, "Tor", "Strela-10M3", and "Igla" air defense 
missile complexes and also posters and mock-ups of other types 
of complexes were displayed at Abu Dhabi. The "Smerch" and 
"Uragan" multiple rocket systems and the "Shturm-S" and "Metis" 
antitank complexes demonstrated outstanding specifications. 
These complexes and small arms confirmed their high live firing 
effectiveness on the range. 
  Of the naval weapons, the "Piranya" submarine and the APS 
5.66-mm underwater assault rifle attracted interest. 
  The significance which was attached to the exhibition was 
emphasized by the presence of the ministers of defense of 
France, Great Britain, Iran, Russia and Italy at its opening. 
Observers could see the leading countries' latest arms in action 
for the first time and compare their effectiveness. This was 
largely explained by the fact that the Arab countries have begun 
to modernize their armed forces based on the experience of the 
Persian Gulf War. During the last two years, they have spent 
approximately $40 billion on arms purchases. Naturally arms 
exporters counted on concluding major new contracts. What are 
the results in this sense for Russia? 
  On the eve of the opening of the exhibition, we learned that 
the UAE [United Arab Emirates] had decided to purchase 390 
Leclerc Tanks and tank escorts from the French State Corporation 
"GIAT Industries" for a total sum of more than $3 billion. This 
occurred despite the fact that the Russian T-80 tank showed 
itself to be better than the others. 
  Critical analysis of the issue of purchasing French tanks 
lasted for several years. Naturally, a certain amount of time 
will be required to prepare and sign contract documents with 
potential customers under conditions of recently made decisions 
on the possibility of exporting the domestically-produced T-80 
tank. Despite substantial expenditures on the organization of 
the exhibition at Abu Dhabi, the great success of Russian arms 
permits us to hope for their sales on the external market. 
  Russia's participation was more modest at the 1993 Le 
Bourget 
Airshow, however, the Aviation Complex imeni Ilyushin managed to 
conclude a contract. The MiG Scientific-Production Complex 
reached an agreement on the sale of new trainer-transport 
aircraft with French Snecma engines. 
  Moscow Airshow-93 was conducted from 31 August through 5 
September. Foreign firms were involved in the preparations for 
this exhibition. 
  So, one could say that Russia is learning arms sales under 
contemporary conditions. However, as Russian Presidential 
Advisor M.D. Maley says, the world arms market is a subtle 
thing, it is an elite market. Previously, an ideological 
demarcation shut us out of many arms purchasing countries and 
this largely suited our competitors which first and foremost is 
the United States. 
  At the present time, the United States has announced the 
establishment of most favored nation trading status with Russia. 
However, the opening of U.S. markets for Russian missile, 
nuclear and space technologies does not cause ecstasy among 
American firms. The firms can obtain support in the U.S. 
Congress which has the right to unilaterally terminate this 
status or to introduce restrictions. Already right now 20 
anti-dumping procedures are in force or are in the stage of 
adoption with regard to Russian goods. So, the United States has 
banned the import of our uranium until its price reaches $13 per 
pound (Russia has sold uranium for $9.50 per pound). 
  A complex situation has emerged with Russia's attempt to 
sell 
MiG-29 fighter aircraft to Malaysia. Having learned about the 
negotiations that were being conducted with Russia, the U.S. 
embassy exerted pressure on McDonnell-Douglas and General 
Dynamics which reduced the prices for F-16 and F-18 aircraft by 
approximately 40%. It has turned out that the Americans 
are 
getting in the Russians way. However, considering the high 
tactical-technical specifications of MiG-29 fighter aircraft, 
the Government of Malaysia announced its decision to purchase 18 
aircraft from Russia and eight American F-18 fighter aircraft. 
This is a serious success on the arms market and for the first 
time Russia will enter a market with its arms that was 
previously closed to it (FINANSOVYYE IZVESTIYA, No 35, 1993). 
  Up to now, the Americans are seeking to cancel the $400 
million contract on Russia's delivery of cryogenic missile 
engines to India. The United States asserts that these engines 
can be utilized for the Indian "Agni" Ballistic Missile and 
sales of missile technologies are banned by international 
agreements. The Americans have agreed to compensate Russia for 
losses, however, they are demanding that the contract with India 
be canceled first. The absence of an agreement on this issue was 
one of the causes of the cancellation of the Russian Federation 
Prime Minister's visit to the United States in June 1993. 
Russia's refusal to carry out the U.S.'s demand on the extension 
of the monitoring regime for the utilization of missile 
technologies to Russia's mutual relations with the other CIS 
countries was another cause. We cannot agree to that demand 
because the Russian Federation space industry is closely tied to 
Ukraine and Kazakhstan. 
  The United States is also utilizing the European Community 
(EC) and COCOM in the competitive struggle. Although COCOM 
should allegedly cease to exist, for now it continues to impede 
Russia's penetration into the international arms market. So, for 
example, this organization bans the purchase from Russia of 
ecologically clean fuel for space system missile engines. 
Therefore, 200 tonnes of hydrogen chloride are released into the 
atmosphere during each launch in the United States that cause a 
great deal of ecological damage (IZVESTIYA, No 17, 29 January 
1993). The EC, treating Russia as a country with a state trade 
system, is establishing reduced quotas for Russian goods. 
  In order to have success in a fierce competitive struggle, 
we 
need not only to have good quality weapons but we also need to 
know how to sell. 
  Right now, reliable partners, who are not restricted only to 
sales but who can provide maintenance to the weapons sold, are 
highly valued on the arms market. According to American experts, 
today Russia has those capabilities but is incapable of 
competing with American high technology weapons. Therefore, they 
think that Russia can successfully sell lower quality weapons on 
the market by offering MiG-29 aircraft, air defense missiles, 
and small arms there (SEGODNYA, No 17, 18 May 1993). 
  Russia needs to resolve a number of organizational issues to 
carry out successful arms sales. 
  The Committee for the Defense Sectors of Industry has 
specifically proposed a new concept for Russia's 
military-technical cooperation with other countries. The concept 
provides the capability to the arms manufacturer itself to seek 
customers in countries with which military-technical cooperation 
has not been prohibited. It can also demonstrate its "goods" to 
the customer and tell the customer the tactical-technical 
specifications that are authorized for arms exports and a 
preliminary price. They propose stimulating commercial arms 
deliveries through the use of state credits, beneficial 
taxation, and exemption from payment of export duties. For 
example, in the United States, the government extends credit for 
up to 50% of these deliveries. 
  Furthermore, Committee Head V. Glukhikh thinks that it is 
necessary to privatize the overwhelming number of defense 
enterprises. Enterprises and organizations, that have key 
technologies at their disposal for the development of arms and 
military equipment without which it is impossible for Russia to 
maintain its defense capability, need to be retained as state 
property (SEGODNYA, No 26, 1993). 
  A number of market structures are being created in the 
Russian military industrial complex system. The 
semi-governmental organization Biznestsentr [Business Center] 
has been organized which is carrying out the selection of 
foreign partners. The second structure -- is the Financial 
Company, within which the Military-Industrial Bank is being 
formed with high charter capital. Furthermore, the Russian 
Military-Industrial Insurance Company and the Information 
Association are being founded. 
  At the same time, the Russian Ministry of Foreign Economic 
Relations' specialized foreign economic organizations, while 
implementing the concept for reorganizing their own structures 
that was approved in April 1993 by the Russian Federation 
Interdepartmental Commission for Military-Technical Cooperation 
with Foreign Countries (KVTS), began to intensively work on 
ensuring more active participation of the main Russian arms 
developers and manufacturers in foreign economic activity. These 
specialized foreign economic organizations conclude the absolute 
majority of the actual deals for arms and military equipment 
deliveries to foreign countries and render technical assistance 
in the organization of their production and operation. So, the 
multi-discipline Consultative-Oversight Council was formed under 
the Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations, the working sections 
of which are specialized along the KVTS' primary functional 
directions and have adequately broad powers both for the 
formation of export programs of subdepartmental foreign economic 
associations ("Oboroneksport", "Spetsvneshtekhnika", and GUSK 
[not found]) and also for monitoring, strategy, tactics and 
coordination of the practical work of Russian subjects of 
military-technical cooperation in foreign arms markets. In the 
future, vertically integrated financial-industrial groups could 
be formed that are combined based upon on the common economic 
interests of the leading exporters, developers and manufacturers 
of domestically-produced weapons and also bank, insurance and 
other structures that are comprehensively oriented on 
stimulating the export of military machine-technical products 
and special technologies. 
  The future will tell how all of these organizational 
measures 
affect the success of the Russian military industrial complex on 
the international market. 
  In conclusion, let's point out several other problems that 
are associated with arms sales. One of them is the clearance 
sale of arms of the USSR Armed Forces that have remained on the 
territory of the states of the near abroad. So, arms sales from 
auctions have been stepped up in Kharkov. There the director of 
the Ukraine-Siberia Goods Exchange, that previously sold 
petroleum and grain, now sells arms at reduced prices. In the 
exchange's competitive pricing, Su-27 fighter aircraft are worth 
$32 million, Su-25's -- $11.9 million, MiG-27's -- $16 million 
and, diesel submarines -- from $13 to $150 million. Such "wild" 
sales of Soviet arms not only damage Russia's interests but also 
introduce a definite imbalance in the world market. The origin 
of the arms that are appearing on the "wild" market and to whom 
they are being sold remains unclear. Western diplomats are also 
concerned about the shady deals in the Central Asian republics 
of the former USSR. 
  Scotland Yard thinks that in five years the main threat to 
the cities of Great Britain will emanate from the countries of 
Central and Eastern Europe and Russia. Scotland Yard is certain 
that the influx of arms from there is destabilizing the 
situation in the country. 
  The appearance of new sellers on the world market is another 
problem. India, which traditionally purchased armored vehicles 
and missiles in the USSR, has now developed its own "Arjun" 
Tank, the "Prithvi" Ballistic Missile with an operating range of 
50 km, and the "Akash" Air Defense Missile Complex. India 
displayed its military products at Abu Dhabi and it already 
plans to offer the "Arjun" Tank for sale at the international 
armored vehicle exhibition in Canada in 1994. 
  The international community is concerned about new trends on 
the arms market. The UN General Assembly Resolution on the 
creation of the Conventional Arms Register went into force on 1 
May 1993. All arms exporters and importers must submit official 
data to the UN on arms sales and purchases with an indication of 
the total amount of arms bought or sold. The UN thinks that the 
absence of such a Register permitted the Husayn Regime to 
purchase arms throughout the world and to create the fourth most 
powerful army in the world. 
  By 11 May, 47 countries had submitted data to the UN. Among 
them were the United States, England, France, Germany, Italy, 
Brazil, China, Belarus, Kazakhstan, and Greece. Cuba acceded to 
the Register, having announced that it neither bought nor sold 
any heavy weapons whatsoever in 1992. Russia submitted that 
information in the middle of the summer of 1993. 
  All of this is occurring in the background of the overall 
reduction of the amounts of sales on the arms market. According 
to the assessment of the Stockholm International Peace Research 
Institute, the largest arms sales on the world market occurred 
in 1987 when $46 billion worth of deals were concluded and this 
amount was reduced to $22 billion in 1991 which is by more than 
half. The table indicates the dynamics of the decline on the 
world arms market in 1987-1991. This trend was maintained in 
1992: the volume of deals was reduced by another nearly one 
fourth and totaled 18.4 billion rubles. In 1992, the leading 
countries' shares were: the United States -- 46%, the 
countries 
of the European Community (primarily Germany, France, and Great 
Britain) -- 26% and, Russia -- 11%. 
  According to Goskomstat [State Committee for Statistics] 
data, Russia exported a total of only $546.1 million worth of 
arms in January-May 1993, at that, only $36.2 million worth to 
industrially developed countries. 


The Volume of Arms Sales of the Largest Arms Producing Countries, in 
Billions of Dollars (in 1990 Prices)/% of the Total Volume 

Country     1987         1988         1989         1990         1991 

USSR        17.7/38.8    15.1/38.5    14.9/39.1    9.7/33.5     3.9/17.7 

United      13.7/30.0    11.9/33.0    12.0/31.2    11.2/38.6    11.2/50.8 
States 

France      3.2/7.0      2.4/6.1      2.9/8.0      1.9/6.5      0.8/3.6 

Great       2.2/4.8      1.7/4.3      2.7/7.1      1.6/5.5      1.0/4.5 
Britain 

China       2.9/6.3      1.9/4.8      0.9/2.4      0.9/3.1      1.1/5.1 

FRG         0.8/1.7      1.3/3.3      0.8/2.1      1.2/4.2      2.0/9.1 
[Federal 
Republic 
of 
Germany] 

Total       45.8/100     39.3/100     38.2/100     29.0/100     22.1/100 


  We need to note that you can encounter somewhat different 
figures than those cited in the table. So, the 7 August 1993 
issue of MOSKOVSKIY KOMSOMOLETS cites the following volumes of 
export deliveries of arms and military equipment: in 1987, the 
United States -- $16.8 billion, Russia --$17.8 billion, in 1991 
-- $13.3 and $6.0 billion and, in 1992 $33 and $1.9 billion, 
respectively. In the process, it does not state if the data is 
cited in prices of one year. Without becoming involved in an 
analysis of which figures are more correct, it is important to 
note that the dynamics are preserved in both cases. 
  The reduction of the arms market is resulting in a reduction 
of arms production in the exporting countries. The Pentagon is 
reducing arms purchases, is rejecting a number of developments, 
and is terminating the SDI Program. Financing of defense 
enterprises has been drastically reduced in Russia. The 
reduction of defense production is occurring in all of the 
developed countries. According to Stockholm International Peace 
Research Institute data, total military expenditures of all of 
the world's states were reduced by 15% in 1992, in 
contrast to 
1991. 
  In the next five years, we anticipate a reduction of the 
number of defense enterprise workers by approximately one fourth. 
  Russia may find itself in an especially difficult situation 
where the number of workers and employees at military 
enterprises totals 71% of all personnel of the USSR arms 
sector 
(17.5% in Ukraine, 3.2% in Belarus, and 
1.7% in Kazakhstan) 
(FINANSOVYYE IZVESTIYA, 23, 1993). Considering that conversion 
in Russia is proceeding slowly and with problems, defense 
enterprises are experiencing enormous difficulties that are also 
affecting the general state of the country. 
  All of these factors will result in even greater 
intensification of competition on the international arms market. 
Russia must take into account that, on the one hand, it can only 
access this market with high quality modern weapons and, on the 
other hand, cadres and skill are needed to achieve success under 
conditions of the fierce competition under which the most varied 
methods and techniques are utilized. 
  We must understand that the United States, being the largest 
seller on the international arms market, will impede the 
expansion of Russia's positions in this market. 
  Right now, many defense enterprises in Russia are tying 
their 
future with successes on the world arms market. Considering 
their significance in total industrial production, we can arrive 
at the conclusion that the successful resolution of the arms 
sales task plays a large role for Russia's future. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46576 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Military Reform </F>
<H3> <TI>   The Upheavals of Field PVO </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    The Upheavals of Field PVO </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0311F Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 1, 1993 (Signed to press 5 Jul 93) pp 45-48--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0311F </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yu.G. Sizov and A.G. Luzan under the rubric </F>
"Military Reform"] 
  [Text] Yuriy Georgiyevich Sizov is a doctor of 
technical sciences and the author of more than 150 scientific 
works and inventions, who headed the Armaments Directorate of 
Field PVO of the Scientific-Research Institute of the Ministry 
of Defense from 1982-88. 
  Aleksandr Grigoryevich Luzan is a candidate of 
technical sciences, and a well-known specialist in armaments and 
military hardware for field PVO. He has been deputy and then 
chief of armaments for field PVO of the ground forces for more 
than ten years. 
  The rapid development of the means of aerial attack and the 
great difficulties in the use of the air-defense weaponry that 
has been developed for the country's PVO [air-defense] troops in 
the interests of the ground forces made it necessary to create a 
special branch of troops among the latter. The PVO SV [ground 
forces PVO] troops were first forced to use obsolete cannon 
weaponry and S-75 surface-to-air (SAM) systems. The mobility of 
the ground forces increased rapidly. Their successful operations 
under conditions of the continuously increasing threat from 
aviation and other means of aerial attack (SVN), however, 
required air-defense weaponry with completely different 
characteristics. The S-75 SAM system, quite a fearsome weapon at 
the beginning of the 1960s, had too little mobility. All of its 
combat elements were located on trailers that required cable 
communications between them. The deployment time was thus many 
hours, and movement was possible only along roads. 
  The KS-19 and S-60 artillery systems also had insufficient 
mobility and, more importantly, their effectiveness was 
intolerably low against modern SVN. 
  The decision was made to create air-defense weaponry that 
would meet the tough requirements of the ground forces. The 
first was the Krug SAM system (General Designer V.P. Yefremov), 
which entered service in 1965. All of the combat elements of the 
system were located on highly mobile, self-propelled tracked 
platforms: the acquisition and target-designation radar, the 
guidance radar, and the launchers with the SAMs. The outer 
boundary of the SAM lethal area was 50 km, with the altitude of 
targets from 3.0 to 24.5 km. The lower boundary was brought 
first to 500 meters, and then to 150 meters in later models. 
  The appearance of the first SAM systems in service with the 
USSR and Western countries forced aircraft to adopt new tactics. 
Air power was forced in particular to operate primarily at low 
altitudes in the zones of powerful PVO. The Kub SAM system 
(General Designer Yu.N. Figurovskiy) was created to fight air 
power at low and medium altitudes. 
  The system has two principal combat elements--a 
self-propelled vehicle with the electronics equipment, and a 
launcher with self-guiding missiles. The former has the 
acquisition radar, guidance radar and illumination station. It 
must be said that the combination of this many stations was done 
for the first time in world practice. The acquisition radar and 
the guidance radar were located separately for the analogous 
American Hawk SAM system. The reaction time could be reduced 
markedly with the joint placement of the stations, important in 
defeating low-flying targets. 
  The Krug SAM system began to enter service with army and 
frontal air-defense missile brigades. Air-defense regiments for 
the tank divisions were formed on the basis of the Kub SAM 
system. A heavier and cheaper weapon was needed for the 
protection of the motorized-rifle divisions. The Osa SAM system 
(General Designer V.P. Yefremov) was thus created; it had all of 
the elements placed on a single self-propelled platform. 
  This made it possible to protect troops advancing in battle 
formation. It must be said that the Mauler SAM system, in which 
all of the elements were also placed on a single vehicle, was 
also under development in the United States for many years. The 
project was not completed, however. 
  The lighter and cheaper Strela-1 (Chief Designer A.E. 
Nudelman) and portable Strela-2 (General Designer S.P. 
Nepobedimyy) SAM systems with non-radar equipment, as well as 
the Shilka self-propelled AA cannon mount (Chief Designer N.A. 
Astrov), were created in addition to these other types of SAM 
systems for the PVO SV troops. The first two were later replaced 
by the Strela-10 and Strela-3 systems respectively. The 
analogous Chaparral, Redeye and Vulcan system were in service 
with the U.S. Army. 
  The first generation of air-defense missile and artillery 
weaponry for the PVO SV troops thus took shape. All of the types 
of systems, aside from the Krug SAM system, were supplied for 
export abroad and took part in various military conflicts, where 
they proved themselves to be quite highly effective for their 
time. 
  The further development of means of aerial attack, the 
increases in their mass and types and their fitting with 
electronic-warfare armaments required the creation of a new 
generation of arms. The assurance of high effectiveness of this 
generation of systems under the new conditions required serious 
increases in the complexity of air-defense weapons, which led to 
a sharp rise in their cost. It became necessary in this regard 
to optimize the types of air-defense systems for the PVO SV 
troops. 
  An entirely fair question arises--why are we discussing the 
optimal types for the PVO SV, and not for all of the armed 
forces? The answer to this question is both complex and simple. 
  First of all, the task of the necessity of developing 
second-generation systems arose in the middle of the 1960s, when 
the narrow departmental fragmentation even within the Ministry 
of Defense was very large. It existed between the customers, 
between the developers and even between scientific organizations. 
  Second, there was a very serious battle among the customers. 
  Third, quite powerful groups of developers appeared that 
were 
working for various customers. The various "weights" of the 
customers was a circumstance of no small importance. 
  The leaders of PVO Strany [national PVO], as a branch of the 
armed forces, had greater access to the leadership of the 
Ministry of Defense and the other power structures of the USSR 
than the leaders of the branches of the armed forces, the PVO 
SV, and the customer, one of the directorates of the GRAU. The 
conceptual model for the leadership of the PVO troops in the 
creation of weaponry was for many years oriented toward fixed, 
semi-mobile or, in the best case, slightly mobile equipment. 
This weaponry was thus not suited to the ground forces. The 
reverse was possible--the troops of the PVO Strany could take 
weapons developed for the PVO SV. But this impeded ambitions and 
the orientation toward "their own" developers. The task of 
substantiating the optimal types was formulated as follows: find 
the types of air-defense systems under which the required 
protection of the force groupings with PVO is ensured, while the 
cost of the air-defense systems is minimal, i.e. find 
n at which C = min. The task of 
defeating all types of SVN could be fundamentally resolved by a 
PVO group that had only one all-purpose type of SAM system able 
to defeat all targets effectively. Another extreme variation is 
where a specialized type of SAM system is developed to defeat 
each type of SVN. The optimal solution is located somewhere 
between them, and is sought according to the criterion of 
minimal cost with the aid of mathematical modeling. 
  The required effectiveness of PVO is determined proceeding 
from the level of losses of ground forces allowable while their 
fighting ability and capabilities for the successful fulfillment 
of the assigned mission are still preserved. 
  A number of restrictions imposed on SAM systems by the 
specific features of the ground forces as objects of defense are 
introduced in the solution of the problem. These include 
mobility, terrain passability, frequency of change of positions, 
time for shutdown and deployment of the systems, resistance to 
climatic factors etc. 
  Manned and unmanned aircraft, helicopters, ballistic and 
cruise missiles, guided aerial bombs and the strike elements of 
high-precision weaponry, as well as special EW and 
command-and-control aircraft that are in patrol zones, were 
considered as SVN. 
  The operational-tactical background for the solution of the 
problem was taken to be repelling a mass attack by SVN in which 
all types of air-defense systems take part. The efficient types 
of air-defense systems were determined according to the results 
of computation; each of them should provide for the defeat of a 
certain set of SVN, with this set is moreover arranged in its 
own priority order for each type of system. The presence in a 
PVO group of air-defense systems of a certain type ensures its 
stability under the conditions of exposure to EW equipment. The 
development of second-generation systems was begun at the end of 
the 1960s and beginning of the 1970s. 
  The types of air-defense systems received concrete 
designations and purposes: 
  S-300V SAM system (General Designer V.P. Yefremov)--for 
the defeat of ballistic and aeroballistic missiles, EW and 
command-and-control aircraft in their patrol zones, aircraft of 
strategic and tactical aviation and other types of targets; 
  the Buk SAM system (Chief Designer Ye.A. Pigin)--for 
the defeat of aircraft of tactical and strategic aviation, 
cruise missiles and other types of targets; 
  the Tor SAM system (General Designer V.P. 
Yefremov)--for the defeat of aviation missiles and other combat 
elements of high-precision weaponry, aircraft of tactical 
aviation, cruise missiles and other types of targets; 
  the Tunguska air-defense missile and artillery system 
(General Designer A.G. Shipunov)--for the defeat of combat 
helicopters, aircraft of tactical aviation, cruise missiles and 
unmanned equipment; 
  the Igla portable SAM system (General Designer S.P. 
Nepobedimyy)--for self-defense against attacking SVN. 
  The leadership of the USSR was forced to alter some of the 
procedures in the country and begin to destroy interdepartmental 
barriers at the beginning of the 1970s. This was determined to 
no small extent by the colossal expenditures that had to be made 
for the development and production of arms. Discussions began on 
the necessity of standardizing them. 
  Some concrete steps were also taken. These include the 
creation of various Interdepartmental Coordinating Councils 
(MKS). An MKS was created in particular for radar equipment. The 
largest step in this regard was the decision in 1980 to transfer 
the leadership of the PVO SV troops to the PVO Strany troops, 
after which the latter began to be called simply the PVO Troops. 
  The idea of combining all of the PVO troops under a unified 
command was not a bad one in and of itself. As much else that 
was done here during the "era of stagnation," however, the 
incarnation of the idea took on a grotesque nature. What in fact 
happened? 
  The command and staff of field PVO were transferred to the 
PVO Strany High Command. The commander of the PVO SV forces, 
Colonel-General P.G. Levchenko, was named commander of field PVO 
and first deputy commander-in-chief of the PVO Troops. Some 
structural changes were made in the PVO staffs of the military 
districts, and substantial organizational changes were made in 
the PVO Strany troops. The various customers for PVO weaponry, 
however--the PVO GUV [Main Armaments Directorate] for the PVO 
Strany troops, the GRAU Directorate for field PVO--and the 
arsenals and bases remained under various departments. A 
paradoxical situation arose in the ground forces--the field PVO 
formations were part of the motorized-rifle and tank regiments, 
motorized-rifle and tank divisions and armies and, naturally, 
were subordinate to the corresponding commanders and the 
commander of the ground forces. 
  Many questions of the administration of these formations, at 
the same time, were in the hands of the command of the PVO 
Strany troops. This situation brought harm to everyone. The 
commands began to be regarded as alien to the PVO formations in 
the ground forces in a number of cases, and a large portion of 
the housekeeping and other unpleasant work began to be passed on 
to them. The most complex PVO military hardware, after all, is 
in the ground forces--this is PVO hardware, and it requires 
well-trained and professionally prepared people. The command of 
field PVO, on the other hand, remained an alien body to the 
leaders of the PVO Troops. The commander of the field PVO was 
only nominally named first deputy commander-in-chief. All of 
this caused great harm, which became obvious to the leadership 
of the Ministry of Defense as well. 
  The leadership of the field PVO was thus returned to the 
ground forces in 1986. 
  Some positive aspects of the attempt to combine PVO should 
be 
noted for the sake of fairness. These are, first and foremost, 
the substantial destruction of interdepartmental barriers. A 
number of conceptual views in the PVO Strany thus underwent 
marked changes as a result. The necessity of a substantial 
increase in the mobility of the weaponry and the rejection of 
static weapons wherever possible was understood first of all. A 
model of the Buk SAM system was ordered in which the principal 
combat equipment was switched to wheeled self-propelled 
vehicles, and the appearance of the S-300P system was altered 
and began to look outwardly more like the S-300V system. 
  Russia is now in a grave economic and political state. 
Spending for defense needs has been cut back sharply. Military 
reform is underway, but its implementation is proceeding with 
great difficulty, and the structure of the armed forces that 
existed under the USSR is by and large preserved. 
  There are three branches of the armed forces in all of the 
leading countries of the world--the ground, naval and air 
forces. Each branch has its own high command, the size of which 
is quite large, and is staffed to a considerable extent by 
senior officers and generals. The upkeep of the high command 
constitutes an appreciable share of the funds that are allocated 
for the maintenance of personnel in that branch of the armed 
forces. The only country in the world that permitted itself to 
have five branches of the service was the USSR. When the 
collapse of the Soviet Union began, it was proposed that Russia 
have three branches of the armed forces. There were also to be 
strategic forces unified for the whole CIS, which were expected 
to include some of the structures of the PVO troops as well 
(first of all the system for warning of a missile attack (SPRN) 
and the system for fighting space weapons). 
  This decision was dictated not only by economic 
considerations, but also by the great changes that have occurred 
in recent years in the structure and characteristics of SVN, 
first and foremost aeroballistic ones. 
  The share of cruise missiles, which fly principally at low 
altitudes and can be defeated only at short ranges, has 
increased substantially. Various RPVs are close in trajectory 
and radar characteristics to aircraft in sport and agricultural 
aviation on which IFF transponders have not been installed. 
Sport aircraft often violate the airspace of neighboring states 
and do it, as a rule, unintentionally. What should be done with 
them--do they really all need to be shot down? 
  The characteristics of some ballistic targets have been 
markedly altered. Recall the recent past, when the Pershing-2 
ballistic missiles were placed in Western Europe. It turned out 
at that time that the SPRN in the USSR could not ensure timely 
target designation for firing on such targets. 
  The problems that brought about the necessity of creating 
the 
PVO Strany troops as a branch of the armed forces thus proved to 
be largely unresolved. Those troops could not protect the entire 
country, but only a certain number of targets. A whole branch of 
the armed forces is probably not necessary for that. 
  Such structural changes naturally cannot be carried out 
easily and require a certain amount of time, but they must begin 
now. The funds freed up thereby are best invested in enterprises 
that produce air-defense systems for the ground forces. Those 
arms have already won leading positions, and could be used not 
only to equip the armed forces of Russia, but could also be sold 
in the international arms market. The favorable situation that 
arose after the successful Mosaeroshow-92 weapons show and the 
Oborona-92 exercises, as well as the results of the IDEX-92 
weapons show in Abu Dhabi, must be utilized. 
  The funds invested in the production of air-defense weapons 
for the ground forces (the S-300V, Buk, Tor, Tunguska and Igla 
systems) could very quickly repay themselves a hundred times 
over. The decision needs to be made quickly, however. If the 
funds are not invested now, this year, the leading positions of 
Russia in air-defense weaponry will quickly be lost, and the 
market competitiveness of our air-defense weapons in the world 
market will be gone. 
  COPYRIGHT: Vooruzheniye, Politika, Konversiya 1993 No 1 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46577 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Military Reform </F>
<H3> <TI>   The Strategic Missile Troops and Reform of the Russian </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    The Strategic Missile Troops and Reform of the Russian </PHRASE></F></HT>
  Federation Armed Forces 

<F P=102> 94UM0312H Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 2, 1993 (Signed to press 12 May 93) pp 42-45--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0312H </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Russian Federation Ministry of Defense TsNII </F>
[Central Scientific Research Institute] Chief Vladimir 
Zinovyevich Dvorkin by an unidentified VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, 
KONVERSIYA correspondent: "The Strategic Missile Troops and 
Reform of the Russian Federation Armed Forces"] 
  [Text] Vladimir Zinovyevich Dvorkin completed 
Chernomorsk VVMU [Higher Naval School], is an expert in the 
sphere of missile weapons, the author of many scientific works, 
including the monograph "Effektivnost raketnykh sistem" [The 
Effectiveness of Missile Systems], is a doctor of technical 
sciences, a professor, and Russian Federation honored figure of 
science and technology. He was elected an active member of the 
Academy of Cosmonautics, RARAN [not found], and is a 
corresponding member of the RF Engineering Academy. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] What changes are 
occurring in the Strategic Missile Troops [SMT] as a result of 
the reform of the RF Armed Forces that have begun and what are 
the prospects for the near future? 
  [Dvorkin] The changes that are occurring in the Strategic 
Missile Troops have been caused mainly by the consequences of 
the disintegration of the Armed Forces of the Soviet Union, by 
the disintegration of the cooperation of missile weapons 
developers that had developed over the decades, by the 
difficulties of the country's economic situation, and also by 
the limitations established by the START treaties. 
  Today the Missile Troops number 1,260 ICBMs in fixed and 
mobile basing variants that are equipped with 6,300 warheads and 
which are organizationally deployed in 27 position areas (PR) on 
the territories of Russia, Kazakhstan, Belarus, and Ukraine. In 
the process, the SMT formation located outside the Russian 
Federation numbers 361 ICBMs and 2,361 warheads in seven 
position areas. 
  There are 176 launch silos (13%) located in Ukraine 
in two 
position areas near the cities of Pervomaysk and Khmelnitskiy. 
Missile complexes with two types of missiles are deployed in the 
first position area: 40 launch silos with RS-18 ICBMs and 46 
launch silos with RS-22 ICBMs. There are 90 launch silos with 
RS-18 missiles deployed in the second position area. 
  There are 104 launch silos (8%) of RS-20 heavy ICBM's 
deployed equally in the two position areas of "Derzhavinsk" and 
"Zhangis-Tobe" in Kazakhstan. 
  In Belarus, by the beginning of 1993, 81 (6%) 
launchers with 
RS-12M ICBMs were deployed in the three position areas of 
"Mozyr", "Lida" and "Postavy". At the present time, nine of them 
have been redeployed onto Russian territory. 
  There are fixed missile complexes with RS-20, RS-22, RS-18, 
and RS-16 missiles that are equipped with multiple independent 
reentry vehicles (MIRVs) and with single-warhead RS-10 and RS-11 
missiles, and also mobile missile complexes in the Missile 
Troops inventory: rail complexes with RS-22 multi-warhead 
missiles and ground-based complexes with RS-12M single-warhead 
missiles. The share of fixed missile complexes in the SMT 
formation by number of launchers is approximately 70% 
and, by 
number of warheads -- approximately 90%, and the share of 
mobile missile complexes is 30% and 10%, 
respectively. 
  The fixed missile complexes support accomplishment of 
retaliatory-counterstroke strike [otvetno-vstrechnyy udar] and 
retaliatory [otvetnyy udar] strike missions. 
  Mobile missile complexes play a main role in supporting the 
SMT formation's effectiveness in a retaliatory strike after 
bringing pressure to bear against the position areas. 
  The existing SMT formation consists of 64% of the 
warheads 
and 57% of the weapon platforms of our strategic nuclear 
forces. 
  A large portion (60%) of the missiles of fixed 
missile 
complexes (RS-20's modifications 1 and 2, RS-18's, RS-16's, 
RS-10's and RS-11's) were placed on combat alert duty at the 
beginning of the 1970's and at the present time the duration of 
their operation totals 11-19 years. Approximately 15/% of the 
missiles of the fixed missile complexes (RS-20's modification 3 
and RS-22's) are the latest generation missiles that were 
developed by "Yuzhnoye" KB [Design Bureau] (Dnepropetrovsk). Of 
the 278 RS-20 heavy ICBMs deployed, 196 missiles of the first 
two modifications were placed on combat alert duty in 1976-1980. 
The process that has begun to withdraw them from the effective 
combat strength will be completed in the next 10 years. 
  Of the 82 RS-20 modification 3 ICBMs that were deployed in 
1988-1991, 24 missiles are deployed in Kazakhstan and 58 -- in 
Russia. They must be removed from combat alert duty by the 
expiration of the prescribed operating periods, that is, no 
later than 2005 and, when the START II Treaty is taken into 
account -- by the year 2003. 
  By 2005, it will be necessary to scrap the RS-16 and RS-22 
light ICBMs that are deployed at the present time and we also 
will have to scrap the RS-18 missiles if we don't manage to 
extend their maintenance periods. 
  In 1987-1991, 92 RS-22 10-warhead ICBMs were deployed in the 
rail and fixed variants. Based upon operating periods and treaty 
limitations, they will also be removed by 2003. 
  Single-warhead ICBM's are represented in the SMT by three 
types: RS-10's and RS-12's -- fixed basing; RS-12M's -- mobile 
basing. Deployment of the first two types of missiles was 
carried out in 1971-1981. At the present time, they are being 
removed from combat alert duty. We propose completing this 
process during the next three years. Highly-survivable mobile 
ground-based complexes with RS-12M ICBMs have been introduced 
into the effective combat strength of the SMT since 1985. 
  Assessments indicate that, regardless of the START I and 
START II treaties, we will need to remove and scrap 
approximately 1,200 missiles, which are 95% of the 
existing SMT 
formation, by 2005. 
  According to the terms of the START I Treaty, the effective 
combat strength of the Missile Troops is authorized to have up 
to 1,000 launchers and 3,000 warheads. We planned to ensure the 
development of this formation through modernization of the 
RS-12M single-warhead missile and its deployment in mobile 
ground-based and fixed variants, and maintenance of the RS-20, 
RS-22 and RS-18 missiles in the effective combat strength until 
the year 2000 with the extension of their operating periods and 
subsequent augmentation of their strength using the latest 
modifications of RS-20 ICBMs and the modernized RS-22 missile. 
  The breakdown of the cooperation of SMT weapons 
manufacturers 
has disrupted these plans. Reproduction became impossible and 
the possibilities for extending the operating periods of the 
newest ICBMs with MIRVs have been restricted. With the 
preservation of the START I Treaty and under the new conditions, 
it would be necessary to conduct experimental-design work in 
short periods of time (3-4 years) and create the cooperation of 
developers and manufacturers of Russian ICBMs with MIRVs for the 
timely replenishment of ICBMs with MIRVs in order to begin their 
deployment in the SMT formation to replace the RS-20's and 
RS-22's by the end of the 1990's. 
  However, obtaining the required financing to conduct 
experimental-design work, and testing and deployment of the 
required number of ICBMs with MIRVs under the conditions that 
have developed is quite problematic. I need to say that the 
terms of the START II Treaty permit us to substantially smooth 
over the negative consequences for our country of the breakdown 
of the cooperation of SMT weapons developers since it is easier 
to create the formation of the SMT and strategic nuclear weapons 
as a whole that is comparable in combat capabilities with the 
U.S. strategic offensive forces formation and thereby ensures 
maintenance of the military strategic balance at a lower level 
of nuclear confrontation. 
  The START II Treaty limitations provide a fundamental 
capability to the Missile Troops to have up to 1,200 or more 
single-warhead missile launchers, depending on the development 
of the naval and aircraft components of the strategic nuclear 
forces. The specific distribution of the number of warheads and 
weapon platforms among the components of the strategic nuclear 
forces triad must be determined by the military-political and 
domestic economic situation in Russia that is taking shape. We 
propose carrying out the deployment of the formation in the 19 
existing position areas on RF territory. In accordance with the 
provisions of the START II Treaty, a significant portion of the 
single-warhead missiles in the fixed variant can be deployed in 
reequipped heavy missile (90 silos) and light ICBM with MIRV 
launch silos. 
  In accordance with the terms of the START II Treaty, the 
number of Missile Troops position areas is being reduced in 
relation to the current number by eight positions: seven 
position areas in Ukraine, Belarus and Kazakhstan and one in the 
Russian Federation. In the process, the personnel strength of 
the RF SMT must be reduced insignificantly which is associated 
with the increase of the SMT's mobile formation. In contrast to 
fixed missile complexes, several times as many personnel are 
required per launch crew in mobile missile complex subunits. 
  Under conditions of the deep reductions in accordance with 
the START II Treaty, the SMT will be capable as before of 
playing the role of a leading component of the strategic nuclear 
forces which is caused by its high combat capabilities. 
  Assessments indicate that, despite the reduction of the 
share 
of the SMT per number of warheads from 64% to 30% 
at the 
present time in accordance with the START II Treaty, their 
contribution in a strategic nuclear forces potential retaliatory 
strike even increases as a result of the increase of the 
formation's survivability and better operational specifications 
for the functioning of the SMT combat command and control system. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] What is occurring with 
the SMT large formations in Belarus, Kazakhstan and Ukraine? 
  [Dvorkin] The positions of Belarus, Kazakhstan and Ukraine 
with regard to the nuclear weapons deployed on their territory 
is having a definite impact on the prospects for SMT development 
and implementation of the START treaties. 
  In accordance with the Lisbon Protocol that is an integral 
part of the START I Treaty, the Republic of Belarus, Republic of 
Kazakhstan and Ukraine reaffirmed the USSR's obligations in 
accordance with the START I Treaty and were obligated to accede 
to the 1 June 1968 Treaty on Nonproliferation of Nuclear Weapons 
as participating states that do not have nuclear weapons. Taking 
into account the state obligations that have been assumed in 
accordance with the START I Treaty and also the bases of CIS 
nuclear policy that are recorded in the Agreement on Joint 
Measures With Regard to Nuclear Weapons (Alma-Ata, 21 December 
1991) and the Agreement on Strategic Arms (Minsk, 30 December 
1991), packages of bilateral agreements that regulate all of the 
aspects of the activities of the nuclear forces that are 
temporarily deployed on the territory of Belarus, Kazakhstan and 
Ukraine have been prepared and partially signed. 
  Our mutual relations with the Republic of Belarus with 
regard 
to nuclear forces have been completely defined. The process of 
withdrawing mobile complexes with RS-12M ICBMs has already begun. 
  Kazakhstan, just like Belarus, has ratified the START I 
Treaty. However, the state affiliation of the nuclear weapons 
and the status of the nuclear forces on the territory of the 
Republic of Kazakhstan have not been determined at the present 
time. The Republic leadership's position with regard to the time 
periods for the elimination and withdrawal of strategic nuclear 
weapons is not completely clear. Nevertheless, the missile 
weapons specified combat readiness is being maintained, 
scheduled maintenance of the missile complexes is being 
conducted, and the first 12 missiles (six in each of two 
position areas) have been removed from combat alert duty. 
  The greatest uncertainty is being preserved with regard to 
the nuclear weapons in Ukraine, whose parliament has still not 
ratified the START I Treaty. Ukraine has established 
administrative control over the ICBMs located on its territory. 
At the same time, centralized combat command and control of all 
ICBMs, including those deployed in Ukraine, is being maintained 
and carried out only from Russian territory. 
  The Agreement Between the Russian Federation and Ukraine on 
the Procedures for Implementation of Warranty and Inventor's 
Supervision [avtorskiy nadzor] Over the Operation of the 
Strategic Missile Complexes Located on Their Territories was 
signed at the beginning of September of this year at Yalta and 
entered into force from the moment it was signed. In this 
agreement, the parties, guided by the need for nuclear and 
ecological safety, the exclusion of unsanctioned employment of 
nuclear weapons and maintenance of the missile complexes in the 
proper technical state, have agreed to conduct work on warranty 
and inventor's supervision using specialists of developing and 
manufacturing enterprises without regard to on whose territory 
they are deployed. 
  At the same time, an Intergovernmental Agreement on 
Scrapping 
Nuclear Warheads and the Basic Principles for Scrapping Nuclear 
Warheads of the Strategic Nuclear Forces That Are Deployed in 
Ukraine were signed and have equal force. These documents define 
the procedures and conditions for removal and transportation to 
Russian territory and for scrapping and dismantling of all types 
of ICBM nuclear warheads and also warheads of air-based nuclear 
cruise missiles. 
  I am far from the thought on the unimpeded implementation of 
these agreements. Quite a few barriers have quite rapidly 
appeared and will continue to emerge in the future. We must 
apply significant efforts. However, it is important that the 
parties have reaffirmed their adherence to the 1 July 1968 
Treaty on the Nonproliferation of Nuclear Weapons and the START 
I Treaty. 
  According to U.S. State Department associates, evidence 
exists that Ukrainian specialists are undertaking attempts to 
establish operational control of the ICBMs on their territory. 
However, first of all, the data we have does not confirm that 
and, second, attempts to implement these plans would cancel out 
all of the international and bilateral agreements and treaties 
with the participation of Ukraine, leaving it in a state of 
isolation. In my opinion, Ukraine understands the senselessness 
of such steps. Under any development of the political situation, 
the elimination of nuclear weapons in Ukraine is a question of 
time since Ukraine does not have at its disposal the 
capabilities to manufacture nuclear munitions and to test ICBMs 
and, consequently, to renew the strategic offensive weapons 
formation. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] What are the prospects 
for further reductions of strategic offensive weapons and how 
will this affect strategic stability? 
  [Dvorkin] Maintenance of the capability to maintain a 
balance 
(equilibrium) of forces both for the potential for deterrence 
(the effectiveness of retaliatory operations) and also for 
counterforce potential (the capability to destroy strategic 
military targets in preemptive operations) can be the criterion 
for the maximum depth of strategic offensive weapons reductions. 
  There can also be other criteria based first of all on the 
required level of damage in retaliatory operations but this is a 
separate topic. 
  In accordance with the START I Treaty limitations, up to 
4,900 warheads can be deployed on ICBMs and SLBMs [submarine 
launched ballistic missiles]. It has been assumed that the 
United States will carry out the reductions with the 
simultaneous accomplishment of strategic offensive forces 
modernization programs under the terms of the START I Treaty: 
  deployment of new Minuteman IV missiles in the launch silos 
of existing Minuteman II and Minuteman III missiles and 
acceptance into the inventory of mobile Midgetman small ICBMs; 
and, 
  completion of the construction of 18 Ohio Class SSBNs 
[nuclear ballistic missile submarines] and equipping them with 
Trident II SLBMs and others. 
  As a result of reductions in the effective combat strength 
of 
the U.S. strategic offensive forces, the number of ICBMs and 
SLBMs must be reduced by approximately 25% (from 
approximately 
1,656 to 1,200 missiles) and, the number of ballistic missile 
warheads -- by approximately 30% (from 7,954 to 4,900 
weapons). 
However, qualitative changes in the formation would have a 
substantial impact on the increase of its combat capabilities. 
The ballistic missile formation's counterforce potential would 
increase by a factor of 1.3 and potential for deterrence -- by a 
factor of 1.1-1.35, with regard to 1992. By the time of the 
completion of the implementation of the START I Treaty, the 
United States would surpass Russia in these indicators by 
approximately a factor of two. 
  Under the terms of the START II Treaty, approximately 932 
ICBMs and SLBMs equipped with 2,228 warheads could be in the 
effective combat strength of the U.S. strategic offensive forces. 
  Furthermore, during the course of preparations for the 
Treaty, the American side carried out unilateral steps for the 
termination of the Midgetman Small ICBM development and 
deployment program and terminated production of W-88 warheads 
for Trident II SLBMs. 
  In the event the enumerated measures are implemented, the 
CIS 
missile formation's counterforce potential will be reduced by a 
factor of three with regard to the current level after 
elimination of the MX ICBM, reduction of the number of warheads 
for the Minuteman and Trident II missiles, and termination of 
equipping the latter with W-88 warheads. The deterrent potential 
will be reduced by approximately a factor of two. 
  Under the terms of the START II Treaty, the counterforce 
potential of the RF strategic nuclear forces is also being 
reduced by approximately 45% with the elimination of 
ICBMs with 
MIRVs, however, the superiority of the U.S. strategic offensive 
forces (by a factor of 1.2) is noticeably less in contrast to 
the terms of the START I Treaty. 
  The reduction of the U.S. strategic offensive forces' 
offensive capabilities and the increase of the portion of mobile 
complexes in the Missile Troops formation from 30% with 
the 
limitation of strategic offensive arms at the level of 6,000 
warheads to 50...60% with deeper reductions causes an 
abrupt 
increase of the survivability of the domestic ICBM formation. 
Under conditions of the implementation of the START II Treaty, 
the potential of an SMT retaliatory strike increases by a factor 
of 1.5 and, of all strategic nuclear forces -- by approximately 
20/% and levels out with the American potential. 
  Comparison of the terms of the START I and START II treaties 
indicates that, with the directions and trends of development 
that have taken shape for Russian and U.S. strategic offensive 
weapons, the counterforce and deterrent potentials of the sides 
are coming closer together as the number of warheads is reduced. 
  The trend toward the combat capabilities of the sides' 
strategic forces coming closer together is strongly manifested 
at the level of 5,000-6,000 strategic offensive weapons or less. 
This is occurring for a number of reasons. First of all, 
according to the START I Treaty, the number of warheads is being 
reduced significantly more radically than weapon platforms (from 
approximately 2,400 to 1,600) which is promoting the increase of 
the stability of the formations' combat systems since the 
average number of warheads per weapon platform is being reduced 
from 4.5-6.3 to 3.5-4.0 in accordance with the START I Treaty 
and the terms of the START II Treaty generally do not envision a 
further reduction of the number of weapon platforms (the average 
number of warheads on weapon platforms can be 1.9-2.2). 
  Second, the portion of warheads on mobile ICBMs is 
increasing 
in the ground component of Russia's strategic nuclear forces 
which, along with the reduction of the other side's counterforce 
potential, is drastically increasing survivability and, 
consequentially, the deterrent potential of the SMT formation. 
  So, an analysis of the correlation of the combat potentials 
of the existing and future U.S. strategic offensive weapons 
formations and RF strategic nuclear forces indicates that a 
reduction of warheads promotes the strengthening of 
military-strategic stability and meets Russia's national 
security interests. 
  The equality of the offensive and defensive potentials of 
the 
United States and Russia can be preserved with further 
reductions of strategic offensive weapons (below 3,000 warheads) 
and maintenance of a rational structure for the strategic 
nuclear forces. However, as strategic offensive weapons are 
reduced, the absolute significance of these potentials is also 
reduced which could reduce the significance of nuclear arsenals 
as a tool for maintaining military-strategic stability. 
  The employment of various approaches, while taking into 
account the impact of the most significant factors that are 
capable of having a negative impact on the military-strategic 
balance in the period until 2010 (joint employment of nuclear 
forces of the coalition of states, utilization of 
precision-guided weapons during the course of a non-nuclear 
period of military operations for strikes against CIS targets, 
the employment of tactical aviation nuclear weapons in a nuclear 
missile strike that is coordinated with strategic forces, or 
deployment of even a limited U.S. territorial ABM [antiballistic 
missile] defense), indicates that, from the point of view of the 
stability of the military-strategic balance, the possibilities 
for further reductions of strategic offensive weapons without 
neutralization of destabilizing factors is quite limited, 
although it does exist. 
  In my view, the transformation of the Triad into a Dyad by 
reorienting all heavy bombers to the accomplishment of missions 
in war with the employment of conventional weapons could be one 
of the possible directions on this path. 
  Strategic aviation with nuclear weapons would certainly play 
a priority and quite independent role in the nuclear strategy if 
the sides did not have ICBMs and SLBMs. However, the 
contribution of heavy bombers to the accomplishment of the 
nuclear deterrence mission with the availability of adequate 
ICBM and SLBM forces is, in my view, beyond the threshold of 
discernibility. Obviously, therefore nothing is known about the 
U.S. plans to conduct air operations in the process of and after 
conducting massive nuclear strikes using ICBM and SLBM forces. 
With the shift from the Triad to the Dyad, the sides' strategic 
offensive weapons could be reduced in the manner being examined, 
for example, to a level of 2,500 warheads. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46578 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Military Ecology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Problems of Military Ecology </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Problems of Military Ecology </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0312I Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 2, 1993 (Signed to press 12 May 93) pp 49-51--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0312I </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Doctor of Technical Sciences Vyacheslav </F>
Dmitriyevich Pilyugin: "Problems of Military Ecology"] 
  [Text] Vyacheslav Dmitriyevich Pilyugin heads a 
section in the Russian Ministry of Defense Ecology and Special 
Protective Systems Directorate. He is the author of more than 
100 scientific works and inventions. 
  In February 1993, V.D. Pilyugin delivered a report on 
the problems of ecology in the Russian Federation Armed Forces 
at the NATO SSAS [not found] Committee in Brussels. 
  In the Soviet Union, Ministry of Defense ranges occupied 30 
million hectares and 42 million hectares were allocated for 
various military facilities. Furthermore, in the process of 
daily activities and the conduct of military exercises, the 
Armed Forces operate on areas that significantly exceed these 
limits. At the present time, a substantial portion of this 
territory remains within the jurisdiction of the Russian 
Ministry of Defense. Some ranges are located outside the borders 
of the Russian Federation, primarily on the territory of 
Kazakhstan. 
  Military activity in peacetime is one of the types of 
housekeeping-economic activities that is associated with a 
heightened risk of unfavorable impacts on the environment and 
man. This activity proceeds from the priority of the state's 
military security and therefore ecological violations are 
fundamentally permitted in some cases. The Armed Forces are a 
source of negative impact on the environment, based upon the 
specific nature of their activities, saturation with complex 
weapons systems and military equipment, and the employment of 
energy-intensive technologies in everyday life. Military 
facilities discharge harmful substances into the air during 
launches of various types of missiles, flights of aircraft and 
housekeeping activities (boilers, kitchens, etc.) Furthermore, 
the Armed Forces are saturated with motor vehicle transportation 
and, in the meantime, we have calculated that they cause 
approximately 70% of all harmful discharges into the 
atmosphere. So, during a 24-hour period, a carburetor engine 
emits as much carbon gases as a man during his entire lifetime. 
  During the daily activities of the troops, reservoirs and 
soil become polluted and a significant portion of the pollution 
occurs due to uncontrolled wastes and poor collection of 
everyday wastes. 
  There are a significant number of nuclear reactors in the 
Armed Forces, especially in the Navy. Radioactive contamination 
of the environment occurs during the operation of reactors, when 
maintenance work is conducted on them, and when they are removed 
from operation. Leaks and spills of various highly toxic 
substances, primarily missile engine fuel, are a source of 
pollution. The electromagnetic radiation of powerful radio and 
radar sites and other sources of radiation inflict enormous 
damage to the environment. The extent of that damage to the 
environment has still not been completely determined. 
  So, the daily activities of troops inflict ecological damage 
to the environment. However, civilian departments, and their 
numerous enterprises that are not equipped with the required 
cleaning equipment for various reasons, frequently conduct 
dumping and emit harmful substances and in many cases these 
departments are attempting to accuse the Armed Forces of the 
harm that has been caused to the environment. Right now Russia 
has especially had to encounter this phenomenon when troops are 
being withdrawn from other states. The governments of these 
states are demanding enormous compensation from Russia for the 
damage caused to the environment and there frequently is no 
evidence that the damage was caused by our troops. 
  At the same time, I need to point out that the Armed Forces 
have the scientific-technical, material and production potential 
that is capable of making a substantial contribution to 
ecological security, including for the creation of ecological 
monitoring. The Ecology and Special Protective Systems 
Directorate, which is called upon to precisely determine the 
environmental situation in the Armed Forces and ways to improve 
it, was created in the Russian Ministry of Defense in August 
1992. 
  Environmental protection structures previously existed in 
the 
Armed Forces. The inspectorate for Protection of the Environment 
was created eight years ago under the Rear Services of the Armed 
Forces and inspectorates and inspectors were introduced into the 
Armed Forces services, military districts and fleets. However, 
their activities were practically reduced to monitoring 
functions. 
  In accordance with the Statute approved by the RF Minister 
of 
Defense in February of this year, the Ecology and Special 
Protective Systems Directorate was tasked with overall 
management and monitoring of environmental activity in the 
Russian Armed Forces and also with the organization and 
coordination of work for the creation and employment in the 
Armed Forces of special (medical, veterinary, chemical and 
technical) systems to protect the troops from the impact of 
unfavorable environmental factors during the course of everyday 
troop activities and in emergency situations. An RF Council of 
Ministers Chairman Directive founded the Ministry of Defense 
Ecological Center, that was created by the Ecology and Special 
Protective Systems Directorate in May 1993, to form and develop 
Armed Forces ecological support systems. 
  The following are the Ecology Directorate's primary 
missions: 
formation and development of the RF Armed Forces ecological 
support system; management and monitoring of the activity of the 
ecological organs of the Armed Forces services, branches of 
troops, military districts, fleets, and RF Ministry of Defense 
directorates; implementation of cooperation with state 
environmental protection organs; formation of a 
scientific-technical policy and organization of the conduct of 
research and development on the problems of military ecology; 
and, organization of a system of ecological training and 
education in the army and navy. 
  The Ecology and Special Protective Systems Directorate is a 
central organ of the RF Ministry of Defense military directorate 
and is subordinate to the chief of the RF Armed Forces General 
Staff. The Ecology and Special Protective Systems Directorate 
developed the RF Armed Forces Ecological Support Concept, in 
which a system of views, primary directions and practical 
missions in this sphere is reflected, to ensure a comprehensive 
and weighty approach to the reduction of the negative impact of 
military activity on the environment. The Concept, which has 
been approved by the RF Armed Forces Chief of the General Staff, 
proposes the mandatory accounting of economic aspects in all 
elements of the RF Armed Forces structural development system. 
  An objective assessment of the ecological situation in the 
army and navy and the discovery of areas of heightened 
ecological tension is one of the Directorate's priority 
missions. Right now we are continuing the ecological passport 
system [pasportizatsiya] of military facilities and territories 
and we are conducting the formation of an ecological measures 
plan and a research and development program for 1994. As of 
today, the passport system has been conducted at approximately 
20% of military units. 
  Work has begun on the creation of an Armed Forces automated 
ecological monitoring system which will become one of the 
elements of the Russian Federal Ecomonitoring System. 
  An RF Presidential Directive has approved the procedures for 
inventorying locations and extraction facilities, 
transportation, and the collection and burial of radioactive 
substances and wastes that have been developed in the 
Directorate. An organizational diagram and the procedures for 
conducting this work in the Armed Forces have been defined. 
  We are preparing proposals on the formation of ecological 
organs and subunits ("green helmets") based upon existing Armed 
Forces structures and services, military districts and fleets. 
The ecological organs and subunits will be tasked with the 
resolution of practical missions for protecting and restoring 
the environment at ground and naval forces deployment and combat 
training areas. In the process, we plan to utilize the 
experience of work of nonorganic detachments for the elimination 
of the consequences of the Russian troop stay in Germany and the 
Baltic republics, and also similar subunits that have been 
created in the armies of the United States and Western Europe. 
  A great deal of attention will be devoted to the 
organization 
of expanded ecological training of officers at military 
educational institutions and the development of ecological 
training and education in the troops. 
  In its activity, the Directorate is proceeding from the fact 
that putting in order and normalizing the ecological situation 
in the Armed Forces is first of all a matter for the Armed 
Forces themselves. In order to achieve that, we need: 
  a) A team of people that will be specially involved with the 
ecology in the army and navy. To do this, we have created the 
Ecology and Special Protective Systems Directorate and the 
Ecological Center and we are beginning to form a system of 
ecological organs in military districts, armies, fleets, etc. 
Furthermore, we are creating special ecological subunits which 
will conduct recultivation and other restoration work on 
territories allotted to the Ministry of Defense. It's possible 
that these subunits will be created outside Armed Forces 
strength standards or by reducing the army and navy, possibly -- 
on the principles of alternative service; 
  b) within the framework of all state ecological programs, 
such as "Russia's Ecological Security", "Conversion -- Ecology", 
and others, the appropriate portion of the resources must 
provide for the needs of the Armed Forces. 
  During the formation of various ecological funds, including 
funds from the employment of tax sanctions, a definite portion 
of the resources must be transferred to the Ministry of Defense 
to conduct environmental protection measures. 
  A separate article to conduct environmental protection 
activity must be provided for within the framework of the 
defense budget; and, 
  c) A system of ecological training and education in the 
Armed 
Forces. 
  In recent years, the RF Ministry of Defense has done quite a 
bit of work to provide public services and amenities at military 
garrisons and to transform polluted areas into troop deployment 
areas. For example, dozens of complexes for the complete 
biological treatment of sewage with a total output (capacity) of 
more than 20,000 cubic meters per day were built in the areas 
adjacent to the Scandinavian countries, that is, toward the 
Baltic Sea, on the Kola Peninsula, in Kareliya and Arkhangelsk 
Oblast which had a positive impact on the state of surface and 
ground waters in this region. I need to note that environmental 
protection work was carried out more intensively on the 
territory of Lithuania, Latvia and Estonia. So, water treatment 
facilities were built at a number of garrisons there. 
  In Baltic and Northern Fleet garrisons, the total capacity 
of 
water treatment plants has been increased by more than 5,000 
cubic meters per day in recent years. Reequipping surface 
combatants and ships with separators to clean water containing 
oil and also systems for their collection has been completed in 
these fleets. We are conducting the systematic installation of a 
new type of waste oil collection systems to clean petroleum 
products and floating garbage from water areas. There are boom 
barriers in constant readiness in each fleet. They plan to build 
additional coastal sites to clean up water that contains oil. 
  In recent years, special attention has been devoted to 
improving public services and amenities of fleets of motor 
vehicles and other military vehicles and to equipping them with 
washracks with circulating water supply systems with 
gasoline-grease recovery devices. Work is being continuously 
conducted to ensure ecological safety during the operation of 
petroleum-oil-lubricants [POL] depots and facilities, and motor 
vehicle and construction equipment refueling and servicing 
locations. 
  The above listed environmental protection measures are 
mainly 
being carried out through the efforts of the troops themselves 
without the involvement of specialized construction 
organizations. 
  The availability of auxiliary support services in the troops 
is a specific feature of the everyday activities of our Armed 
Forces. As a result, problems arise with the maintenance of 
sanitary procedures on the territory of these services. Existing 
boiler facilities that were built in the troops according to 
typical designs are far from perfect from the point of view of 
ecology. As a rule, cleaning harmful combustion products from 
smoke gases is inadequate. Cleaning gases is mainly conducted in 
dust extractors and only solid particles are removed from these 
gases. The resolution of this problem will require significant 
material resources, effort, and time and will largely depend on 
the heat-engineering equipment that is being employed and 
developed. 
  In the RF Armed Forces, attention is also being devoted to 
the protection, reproduction and rational utilization of forest 
resources. The volumes and areas for cutting down forests for 
the needs of the army and navy are being continuously reduced. 
In Kareliya, Murmansk and Arkhangelsk oblasts alone, the volume 
of logging has been reduced by one million cubic meters per 
year, that is, by more than half, since 1975. Forest restoration 
work is being mandatorily conducted on all cut down areas and 
the planting of valuable breeds of timber is being conducted. 
So, in 1992, tree planting was conducted on approximately 3,500 
hectares in this region. In 1990, we terminated drift floating 
of timber that was being conducted in Arkhangelsk Oblast because 
it had a negative impact on the state of the rivers. 
  Under the new sociopolitical conditions and under the 
fundamental restructuring of the entire state structure, 
including in the army, the resolution of urgent ecological 
problems of military activity is unthinkable without a unified 
State Scientific-Technical Program which would determine the 
primary directions and research tasks, the procedures and time 
periods for accomplishing work, the composition of the 
executors, the volumes and sources of financing, coordination 
and the exchange of experience in international cooperation, 
training and education of cadres. 
  The conduct and implementation of ecological programs in 
Europe, and in the entire world, will require the united efforts 
of all countries, including former potential enemies, which in 
turn will permit us to accelerate the overall process of the 
transition to international relations from confrontation and an 
indifferent attitude toward mutual cooperation. 
  In our opinion, we need to begin international cooperation 
with: 
  1. Coordination of the norms and standards on all aspects of 
ecological problems; 
  2. Organization of an international warning and notification 
system and elimination of the aftereffects of major accidents 
and catastrophes at ecologically dangerous facilities that are 
accompanied by ecological consequences on regional, national or 
cross-border scales; and. 
  3. With cooperation in scientific-technical policy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46579 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Information </F>
<H3> <TI>   Information Technology in the Armed Forces of the Russian </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Information Technology in the Armed Forces of the Russian </PHRASE></F></HT>
  Federation 

<F P=102> 94UM0311G Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 1, 1993 (Signed to press 5 Jul 93) pp 57-60--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0311G </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by V.N. Medvedev and S.K. Lopukhov under the rubric </F>
"Information Sciences"] 
  [Text] Vsevolod Nikolayevich Medvedev completed the 
VIA [Military Engineering Academy] imeni F.E. Dzerzhinskiy, and 
is a doctor of technical sciences, professor and academician at 
the International Engineering Academy in the field of 
information sciences. 
  Sergey Konstantinovich Lopukhov completed the VAGSh of 
the VAF [Military Academy imeni Frunze], and is a specialist in 
the field of information sciences and management, a candidate of 
military sciences and chief of an institute. 
  The dissemination of information technology in the armed 
forces is the process of the creation, broad-scale incorporation 
and application in various fields of activity of the armed 
forces, under any conditions, of methods, system and means of 
obtaining, gathering, processing, storing and using information. 
  A certain base of information technology has taken shape in 
the armed forces, including automated systems of 
command-and-control of troops (ASUV) and the computer centers of 
staffs, as well as the computer capacity of the NIIs 
[scientific-research institutes], VVUZs [higher military 
educational institutions] and institutions of the armed forces. 
The facilities, elements and command posts of the troops whose 
officers have an affect to a certain extent on the combat 
capabilities of the armed forces have been equipped with 
automated systems first and foremost. The level of information 
technology is considerably lower in the lower echelons of 
command and control, supporting structures and in the social 
realm. 
  The dissemination of information technology in the armed 
forces as a whole is higher than average for the national 
economy, since means of artificial intelligence have been 
adopted more actively in the armed forces. An analysis of the 
state of information technology in the armed forces shows, at 
the same time, that its level does not conform in full to 
contemporary methods and means of waging battle and the 
requirements arising therefrom. 
  The principal shortcomings in information technology in the 
armed forces of the Russian Federation are: 
  a sharp lag in information technology of lower levels 
of command and control and, as a consequence, the absence of a 
real information base; 
  the adoption of various hardware and software that are 
not compatible; 
  the insufficient level of the capabilities and 
characteristics of the computer technology being used, and the 
low degree of saturation of subunits and services with modern 
computer hardware; 
  the insufficient utilization in the armed forces of 
contemporary achievements in the field of new information 
technologies, methods of mathematical modeling and artificial 
intelligence. 
  The topicality of information technology for the armed 
forces 
is explained by the growing role of information and the 
necessity of reducing the time for the making of well-founded 
decisions for their command and control under the new military 
and political conditions, which envisage cutbacks in 
conventional and strategic offensive weapons. 
  The necessity of information technology for the armed forces 
is conditioned by the marked increase in the flows of 
information in the command-and-control elements of the armed 
forces and the value of the information, the increased 
significance of the level of awareness of officers and the 
well-foundedness of the decisions they make. 
  The dissemination of information technology in the armed 
forces defines new views of the development of arms and military 
hardware (VVT) and their robotization and intellectualization, 
as well as improvements in the system of the command-and-control 
of troops (forces) and weapons, and envisages the creation and 
application of new information technologies and means of 
information technology, the formation of an information 
infrastructure for the armed forces, and the creation of 
specialized information facilities for the efficient utilization 
of information in all spheres of their activity. More than 50 
percent of the time of the command-and-control cycle in the 
armed forces of the United States, according to the estimates of 
foreign specialists, is spent on the gathering, summary and 
analysis of various information, while the making of decisions 
is accomplished based on the use of only a small percentage of 
the available information. 
  The principal directions and aims of the dissemination of 
information technology in the armed forces are: 
  --in the field of military construction, the 
fuller utilization of information resources for the scientific 
substantiation of armed forces structures, their necessary size, 
sophistication, development prospects and support, through the 
broad-scale incorporation of modern means of information 
technology for the accelerated use of the achievements of 
science and technology in the interests of the armed forces, 
predicting the military-political situation and performing 
measures for the preparation of the armed forces and the country 
as a whole to repel aggression, based on the development of 
multifunctional information-management systems; 
  --in the field of armed combat, increasing the 
effectiveness of the development of plans for the employment of 
the armed forces, reducing the times and raising the quality of 
decision-making in preparing for operations, and providing a 
flexible response to changes in the military-political situation; 
  --in the field of command-and-control of the armed 
forces, increasing the operativeness, reliability and 
concealment of the command-and-control of troops (forces) 
through the adoption of improved means of automation; 
  --in the field of supporting the troops, raising 
the qualities, completeness and operativeness of all types of 
support for the troops, under any conditions, through the 
widespread and comprehensive incorporation of means of 
information technology and new information technologies, and the 
creation of favorable conditions with the aim of supporting the 
everyday activity of units and subunits in peacetime for the 
organized and timely conduct of operations under conditions of 
the combat environment; 
  --in military-scientific activity, raising the 
effectiveness of the fulfillment of scientific-research work on 
the basis of equipping the subunits (units) for military 
scientific information with the latest means of information 
technology, uniting them into information networks, priority 
research of problems in the preparation and waging of modern 
operations and combat activity connected with the increasing 
influence of information technologies, intensification of the 
creation of new means of armed combat and command-and-control of 
troops (forces) on the basis of qualitatively higher information 
support, substantiation of efficient forms and methods of combat 
preparation of the troops, and optimization of the ways of 
achieving the required characteristics of arms and military 
hardware; 
  --in the field of military education, military training 
and indoctrination, a radical rise in the quality of 
training of military specialists on the basis of efficient 
information support for the tasks of training personnel, 
creating an information-technological base for the restructuring 
of military education through a deepening of scientific 
research, the intensification and individualization of training, 
and adaptation to the abilities of the trainees and the 
activation of their creative potential; 
  --in the field of routine activities, raising the 
quality of decision-making in the process of everyday activity 
of the subunits, units and institutions of the armed forces, the 
performance of garrison and guard duty, the escort of military 
freight, the observance of regulation order and the 
reinforcement of military discipline; 
  --in the military-legal and social realm, the 
information technology of the armed forces pursue the aim of a 
substantial rise in the quality of information-legal support for 
the everyday activity of the troops, improvements in lawmaking 
activity, and assurance of a greater level of awareness on 
questions of social protections for servicemen and their 
families. 
  The dissemination of information technology, along with the 
development and improvement of traditional information 
technologies, presupposes the adoption into the active practice 
of the armed forces new information technologies that support 
the automated resolution of poorly formalized tasks in various 
fields of activity of the armed forces, including by a user who 
does not have special training in the field of computers. The 
new information technologies are the foundation for resolving 
applied tasks in the command-and-control of troops, the creation 
of robotized weapons systems, and the support of the everyday 
activity of the troops, services, and the training of personnel. 
  The work on the dissemination of information technology in 
the armed forces of the Russian Federation is being held back 
for a number of objective reasons--the uncertainty of the paths 
and stages of the reformation and development of the armed 
forces and the incomplete nature of the development of the State 
Program of Information Sciences for Russia, on the one hand, and 
the fact that the principles and sources of financing of the 
Program of Information Sciences for the armed forces has not 
been resolved, on the other. 
  Analysis shows that the substantial development of means of 
computer technology and information technology (SVTI), a 
reduction of several times over in mass, dimensions and power 
consumption and an increase in reliability by one or two orders 
of magnitude will be required under the new conditions. Domestic 
technologies for the development of SVTI still do not ensure the 
rapid attainment of the indicated characteristics. One reason 
for this situation is the technical policy that was pursued in 
our country in the recent past--a preference for copying foreign 
models. The creation of new computers in the Unified Series (YeS 
computers), the System of Small Computers (SM computers) and 
personal computers (PEVM) has proceeded and is proceeding along 
that path. Primarily foreign-made computer hardware is being 
used as a result to equip the staffs, command-and-control 
elements (posts) and institutions of the armed forces of the 
Russian Federation in the development and adoption of new 
automated information systems, which is forcing significant 
expenditures from the state budget. And until market-competitive 
computer hardware is produced in the Russian Federation, those 
expenses will increase owing to the necessity of replacing 
functionally and physically obsolete series-produced models of 
the YeS and SM computers. 
  The directions for the dissemination of information 
technology in the armed forces also encompass priority problems, 
within the framework of which the following tasks should be 
resolved in the near future: 
  the gradual creation of a telecommunications 
environment for the armed forces and its link-up with nationwide 
communications and data-transmission systems, and the further 
development of communications equipment; 
  the development and incorporation of base 
problem-oriented systems, software and hardware for the 
structuring of local and global information and computer 
networks; 
  the fastest possible equipping of armed forces staffs 
and organizations with base means of information technology and 
personal computers, advanced communications and 
telecommunications gear and improved organizational techniques 
as the foundation for the adoption of "paperless" information 
technologies; 
  the improvement of methods and tools for the 
development of software and the use of CASE technologies, 
without which progress in the creation and adoption of 
subsequent generations of automated systems and ASUVs is 
impossible; 
  assurance of the technical, information, linguistic and 
program compatibility of the means of information technology; 
  improvement of the system of training, retraining and 
skills enhancement of military specialists in the realm of 
information technology; 
  the creation of standardized, advanced means of 
information technology with a regard for the requirements of 
ensuring the security of the information. 
  The strategy of information technology for the armed forces 
and plans for the performance of the priority operations should 
be defined in the Conceptual Framework for the Dissemination of 
Information Technology in the armed forces and the Program of 
Information Technology for the armed forces. Its realization 
will occur under conditions of grave economic crisis in the 
national economy as a whole, with all of the consequences 
arising therefrom. The information technology policy for the 
armed forces should inevitably be considered within the context 
of the socio-economic policy of the state, reflecting the 
specific features of the transition of the country to new 
methods and mechanisms for the management of the national 
economy under conditions of the emergence of a market economy. 
  The aspect of the management of this process from within 
should exist alongside the state aspect of managing information 
technology in the armed forces. Those areas of financing, in 
other words, that will have the maximum impact under the 
concrete conditions of the realization of the Program should be 
defined within the framework of the amounts of financing 
allocated by the state and the restrictions defined by law. 
  The specific nature of the armed forces does not permit the 
Program to be fundamentally open for the participation of the 
plans of various organizations on a competitive basis. 
Considering that competitive selection is the most effective 
means of formulating programs, and allowing that the involvement 
of the civilian sector will make it possible to reduce expenses 
to a substantial extent, however, the analysis and ranking of 
all draft Programs by the degree of their openness is being 
proposed, orienting most of them toward realization in both the 
military and the civilian spheres, thereby ensuring the partial 
or full recouping of the initial expenditures. The possibility 
appears therein of preserving the strong scientific collectives 
of military organizations through the credit financing of 
additional projects in armed forces information technology. 
  The enterprises and organizations that are the consumers of 
SVTI are not only not upgrading their computer capacity, but are 
trying to get rid of existing capacity so as to reduce overhead; 
that is, a policy of gains for the moment is being pursued. The 
paramount development of the priority areas stipulated in the 
Program of Information Technology for the armed forces of the 
Russian Federation is required in particular in this regard, 
providing a sharp rise in the quality of the computer hardware 
being produced, out of the whole range of which only a few 
directions merit consideration at the given moment (some 
materials-intensive parts--the housings, boards, power sources 
etc.) that could easily be reproduced under foreign 
technologies. The backwardness of our microelectronics 
technology is well known. The situation is aggravated by the 
breakup of economic ties among the former union republics. About 
50 percent of the enterprises in this field have remained on the 
territory of Russia, and just 25 percent of the capacity of the 
former USSR went to the republics. This need not necessarily 
lead to a stoppage of production, but the output of modern and 
complex computer hardware can be set up only after a certain 
time interval and, most likely, only with the aid of foreign 
partners. 
  The unification of the fragmented information-management 
systems of the branches of the armed forces into a unified 
system for the Ministry of Defense, provision for its 
interaction with the information systems of the bodies of state 
administration and, in particular, with the information systems 
of the apparatus of the President and the Security Council, is 
an urgent task for the armed forces of the Russian Federation 
under prevailing military-political conditions. The material, 
scientific and technical basis for this work should be improved 
computer hardware and software support. The following basic 
principles should be taken into account when structuring the 
conceptual model for the unified information-management system 
(YeIUS): 
  minimization of the material and financial expenditures 
for the creation of the YeIUS; 
  the maximum utilization of available systems of 
command-and-control, computers, communications and 
data-transmission systems and scientific and technical 
developments; 
  centralization of access to information contained in 
the information and computer centers of the branches of the 
armed forces and other command-and-control points; 
  coordination of information flows in the YeIUS being 
created and the systems integrated with it according to uniform 
requirements; 
  the creation of support points for the gathering, 
study, depiction and analysis of data; 
  assurance of the basic principle of the 
command-and-control of troops--the centralization of 
command-and-control at all levels. 
  The information system being created within the apparatus of 
the Ministry of Defense and General Staff of the armed forces 
could be used as the foundation for creating this YeIUS. 
  The principal requirement toward the YeIUS is providing 
information to all elements of command-and-control and 
administrative leadership of the Ministry of Defense. 
  The accomplishment of the tasks enumerated above is 
impossible without the creation of scientific, technical, 
organizational and financial foundations of the 
command-and-control system and the coordination of operations in 
the realm of armed forces information technology. The following 
measures would be expedient to pursue in these areas, in our 
opinion: 
  1. A staff coordinating element--a Committee on Information 
Technology for the armed forces--should be created under the 
General Staff, answering directly for the resolution of issues 
in the dissemination of information technology in the armed 
forces. 
  Two independent elements could be formed under the Committee 
for Information Technology of the armed forces: an Expert 
Council and a Council of Chief Designers. The Expert Council 
should be composed, as a rule, of leading specialists in the 
field of information technology from the scientific-research 
organizations of the Ministry of defense, while the Council of 
Chief Designers should include representatives of the General 
Staff of the Ministry of Defense of the Russian Federation, 
organizations in the defense sectors of industry and the 
scientific-research organizations of the Russian Academy of 
Sciences associated with the development of information 
technologies and systems for military purposes. 
  2. It is essential to determine the General Customer and the 
sources, principles and procedure for financing the work under 
the program of Information Technology for the armed forces. 
  3. The creation of centers for the certification and funding 
of software are also best created in order to provide quality 
expert analysis of plans in the field of information technology 
for the armed forces, assessments of the quality level of 
information technologies being developed and systems and 
individual pieces of equipment in information technology, for 
the purpose of ensuring the compatibility of the means of 
information technology being employed in the armed forces, and 
on that basis the efficient making of financial expenditures for 
the development and acquisition of the means of information 
technology, as well as arms and military hardware that uses 
information technologies. 
  The problem of the dissemination of information technology 
in 
the armed forces is thus becoming a priority one today, 
determining both the look of the armed forces of the Russian 
Federation and the principles for its combat application. The 
economic expenditures for the realization of the Program of 
Information Sciences will be recouped over a short time through 
the marked increase in the efficiency of the performance of 
defensive tasks by the armed forces of the Russian Federation. 
  COPYRIGHT: Vooruzheniye, Politika, Konversiya 1993 No 1 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46580 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Information </F>
<H3> <TI>   Articles Not Translated From VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Articles Not Translated From VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, </PHRASE></F></HT>
  KONVERSIYA No 1, 1993 

<F P=102> 00000000 Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, 
POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in Russian No 1, 1993 (Signed to press 5 </F>

Jul 93)--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 00000000 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, 
POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>

<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

  [Text] Tactical Missile Weaponry of Russia. Notes on the 
History of Their Creation (S.P. Nepobedimyy) 19-25 
  Problems of Geopolitics and Security in the Research of the 
Academy of Natural Sciences (V.S. Pirumov) 38-40 
  Is a Collective System of Security for the Planet Possible? 
(N.N. Moiseyev) 41-43 
  Does Russia Have a an Effective Conceptual Model of 
Conversion? (B.V. Gusev) 49-51 
  The Privatization and Conversion of the Defense Complex of 
Russia (A.P. Kotov) 52-56 
  COPYRIGHT: Vooruzheniye, Politika, Konversiya 1993 No 1 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46581 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Information </F>
<H3> <TI>   Publication Data From VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA No </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Publication Data From VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA No </PHRASE></F></HT>
  1, 1993 

<F P=102> 94UM0311I Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 1, 1993 (Signed to press 5 Jul 93)--FOR OFFICIAL USE </F>

ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0311I </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

  [Text] 
  English title: ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION 
  Russian Title: VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA 
  Editors: M.M. Budayev, L.I. Volkov et al. 
  Publisher: Scientific Research Institute for Systemic 
Analusis of Problems 
  Place of publication: Moscow 
  Date of publication: 1993 
  Signed to press: 5 July 1993 
  COPYRIGHT: Vooruzheniye, Politika, Konversiya 1993 No 1 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46582 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Information </F>
<H3> <TI>   Articles Not Translated From VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Articles Not Translated From VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, </PHRASE></F></HT>
  KONVERSIYA No 2, 1993 

<F P=102> 00000000A Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, 
POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in Russian No 2, 1993 (Signed to press 12 </F>

May 93)--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 00000000A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, 
POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>

<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

  [Text] 
  The Experience of Conducting Conversion in St. Petersburg 
(O.I. Gapanovich)46-48 
  Security of Computer Infosphere Critical Applications 
Systems 
(R.M. Yusupov, B.P. Palchun)52-56 
  The Academy of Artillery Sciences (Recollections of the Son 
of the Academy President) (V.N. Voronov)57-61 
  From a Harquebus to a Missile (V.M. Krylov)62-68 
  COPYRIGHT: "Vooruzheniye, Politika, Konversiya", 1993 No 1 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46583 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Information </F>
<H3> <TI>   Publication Data From VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA No </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Publication Data From VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA No </PHRASE></F></HT>
  2, 1993 

<F P=102> 93UM0312K Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 2, 1993 (Signed to press 12 May 93)--FOR OFFICIAL USE </F>

ONLY 
<F P=103> 93UM0312K </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Publication Data] </F>
  [Text] 
  English Title: ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION 
  Russian Title: VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA 
  Editor-in-chief: V.V. Panov 
  Publisher: Scientific Research Institute for Systematic 
Analysis of Problems 
  Place of Publication: Moscow 
  Date of Publication: June 1993 
  Signed to press: 12 May 1993 
  COPYRIGHT: Vooruzheniye, Politika, Konversiya 1993 No 2 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46584 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Organized Crime Establishing Contacts in Military </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Organized Crime Establishing Contacts in Military </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0453A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 3 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0453A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yelena Sizova in the column "Warning": "Would </F>
You Step on a Rake?] 
  [Text] 
<H8>  Friedship With Mafia Always a One-Way Street, Even for </H8>
Military 
  Especially visible among the many less than hopeful trends 
current today is a pronounced increase in professionalism of 
organized crime. In literally one year, the domestic "Cosa 
Nostra" has progressed from minor stabbings and senseless random 
shootings to surprisingly accurate explosions in offices and 
residences, to contract killings carried out with a sniper's 
precision, to highly sophisticated criminally planned motor 
vehicle accidents. 
  It appears in general that the amateurs have been replaced 
by 
professionals, ones carrying out, rather than merely organizing, 
the crimes. This has been accompanied by another trend: a 
lowering of the average age of the criminals. 
  Just how is the youth of the criminals carrying out crimes 
associated with professionalism? The answer to that question is 
unbelievably simple. Shadow structures are attempting to involve 
in "business" the engineer troop, Marine, airborne trooper or, 
in a word, specialists who have received a particular kind of 
training in Army service. This is not only a simple solution, 
but also an inexpensive one, so to speak. 
  Although much has been said about the criminal world's 
increased interest in servicemen, very few details have been 
made known. Conventional wisdom has it that the only thing the 
Armed Forces have that is of interest to the Mafia is weapons. 
This being the case, preventive measures in effect in units, if 
any are applied, are based primarily (if not exclusively) on 
this aspect of the problem. Nonetheless, presently targeted by 
the Russian "camorra" just as intensively as the above is the 
Army's cadres. In this connection, criminal agents do not limit 
their efforts to enlisting the aid of men already discharged 
into the reserve. Several examples follow. 
  Cadet N. (whose investigation is still in progress) of the 
Pacific Ocean Higher Naval School acquired the habit of taking 
his automatic rifle from the weapons room, once a week over a 
period of six months, with the purpose being - of all things! - 
providing guard service to narcotics traffickers. Outrageous? 
This unfortunately is not an isolated case, since other military 
schools are experiencing this kind of occurrence. This falls 
under the category of individual "creative activity." 
  Incidentally, there also exists a group activity. It came to 
light that, until recently, representatives of regional 
groupings of organized crime were holding conferences on 
Tuesdays in a Vladivostok stadium. One item unfailingly included 
on the "agenda" was the question of utilizing Marine servicemen 
and subunits. Marines specially selected because of their 
remarkable physical conditioning were tasked with blackmailing 
competitors, often with the use of force. Made on the Tuesdays 
was a decision of how to deploy the "rapid deployment group" for 
the next job. 
  Other examples could be cited. The essence of the activity 
consists of effective organization, ease of finding willing 
participants, and relatively low cost of the "workforce." In 
addition, there is the possibility of using standard issue 
weapons. The foregoing inspires the domestic variety of the 
"Cosa Nostra" to mount ambitious searches for enlisting the aid 
of the man in uniform. 
  Just how is "recruitment" carried out? My work involves 
meeting various officials, including representatives of the 
military procuracy. They state that organized crime employs a 
widespread network of informants and doers. First on the 
targeting list are persons who have a criminal record prior to 
entering military service. The number of this kind of person in 
some units is as high as 20 percent, meaning that the supply of 
persons is large. 
  Let us assume (theoretically) for the moment that in a 
particular regiment there is not a single person bearing a 
criminal past. Let us assume that. However, trying to imagine 
that in the regiment there is not a single serviceman dealing in 
fuel, canned meat, condensed milk, and other "small items" in 
our country is an exercise in futility. The "recruiter" will get 
to them, also. 
  Take the case of Private Ishin, who was stationed in a unit 
of the Far Eastern Military District. As his term of service 
neared completion, the soldier started to sell fuel "on the 
side." Representatives of shadow structures provided him with an 
easy and lucrative business. They later ordered some kinds of 
spare parts and once more paid him well. Ishin by that time had 
been discharged, but he did not depart from the unit, in that he 
was hired as a civilian driver. That is how he earned extra 
money, based on his friendship with the "authorities." The 
logical conclusion of this friendship was his receiving an order 
to steal weapons, an act which caused his "downfall." 
  Generally speaking, few servicemen who become involved with 
criminals realize the full seriousness of their actions. They 
often rely on their contacts and an unreal conviction in 
imagined benefactors. 
  A major group at risk in this connection are the so-called 
"runners," soldiers who absent themselves from their unit 
without official leave. To find such persons, the "Cosa Nostra" 
has special intercept persons who station themselves at railroad 
stations, bus stations, and airports. The deserters possess no 
money, as a rule. All of a sudden, present on the scene is a 
"savior," who offers the deserter an opportunity of earning the 
price of a ticket. What comes next? Nothing less than slave 
labor, languishing in some warehouse, a bed consisting of boxes, 
poor food. Subsequently, the "runner" is told that he has done 
nothing for which he can be paid, and that, on the contrary, he 
has fallen into debt. 
  A system of fines spread throughout the criminal medium 
imposes monetary deficits, with the cause cited - for example - 
of taking up space in a warehouse in which the deserter does not 
belong (not an exaggeration). It is possible to turn off the 
"meter," partially at least, but only at the cost of sinking 
even more deeply into the quagmire. There exist many instances 
of that. 
  Take another case of a regimental headquarters of a military 
builders' detachment. Local mafiosi made duty Sergeant M. (whose 
investigation has not yet been completed) an offer to sell 
drugs. They quoted a sum of money they intended to receive, one 
considerably less than the going rate. This duty soldier, with 
the smell of easy money in the air, gave his assent. He did this 
a couple of times. Then he was told: "Young man, you are in this 
over your head. There is no way you can get away from us." The 
drug dealer, working in his profession of a "condemned man," was 
active for several weeks, then he was arrested. Meanwhile, a 
search was on for someone else who would like to "earn some 
money." 
  Especially alarming is how easily taken is the bait - first 
sweet promises, then abject bondage - by officer cadres, not 
only enlisted personnel. There is a disciplinary battalion 
stationed on Russkiy Island. It is a restricted post. It does 
not appear to have any ties to the mainland. Nonetheless, rumor 
had it that a man arriving from the "big land" had given away a 
considerable sum of money "out of friendliness." To whom? To 
officers awaiting discharge. Why had he done this? To pave the 
way for future cooperation in the civilian sector. The 
interested officers were told the details. The offer was 
tempting: It involved vessels of the merchant fleet performing 
primarily "Japanese" voyages. Foreign-made goods may be brought 
in. Some persons agreed to participate. Only later was it 
determined that the first three motor vehicles were intended for 
a "sponsor." But the deal had already been concluded. 
  We cannot be remiss by not mentioning how the Mafia deals 
with people who are stubborn, violate the "rules of the game," 
or outlive their usefulness. Agencies exercising jurisdiction 
over these matters are of the opinion that it is fairly 
difficult to help people who become deeply involved. However, it 
is possible (and necessary) to do something else: Warn anyone 
having any thoughts of taking advantage of the "unselfish" help 
offered by "friends" in a regimental headquarters. 
  Finally, is everything clear? If someone steps on a rake, he 
will undoubtedly be struck in the head, no matter how carefully 
he does the stepping. That is how the tool is made. 
  Therefore, does it not make sense to do some thinking about 
this beforehand? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46585 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   31 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Discussion of Provisions of Draft Law on Defense Order </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Discussion of Provisions of Draft Law on Defense Order </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0447A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 31 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0447A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Yermolin, KRASNAYA ZVEZDA: "A Draft Law </F>
on the Defense Order Exists. The Important Thing Is for It Not 
To Be Pigeonholed"] 
  [Text] A discussion of the bill "On the State Defense 
Order" took place in the State Duma Committee for Industry, 
Construction, Transportation and Energy. By this point 
ministries and departments interested in the law in one way or 
another had studied the draft and had supplemented it with their 
own proposals. Around 30 major defense industry enterprises also 
submitted their conclusions to the Committee. After undergoing 
some changes, the bill departed for the next segment of its 
thorny path--according to the Duma calendar, consideration in 
the first reading lies ahead at the end of June. 
  Grigoriy Zhorin, head of the military-industrial complex 
sector in the Duma Committee, who put much effort into the law 
for the defense industry back behind the walls of the Russian 
Federation Supreme Soviet, does not rule out that opponents of 
the draft will be found in the Duma, inasmuch as it is a 
question of the federal budget. And recent parliamentary debates 
over the 1994 state budget showed that there are many proponents 
of financial suffocation of defense enterprises among deputies. 
The fact is, the R18 trillion being sought (and rejected in the 
course of the first reading) were intended specifically for the 
defense order. But those same votes showed that there still were 
more people in the hall who understood this (according to my 
observations, around 170), which means there also is hope for 
success. 
  Strictly speaking, what is this law about that is coming 
into 
being? It defines the status and the legal and economic 
principles of forming, placing and fulfilling the State Defense 
Order for delivery of products and fulfillment of work in the 
interests of Russia's defense, security, and law and order. A 
provision has been put into a legal rule for the first time that 
the development and series manufacture of set-completing 
articles and special materials is an inalienable part of the 
defense order (a through [skvoznoy] order). Program development 
of arms and military equipment is envisaged for periods of 15, 
10 and 5 years, and even for one year. An article is included 
about mandatory execution of the defense order and about the 
parties' responsibility. 
  In the developers' opinion, the Law "On the State Defense 
Order" will permit realizing Russian Federation military 
doctrine more fully and will strengthen the financial incentive 
of all executors of the State Defense Order, including for 
creating and producing set-completing articles and materials 
regardless of forms of ownership and departmental subordination. 
The law will elevate the role of state contracts and agreements, 
will allow competitive placement of the defense order to be put 
into practice, and guarantees material-technical resources for 
needs of the military-industrial complex. 
  Of course, no matter how ideal it might be, the law itself 
can remain only good intentions if the state does not find the 
money to support it. The paradox of our present economic life 
consists specifically of the fact that at times one has to 
"defend himself against the state itself." And any federal 
budget knocked together according to the principle "the fewer 
funds allocated for defense, the better" will reduce the most 
sensible law, including one on the defense order, to dust. It 
would appear the budget is above the law. Sometimes it seems to 
be above the Constitution. At any rate, purely financial 
considerations have been winning victories lately over any other 
considerations, even those of common sense. And the financier 
offhandedly pins both physicists as well as lyric poets to the 
mat. In this struggle the military and defense industry workers 
are placed in the lightest weight category. 
  But one should not grieve in advance, especially as the bill 
is destined to pass through the filters of committees and 
discussions of the first and second readings. Perhaps it will 
acquire "armor" in the form of an article which will make it 
inaccessible to the whim of bureaucrats. 
  In addition, one should remember that the law is not as 
important as the procedure for its application. One can 
proclaim, for example, the obligatoriness of the State Defense 
Order being executed by enterprises and organizations regardless 
of forms of ownership, but how is this provision to be combined 
practically with the market's legal declarations? Or tax 
breaks--one cannot get by here without an extensive explanation 
of the tax department. The law provides only general directions. 
Again, much will depend on what procedure will be established by 
the government for determining volumes, time periods of delivery 
and the list of material-technical resources subject to 
allocation. It is understandable that the bill is incapable of 
answering the question (and therefore does not do so) of what to 
do if a paralysis of nonpayments breaks up the domestic economy. 
Where then should one go with this law and what doors should be 
forced open? 
  I deliberately will not concretize the content of the bill. 
It will be possible to speak objectively about articles only 
after the first reading. We are saying that a law can be good to 
the extent to which it does not contradict the realities of 
life. And there are grounds to assume that the bill's developers 
are standing firmly on sinful soil and not getting carried away 
by speculative models. I also consider evidence of this to be 
the temperate optimism of Grigoriy Zhorin, who understands that 
the defense industry needs an entire package of laws, but who 
also is ready to thank God if He helps push through at least the 
one law--"On the State Defense Order." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46586 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Results of Duma Meetings With Senator Nunn </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Results of Duma Meetings With Senator Nunn </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0455A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 1 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0455A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by KRASNAYA ZVEZDA correspondent Mikhail Pogorelyy: </F>
"Senators Apparently Do Recognize Need for `Delicate Approach' 
With Russia"] 
  [Text] 
<H8>  Offer to Carry Out Russian-American Peacekeeping Force </H8>
Training on U.S. Soil 
  On 31 May, leaders of the Duma defense and international 
affairs committees Sergey Yushenkov and Vladimir Lukin and Sam 
Nunn, U.S. Senate Armed Services Committee chairman, called a 
press conference in which they described the results of a joint 
session held by the legislators of the two countries. These 
members of the legislative bodies listed the problems 
constituting subjects of common discussion and shared their 
views for resolving these problems. The dialogue, as pointed out 
by Sergey Yushenkov, was constructive as well as open. 
  One of the topics examined was the pressing one of the trade 
in weapons produced by our countries. Russia would like to have 
a clear indication that the U.S. does not stand in the way of 
our making exports to Third World countries. America believes in 
the aggressive approach, in that she intends to play by the 
rules of a free market, under conditions of stiff competition, 
something which as noted by Senator Sam Nunn exists even among 
the closest of allies. There is as yet also a lack of unity of 
views on the status of Russian Armed Forces units pursuing 
peacekeeping missions on the soil of CIS member countries. 
  Nonetheless, neither the State Duma members nor the U.S. 
senators did anything to dramatize whatever differences arose 
concerning their opinions and assessments. On the contrary, 
their feelings are fairly optimistic, and they intend, as borne 
out by their answers to a question put by the KRASNAYA ZVEZDA 
correspondent, to meet regularly for the purpose of seeking 
points of agreement. Senator Dan Coats, one of the guests, 
jokingly remarked that the Americans are willing to have Russian 
parliamentarians "interfere" on Washington's Capitol Hill, for 
an exchange of opinions is useful to both sides. 
  An example of the above are the results of examining the 
situation arising in Russia relative to a plan to carry out a 
joint exercise of armed fores peacekeeping units of the two 
states in the month of July. According to Vladimir Lukin, the 
American senators arrived at a keen understanding of the 
difficulties attendant to that, realizing that this is not a 
question of disinterest in cooperation, but rather one of 
delicate matters, such as national dignity and pride. Sam Nunn 
stated that, after completing the trip, he intends to submit a 
proposal for carrying out the first of a series of joint 
exercises on U.S. soil, on a base located in California or 
Georgia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46587 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shirshov: R55 Trillion Is `Subsistence Minimum' for Defense </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shirshov: R55 Trillion Is `Subsistence Minimum' for Defense </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Budget 

<F P=102>   94UM0454A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 4 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0454A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Petr Karapetyan, KRASNAYA ZVEZDA: "The </F>
Federation Council Proposed To Increase Defense Appropriations. 
It Is Up to the Duma To Decide"] 
  [Text] At a closed session on 2 June the Federation Council 
adopted, as a basis by an overwhelming majority of votes, the 
Decree: "On the Course of Forming the 1994 Federal Budget." 
  It was recommended to the State Duma that defense 
expenditures be increased up to R55 trillion, of which R12 
trillion is for arms procurement, up to R5.5 trillion for 
RDT&amp;E, 
and up to R8 trillion for capital construction. It was 
recommended that expenditures for upkeep of the Armed Forces be 
reduced from R28 to 25.8 trillion. 
  Thus, the Federation Council proposed to the State Duma that 
the defense budget be increased by R18 trillion. 
  Commenting on this decision at the request of a KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA correspondent, Petr Shirshov, chairman of the Federation 
Council Security and Defense Committee, directed attention to 
the fact that 55 trillion is that subsistence minimum which 
permits keeping the Army and military-industrial complex from 
collapse. As a comparison, 55 trillion do not make up even a 
third of the defense item of the 1994 U.S. budget. 
  Against the background of these calculations, some 
politicians' assertions about excessive appetites of the Army 
and military-industrial complex sound unconvincing. Meanwhile, 
even with 55 trillion there will be no fat, as is customarily 
said in such cases. 
  The decree is viewed rather critically by certain heads of 
administrations. In a talk with journalists about expenditures 
for military capital construction, Nizhniy Novgorod Oblast 
Governor Boris Nemtsov came out in favor of creating personal 
accounts that are closed for consumption expenditures, with 
funds for individual construction transferred to them. According 
to his estimates, 400,000 officers would be able to build 
themselves "decent houses" for R8 trillion. 
  Common sense must win out in the argument about R18 
trillion, 
and I will give the reminder that it was proposed to reduce 
initial appropriations for defense by that much. The Federation 
Council is recommending that the State Duma not increase, but 
restore the amount of the "subsistence minimum" for the Army 
that was proposed in drawing up the budget message. Of course, 
there can be divergences of views, but a place also must be 
found for compromises. Judging from the familiar statements of 
its chairman, Vladimir Shumeyko, and the reaction of deputies to 
the decision to cut off the defense item of the federal budget, 
the Federation Council will stand its ground firmly. 
  It is important in itself that the Federation Council 
position is clear to the State Duma on the eve of the second 
reading of the 1994 draft federal budget. 
  In a situation where President Boris Yeltsin, Government 
Chairman Viktor Chernomyrdin and the Federation Council 
unequivocally came out in favor of a defense budget of R55 
trillion, the State Duma also finally has to settle on its 
choice. 
  Probably now Duma deputies should take into account that 
they 
assume a special responsibility for possible consequences of 
their decision. 
  In the final account it is not a question of the Army's 
interests, but of the interests of the state, of Russia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46588 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Media `Fantasies' About Army Reform Rebutted </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Media `Fantasies' About Army Reform Rebutted </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM2106080194 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 18 Jun 94 pp 
1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> PM2106080194 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Polemical Notes" by Anatoliy Dokuchayev of KRASNAYA </F>
ZVEZDA: "Military Reform: Truth and Fantasies"] 
  [Text] Recently the Russian Army and its leadership have 
found themselves the subject, so to speak, of very biased press 
attention. Analysts, political scientists, journalists, and 
sometimes simply hacks who like to speak out about anything have 
been conducting a targeted critical "bombardment." The thrust 
of the media salvoes is that the situation in the Army is quite 
appalling, and the reforms are not progressing at all. 
  Why are they not progressing? Unfortunately, it is difficult 
to obtain an answer to this question even after careful study of 
the many critical articles relating in one degree or another to 
this problem. Perhaps some of the plans are not being 
fulfilled? Is the Blueprint for the Organizational Development 
of the Armed Forces elaborated by the Defense Ministry not being 
implemented? Or maybe political scientists' forecasts have not 
been borne out and some of them are feeling aggrieved? 
Questions, questions, questions.... And here is another one. 
Is the situation really so bad in our country with regard to 
military organizational development? 
  Even a cursory analysis of what has been done over the last 
two years (the Russian Army is a little over 2 years old) 
refutes this. As does the end result -- the Russian Armed 
Forces, despite many extremely painful problems, are 
combat-capable and on the whole ensure the fulfillment of the 
tasks confronting them. No, I am not talking about the 
assessment which the president made in his message to the 
Federal Assembly at the start of this year, although that is 
important in itself. I am talking about something else. About 
the actual combat readiness of units and formations. At the 
time of writing Russian battalions were performing peacemaking 
functions in Yugoslavia in accordance with international 
pledges. Units of the 201st Motorized Rifle Division were taking 
part in protecting and defending the Tajik-Afghan border, and 
our subunits were between the warring sides in the Dniester 
region, South Ossetia, and Abkhazia. There are 16,000 Russian 
servicemen in "trouble spots." And they are dealing with them. 
  The results of the winter training period attest that other 
units and formations of the General-Purpose Forces, which are 
being qualitatively transformed, are also combat-capable. The 
Mobile Forces which are being created as a new Armed Forces' 
interbranch operational-strategic formation are giving them a 
new face. Practical steps have already been taken today. Work 
to bring up to strength the units and formations that, when 
necessary, will be transferred from region to region and to 
provide them with arms and materiel has been started in the 
Airborne and Ground Forces, the Air Defense Forces, the Air 
Forces, and the Navy. 
  But what has not been done? Perhaps some important fruitful 
ideas have not been implemented? 
  A few years ago the General Staff began work on a new table 
of organization structure for the Armed Forces -- a subject 
about which a great deal has been and is being said. This is 
already coming into being. The troops of the North Caucasus and 
Leningrad Military Districts have already been partly switched 
to a corps/brigade structure. If there is anything to be said 
here, it is merely to ask whether we are not being too swift to 
abandon combined arms army formations and formations of the 
division type. After all, in certain spheres divisions are 
simply irreplaceable, as experience shows. They have greater 
firepower than brigades and can conduct combat operations for 
several days. In short, what had long been advocated is being 
put into effect. 
  Other "drastic" reformers reduce all innovative work 
exclusively to switching the Army to a professional footing. 
Here too there are real shifts --the contract method of 
manpower acquisition is now a permanent feature in the Russian 
Army. As is well known, over 160,000 professionals are now 
serving as soldiers and sergeants, and another 150,000 contract 
personnel will be recruited in 1994, including over 14,000 women. 
  We have looked at just a few aspects of military reform, but 
even they graphically demonstrate that the reforms in the Army, 
for all the difficulties and contradictions, are nevertheless 
making clear progress. At any rate the pace of reform in the 
Army is in no way lagging behind the reforms in society in 
general. On the contrary, many spheres of military reform are 
being retarded precisely by the fact that the appropriate 
economic, political, and legal preconditions have still not been 
created and that the potential of the state, which is in 
profound crisis, is unfortunately extremely limited. 
  So why then are there such harsh assessments? Why do some 
newspapers often paint such a negative picture of the Army? Why 
are the honor and dignity of Russian officers often nonchalantly 
sullied? 
  Analysis of many articles devoted to military reform in 
civilian publications automatically suggests that the reform 
itself and the problems of the Armed Forces are a matter of 
indifference to the authors. They are something like auxiliary 
material for some totally different purposes. 
  For instance, take the following quite common thesis: A 
civilian should be appointed as soon as possible to the post of 
defense minister, otherwise there will be no reform. The 
arguments here consist of allusions to Western experience, and 
also contentions regarding the need for civilian control over 
the Armed Forces. 
  There is no question that civilian control is an important 
problem. But is is far more serious and far broader than simply 
the question of whether the minister has epaulets or not. 
Epaulets are rather a formality. In certain conditions a 
civilian could develop into a dictator, while a general's rank 
is certainly no obstacle to democratic attitudes and openness to 
society. Incidentally, that same Western experience provides 
much confirmation that military men often make very strong 
democratic politicians.... 
  Clearly, it is more accurate to speak not of civilian but of 
political control over the Armed Forces. This includes 
presidential control, parliamentary control, collaboration 
between Army structures and various social organizations, and 
much else besides. This whole system has already taken shape in 
many respects today and is continuing to emerge. 
  And as for epaulets... Well, there probably will come a time 
when a civilian occupies the post of defense minister in our 
country, as in the United States or the FRG, although I 
personally am opposed to this -- Russia has its own traditions. 
But is this the most urgent question today? For the sake of 
purely formal changes is it possible to disregard both, so to 
speak, the mentality of our military, who will scarcely find it 
easy to accept simply "some guy in a suit coat," and the clear 
absence of the preconditions for this in the political sphere 
itself? Have we not already suffered a lot of grief as a result 
of incompetence? Do we have plenty of readymade, full-fledged 
civilian candidates for defense minister? Remember how the 
notorious Galina Starovoytova was suggested quite seriously as 
minister. Imagine what the situation with regard to our Army 
and our defenses would be today if that had happened? 
  Political interests are usually what lies behind this. As 
they do behind other proposals for the drastic reform of the 
Defense Ministry and the Army in general. For instance, what is 
the worth of the maxim that a structure, in other words the 
Army, cannot reform itself, but military reform today has been 
left in the hands of the military. 
  Excuse me, but what is the point in airing a false premise 
in 
the newspapers and then chewing it over? The Army is indeed not 
reforming itself. Evidence? Certainly. Was it the military 
department that elaborated and adopted the laws by which people 
in uniform are guided today? And what about the military 
doctrine? Many state structures worked on it, beginning with the 
country's Security Council. Take the Blueprint for the 
Organizational Development of the Armed Forces. It was approved 
by the President. Or the recruitment of contract personnel. 
This has been and is being carried out on the basis of the 
edicts of the head of state and depends on the funding allocated 
by the government. Perhaps the military ratify the defense 
budget? That is not the case. The general military regulations 
are also the President's prerogative. A big scandal recently 
erupted in the press about the new uniform -- apparently the 
military are wearing illegal uniform that has not been approved. 
An investigation was made. It turns out that the uniform is 
legal. Furthermore, it had long been planned with the aim of 
simplifying certain elements, making it cheaper, and making it 
more modern and attractive. 
  In short, military reform involves active participation by 
the president, parliament, government, Security Council, other 
state structures, and even...social organizations. Even the 
church is taking part in it. Yes, it is true that the 
leadership of the Armed Forces and military specialists and 
scientists play a great role in elaborating and implementing all 
the legal acts, programs, and blueprints. But how could that be 
otherwise? We cannot involve generals from abroad. 
  Anyhow, what is so bad about the military implementing 
military reforms? The main thing is that they introduce 
innovations that benefit the country's defenses and give the 
Army a modern face, the face of the army of a democratic state. 
Incidentally, all our Russian reforms in the defense sphere 
have been associated with the names of military figures. 
Milyutin's reforms. Rediger's reforms. Frunze's reforms. 
  It transpires that the military are not the point. It is 
just that every drastic proposal for the drastic reform of the 
Defense Ministry and the Armed Forces as a whole and every maxim 
aired in the press, I repeat, often stems from political 
interests and nothing more. 
  I think even the authors of these and similar "fantasies" 
are 
perfectly well aware of the shakiness of their positions and 
scarcely seriously expect anyone to be guided by their 
conclusions. They are probably pursuing a different aim: to 
weaken from time to time the military leadership's position in 
resolving state questions -- at the time when the military 
budget is being adopted, for instance. Or at a time when the 
political situation is deteriorating and there is social 
tension. If this is so, and I believe that this is precisely 
the case, then such articles are actually attempts to throw a 
monkey wrench in the works of the reforms that the "reformers" 
are ostensibly advocating. 
  Other experts, analysts, and journalists choose a "subtler" 
angle of attack on the Army -- the real reform of the Armed 
Forces, regarding it as "fundamentally incorrect," "destructive 
of the homeland's Army," and so on. 
  The target of the attacks is primarily the Mobile Forces, 
though only yesterday the process of their creation was loudly 
welcomed by everyone without exception. Today the tone is 
different. Already some people have proclaimed: "Mobile 
Forces? Are they designed to perform gendarme functions?" 
Others seek simpler grounds for criticism -- our Defense 
Minister is from the Airborne Forces, so he personally is 
championing expansion of the Airborne Forces. The criticism is 
bald, so to speak, and for some reason the authors do not bother 
with even the most modest analysis. What prompted the Armed 
Forces leadership to create them? What principle forms their 
foundation? Detailed answers to just these questions would 
allow the reader to draw his own conclusions. But no, what is 
the point of analysis, let alone serious analysis. But the 
truth is as follows. 
  Russia cannot afford to keep large troop groupings in all 
the 
strategic operational salients, and anyhow there is no need for 
this. What appear to be most dangerous to the state today are 
local conflicts, rather than large-scale war. But Russia (and 
it is capable of doing this) if necessary has to place a 
reliable barrier in the way of aggression from any direction. 
The principle of mobile defense which forms the basis for the 
creation of the troop groupings is called upon to play its main 
role here -- it presupposes the existence of small but quite 
powerful forces ready for operational use wherever a real threat 
to the country's security arises. Incidentally, the USSR's 
military-political leadership, which adhered to the principle of 
reasonable sufficiency for defense, would have been bound in 
time to arrive at a similar principle for the structuring of 
defenses. This is less burdensome for the state, and it is 
effective so far as defense is concerned. 
  The Mobile Forces also come under attack from a different 
direction -- it is claimed that they are being established to 
the detriment of the development of other branches of the Armed 
Forces, for instance, the Navy. There has been a whole series 
of articles in the mass media claiming that the present military 
leadership is virtually deliberately destroying the Navy. 
Articles of various calibers -- ranging from claims that there 
is only one nuclear submarine on alert duty in the Russian Navy 
to articles attempting to encapsulate everything negative 
relating to our Navy. 
  What is the situation in reality? First a detail. At his 6 
May briefing General of the Army Pavel Grachev disclosed some 
sensational news -- each day 50 Russian submarines and surface 
ships are on alert duty and combat service at sea. But for some 
reason the mass media chose not to mention this. Now a few 
words about the state of affairs in the Navy. The situation 
today is indeed complex, but this is clearly not because of the 
creation of the Mobile Forces, it stems from the entire course 
of military organizational development in our state in recent 
decades. The main efforts in the Soviet Union were concentrated 
on building warships, while the development of the 
infrastructure for their basing, support, and repair lagged 
behind. By 1992, that is, by the start of the creation of the 
Russian Armed Forces, about two-thirds of ships were in the 
final stage of their lifetime and in practice there was no 
system for basing large surface ships and heavy 
aircraft-carrying cruisers. Problems of repair and scrapping 
came to the fore. It takes sizable financial resources to solve 
them. But the Navy, like the other branches of the Armed 
Forces, unfortunately only receives a pittance. 
  If anyone is sounding the alarm about the state of affairs 
in 
the Navy it is the Defense Ministry leadership and the Navy 
command. There is some progress. Last year over 100 voyages 
were carried out. It is planned to achieve this level this 
year. It should be noted that alert duty and combat service at 
sea are carried out in accordance with the new system of views 
regarding the organizational development and use of the Navy -- 
a system whose elaboration was affected by the substantial 
change in the geopolitical situation. 
  There is a great deal of speculation today over the reform 
of 
the Air Defense Troops. Some analysts have even hastened to 
declare that this branch of the Armed Forces too is being 
destroyed by the Defense Ministry leadership, disbanded, and so 
forth. What is the actual situation? All five existing 
branches of the Armed Forces, including the Air Defense Troops, 
are remaining until the year 2000. But it is also true that the 
theoretical basis for the further development of the branches of 
the Armed Forces is being improved today, and certain concepts 
are being verified in the course of large-scale strategic 
exercises involving troops. The facilities that needed to 
receive air defense cover are also being reviewed. The Air 
Defense Troops will be reduced to the optimum level by removing 
surface-to-air missile systems from secondary defended 
installations. 
  There are also difficulties in the organizational 
development 
of the Russian Air Forces, and this too is giving some of our 
"supporters" grounds for attacking the Army. But organizational 
development is under way.... The complex process of the 
redeployment of units on Russian territory that is now nearing 
completion is being carried out simultaneously with profound 
reform. The organizational structure of the Air Force is 
changing. Two new aviation commands have appeared -- front-line 
aviation, and also the reserve and cadre training. New aviation 
groupings have been set up in the northwest, west, and southwest 
salients. Two air armies have "sprung up" in theaters that were 
not equipped from the aviation viewpoint. At the same time the 
total number of aviation formations has decreased from 15 to 
nine. Overall, the strength of the Air Force has decreased by 20 
percent. 
  There is progress in another sphere -- the military 
technical 
sphere. Today aviation regiments are being rearmed with more 
modern equipment, which certainly gladdens everyone who cares 
about our Army. 
  On the whole the Russian Air Force, in the assessment of the 
Defense Ministry leadership, for instance, is capable of 
resolving the tasks that constitute its mission in collaboration 
with other branches of the Armed Forces. And this assessment is 
not a mere inference by our high-ranking generals. It is based 
on the results of the series of major exercises held in 
1993-1994 involving the use of aviation units, the in-flight 
refueling of large numbers of aircraft, the launch of highly 
accurate aviation missiles, and the control of Air Force forces 
and systems from airborne control centers. 
  Of course, dozens of unsolved problems in the Air Force 
could 
be mentioned. For instance, the flying time of pilots of 
fighter and ground-attack aircraft remains a bottleneck. There 
are many reasons for this -- the lack of airfield facilities, 
the shortage of fuel, and so forth. At the same time, as the 
experience of exercises shows, Russian pilots are capable of 
delivering highly accurate strikes, including from cloud cover. 
  I would also like to mention the following point. Some 
experts are worried and others, as the esteemed reader will have 
realized, angered by the fact that the branches of the Armed 
Forces are being reduced. But not all of them feel this way. 
There are many analysts who immediately say: "The Army is big, 
but it is not being downsized," "the military do not know the 
strength of the Armed Forces," "it is time to start cutting the 
Army," and so on in a similar vein. 
  What can I say about this? As the Defense Ministry 
leadership has repeatedly stated, a planned reduction in the 
strength of the Armed Forces is being carried out today -- in 
1993 alone it was cut by more than 260,000 men. Sometimes you 
hear the figure: There are 3 million military in the country. 
Specialists are aware that this figure relates not only to the 
Army, but also to other "power" structures. Sometimes military 
leaders themselves give the Army's strength without explaining 
whether this is the authorized strength, the roll call strength, 
or the actual strength. Some commentators see no difference 
between these. And so you get comments like: "The military do 
not know the strength of the Armed Forces." 
  Since we are talking about reductions, I will note that not 
everything is simple here. First of all, sharp reductions are 
an overly expensive pleasure for the state. Furthermore, this 
process entails the solution of many other problems, the most 
acute of them being housing. Over 77,000 servicemen discharged 
into the reserve do not have a roof over their heads today. It 
is also necessary to decide how big the reductions should be. 
The former Supreme Soviet legislatively defined the strength of 
the Armed Forces as 1.5 million men. At the time 
parliamentarians explained that they were proceeding from 
"generally accepted" norms: The armies in the developed 
countries, they said, are usually no more than 1 percent of the 
country's population. Foreign experience, it has to be said, 
should be taken into account. But does this formal percentage 
take account of Russia's specific features, its geopolitical 
position, the length of its borders, the density of its 
population? Calculations by General Staff specialists show 
that, even with implementation of the principles of mobile 
defenses, the strength of the Army should be around 2 million 
men. This strength will make it possible to create troop 
groupings capable of responding adequately to any increase in 
the military threat in a particular region by transferring 
mobile components there. 
  ...Yes, the reforms are proceeding with difficulty, 
sometimes 
painfully, but painstaking daily work to improve the Army is 
continuing. In the immediate future, during 1994 and 1995, it 
is planned to complete the formation of the Armed Forces and to 
create the basis for their profound transformation. In 
particular, it is planned to create the Mobile Forces, to 
continue the creation of troop (force) groupings and the 
military infrastructure, and to complete the withdrawal of 
troops to Russia's territory. The plans also include a further 
switch to the mixed principle of manpower acquisition for units 
and formations and the transition from a predominantly army- and 
division-based forces structure to a corps and brigade 
structure. Full-scale comprehensive studies will be carried out 
to substantiate the strength, combat composition, and structure 
of the Armed Forces for the period after 1995. 
  A remark by General of the Army Grachev that is often quoted 
is: "We have succeeded in halting the sharp decline in combat 
readiness and military discipline among the troops. 
Servicemen's morale makes it possible to resolve the set 
tasks." It is quoted and presented ironically: What an 
achievement -- it has proved possible to halt the sharp decline 
in combat readiness. Yes, this is an achievement, and a great 
one, as is recognized by everyone who is very familiar with the 
former and the present state of affairs among the troops and who 
knows the constant shortage of funds and the masses of other 
extremely complex problems. Incidentally, today it is time to 
say to the military leadership: Don't spur on the reforms so 
sharply, this is all too complex and difficult a job. 
  Look at the Blueprint for the Organizational Development of 
the Armed Forces (an unclassified document), and you will see, 
dear reader, the face of our Army by 1995 and the year 2000, a 
modern face. The main aim is to create qualitatively new Armed 
Forces according with the demands of the present 
military-political situation in the world and the real extent of 
the military danger to Russia. But the implementation of any 
provision of the blueprint requires not merely efforts on the 
part of the Armed Forces military leadership and the entire 
officer corps, but also efforts by the whole state and society. 
And here straightaway is a line from the blueprint -- 
"reforming the structure of the Armed Forces." 
  What does reforming the structure of the Armed Forces mean? 
It is not a matter of shuffling a deck of cards. It is not a 
matter of drawing a new diagram. It is not a matter of drawing 
up a new document. It is a terribly complex and difficult job 
spanning many years and an extremely costly measure. Finally, 
it is the lives of hundreds of thousands of people in uniform 
and of those who work in the defense sphere. 
  The first stage -- the elaboration of the blueprint itself 
-- 
is not easy in itself, although for some reason certain analysts 
and critics do not think so and constantly bandy about words 
like "I believe" and "I see the structure of the Armed Forces as 
follows." Certainly, everybody is entitled to have and to 
express their own viewpoint. But anyone who is concerned for 
their reputation and respectability should, in my view, put a 
period after the words "I believe." This is not merely 
superficial, it is very superficial. 
  The options for the structure of the Armed Forces that have 
been elaborated today by the Defense Ministry's main military 
scientific centers (I emphasize, not by individuals but by 
collectives of military professionals such as, for instance, the 
General Staff Military Academy) are not being implemented 
straight away but are being verified at various command staff 
games, exercises, training sessions, and so forth. For any 
error in this sphere could entail the breakdown of the existing 
defensive system, the expenditure of trillions of the people's 
rubles, and disruption to the lives of hundreds of thousands of 
people in uniform. 
  Of course, if you are not concerned about the country's 
security, if you are not cost-conscious, and if you portray 
people in uniform as mere cogs and chess pieces, in theory you 
can announce very striking changes in the Army every month and 
report that "considerable heights have been scaled in the course 
of military reform." But only adventurists could venture to do 
such things. 
  And why is nobody considering the following question: Is it 
possible at all to reform the Army, such a complex mechanism, 
when you have no money in your pocket? Of course not, if you 
regard the enhancement of the combat readiness and combat 
capability of units and formations as the main aim of the 
military reform. So why is it precisely the people who shout 
loudest about the absence of reforms in the Army who are voting 
in parliament today against granting the Armed Forces not only 
any money to carry out those reforms but even against providing, 
so to speak, a "subsistence income"? All the indications are 
that mercenary political calculations are the driving force 
here: "The worse the situation in the Army is, the more 
unstable society is. And therefore the better chance I have in 
the question of power." 
  Let us return once again to the question of contract 
personnel. In itself the number of contract personnel will not 
increase combat readiness. Why is that? Quality in the human 
resources and morale on the part of the volunteers are also 
needed. And these components depend directly on her majesty the 
economy, on funding, and on the state's potential to allocate 
it. In 1993 the state earmarked 6 billion rubles for the 
recruitment of professionals. Just as much is needed this year. 
But it is not just a matter of money. 
  Do the respected critics of military reforms in the Army 
know 
that the most important thing for those who work with contract 
personnel is to look them in the eye sometimes. Why? The Army 
(the state) sometimes cannot deliver on its commitments. And 
the reasons for this are well known. In some regions 
professionals do not receive their wages for two or three 
months. Only peanuts are allocated for the leasing of housing. 
The list of problems could be continued. And so...I am afraid 
we may lose those who have already joined the combat ranks and 
who are willingly going to serve in "godforsaken spots" and 
"trouble spots." 
  Give us the money, officers of the General Staff and the 
commands of the branches of the Armed Forces say, and we will do 
the job, we will recruit precisely half the personnel on 
contract today rather than in the year 2000 as planned. But 
unfortunately, respected critics and analysts, unfortunately.... 
At present only 25 percent of servicemen are professionals. 
  What about research and development, modern types of 
equipment and arms, and the infrastructure.... All this also 
requires colossal funding, like the entire military reform, 
assuming, I repeat, that its main aim is deemed to be to 
increase the Armed Forces' combat readiness rather than destroy 
them. 
  Certainly analysis of the progress of the military reform 
must proceed on the broadest scale. Certainly the successful 
advance of military reform is helped by objective critical 
articles. But the authors of various opinions (especially those 
who "reform" absolutely everything as they see fit -- one can 
only marvel at their flights of fantasy) should also remember 
the following point -- unfair criticism demoralizes people in 
uniform who are honestly and selflessly serving the homeland, 
our Russia, and is a painful blow to military reform. And 
unscrupulous speculation is doubly harmful. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46589 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   MIG-29s Going to India </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    MIG-29s Going to India </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0455B Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 1 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0455B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unsigned article: "MIGs for India?"] </F>
  [Text] DELHI, 31 May. (ITAR-TASS). Russia is to provide the 
Indian Air Force with the first lot of MIG-29M fighter-bombers 
in the near future under the terms of a contract calling for 
selling to India 30 of these units and six MIG-29UB (combat 
training) types costing a total of 25 billion rupees (about 780 
million dollars). This was disclosed here by high-level Indian 
sources. According to these sources, MIG shipments will be 
initiated as early as this summer. The aircraft will effect a 
considerable improvement in combat capability of the Republic's 
Air Force, since "they can effectively both perform interception 
and deliver strikes against ground targets located in an enemy's 
deep rear." 
  Sergey Anishchenko, the Delhi representative of the state 
company Rosvooruzheniye, made a corroboration of the above to 
the ITAR-TASS correspondent, stating that the Russian side did 
indeed dispatch to its Indian partners an offer to supply the 
MIGs, with 10 units to be furnished via state credit and 20 
units on commercial credit. Since Moscow has not yet received an 
official reply, he characterized the abovementioned delivery 
time as "overly optimistic." However, S. Anishchenko expressed 
the hope that a reply may be forthcoming in the next few days as 
a result of an official visit to Russia to be made by Prime 
Minister P.V. Narasimha Rao in the end of June. 
  Russian military cooperation has definitely been on the rise 
in the last few months after several years of a downward slide. 
In the middle of May, the Indian Ministry of Defense announced 
that the MIG Aviation Scientific Production Complex imeni A. 
Mikoyan, operating in an atmosphere of stiff competition with 
English, French, and Israeli companies, won a bid for 
refurbishing more than 100 MIG-21BIS aircraft, which constitute 
the backbone of the Republic's Air Force. Rosvooruzheniye 
General Director Viktor Samoylov recently signed here a series 
of agreements relating to constructing in the docks of Goa and 
Bombay a series of fast attack watercraft and frigates. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46590 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Expedition To Seal Forward Section of KOMSOMOLETS </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Expedition To Seal Forward Section of KOMSOMOLETS </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0455C Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 1 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0455C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by KRASNAYA ZVEZDA correspondent Ivan Sergeyev: </F>
"KOMSOMOLETS' Nuclear Submarine Safety Supervised by MChS"] 
  [Text] 
<H8>  Russian MChS Collegium Holds Open Session on Expedition to </H8>
"KOMSOMOLETS" Submarine Sinking Site 
  In compliance with an RF Presidential Order and a decree 
issued by the government of the Russian Federation, the Russian 
MChS [Emergencies Ministry] is to provide supervision for the 
period 15 May to 15 August 1994 in the planning of an expedition 
to the site of the 1989 accidental sinking in the Norwegian Sea 
of the "KOMSOMOLETS" nuclear submarine, which has aboard a 
nuclear reactor and two torpedoes armed with nuclear warheads. 
  The greatest potential danger relative to radiation in the 
ecological situation in the Norwegian Sea is posed by the two 
torpedoes each carrying 3,200 grams of plutonium 239. The actual 
danger is associated with the possibility that corrosion may 
lead to the release of plutonium into the sea. The most 
pessimistic forecast specialists can make is the possibility of 
such an occurrence in the end of 1995-1996. 
  The above being the case, the expedition's purpose consists 
of sealing the submarine's forward section, monitoring the 
environment for radiation leakage, and maintaining checks on the 
technical condition of the craft. 
  The cost of the abovementioned operations will amount to 
4.625 billion rubles and 4.1 million dollars. According to the 
MChS leadership, the government of the Russian Federation is to 
provide all the funding. 
  Technical project development is to be accomplished under a 
contractual arrangement with the TsKB [Central Design Bureau] 
Rubin, with the participation of a number of scientific research 
institutions of the RAN [Russian Academy of Sciences], the MO 
[Ministry of Defense], and industrial organizations. 
  Expedition operations will involve the use of the research 
vessel "Academician Mot. Keldysh," which will be equipped with 
the Mir-1 and Mir-2 apparatus, and a ship belonging to the 
Ministry of Defense's GUNiO [Main Directorate for Navigation and 
Oceanography], which will transport equipment and expedition 
personnel from Murmansk to the site of operations. 
  Scientific and technical aspects of the work will be handled 
by the Main Administration for Operations in Seas and Water 
Bodies, Russian Emergencies Ministry, with the participation of 
specialists from a Ministry of Defense TsNII [Central Scientific 
Research Institute] and from 40 Ministry of Defense GNIIs [state 
scientific research institutes] on a contractual basis. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46591 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> STRATEGIC DETERRENT FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nontargeting of Missiles Said To Enhance International </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Nontargeting of Missiles Said To Enhance International </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Security 

<F P=102>   94UM0451B Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 1 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0451B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Colonel Anatoliy Belousov, editor, Combat </F>
Training and Troop Life Department: "Our Missiles No Longer 
Threaten the United States and Great Britain, but Their Combat 
Readiness Is Preserved"] 
  [Text] This event can be called historical without 
exaggeration. For dozens of years, since the very origin of 
nuclear missile weapons, the world constantly has been in the 
sights of the nuclear button, so to speak. The missiles of 
countries possessing these weapons were aimed not only at each 
other, but also, it must be assumed, at important strategic and 
industrial targets, lines of communication... in short, at you 
and me. 
  Then, in accordance with understandings recorded in the 
Moscow Declaration of Presidents of the Russian Federation and 
United States of 14 January 1994 and in the Joint Declaration of 
the President of the Russian Federation and Prime Minister of 
the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland of 15 
February 1994, the heads of the three countries made the 
decision to issue necessary instructions about nontargeting of 
strategic nuclear missiles under their respective command. 
  Implementation of this understanding by the Russian 
Federation signifies that day to day control of nuclear forces 
now is exercised based on the fact that the United States and 
Great Britain are not enemies of the Russian Federation and not 
one of our more than one thousand missiles in silos, on 
submarines and on mobile missile systems is aimed any longer 
against any targets on the territory of the United States and 
Great Britain. 
  It is hardly necessary to mention how much this step 
strengthens mutual and international security and follows the 
channel of fundamentally new relations of strategic partnership 
among our countries and of their practical cooperation in the 
military-political sphere. The Russian Federation Ministry of 
Foreign Affairs Statement which was disseminated states that 
this important step will open the path to further steps on a 
bilateral and multilateral basis in the interests of 
strengthening trust, stability and predictability in strategic 
nuclear arms. The document expresses the hope that the other 
nuclear powers also will take this path. 
  But what does implementation of a regime of nontargeting of 
missiles signify in practice? And is it necessary to be on 
constant alert status in that case? Will not the combat 
readiness of missile units suffer from this? These simple 
questions cannot help but occur to people who are not too 
familiar with the specifics of strategic nuclear forces. 
KRASNAYA ZVEZDA repeatedly has touched on these subjects, but 
today of course there is a need to return to this once more and 
cite the opinion of people who are informed, as they say... 
  Colonel General Stanislav Kochemasov, chief of the Main 
Staff 
of Strategic Missile Troops, says the following concerning the 
regime of zeroizing the missiles' missions: 
  "The problem of zeroizing depends on the missile systems' 
design features and will be resolved by us and by the American 
side for each type of missile in our own way. But common to all 
is an unequivocal reduction of the threshold of a surprise 
strike, since each side will have to perform a number of 
operational and technical operations to reestablish combat 
plans. This will take time, which politicians can use 
additionally for peaceful resolution of problems, should they 
arise." 
  One can add to what was said by the chief of the Main Staff 
that inasmuch as battle management systems of U.S. ICBM's and 
our ICBM's differ somewhat, their missiles will be targeted 
against uninhabited areas of the earth, while ours will have no 
specific targets. 
  With respect to combat readiness, specialists believe that 
zeroizing the missiles will not lower the combat potential of 
missile units. Special measures have been worked out and 
implemented to support the day to day activity and life of 
troops with nontargeted missiles. 
  Hundreds of specialists worked to ensure that the 
retargeting 
of missiles, which lowers nuclear danger in the world, was 
carried out within the time period set by the understandings--no 
later than 30 May 1994. Nevertheless, this act of good will and 
mutual trust does not relieve strategic nuclear forces of the 
responsibility of providing protection for the homeland and 
preserving stability on the planet. Therefore today, as always 
over the last 35 years, more than 20,000 missilemen are at duty 
stations around the clock. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46592 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> GROUND TROOPS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Performance, Specifications of `Tyulpan' 240mm Mortar </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Performance, Specifications of `Tyulpan' 240mm Mortar </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0442A Moscow VOYENNYYE ZNANIYA in Russian No 1, 1994 pp 
17, C4 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0442A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOYENNYYE ZNANIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by A. Grigoryev, engineer, under rubric "You </F>
Ask, We Answer"] 
  [Text] "In VOYENNYYE ZNANIYA, No 10, 1991, you 
included a photograph of an artillery piece on the back cover 
without supplying its explanatory caption. What kind of gun is 
this? 
  "N. Mekhrengin (Kirov Oblast)" 
  We are correcting our error, albeit belatedly. 
  Powerful reinforcing mortars were required during the Great 
Patriotic War, and designing of 240-mm mortars along with 160-mm 
mortars began in 1942. Several design bureaus were doing this at 
the same time. Thus, the ZIS-27 (1942) and S-16 (1943) 240-mm 
mortars were designed under V. Grabin. In 1943 OKB-172 (where 
convicts worked) began working on the OB-29 240-mm mortar 
project. The OB-29 weighed 3,500 kg deployed, the mortar round 
weighed 125 kg, and the range of fire was 250-7,000 m. 
  During 1944-1945 B. Shavyrin's SKB [special design bureau] 
developed the most powerful model of a 240-mm mortar. Plant 
testing began back before the end of the war. Design 
deficiencies were found in the course of testing, and after they 
were remedied tests were renewed in 1947 and ended in 1949. 
Shavyrin's 240-mm mortar, designated M-240, became operational 
in 1950, at which time its range of fire was 8 km. In 1953 a 
special, more powerful propelling charge was developed for the 
M-240 which supported a range of fire of 9.7 km. 
  The M-240 240-mm mortar represents a rigid (without recoil 
mechanisms), breech-loaded, smoothbore system on a wheeled 
carriage, which fires a fin-stabilized projectile (mortar 
round). It consists of the following basic parts: barrel with 
breech mechanism, breech piece, frame with shock absorber, mount 
with laying mechanisms and equilibrator, road wheels with 
suspension, trail with mechanism for transferring the mortar to 
a deployed and travelling position, base plate, and sights. 
  The barrel is a smoothbore tube secured in a trunnion band, 
which has the capability of tipping on trunnions to position the 
barrel for loading. The breech end is closed by an upward 
swinging breech mechanism. 
  The mount consist of two frames (upper and lower) hinged 
together. The lower is assembled on a two-wheeled axle. 
Elevating gear and an equilibrator accommodated between brackets 
of the axle and mount upper frame serve to lay the mortar for 
elevation. There is a spring suspension, and wheels are 
trolleybus type with foam rubber filling. The sight is a 
panoramic MP-46. 
  The mortar is loaded from the breech end, for which the 
barrel is placed in a horizontal position. A loading tray is 
mounted after the breech mechanism is opened. Five team members 
manually lift the mortar round, place it on the tray and ram it 
into the bore. Then it is lowered into the breech piece for 
firing. 
  The time for converting the M-240 from a travelling to a 
deployed position at a previously prepared firing position is 
20-25 minutes, and the reverse takes 15-20 minutes. The mortar 
is moved by an ATL [light artillery prime mover] or other 
artillery prime mover at a speed up to 40 km/hr. Ammunition for 
it is in the body of the prime mover or in a motor vehicle. 
  In the late 1960's the gun part (model 2B8) of the 2S4 
Tyulpan self-propelled mortar was designed on the basis of the 
M-240, for which the 2B8 240-mm mortar was mounted on a special 
chassis (Object 305). The barrel and ballistics were left 
unchanged in the 2B8 tipping part of the 2S4 Tyulpan 
self-propelled mortar. In contrast to the M-240, where all 
operations were manual, the 2B8 has a hydraulic system which 
completely replaces the team's difficult work of loading and 
laying the mortar. Only laying for deflection remained manual. 
  In contrast to the M-240, the loading angle for the 2B8 is 
around +63ë. Mortar rounds are fed automatically onto the 
rammer guides from mechanical ammunition stowage in the chassis 
body. Two ammunition stowage areas hold 40 high-explosive or 20 
rocket-assisted mortar rounds. In addition, loading can be done 
from the ground using a crane. 
  The V-59 diesel installed in the Tyulpan permitted 
developing 
a speed up to 62.8 km/hr on the highway and 25-30 km/hr on dirt 
roads. 
  Both mortars fire the F-864 high-explosive steel round 
weighing 130.7 kg, with explosives weighing 31.9 kg. The GVMZ-7 
fuze has settings for instantaneous and delayed action. The 
F-864 round has five charges giving it a muzzle velocity of from 
158 to 362 m/sec and a corresponding range from 800 to 9,650 m. 
The primer charge is in the round's central tube and the other 
charges are contained in ring-shaped bags fastened to the 
central tube with silk cords. In addition to the F-864, it is 
possible to fire a rocket-assisted and a guided mortar round 
from the 2B8. According to western press information, "special 
charges" also were created for the M-240 and 2B8. 
  The following are the primary missions of 240-mm mortars: 

  -  destroy sturdy field stone-wood-earth structures; 
  -  destroy enemy personnel and equipment inaccessible to flat 
trajectory fire of artillery pieces. 


    The latter quality makes the 240-mm mortar irreplaceable 
when 
operating, for example, in a city with high stone structures. 
Using the 1st and 2nd charges, the steepness of fall of the 
rounds becomes almost vertical, which ensures destruction of 
practically any target. The rocket-assisted round increases the 
range of fire, and the guided round selects and destroys point 
targets, including armored equipment. 
  Not one country in the world has adopted such powerful 
mortars in the postwar period. The present caliber of mortars of 
the United States, England, France and Germany does not exceed 
120 mm. 


Specifications and Performance Characteristics of 240-mm Mortars 

                              M-240                    2S4 

Caliber, mm                   240                      240 

Tube length, mm/caliber       5,000/20.8               5,000/20.8 

Mortar elevation when         +45, +80                 +50, +80 
firing, degrees 

Angle of deflection with: 

minimum angle of elevation,   +/-18                    +/-10 
degrees 

maximum angle of elevation,   +/-39                    +/-41 
degrees 

Weight of tube with breech    726                      1,100 
mechanism, kg 

Weight of gun part of         -                        3,300 
self-propelled gun mount, 
kg 

Weight of system deployed,    3,610                    27,500 
kg 

Rate of fire, rounds/min      1                        0.8-1 

Range of fire of F-864 
round: 

minimum, m                    800                      800 

maximum, m                    9,650                    9,650 

Range of fire of                                       18,000 
rocket-assisted round 
weighing 228 kg, m 

Sight                         MP-46                    MP-46M 


  COPYRIGHT: "Voyennyye znaniya", 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46593 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> AIR, AIR DEFENSE FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Operations of Su-25 Regiment in Tajikistan </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Operations of Su-25 Regiment in Tajikistan </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0443B Moscow KRYLYA RODINY in Russian No 1, Jan 94 
(signed to press 20 Dec 93) p 46 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0443B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRYLYA RODINY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Dmitriy Grinyuk: "Rooks' Over the Pyandzh Again"] </F>
  [Text] Almost nothing is known about the fact that Russian 
Air Force units have been active in combat operations on the 
territory of Tajikistan. Here are the details. The 186th Ground 
Attack Instructor Regiment, based at Kakaydy Airfield in 
Uzbekistan at the junction of the Tajik, Afghan and Uzbek 
borders, is a component part of the Russian Federation Air Force 
Grouping. The regiment was formed on the basis of the 
Borisoglebsk Air Training Center and the backbone of its flight 
personnel are very experienced instructor pilots (hence the 
regiment's name). 
  The appearance of instructor air regiments in the Air Force 
makeup is no accident. According to the new methodology of 
putting young pilots in formation, the main emphasis, in 
contrast to past times, is placed on air training centers in 
which pilots perfect flying skills obtained in schools and 
rehearse tactics of combat employment of equipment. The new 
level of flight personnel training demanded a new level of 
instructors: a combat pilot can be trained only by a mentor 
possessing combat experience. This was the basis for forming 
special instructor regiments. 
  The 186th Ground Attack Instructor Regiment is armed with 
Su-25BM and Su-25UB attack aircraft. Before restationing to 
Kakaydy, the regiment was covering Russian troops in the 
Georgian-Abkhaz conflict zone. It was there that enormous 
depictions of the Russian flag appeared on the fins of many 
aircraft along with the red stars inherited from the USSR, which 
permitted distinguishing the regiment's aircraft at least in 
some way from Georgian Air Force Su-25's of the same type--the 
only aircraft being produced there in Tbilisi. 
  The regiment rebased to Kakaydy on 24 July 1993 at the most 
critical moment on the border, after the death of 25 border 
guards in the 12th Border Outpost, when numerous well-armed 
detachments of rebels and Afghan mujahedin were proceeding over 
several crossings constructed across the Pyandzh into the 
interior of Tajikistan. In the first days the pilots flew 
several combat sorties each, dropping up to 80 tonnes of bombs a 
day. The standard combat payload consisted of six OFAB-250's and 
two R-60M air-to-air missiles for self-defense in a possible 
encounter with Afghan fighters, and also two suspended fuel 
tanks. The decisive actions of the ground attack pilots broke 
the course of events and permitted the border guard personnel 
and motorized riflemen to dig in firmly at the occupied 
positions. 
  Together with a group of Moscow Military District Air Force 
staff officers headed by Lieutenant-General of Aviation Nikolay 
Antoshkin, which was making an inspection trip, your 
correspondent flew in to Kakaydy Air Base in a period of 
relative lull. Our Il-76MD also delivered another shift of 
pilots and technicians from Buturlinovka, the Borisoglebsk Air 
Training Center airfield. As already mentioned, by agreement 
with the government of Uzbekistan, the 186th Ground Attack 
Instructor Regiment is operating from its territory. Because of 
the absence of national cadres and the break in economic ties, 
the Republic Armed Forces are in an extremely difficult 
situation. Russian servicemen who arrived encountered a mass of 
problems: long-range and short-range navigation systems were not 
operating at the airfield. The Uzbek Air Force 115th Guards 
Fighter Regiment based at Kakaydy, previously regarded as one of 
the best, is experiencing a great shortage of technical flight 
personnel. Therefore along with conducting combat operations, 
personnel of the Russian Air Force regiment had to restore 
airfield equipment and guard the entrusted equipment and 
ammunition under very difficult conditions of Central Asian 
heat, sand storms, and a shortage of potable water and of 
adjusted everyday life--air conditioners are absent and the food 
ration is monotonous. 
  High combat proficiency helps avoid losses in people and 
equipment while inflicting considerable damage on the enemy. The 
following fact attests to the pilots' proficiency and to the 
Su-25's combat capabilities: with one pass at the target, the 
positions of a DShK [Degtyarev and Shpagin heavy machinegun] 
antiaircraft battery, Major Vdovin destroyed three out of four 
machineguns with a bomb strike. In the last days of September it 
was learned that several pilots headed by regimental commander 
Colonel Aleksey Golovin, an Afghan War veteran, were recommended 
for state awards at the initiative of the ground troops command 
in Tajikistan. 
  The majority of servicemen of the 186th Ground Attack 
Instructor Regiment believe that by covering the border on the 
Pyandzh River they are defending the borders of Russia and of 
Commonwealth countries. If they were to leave here, it is fully 
likely that in a short time interval they will have to fight the 
very same enemy, only several hundred kilometers to the north. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Krylya Rodiny" 1994. No 1 (756) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46594 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> AIR, AIR DEFENSE FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Detailed Description of Tu-160 Subsystems </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Detailed Description of Tu-160 Subsystems </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0443A Moscow KRYLYA RODINY in Russian No 1, Jan 94 
(signed to press 20 Dec 93) pp 1-3 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0443A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRYLYA RODINY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Conclusion of article by Vladimir Ilin and Mikhail Levin: </F>
"Practically the Only Strategic Aircraft (Tu-160)"; beginning of 
article in KRYLYA RODINY, No 12, 1993] 
  [Text] The aircraft is controlled in pitch using an 
all-moving stabilizer, in roll by flaperons and interceptors, 
and in yaw by an all-moving fin. 
  There is an automatic system for restriction and warning 
about moving to threshold regimes. 
  The Tu-160 is equipped with a hose/cone aerial refuelling 
system. When not in use, the boom retracts into a compartment 
ahead of the pilots' cockpit in the fuselage nose. Initially, 
when Il-78 and 3M tanker aircraft were equipped with an aerial 
refuelling system having a heavy cone, a massive "firing" boom 
was installed in the bomber, but since the appearance of lighter 
cones, the Tu-160 has had lightweight booms of a simpler design 
since 1988. 
  An option also examined at Air Force insistence was that of 
outfitting the aircraft with a nonretractable boom accommodated 
in the slightly upturned fuselage nose (as in the 3M), but such 
a solution subsequently was rejected. 
  The bomber is equipped with a sighting and navigation system 
supporting automatic flight and combat employment. This includes 
a number of systems and sensors which permit engaging ground 
targets regardless of time of day, region or weather conditions. 
  An inertial navigation system, astronavigation system, 
satellite navigation system, multichannel digital communications 
system and developed ECM system are installed. The latter 
permits detecting enemy radars in a wide band and conducting 
active and passive jamming. 
  The navigation and fire control radar mounted in the 
fuselage 
nose has a parabolic antenna and is capable of detecting large 
naval and ground radar-signature targets at a great distance. 
There is an electro-optical bombsight supporting high-accuracy 
bombing under daylight conditions and with a low level of 
illumination. 
  The tail cone accommodates numerous pods with decoy flares 
and chaff. A thermal direction finder which detects enemy 
missiles and aircraft approaching from the rear hemisphere is in 
the extreme rear of the fuselage. 
  The overall number of digital processors aboard the aircraft 
exceeds 100. The navigator workstation is equipped with eight 
digital computers. 
  The pilots' cockpit is equipped with standard 
electromechanical instruments similar to those installed in the 
Tu-22M3 bomber, but the aircraft is controlled not with the help 
of the control yoke traditional for heavy aircraft, but by means 
of a "fighter" type of stick (the Tu-160 largely is obligated 
for the control stick's appearance to Reshetnikov, who helped 
convince numerous "conservatives" of the benefit of using it on 
a heavy bomber). 
  The Tu-160 armament is located in two large fuselage bays 
and 
may include a wide assortment of guided missiles, guided and 
free fall bombs, as well as other weapons both with nuclear as 
well as conventional filling. This permits using the aircraft 
against essentially all types of ground and naval targets. 
  Missile armament includes up to 12 Kh-55 cruise missiles 
created in the Raduga MKB [Design Bureau] and accommodated in 
two rotary launchers. The cruise missiles are for engaging 
stationary targets with preset coordinates, input to the cruise 
missile "memory" before the bomber takes off. 
  The Kh-15 aeroballistic missile may be included in the 
armament for engaging targets of no lesser range. An antiship 
version of this missile with a radar homing system operating in 
the millimeter band and an antiradar version with passive homing 
have been developed. Use of other types of advanced missile 
weapons also is possible. 
  Bomb armament of the Tu-160 bomber is viewed as a "second 
priority" weapon intended for engaging targets remaining after a 
first missile strike by the bomber. It also is accommodated in 
the weapons bay and may include various types of guided bombs, 
including the most powerful domestic munitions of this 
class--series KAB-1500 with a caliber of 1,500 kg. 
  The aircraft also can be equipped with free fall (including 
nuclear) bombs of various caliber, expendable cluster bomb 
dispensers, sea mines and other armament. 
  One possible area of employing the Tu-160 is to use it in 
the 
Burlak system intended for inserting light satellites into 
near-earth orbit. A need for such satellites may arise in the 
course of combat operations in case the enemy succeeds in 
destroying or substantially weakening the orbital grouping and 
the Baykonur and Plesetsk space launch facilities have been 
knocked out. In addition, Burlak has enormous potential for 
commercial use for launching domestic and foreign satellites for 
the most varied purposes. 
  The system consists of the Tu-160 platform aircraft and a 
solid-propellant cruise missile being created in the Raduga MBK 
[sic; probably MKB]. 


Burlak Aircraft System Characteristics 

Weight of payload to be inserted into 
low circular orbits, kg: 

polar                                     300-500 

equatorial                                500-700 

Weight of payload to be inserted into 
circular orbits 1,000 km high or 
elliptical orbits (perigee 200 km, 
apogee 8,500 km), kg: 

polar                                     50-150 

equatorial                                120-220 

Maximum payload dimensions, m:            1.3 x 1.2 x 1.2 

Volume of payload bay, m[.sup]3[/]         1.75. 


  Employing the aircraft system precludes the need for 
creating 
new costly ranges and ground launch complexes or leasing 
existing ones. It supports formation of an orbit in practically 
any plane and launches from any place on earth suitable from the 
standpoint of safety regardless of time of day and climatic and 
weather conditions. Compared with traditional launch vehicles, 
specific energy costs for launching an equivalent payload are 
reduced by 2-3 times and the unfavorable effect on ecology is 
diminished. 
  Equipment for preparing the missile and system are 
autonomous 
and mobile and support prompt launch of a mission-specific 
payload. 
  Despite very major achievements of domestic designers in 
creating bombers, our country's Long-Range Aviation has remained 
a very small component of the strategic nuclear triad for many 
years. When the START I Agreement was concluded in 1991, the 
USSR had 162 strategic bombers carrying 855 nuclear weapons, 
which was 8.3 percent of the overall number (10,271) of the 
USSR's nuclear weapons. Heavy bombers in the U.S. strategic 
forces always were given a substantially greater role: in that 
same 1991 the United States had 574 heavy bombers with 2,353 
nuclear weapons (22.3 percent), i.e., aviation had approximately 
the very same weight as ICBM's, although it was behind submarine 
missile forces. 
  But the situation may change substantially in case of 
realization of the START II Treaty, which provides for a radical 
restructuring of strategic nuclear forces. This inevitably will 
involve an increase in the role of heavy bombers in the 
country's defense system (by 2003 the limit for bombers will be 
750-1,250 nuclear weapons, with 3,000-3,500 nuclear weapons 
overall). 
  While the main emphasis previously was placed on creating 
weapons intended for combating the main potential enemy, the 
United States, now various scenarios of armed conflicts are 
being examined, and it is not a nuclear "apocalypse" that 
appears most likely, but limited local wars. In this case 
Long-Range Aviation remains the only part of the strategic triad 
capable of universal employment (using both nuclear as well as 
conventional weapons), which significantly elevates its role. 
  The domestic and foreign press has noted that the Tu-160 
presently is the most powerful strike aircraft in the world. One 
can become convinced of the soundness of these assertions by 
comparing it with the U.S. analogue, the Rockwell B-1B strategic 
bomber. The common feature of fourth-generation aircraft is the 
integrated aerodynamic configuration distinguished by the smooth 
joining of wing and fuselage, which because of its 
unquestionable advantages (increased aerodynamic efficiency, 
increased internal volumes, a decrease in the area flowed around 
and in radar cross-section) has become widespread in modern 
combat aviation. It also was adopted for many fighters of the 
1970's and 1980's (Su-27, MiG-29, G-16, F/A-18). The closeness 
of requirements (possibility of penetrating enemy air defense at 
low altitude and transonic speed and at high altitude and 
supersonic speed while providing intercontinental flight range 
and a considerable combat payload) predetermined the choice for 
both aircraft of a variable-geometry wing supporting 
multiple-regime flight [mnogorezhimnost poleta]. 
  But their similarity ends with these configuration features 
common to both aircraft. The Tu-160 is considerably heavier than 
the U.S. aircraft (maximum takeoff weight 275 t compared with 
216 t of the B-1B) and possesses a much greater maximum 
load-carrying capacity (design weight of combat payload in 
weapons bays is 45 t as against 34 t for the B-1B). 
  A certain advantage of the Tu-160 in specific weight 
indicators of thrust-to-weight ratio also leads to better 
specifications and performance characteristics: it has a greater 
flight range (12,300 km compared with the B-1B's 10,400 km). It 
should be taken into account that the Tu-160 has a high 
supersonic flight speed at which it is capable of flying for a 
lengthy time, while the maximum Mach number for the B-1B is 
reduced to 1.25 because of the rejection of variable-geometry 
intakes and a decrease in the proportion (by weight) of titanium 
alloys in the construction from 21 to 17.6 percent. 
  In the assessment of Russian Air Force Commander P. S. 
Deynekin, expressed in a conversation with the authors, 
maneuverability and controllability characteristics of the B-1B 
and Tu-160 aircraft are approximately identical. The "empty" 
B-1B (with a takeoff weight of around 150 t) in which Deynekin 
flew in the United States made sharp turns with up to a 40ë 
bank and a steep climb and descent. But in the commander's 
words, it also would have been possible to fly a Tu-160 with an 
incomplete fuel load in a similar manner. 
  Advantages of the Tupolev aircraft were dictated by a number 
of its fundamental design features. In contrast to the B-1B, 
which uses a system of supplementary moving airfoil surfaces in 
the aircraft nose for damping elastic vibrations of the fuselage 
in the pitch plane when flying in a turbulent atmosphere, there 
is no need for such devices in the Tu-160. Increased rigidity of 
the aircraft's construction is achieved through a lesser 
elongation of the nose with developed wing root leading-edge 
extensions. Realization of an original wheel well 
configuration--without disturbing the fuselage's load-bearing 
unit, while in the B-1 the fuselage is greatly weakened (in the 
figurative expression of aircraft chief designer V. I. Bliznyuk, 
it is "cut in half" by the wheel compartments)--permitted 
getting by without using a supplementary electronic system. The 
increased resonance of joints for rotating the Tu-160's moving 
wing panels (the relative length of the center section beam is 
0.25 with unfolded wing compared with 0.19 for the B-1B) reduces 
trim losses at transonic speeds as a result of a lesser shift of 
the center of aerodynamic pressure when reversing the wing. Use 
of an electro-remote control system in the Tu-160 provides a 
fundamental capability to reduce trim losses even more by 
reducing the aircraft's static stability. 
  In creating the Tu-160 and B-1B, designers were given the 
task of sharply reducing radar cross-section, the main indicator 
of radar signature. But while the United States sacrificed a 
number of very important performance characteristics for the 
sake of this (above all speed, which turned the bomber from 
supersonic to transonic), the Tupolev firm achieved similar 
results without "worsening" the aircraft. In contrast to the air 
intake with S-shaped baffles used in the B-1B, an ordinary 
variable-geometry intake was installed in the Tu-160, providing 
high characteristics in all flight configurations, and radar 
cross-section was reduced by using "low-signature" engines. A 
reduction in radar signature also is facilitated by a more 
"integrated" configuration (from a front view, the Tu-160's 
lines resemble the U.S. Northrop B-2 low-signature aircraft), a 
cockpit not extending beyond fuselage lines (in the B-1B it is 
situated above the wheel wells and forms a unique hump in the 
aircraft nose section), and an all-moving fin (the slot formed 
between the B-1B vertical tail and rudder provides an additional 
splash of reflected radar emission). 
  Armament of the bombers also differs substantially. The 
Tu-160 is capable of carrying a wide assortment of both nuclear 
as well as conventional munitions (guided and unguided). The 
presence of an optical bombsight provides high precision of 
high-altitude bombing. The B-1B presently is equipped only for 
delivering B-61 and B-83 nuclear free fall bombs. The SRAM 
short-range guided missile was removed from the armament since 
storage periods of solid-propellant rocket motors had expired, 
and work on the SRAM II advanced missile stopped in 1991. 
  It has been written repeatedly that the B-1B is capable of 
carrying ALCM cruise missiles. It fact, tests were conducted 
confirming the possibility of accommodating such weapons on the 
aircraft, but as of the present time the B-1B bomber fleet does 
not have the necessary equipment permitting use of cruise 
missiles. (A large amount of additional funds, which the U.S. 
Defense Department does not have, is required to manufacture 
such equipment and install it in the aircraft.) Only in 1991 did 
the U.S. Air Force begin work to arm the B-1B with conventional 
225 kg free fall bombs. The B-1B can perform only "carpet" 
bombing of areas because of the absence of an optical bombsight. 
  At the same time, the U.S. aircraft has more sophisticated 
cockpit instrumentation, particularly monochron CRT indicators 
installed in front of each pilot, which makes flying the 
aircraft easier, especially in low-altitude flight. 
  Comparing the Tu-160 and B-1B, it is impossible to ignore 
the 
higher engineering professionalism and elegance of design of the 
Tupolev aircraft, which favorably distinguish it from the 
Rockwell creation. Thus, the deflecting root sections of flaps, 
which provide smooth joining of the rotating and stationary 
parts of the wing, improve aircraft aerodynamics when flying at 
high speeds by performing the role of additional fins. In a 
cruising regime they form a smooth transition between wing 
surfaces, ideal from the standpoint of aerodynamics and radar 
signature. This elegant, clever solution contrasts with the 
cumbersome, "nonaerodynamic" system of joining used by the 
Americans and including hideous (from an aesthetic standpoint) 
deflecting panels and complicated and not very reliable seals. 
In general, in the authors' opinion, a unique "superiority 
complex" (in the good sense of this word) was displayed in 
creating the Tu-160, which formed in the best part of the 
engineering design corps of the OKB [Special Design Bureau] 
imeni A. N. Tupolev (a rather rare quality for our days). 
  The multiple-regime combat aircraft, harmoniously combining 
low signature with high performance characteristics and powerful 
defensive and offensive weapons, has good chances of "surviving" 
in the skies of the early 21st century. It is obvious that of 
all the strategic supersonic bombers created as of the present 
time, specifically the Tu-160 most approaches the ideal of such 
an aircraft. 


Tu-160 Characteristics 

Wingspan, m: 

flying at maximum speed                   35.6 

in cruising flight                        50.7 

in a takeoff and landing regime           55.7 

Aircraft length, m                        54.1 

Height, m                                 13.2 

Wheel track, m                            5.4 

Wheelbase, m                              17.9 

Length of engine nacelle (less wedge),    13.78 
m 

Horizontal tail span, m                   13.25 

Maximum takeoff weight, kg                275,000 

Maximum landing weight, kg                165,000 

Fuel weight, kg                           140,600 

Maximum practical combat payload, kg      22,400 

Maximum permissible weight of combat      45,000 
payload, kg 

Maximum speed at 13,000 m in              2,200 
afterburning power conditions, with 65 
wing sweep, km/hr 

Maximum Mach                              2.0 

Service ceiling, m                        15,000 

Range on full fuel load down to minimum   12,300 
reserve with takeoff weight of 275,000 
kg 

Endurance, hrs                            15 

Maximum rate of climb, m/sec              60-70 


  COPYRIGHT: "Krylya Rodiny" 1994. No 1 (756) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46595 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Destroyer `Neustrashimyy' To Participate in NATO </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Destroyer `Neustrashimyy' To Participate in NATO </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
`BALTOPS-94' 

<F P=102>   94UM0451A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 7 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0451A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Maryukha and Valeriy Gromak, KRASNAYA </F>
ZVEZDA: "Russia's Accreditation in NATO Exercises Is Becoming 
Traditional"] 
  [Text] BALTOPS-94 is the name of the NATO Allied Naval 
Forces exercise which began today in the southern Baltic and in 
which ships, submarines and naval aviation of 13 countries, 
including countries not in the Alliance, are taking part. The 
commander-in-chief Allied Forces Baltic Straits zone has overall 
direction of the exercise and the ship grouping is subordinate 
to the commander, U.S. Navy Destroyer Squadron 14. 
  Along with other countries for which participation in such 
exercises is new (Lithuania, Latvia, Estonia, and to some extent 
Poland), Russia is represented relatively modestly in Baltic 
Operations-94. Nevertheless, the patrol ship Neustrashimyy, to 
which the exercise plan assigns a serious mission of taking 
American specialists aboard after they land on the water from an 
Orion aircraft, is the newest and one of the best ships of the 
Baltic Fleet. 
  According to a Russian Federation Navy Press Center report, 
in addition to interworking with U.S. special forces during the 
exercise, the ship will rehearse elements of joint maneuvering 
and communications, practice firing will be carried out against 
a naval target, and a rescue operation will be conducted. The 
participation of three submarines in the exercise also implies 
conduct of an ASW operation. Neustrashimyy already is the second 
Baltic Fleet ship to take part in NATO naval exercises. In the 
past year the patrol ship Bditelnyy was "sent on TDY" to 
BALTOPS-93 and successfully coped with the mission assigned. 
  The exercise, held annually for 22 years now, will last 
until 
10 June. 
  The ships put to sea yesterday after a briefing and 
clarification of exercise details in the German port of Kiel. 
Our correspondent also set off for the exercise area aboard the 
Neustrashimyy. We intend to publish his detailed account in 
upcoming issues. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46596 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Navy Leaders Said To Ruin Sub Fleet but Go Unpunished </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Navy Leaders Said To Ruin Sub Fleet but Go Unpunished </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM1606135794 Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA in Russian 
11 Jun 94 pp 1, 2 </F>

<F P=103> PM1606135794 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Captain First Rank (Retired) Ilya Kolton, </F>
candidate of technical sciences: "Military Secret: Evidence 
Will Surface -- Top Secret Documents on the Status of Russian 
Naval Submarines"] 
  [Text] It is not the first time that this theme has been 
raised in the press. A whole host of articles in various mass 
media sources have been devoted to the catastrophic situation in 
the Russian Navy and its level of combat effectiveness. The 
article by Captain First (Retired) Ilya Kolton is the 
culmination of this long history, which reveals not only the 
criminal negligence on the part of the Navy leadership in the 
matter of ensuring the combat effectiveness of Russian nuclear 
submarines, but also the monstrous bureaucratic red tape at all 
levels of power today. 
<H5>  In Place of an Epigraph: </H5>
  If a wily and perfidious leadership, showing no 
consideration 
for the well-being of the fatherland, wanted, for its own gain, 
to reduce our Navy to the point of possible annihilation, even 
it could not place it in a position any more contemptuous or any 
more impotent than the one in which it is today. 
  Vasiliy Golovnin (1776-1831), Russian seafarer, participant 
in an around-the-world voyage, and, from 1823 onward, chief 
naval quartermaster. 
  The use in the 1950's of nuclear-powered devices on 
submarines by the United States and the USSR allowed them to 
conduct lengthy secret operations under water. It is this which 
predetermined their role as a nuclear missile carrier and became 
a component (the naval one) of strategic offensive arms. 
However, by the end of the 1960's, this key combat asset had 
been lost by our nuclear-powered submarines. The main reason -- 
the unacceptable, if not criminal, negligence on the part of 
certain home-grown scientists, designers, and the Navy 
leadership -- that is, all those who preside over naval 
shipbuilding -- in respect of the problem of reducing the 
underwater noise levels of nuclear-powered submarines, their 
main detection factor. 
  On the other hand, the United States and the countries of 
NATO, applying the principle of complex acoustic design to their 
nuclear-powered submarines, which meant according absolute 
priority to the underwater noise level over all other combat 
characteristics (speed, depth of submergence, and so on), 
reduced the noise levels of their nuclear-powered submarines 
tens of times over and thus improved their detection range 
hundreds of times over [povisili v sotni raz dalnost vzaimnogo 
obnaruzheniya]. They developed a whole series of models of 
torpedoes and mines with acoustic self-guidance systems, plus a 
whole range of other important measures was implemented 
pertaining to combat our submarines on the basis of their high 
noise level. 
  As for us, knowing, as we did, from intelligence reports the 
direction in which the United States' submarine strategy was 
developing, we stuck with the old principles of submarine 
building expounded back in 1742 by Yefim Nikonov, who was the 
first person to create a "hidden vessel" and test its 
submergence and navigability under water in the River Neva. 
  Our guys, failing to alter the philosophy of submarine 
building since that time, as if out of bloody-mindedness 
continued to design noisy submarines. Breaching laws and the 
methodology of testing, they fraudulently supplied and continue 
to supply the fleet -- with the consent of the naval commander 
in chief -- with unbattleworthy floating targets which are both 
unreliable and dangerous to use. In this way, the combat 
efficacy of the Navy has been brought to the level of the absurd. 
  We did not want a sensation on this subject in the open 
press. There was, after all, a real possibility of resolving 
this problem on a bilateral basis without humiliating the 
military-industrial complex, the Navy, and those who served and 
serve it faithfully. Indeed, 1990 even saw the conclusion of 
just such an alliance with Admiral F. Novoselov, deputy naval 
commander in chief for shipbuilding and weaponry, and we 
supported nuclear-powered submarine projects, but, clearly, this 
move did not fit into V. Chernavin's plans. So we were forced 
to enter into open discussion with V. Chernavin in the press, at 
times making use of officially classified information which, in 
point of fact, was really being kept secret from our only own 
people. 
  After this, we made repeated appeals to all state 
authorities, including the newfangled Russian Security Council 
(Yu. Sokolov, V. Rubanov, V. Manilov, Yu. Nazarkin, B. Ilin), 
with a single request: That we might be given a chance in their 
presence to defend the truth in honorable battle. However, even 
for these people, directly answerable under the Law "On 
Security" for the country's defense capability, this venture was 
unsuitable. Nobody from among the state officials noticed our 
pointed, revealing articles in newspapers and magazines, giving 
the impression that they had never read them. But then came the 
"first sign" which we had been patiently awaiting -- V. 
Chernavin's article in PRAVDA 9 February this year entitled 
"Paper Boats in the Sea of Life." The former navy commander in 
chief came down angrily on the conclusion that "our nuclear 
submarines, the basis of the Navy's nuclear might and a 
component of the strategic nuclear forces, are a sham. They are 
merely a maneuver to show that our country does still have a 
combat capable fleet. We go to sea, churn up the waters in the 
ocean, but this is as effective as beating the air. 
Missile-armed submarines cannot in principle bear any combat 
significance or effect any combat service.... The Americans are 
hundreds of times superior in terms of detection range. The 
upshot is that they, secretly tracking our missile-armed 
submarines from the first to the last moment they are at sea, 
stick with them, as if they had a dog on a lead...." 
  In the article V. Chernavin described this, albeit bitter, 
truth as a "monstrous lie." But it is this bitter truth which 
has been communicated in the open press and in dispatches to the 
CPSU Central Committee and the USSR KGB since as far back as 
1974 not only by me, a mere mechanical engineer who, in V. 
Chernavin's words, is unfit to discuss the problems of naval 
strategy, but also by admirals and top nuclear-powered vessel 
commanders with a conscience and a feeling of responsibility 
toward their people. 
  Incidentally, while V. Chernavin was floundering emotively 
in 
the airy "strategy" of conducting underwater warfare, submarine 
experts in the United States condensed actual underwater 
strategy to ensuring the secrecy of the actions of their own 
submarine forces, which was sufficient for our submarine forces 
to find themselves in the role of a blind and deaf boxer 
striving to win a fight against the invisible man. 
  Unlike V. Chernavin, Fleet Admirals G. Yegorov and N. 
Smirnov, Admiral N. Amelko, Vice Admirals R. Golosov, V. 
Kruglyakov, and Ye. Chernov, Captains First Rank A. Alekseyev, 
Yu. Beketov, A. Gorbachev, V. Zhukovskiy, V. Zaznobin, V. 
Loboshinskiy, G. Melkov, A. Khraptovich, and many others, 
bravely sought to extricate our submarine forces from this 
humiliating position, and to ward off the unprecedented damage 
being inflicted on the Navy, society, and the state as a result 
of huge accidents and catastrophes involving weaponry and 
military hardware. But in vain. They were prevented by V. 
Chernavin. They were distanced from vital naval affairs. 
Unfortunately, it is an old Russian custom that such people are 
needed only at times of war and extreme difficulty. K. Simonov 
put it well in a poem entitled "Aleksandr Suvorov": "In 
peacetime, we are like estranged sons, but in wartime we are all 
brothers together!" In times of peace, the people leading the 
dance are people like V. Chernavin. You didn't have to be a 
great strategist to organize the 1987 "spectacular" -- the naval 
operation described by him in the article "Paper Boats in the 
Sea of Life," which, in his words, "...seriously worried the 
Pentagon and prompted questions of a highly pertinent nature in 
the U.S. Congress...." 
  It is clear to the submarine engineer and the schoolboy 
alike 
that this naval operation was designed to disinform. Judge for 
yourself. Five missile-armed submarines were earmarked to take 
turns carrying out alert duty at sea for one year. To fulfill 
the prescribed task, which was part of a plan to use on a rota 
basis one missile-armed submarine at a time, the naval commander 
in chief sent all five to sea at once. The question arises: 
How will the naval commander in chief carry out the task of 
defending Russia and the CIS countries from the sea for the 
other 80 percent of the year if the division's annual sortie 
quota for missile-armed submarines, and unreliable ones at that, 
is completely used up? 
  Let's cite a few excerpts from documents testifying to this 
very real state of affairs. 
  Top Secret: From a letter from Academician A.P. Aleksandrov 
and Fleet Admiral G.M. Yegorov to the USSR president: 
  "As practice has shown, over recent decades every one of our 
missile-armed strategic submarines has been under constant and 
clandestine surveillance affording a high level of readiness to 
destroy them on order, which leaves no grounds to believe it 
possible that the task of Russia's defense, even in restricted 
coastal regions of military action, can be effected." 
  Thus, in his article, V. Chernavin tries to mislead the 
public, and first and foremost the Russian Federation Security 
Council, by mentioning the apparently high combat potential of 
our naval strategic nuclear system: "The success of this 
operation meant a great deal in terms of my international 
prestige too. NATO strategists had to be aware, with the 
departure of the former commander in chief, Admiral of the 
Soviet Fleet S.G. Gorshkov, who did so much to bring our ships 
out into the expanses of the world ocean, that not only does his 
successor not intend to surrendering the positions acquired, but 
will play a new, more profound and more acute game..." 
  The gravity of this stance is not only that V. Chernavin is 
concerned about his prestige in the United States and his own 
country all at once, but also fact that, to the detriment of the 
country's defense capabilityity, he takes the urgency out of the 
problem of the struggle to increase the combat efficiency of the 
actions of our submarines. 
  Top Secret: From Security Ministry files (N. Golushko) to 
Russian Federation General Prosecutor V. Stepankov. 
  "The crux of the problem resides in the fact that the 
elaboration of areas of development of hydroacoustic complexes 
and self-guidance systems for underwater weaponry, appraisal of 
the effectiveness and principles of a decision on new designs 
for nuclear submarines, the elaboration of comprehensive 
programs for antisubmarine warfare, and, finally, the actual 
planning of combat operations involving calculations of the 
optimum force configuration, is directly linked with the need to 
have a precise knowledge of the characteristics of the noise 
levels of our own submarines and those of a probable opponent. 
Any distortion of information in this sphere will cause 
tremendous damage both in the matter of developing weapons and 
military hardware for the Navy and also in that of planning its 
combat activity and, ultimately, the country's defense 
capability." 
  To this day, V. Chernavin's objections to the introduction 
of 
proposals opening the way to ratifying START II without damaging 
the country's defense capability do not add up and dispel doubts 
about the objectivity of our conclusions on the point of this 
"acticity" by V. Chernavin. After all, these proposals remove 
the deficiencies of the naval component of START II in the 
shortest possible space of time and with minimum material 
outlay. They were supported by the submarine engineers of the 
Northern and Pacific Fleets, scientists, and designers, and they 
were substantiated by the results of interdepartmental 
reconstructions and tactical exercises in the period from 1982 
through 1986. The experience gained was analyzed by the 
departments, and in 1985 it was approved at the Navy 
Military-Technical Council and recommended for introduction on 
nuclear submarines. However, through the efforts of the Navy 
commander in chief, everything sunk into oblivion. 
  Top Secret: From Security Ministry files (N. Golushko) to 
Russian Federation General Prosecutor V. Stepankov. 
  "At the same time, it should be noted that Navy Commander in 
Chief V.N. Chernavin, who, since as far back as 1974, has had a 
negative attitude toward these proposals for reasons known only 
to himself, through his 1987 directive declined to introduce 
them owing to their low effectiveness and potential danger in 
questions of nuclear submarine survivability...." (This refers 
to the introduction of proposals guaranteeing the secrecy of the 
actions of nuclear submarines -- I.K) 
  Furthermore, in a bid to please V. Chernavin, the USSR 
Defense Ministry Inspectorate for the Nuclear Safety of Nuclear 
Installations defined these proposals as potentially dangerous. 
In the experts' view, the conclusion drawn by the inspectorate 
(Vice Admiral N. Bisovka) was "highly unconvincing, 
contradictory, and, in point of fact, aimed at discrediting the 
proposals." 
  Meanwhile, V. Chernavin was speaking out indignantly during 
the 1993 election campaign ("Civic Union") in respect of "the 
country's decrepit defense," and he felt no responsibility for 
the collapse of the Navy, in which, back in the pre-perestroyka 
era, he had played an active part. 
  Both the loss of strategic parity at sea and the possibility 
of restoring it with minimum outlay in the shortest possible 
space of time, to which V. Chernavin objected so strongly, were 
subsequently repeatedly borne out by Academician A.P. 
Aleksandrov and Fleet Admiral G.M. Yegorov in letters to the 
USSR president and USSR defense minister, in a comprehensive 
survey by the Russian Federation Security Ministry sent to the 
Russian Federation general prosecutor, in a letter from Fleet 
Admiral G.M. Yegorov and a group of admirals and naval officers 
to Marshal of Aviation Ye.I. Shaposhnikov, and in an article 
entitled "Road to Tsushima" (LITERATURNAYA GAZETA, 01.09.92). 
  The USSR KGB, the USSR Prosecutor's Office, and the Russian 
Federation Prosecutor's Office also made repeated appeals for 
this problem and the Navy's proposals to be examined by the 
highest authorities. 
  Top Secret: From a letter from Deputy General Prosecutor N. 
Shakleyin to Vice Premier G. Khizha. 
  "...Expressing alarm on the subject of the circumstances 
listed, Kolton raises the question of imposing order in the 
matter of supplying the Navy with ships and weaponry, abolishing 
erroneous decisions by administrative organs, and also calling 
guilty officials to account.... 
  "...The repeated incidence of accepting into the effective 
strength of the Navy ships and vessels with imperfections and 
defects is confirmed also by materials at the disposal of the 
prosecutor's oversight body.... An evaluation of information 
cited concerning the military-technical policy conducted in 
recent years, as well as the technical level and combat 
readiness of the Navy, goes beyond the bounds of the competence 
of the bodies of the Prosecutor's Office. At the same time, 
leaving these questions unattended may lead to serious 
consequences.... 
  "...The former USSR Prosecutor's Office submitted an appeal 
on this score to the USSR Cabinet of Ministers 23 July 1991, and 
to the chairman of the Interrepublic Economic Committee 20 
November 1991, but with no result...." 
  This request was also heard repeatedly in appeals by 
ordinary 
citizens to B.N. Yeltsin and other officials -- R. Khasbulatov, 
G. Burbulis, A. Rutskoy, Yu. Skokov, Yu. Petrov, N. Trubin, V. 
Stepankov, V. Panichev, V. Barannikov, S. Stepashin, A. 
Piskunov, V. Ochirov, L. Sharin, A. Lapygin, A. Kotenkov, I. 
Shalatonov, P. Grachev, and others. 
  However, all the appeals were examined merely in a cursory 
manner, with unfounded negative conclusions, or else they were 
not examined at all. One hazy area is the fact that a large 
section of state officials, including some from the Russian 
Security Council who are directly responsible for the country's 
security, shied away in panic not only from a decision but even 
from familiarizing themselves with this problem, as if they 
feared getting burned, and immediately forwarded the documents 
for conclusion by the main culprits: Fleet Admiral V. 
Chernavin, general designer I. Spaskiy, Academician 
Gaponov-Grekhov, and others. Once there, this issue was 
resolved one-sidedly, tendentiously, and with blatant falsehood 
and cynicism, refuting the positive results of reconstructions 
and tactical exercises, the experience of testing and using 
Naval ships -- that is, the truth. You do not have to look far 
for examples. 
  Here before us is the conclusion of Academicians I. Spasskiy 
(USSR Supreme Soviet deputy from the "Red Hundred") and S. 
Kovalev (both, incidentally, heroes of socialist labor, the 
latter twice over), two of the most authoritative general 
designers in the military-industrial complex, prepared by them 
in 1985 for my report to the Navy commander in chief on 
supplying the Navy's combat complement with non-combatworthy 
submarines. Under the stamp "Top Secret," the two academicians 
expound what is actually not secret information: 
  "...For the first time in many years of work developing 
submarines we have run up against the fact of representatives of 
the apparatus of the Navy Standing Commission for State 
Acceptance issuing a document which is unprecedented in terms of 
lack of objectivity, incompetence, and crudeness. We hope that 
the appearance of this document is an accident determined purely 
by subjective factors.... I. Kolton's statement that the 
efficiency of the actions of the U.S. Navy's nuclear submarines 
is incommensurably higher than ours is unfounded and 
tendentious.... Statements by the author such as 'industry, with 
the consent of the Naval Main Directorate for Components Supply, 
is setting norms for noise levels which lower the requirements 
of the CPSU Central Committee and the USSR Council of Ministers' 
are a gross lie insulting to the collectives of the bureaus and 
the construction plants. They also discredit the work of the 
author's colleagues who accepted these nuclear submarines, and 
of the Navy command, which is apparently ignorant about the 
level of secrecy of the actions of our nuclear submarines.... 
Considering the aforestated, designers at the Central Design 
Bureau deem unacceptable the practice of the appearance of 
documents of this ilk, as they harm the great and complex work 
to reduce the noise levels of nuclear submarines which is 
constantly being done by the shipbuilding industry." 
  It seems appropriate to remind these academicians of an old 
saying: "Jupiter, you are angry -- that means you are not 
right." And indeed, both academicians lied. They lied. And 
seven years later, the very same I. Spasskiy was forced to 
admit to MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI correspondent Yu. Teplyakov (no. 48 
1992) that: "Our submarines are dozens of times less efficient 
than the Americans' in terms of noise levels. At high speeds, 
they are defenseless...." But even in admitting part of the 
truth, the academician nevertheless continued to lie. Why is it 
only at high speeds that they are defenseless? They are 
defenseless at low speeds, at which a missile-carrier's main 
task has to be carried out. 
  Considering our distorted system for weapons and military 
hardware supplies, it is possible to some extent to sympathize 
with these academicians. But what can be our attitude toward 
statesmen who should monitor and control this process? I will 
cite an example. In September, for the purposes of checking the 
activity of the USSR KGB, including in respect of the 
aforementioned problems of the Navy, B. Yeltsin appointed a 
commission under the leadership of S. Stepashin, and I got the 
chance to expound my view to this commission. 
  The documents submitted by me contained substantiated proof 
that the USSR KGB leadership, upon receiving objective 
information acquired with great difficulty by their 
subordinates, presented it for specific ends to the higher 
authorities in the interests of lobby groups in a mode 
transformed as required by them. 
  At that time S. Stepashin and his commission (A. Kotenkov 
and 
I. Shalatonov) successfully, and over a long period of time, hid 
the problem of the Navy's combat effectiveness from the Russian 
Federation president. It could not have been otherwise, if the 
president failed to react to the crime of the century. Again, 
my repeated appeals afterwards to S. Stepashin and A. Piskunov 
had no effect, as the documents were returned to me, and they 
ignored the instructions of the Seventh Congress of People's 
Deputies, at which I had appealed on this issue. 
  It is an interesting fact that people who have concealed the 
Navy's ills have made steady advances in the service and have 
risen in the ranks in a way that even D. Yakubovskiy never 
dreamed of. For example, A. Kotenko and I. Shalatonov, patrons 
of the military-industrial complex and of V. Chernavin, 
dilettantes who displayed no special qualities at all, made 
breathtaking strides in the space of a year in terms of ranks 
and posts. Furthermore, Rear Admiral I. Shalatonov, chief of 
the defense, security, and internal affairs department of the 
State Legal Administration under the president, is acting in an 
utterly strange way, as a provocateur. He intercepted a letter I 
sent to B.N. Yeltsin (the eighth to go unanswered) on problems 
of the country's defense capability and safeguarding the 
security of military activity! He has been beating about the 
bush for a year now and, apparently, has no intention at all of 
reporting it to the head of state (although he swore to do so). 
Moreover, the secret document I gave to him for signing, 
exposing the military-industrial mafia, has not come back. 
Evidently, he has hidden it from the president, together with 
other documents relating to questions of the country's defense 
capability and the security of military service. The very 
people who had a profound grasp of these problems, that is, Yu. 
Boldyrev, V. Bakatin, and A. Alekseyev, people prepared to 
expose the military-industrial mafia, were removed from their 
posts. 
  Top Secret: From a Security Ministry (N. Golushko) report to 
Russian Federation General Prosecutor V. Stepankov. 
  "Competent specialists note that all the evaluations made by 
the Mavy, military-industrial complex, and scientists in 
response to appeals to the authorities by A.P. Aleksandrov, G.M. 
Yegorov, and I.B. Kolton during the 1988-1990 period, as a rule 
grossly distort and frequently falsify positive results obtained 
in trials and tactical exercises in the 1982-1986 period, and 
are intended in the main to confirm the invalid decision made 
earlier by navy Commander in Chief V. Chernavin, set out in the 
1987 directive. 
  "At the same time, specialists believe that the results of 
interdepartmental trials and tactical exercises and combat 
practice makr it possible to draw the valid conclusion that 
there is an urgent need to present proposals primarily for 
tactical situations where their positive properties could have a 
significant impact on making the combat use of the Navy more 
effective. 
  "Specialists believe that the solution of this key naval 
problem in this way would fully meet the demands of the new 
defensive doctrine and conform to the principle of reasonable 
defense sufficiency." 
  V. Chernavin, acutely aware of the impending danger, was 
always able to duck responsibility and had the ability to "make 
himself scarce," to use the colloquial expression. 
  This ability of his was strikingly manifested during the 
incidents involving the loss of the nuclear-powered 
missile-armed craft in 1986 and the nuclear-powered submarine 
"Komsomolets" in 1989 and in the 1991 political crisis. But he 
did manage to do something for himself: He organized some 
jingoistic pamphlets singing his praises, and a six-part movie 
is being shot in the United States on our nuclear fleet. And 
who is the chief hero of it? You guessed. 
  The activities of V. Chernavin and his "pals" seem extremely 
conservative to us: the way they seek close contacts with the 
military-industrial complex and impede any positive process in 
the Navy if the introduction of its results runs the risk of 
dissatisfaction on the part of or loss of contacts with "useful 
people" who helped them up the ladder of power. A poor outlook, 
to be frank. V. Chernavin, with his talents, reminds one of the 
story of General Kuropatkin, who was appointed commander in 
chief of the Manchurian Army by Nicholas II. The general was 
honest with the emperor, telling him that the lot had fallen 
upon him precisely because Russia was so desperately short of 
talented cadres. 
  Modern-day Admiral of the Fleet V. Chernavin is incapable of 
thinking in this way. Having left the grand office of commander 
in chief of the Navy, V. Chernavin is compensating for the loss 
in the area of public "recognition" of his talents. He is an 
honorary member of the "Sharkhan Stars" [name as transliterated] 
international union of submariners in the United States and a 
member of the union's journal's editorial collegium in the FRG; 
he is a respected figure in the Russian Federation president's 
team and in the Russian Government -- director (for the moment) 
and member of the collegium of the State Maritime History and 
Culture Center. He is also president of the "Okeanotekhnika" 
association; he is president of the union of navy submariners; 
he is a member of the board of the Naval Aviation Check 
Investment Fund... 
  When one analyzes this story, the inevitable question 
arises: 
Who is calling the tune? The military-industrial mafia, 
extracting credits for dangerous, third-rate projects that 
reduce to naught not only the the country's defensive 
capability, but its economy as well? Will our rulers heed the 
people's cri de coeur on this occasion, heed the truth about the 
Navy on the eve of its 300th anniversary celebrations? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46597 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Adm Baltin Interviewed in Black Sea Fleet Talks </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Adm Baltin Interviewed in Black Sea Fleet Talks </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM2006124394 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 18 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> PM2006124394 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Admiral Eduard Baltin, commander of the </F>
Black Sea Fleet, by Captain First Rank Vladimir Pasyakin; date 
and place not given: "We Will Resolve the Black Sea Fleet 
Problem in Slavic Interests"] 
  [Text] [Pasyakin] Comrade Commander, the negotiations on 
the fate of the Black Sea Fleet are making heavy weather of it 
-- which is having a bad effect not only on Black Sea sailors 
but also on the residents of many of the garrisons where the 
fleet is deployed. Now, after so many meetings between the 
Russian and Ukrainian presidents, the two states' defense 
ministers, delegations, working groups, and military experts, it 
seems as though there is light at the end of the long and 
confusing negotiating tunnel. How do you view the situation as 
regards the division of the fleet, the separation of the Black 
Sea Fleet and Ukrainian Navy headquarters, and the possible 
leasing of Sevastopol and other bases? 
  [Baltin] The situation is deadlocked. In order to grasp 
this, let's look at what objectives Russia and Ukraine are 
pursuing. THey are totally different -- Russia has 
military-political objectives, while Ukraine has purely economic 
objectives. It is quite obvious that indirectly, by solving its 
economic problems, Ukraine will then seek to resolve also the 
tasks of the organizational development of its armed forces on 
the Crimean Peninsula. And at the Russian economy's expense. 
That is the fundamental difference. 
  Let us look further ahead. In order to achieve its 
objectives, what does Russia want to lease -- the Black Sea 
Fleet infrastructure or territory with Ukrainian citizens? What 
does it want to have -- a naval base or the city of Sevastopol 
with its impoverished population of many thousands and its 
ruined urban infrastructure? 
  [Pasyakin] That's a very unexpected way of looking at it.... 
  [Baltin] I agree -- insofar as I am aware, this approach has 
never been looked at by the expert groups in their work. For 
instance, I see the problem like this. 
  What would leasing Sevastopol and its suburbs mean? It would 
mean needing to accept jurisdiction over around 420,000 
Ukrainian citizens, including 127,000 pensioners, 78,000 of whom 
are still capable of working in the production sphere. Of 
these, up to 42,000 are employed at fleet enterprises or are 
directly connected with the sea -- fishermen, merchant seamen, 
ship repair workers. The rest are employed in the private 
commercial sector or in municipal services. There is no 
precedent in all of history for leasing a territory and its 
population. Although many countries -- including the United 
States -- have had dozens of bases abroad. At least until 1970. 
  Military bases, including naval bases, mean, above all, 
armed 
forces, all categories of men, and civilian service personnel 
from the local population living off-base. Good examples of 
such naval bases are Subic Bay in the Philippines, Okinawa in 
the Japanese islands, Guantanamo, Gibraltar, Hanko (which the 
USSR leased from Finland), and others. A naval base should meet 
certain conditions. Chief among these is that of being under 
the jurisdiction of the state leasing it. And, second, there 
should be no locals living on-base if they are not connected 
with servicing it. Finally, there should be no population 
growth. Officers, contract servicemen, and so forth discharged 
to the reserve should not remain permanently resident there. 
  [Pasyakin] Eduard Dmitriyevich, we know all about U.S. naval 
bases. Clearly, conditions here are different. 
  [Baltin] By leasing a territory with a population, Russia, 
it is now supposed, would conclude a treaty with Kiev and pay 
trillions [currency unspecified], above all in the form of its 
energy sources, thereby ensuring the viability of the Ukrainian 
economy. But, moreover, Russia would be forced to maintain the 
entire infrastructure of the leased territory and to meet the 
social needs of the population living there. Thus, under a 
treaty with Kiev neither the Crimea nor Sevastopol would gain 
anything directly and would at the same time be demanding extra 
appropriations from both Kiev and Moscow. They would be granted 
these appropriations by Kiev as subsidies funded out of Russia's 
lease payments. And Kiev would look like a benefactor in the 
public's eyes. 
  It is not hard to imagine that, with the current economic 
position of the two states, Ukraine's demands on Russia would 
constantly increase. Ukraine now sees Russia -- as Chornovil 
has frankly stated -- as a "milch cow." Moreover, Russia will 
be constantly in danger of having the agreement torn up for the 
slightest infraction, and it will have to pay for the upkeep of 
hundreds of thousands of Ukrainian citizens, and for the support 
of Ukrainian armed formations. 
  In short, such a lease would most probably very soon result 
in the emergence of discontent among the population owing to 
their low living standards at a time of economic recession. The 
people of Sevastopol and Crimeans are already profoundly 
impoverished, and they view the switch to Russian jurisdiction 
as a chance to improve their living standards. That can be 
understood, but what will Russia be like? It is exceptionally 
difficult to meet such intolerable conditions. I would 
reiterate that there is no precedent for such an agreement 
anywhere in the world.... 
  A short-term lease (of up to 30 years) would be 
impermissible 
anyway.... 
  [Pasyakin] Why? 
  [Baltin] Because then there would be no point developing and 
maintaining the existing infrastructure. There would be no 
point in investing funds -- because the short-term lease would 
not allow us to either preserve or develop the leased 
territory's infrastructure. 
  [Pasyakin] What other problems of a future lease worry you? 
  [Baltin] Ukraine is already lodging numerous complaints 
about the fleet. For polluting the environment, for instance. 
You can imagine what would happen if the lease became a reality! 
  The recent visit to us by an environmental commission headed 
by the deputy chairman of the Ukrainian Environment Committee 
revealed a rather strange approach. The commission ascribed all 
the violations it discovered to the Black Sea Fleet without any 
investigation or cogent justification. This was graphically 
visible from the example of its work at Balaklava. It is common 
knowledge that the environmental damage done there was caused by 
the mining administration, not by the fleet. Old residents of 
Balaklava recall how, when two submarine brigades were based 
there, there used to be quite a clean city beach in the bay 
right alongside the submarines, and how there used to be 
commercial fishing operations. But, over the past 25 years, 
owing to the strip mining of alumina from the Balaklava Hills, 
the bay has become 15-18 meters shallower. The thick layer of 
silt that used to cover the bottom and was the basis of the life 
of the flora has been entirely clogged with alumina. The 
environmental balance has been upset. The food for the fish has 
disappeared. 
  However, these flagrant problems were for some reason 
outside 
the remit of the environmental commission, which latched onto 
something else: It photographed fuel oil spills -- "evidence" 
against the fleet. But these appeared after the ships were 
refueled by the Ukrainian 5th Border Brigade, because the 
refueling operation was not done properly -- with the fuel being 
pumped from fuel tanker trucks without any special airtight 
devices. As a result, the entire surface [vershina] of the bay 
was flooded with diesel. And many examples of that kind of bias 
and juggling with the facts can be cited. 
  [Pasyakin] To return to the question of the lease, I would 
like you to explain once more why it is so advantageous to 
Ukraine? 
  [Baltin] The decision to lease Sevastopol was made at a 
closed session of the Ukrainian Security Council back in 
July-August 1993. But publicly it was decided to reject a 
lease, although in fact everything is being done precisely to 
force Russia to lease Sevastopol. The main aim being, as I have 
already said, to achieve the maximum economic benefit for 
Ukraine. Now, to judge from the results of the work of the 
intergovernmental commissions, the scenario devised by the 
Ukrainian Security Council is being implemented. 
  In addition, by becoming purely Russian, the Black Sea Fleet 
base will become similar in status to the 14th Army in the 
Dniester Region and will become a foreign grouping on Ukrainian 
territory. In that event, the Black Sea Fleet servicemen must be 
Russian citizens and will no longer be able to avail themselves 
of Ukrainian social benefits even though many of them were born 
and brought up on this territory. Then the infringement of 
people's rights will begin, deputies representing the Black Sea 
Fleet seamen will disappear, and there will be residence 
permits.... This is the familiar path taken by the Baltic 
states. Ukraine is copying them very closely now. It is not 
without reason that Ukrainian delegations have been visiting the 
Baltic and studying the experience of creating an ethnically 
pure state. 
  [Pasyakin] What solution do you see here? 
  [Baltin] The lease of the territory with its population is 
only possible if it is carried out directly via the Crimea and 
the revenue from the lease is used to develop the infrastructure 
of the Crimea, first and foremost that of Sevastopol. Why such 
a path precisely? At present the Black Sea Fleet is paying six 
types of taxes. As the city administration attests, 50 percent 
of those taxes, amounting to around 1 trillion karbovantsi a 
year, goes to Kiev. Then -- Kiev says -- it gives a subsidy to 
Sevastopol. As far as the public can tell, it does seem that 
Kiev is maintaining Sevastopol. But essentially what Kiev is 
doing is returning to Sevastopol a part of the many taxes that 
it has received from the fleet. For example, in the form of 
wages to servicemen, workers, and employees and in the form of 
taxes, the Black Sea Fleet has paid out 1 trillion karbovantsi 
in the first five months of this year alone, the same figure as 
the Sevastopol budget, even though in the classical sense the 
city's budget ought not be subsidized. 
  The situation is also being aggravated by the fact that the 
bureaucratic apparatus in the city has grown beyond all measure 
and costs a vast amount to maintain. 
  A large administration has also been created in the city's 
rayons which is structurally and quantitatively larger than in 
the days of the Soviet Union. 
  The Internal Affairs Administration, for example, has 
increased in size 4.8-fold in the space of a year. And what 
about the mushrooming formations of the National Guard, subunits 
of the Ukrainian Security Council, the Ukrainian Navy, the 
Berkut and Sokol special-purpose subunits, and the psychological 
services? Now the National Guard has demanded 60 apartments. 
And they have been allocated at the expense of other Sevastopol 
people, who have been waiting decades for housing. 
  Nevertheless, with a sensible taxation policy the city could 
be self-sufficient even in present-day conditions. Admittedly, 
if there were a lease it would then be necessary to 
constructively change the existing structures and appoint a 
viable apparatus in place of the elected one. Or, to use the 
British method, we could appoint a governor general or governor 
admiral with structures along the lines of Gibraltar. Then 
Sevastopol will have military and commercial areas -- a base and 
a port. In addition, the appointed administrative organs will 
be able to establish municipal property and thus have its own 
budget. These measures will not in any way be an impediment to 
the further development of the private sector. The existence of 
municipal and private property (the municipal segment must 
constitute at least 60-70 percent) will make it possible to 
support the city's own budget capable of satisfying a 
considerable proportion of the population's needs. None of the 
city's existing administrations can fulfill those tasks at 
present. The commercial structures are producing virtually 
nothing. All they do is buy and sell. The city budget's income 
from them is minimal. 
  However, this is a topic for a separate discussion. To 
return to the main theme, I want to stress that the state, in 
leasing the base, develops [obustroit] only the base, according 
to world practice. And to divide Sevastopol into base and city 
is surely simply impossible, so firmly interlinked are they. In 
addition, there must not be "foreign" military formations on the 
leased territory. That is precluded. 
  [Pasyakin] How do you react to the idea that the Ukrainian 
Navy headquarters be based in Balaklava -- an administrative 
unit of Sevastopol? 
  [Baltin] This is not a serious suggestion. Well, suppose 
they station the Ukrainian Navy in Balaklava. The operational 
regime in the zone will be maintained by the fleet's forces, of 
course. Then what will happen is that the Ukrainian Navy is 
again using the Black Sea Fleet's infrastructure without being 
accountable for anything. And that infrastructure includes the 
navigation and hydrographic support facilities, the observation 
and communications systems, and lines of supply and 
communication.... 
  [Pasyakin] In the mass media, incidentally, there has been a 
report that the Ukrainian Navy Command has stopped passing on 
technical information to the Black Sea Fleet's navigational 
services. What can you tell us about that? 
  [Baltin] The Black Sea Fleet Command has never used 
technical information supplied by the Ukrainian Navy. The Navy 
simply does not have any information because the navigational 
and hydrographic infrastructure is in the hands of the Black Sea 
Fleet. With the exception of the Odessa and Nikolayev 
hydrographic regions seized by the Ukrainian Navy, which have 
virtually ceased operations. And the whole responsibility for 
the safety of shipping in this region rests on the Ukrainian 
Navy. I cannot predict how they will cope with this task. It 
is easier to seize regions than to ensure the safety of shipping 
in them. After all, the Ukrainian Navy has no full-fledged 
navigation and hydrographic service. They even buy conventional 
navigation charts from the Russian Federation GUNIO [expansion 
unknown]. 
  [Pasyakin] So just how can the Black Sea Fleet problem be 
resolved? 
  [Baltin] Only by resolving the problem of Crimea. A 
civilized and nonviolent solution by means of talks, taking into 
account the opinion and will of the people of Crimea and 
Sevastopol and the general foreign policy interests of Russia 
and Ukraine -- for the purpose of the national security of all 
the Slav peoples. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46598 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> REAR SERVICES, SUPPORT ISSUES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Report on Army Housing Problems Part I </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Report on Army Housing Problems Part I </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM1506145794 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 10 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> PM1506145794 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Part One of two-part report by Colonel Aleksandr Oliynik: </F>
"Moscow Military District Receives Troops"] 
  [Text] Moscow-Voronezh -- There is perhaps no task more 
important for the Moscow Military District at present than 
receiving troops from the former Soviet republics and elsewhere 
and providing them with every facility at their new stationing 
places in the center of European Russia. KRASNAYA ZVEZDA has 
more than once discussed this nationwide problem, which is 
relevant to the entire Russian Army. Today we return to this 
theme. 
<H5>  Trapped by Lack of Funds </H5>
  One wall of a room in the district headquarters building is 
completely covered by a map of central Russia, where the Moscow 
Military District is stationed. Blue flags mark where troops 
used to be stationed and red flags indicate units and formations 
which have already been withdrawn or will be withdrawn from 
abroad by 1995. There are almost twice as many red flags as 
blue ones. In short, the introduction of troops has radically 
changed the face of the Moscow Military District, which has now 
become a border district. The district is changing, its 
organizational staff structure is continuing to be improved, and 
it is being supplied with the latest weapons and equipment. 
  Virtually every staff directorate, service, and department 
is 
engaged in tackling this massive task, which -- owing to a lack 
of finances and capering around the already meager military 
budget -- is now on the verge of failure. This is the opinion 
of Major General Aleksandr Groshev, Moscow Military District 
deputy troop commander responsible for construction and the 
billeting of troops. 
  "For four years now troops have been arriving in the 
district 
from abroad in accordance with a Russian Federation government 
decision and a schedule approved by the Defense Ministry," 
Aleksandr Ivanovich said. "During this period we have received 
more than 200 formations, units, and institutions totalling more 
than 70,000 men. The biggest transfer of troops and equipment 
has been to Smolensk, Voronezh, Nizhniy Novgorod, and Tambov 
Oblasts and a number of other oblasts. Appropriate agreements 
for providing the troops with all the necessary facilities, 
building housing, and allocating land as training grounds have 
been drawn up with and signed by the heads of their 
administrations. They have also been signed by Colonel General 
Leontiy Kuznetsov, commander of the Moscow Military District, 
and the Russian Federation Defense Ministry is acting as 
guarantor. But the majority of these agreements are on the 
point of collapse, because no money is now being made available 
from the national budget for the construction organizations with 
which we have concluded agreements. 
  "Judge for yourself. This year (units and institutions being 
withdrawn are still arriving in large numbers) we planned to 
receive 300 billion rubles [R] for this purpose, but in fact 
only R60 billion have been allocated. There can be no talk of 
speeding ahead, as planned, with commissioning housing and 
utilities for the units arriving; the schedule for building 
barracks and vehicle depots in Smolensk Oblast and in Boguchar 
in Voronezh Oblast has broken down. Essentially, troops are 
being greeted by open fields...." 
  It is true what the people say: Better to see something once 
than hear about it 100 times. The things I have seen in 
Voronezh and Boguchar really are staggering, because of the 
difficult conditions in which officers, ensigns, and their 
families are having to start working and living at their new 
stations. As a rule, they have been waved off from Germany and 
the Baltic countries to the ceremonial beat of kettledrums, but 
at home they have met with neglect. At the will of the state, 
thousands of military servicemen and their families have 
essentially been thrown on their own resources in order to 
survive. But one thing at a time. 
  Even in the square outside Voronezh Station you are struck 
by 
the large numbers of people in military uniform. Caps with blue 
or green bands are glimpsed time and again in the crowd. But 
most of the servicemen wear emblems common to all arms. 
  "Voronezh has possibly not seen such an influx of troops 
since the war, when the district headquarters was here," Major 
General Vladimir Chuzhikov, head of the Voronezh Garrison, told 
me. "People living in the oblast and heads of administration 
show them constant attention and help in any way they can. 
Nevertheless, more than half of our units have been withdrawn 
to empty, unprepared places. Well, you can see for yourself 
where we are having to work...." 
  I am talking to Major General Chuzhikov at headquarters, 
where just two offices have been more or less repaired: the 
commander's and the duty officer's. This red brick building -- 
once a convent -- was built at the beginning of the century. 
All kinds of institutions were here during the years of Soviet 
power! It has not been repaired at all for about 40 years: The 
heating and water supply systems are in a dangerous state, the 
roof is wrecked, and in some rooms the ceiling has fallen 
through.... According to planning estimates, it will cost more 
than R6 billion to renovate the building. The capacity of 
military construction organizations in the city would allow all 
repair work to be carried out in full this year. But there is 
no money, alas. Ludicrous though it may sound, the limited 
resources only cover 0.5 percent of the work. 
  The general shows me piles of documents. Material on 
receiving corps units (they are scattered over six oblasts), 
planning estimates for building barracks, depots for equipment, 
and storehouses for food, and agreements concluded with city and 
oblast heads of administration.... 
  "All the necessary documents have long been drawn up, but 
they are not being implemented," Vladimir Petrovich sadly summed 
up. "They are not being implemented because money is not being 
made available by the state. The district has given us 
everything it possibly can and the oblast has helped out with 
resources, but this does not solve the problem." 
  The conversation in the office of Vasiliy Kovalev, deputy 
head of Voronezh Oblast Administration, was also about the main 
issue: money to provide facilities for the troops and build 
housing for the servicemen. Even now, more than 3,600 
apartments are required for officers and warrant officers 
discharged from the Army without housing as a result of 
personnel cuts. That figure rises to more than 5,000 if you 
include all the military servicemen arriving here in need of 
housing. 
  I should point out that, in addition to the considerable 
cost 
of providing troops with the facilities they need, Voronezh 
Oblast is also gaining indisputable benefits. It is planned to 
commission several residential buildings erected by military 
construction organizations in Voronezh by the end of this year. 
It is also planned to build an entire residential district 
overlooking the reservoir and, at the same time, lay roads and 
heat and water supply networks and build social and cultural 
facilities. 
  In Boguchar, where tank crews are stationed, a Turkish firm 
is building a military camp with 1,753 apartments, a school 
complete with swimming pool and conservatory, two kindergartens, 
a clinic, stores, and so forth. 
  It must be said that the city and oblast administration and 
some commercial structures take an understanding attitude to the 
military's needs and help in any way they can. For example, 
following a decision by the head of the oblast administration, 
the "Shilovo" and "Rechnoye" Boarding Houses are serving as 
temporary abodes for officers' families, R6 million have been 
allocated from the city budget to repair the corps headquarters, 
and land has been set aside without delay for the purpose of 
stationing units and establishing training grounds. Viktor 
Atlasov, head of the Southeast Railroad Administration, has met 
the military halfway in the lease of containers for storing the 
personal effects of officers and warrant officers and has 
organized an efficient train service to take equipment to where 
troops are stationed. But all this has to be paid for nowadays. 
How far into debt can you go? For example, the military 
department owes more than R65 million for the use of just one 
gantry crane at Kantemirovka Station, where tanks and 
self-propelled weapons arriving from Germany are being unloaded. 
  "We cannot solve all these problems without a clear 
government program for providing troops with the facilities they 
need," Vasiliy Fedorovich Kovalev believes. "The potential of 
the city and the oblast is now limited: Market relations are 
everywhere. State subsidies are also meager. For example, in 
the past the military did not have to pay for land to be used 
for military units and training grounds, but now they have to 
hand over the money. Considerable amounts of money. For 
example, the Defense Ministry must pay R102 billion at 1992 
prices for a tank crew training ground near Boguchar. But, 
instead of money, the ministry has sent us a letter saying that 
payment for the land will be delayed even further...." 
  It seems that only now are we all, including state 
structures, becoming increasingly acutely aware that making cuts 
in the Armed Forces and redeploying them on a massive scale is 
almost more expensive than it was to maintain the Soviet Army. 
According to the most approximate estimates, withdrawing just 
one division from Germany and providing it with every facility 
in open fields near Boguchar will cost the state R500 billion. 
We have already mentioned above how many such units have been 
received by the Moscow Military District alone. But who has 
counted these costs? 
  Apart from the purely financial side, there are other ways 
of 
measuring the loss to the Army and the country as a whole. 
While preparations for withdrawing troops are underway (this 
period lasts a year or more), officers and warrant officers -- 
the backbone of the Army -- lose their experience and 
professional expertise. How many officers, particularly young 
ones, have waved goodbye to the Army forever during this period! 
  This trend is very characteristic of units being withdrawn 
from abroad to new places of service in Russia. Particularly 
where, for various reasons, they are not ready to receive the 
troops and where because of a chronic lack of funds plans are 
being frustrated to build military camps and homes for officers' 
families in the "back of beyond" of Voronezh Oblast -- Boguchar 
-- to which the withdrawal of the 10th Ural-Lvov Volunteer Tank 
Division from Germany is nearing completion. Essentially, the 
formation is being stationed in open fields. So why has this 
happened? That is what we will discuss in part two. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46599 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> REAR SERVICES, SUPPORT ISSUES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Report on Army Housing Problems Part II </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Report on Army Housing Problems Part II </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM1506164394 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 15 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> PM1506164394 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Second and Final part of report by Colonel Aleksandr </F>
Oliynik: "Moscow Military District Receives Troops."] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Moscow-Voronezh-Boguchar -- In a Field Near Boguchar </H5>
  The ancient city of Boguchar is in the Voronezh Oblast 
"hinterland." Legend has it that it got its name from Peter I. 
One day when the young sovereign was sailing completed ships 
north along the Don he weighed anchor at the mouth of an unnamed 
stream. Strong drinks were poured into goblets, but there proved 
to be one goblet too many. "This goblet is for god [Bogu charka 
siya]," Petr said in jest, knocking it back. From that day the 
stream became the Bogucharka and the town got its name from it. 
  Now the once quiet rayon center in the very south of the 
oblast is experiencing a rebirth. "Life in Boguchar is changing 
drastically," the rayon newspaper SELSKAYA NOV wrote in a May 
issue. "And as we know the foundation to this change was laid 
by the transfer of an armored division from Germany. Some 7,000 
people will come to us, as many as live in the rayon center 
now...." 
  I do not know how it is for the Boguchar inhabitants but for 
the servicemen of the 10th Ural-Lvov Volunteer Armored Division 
which has come here from Germany life in a new place has indeed 
changed drastically. For the worse, unfortunately. 
  Before the armored troops arrived it was planned to 
construct 
at a preferential rate at least the main establishments -- 
barracks, headquarters, storehouses, shelters for equipment, as 
was done for other troops arriving on the territory of the 
Moscow Military District. I shall note that construction was 
still being carried out 12-18 months ago when there were funds. 
  Now only ferroconcrete posts rise up alone in place of 
barracks. All the heavy vehicles -- and that includes modern 
T-80 tanks and 152mm self-propelled artillery mount vehicles -- 
are in the open air. There are not even any fences or roads -- 
after each rainfall you can neither walk nor drive across the 
black earth. 
  "In fact the division has been put out of action for the 
time 
being," Major General Yevgeniy Vorobyev, a task force leader 
from Voronezh, agrees with me. "But we are not to blame -- the 
corps too is only being created and the Moscow Military District 
has given us what it can. There is no one in the division to 
service the vehicles -- soldiers under contract (almost all tank 
crews in the regiments consisted of volunteers) have not 
extended their contracts and have gone home. The majority of 
officers and ensigns are on leave and we do not know which of 
them will serve in this `hinterland.'" 
  Indeed, the armored troops have been unlucky, so to speak, 
in 
their new stationing. The country is wonderful here, but the 
infrastructure is very underdeveloped. It is 65 km to the 
nearest railroad station, Kantemirovka. Fuel is delivered from 
Voronezh, 250km away. Even water is brought in. 
  It was not only strategic aims which were being pursued in 
the early nineties when the venue for the 10th division's 
withdrawal was determined. I was told at the corps headquarters 
that the deciding factor was that Bogucharskiy Rayon agreed to 
take in the armored troops, counting on the city being built up 
and on the railroad being extended to the rayon center.... 
  "Why are there so few people in the fields?" I asked Colonel 
Vladimir Skokov, the division's deputy commander, a Muscovite, 
incidentally, who says he does not want to return to the 
capital. "After all the formation's withdrawal is virtually 
coming to an end?" 
  "But where are people to go?" Vladimir Viktorovich answers 
one question with another. "There is no housing, even 
containers with their personal belongings are a problem to 
accommodate. In addition many have children at school. So they 
have gone their separate ways. Some have taken their families 
to their parents, some are still in Germany. But in a month or 
two the main backbone of the division will be here...." 
  One wants to hope that is how it will be. People will come 
to a new place but how will they serve here if there is just a 
small flag where the future headquarters should stand? 
  "When do you think you will construct the barracks?" I asked 
a group of obviously bored construction workers. 
  "No one knows," work superintendent Vladimir Pecherskiy 
spoke 
for them all." "If we had the funds we would complete 
construction in a few months. But we have not been paid wages 
for April yet and there is no money for construction materials. 
So we sit idle for weeks yet we are no less interested in work 
than the armored troops -- our families have nothing to live on." 
  It has turned out that the local construction workers 
consist 
of Russian refugees who have come to Boguchar from Tajikistan. 
There are now several thousand of them in the city and they 
live where they can, half starving. To give them work the city 
administration has created the "Bogucharstroy" enterprise to 
erect the barracks and the division's vehicle pool facilities. 
They reckoned that the military department had the necessary 
funds and it would be possible to earn money. 
  While Colonel Skokov and I were walking across the field 
where the construction should be I thought: This is where we 
should bring the State Duma and government politicians who, 
despite it all, try to put the Army on financial starvation 
rations! After all it is the uncertainty over the military 
budget and the lack of money which above all have struck a 
pitiless blow to the units withdrawn from remote and nearby 
foreign parts. In Boguchar, Yelnya, Vyazma, and other regions 
of the Moscow Military District. And not just in the Moscow 
Military District.... 
  It is shameful to write but the armored troops are in fact 
living on the city's charity. They receive bread, food, and 
coal on credit. They do not even have the money to wash or to 
clean their clothes. Never mind combat readiness -- just 
surviving is enough! 
  At the vehicle parking area of one regiment I met an officer 
with an armband -- the pool duty officer. He was Senior 
Lieutenant Dmitriy Slyusarenko, commander of a repair platoon. 
In rubber boots and dirty overalls he differed little from the 
construction workers. I do not write this to criticize him. It 
is hard to observe uniform regulations if you are in mud up to 
your knees and there are just a few officers for a tank 
regiment. They go on duty every other day. They have been 
living in a site hut without their families for over six months 
now. Slyusarenko, for instance, sent his wife to her parents in 
Tomsk. He has not received his wages for several months. He 
has already sold his videorecorder, his television set is next. 
He needs something to live on. 
  All the division's officers and ensigns and their families 
are in this unenviable position. And under these conditions 
when, as one officer put it, the state has left them to look 
after themselves, the officers are continuing to serve. They 
are continue, I may add, on enthusiasm alone -- those who are 
not indifferent to the fate of the Russian Army and its future. 
  From dawn until dusk the task forces from the regiment take 
in vehicles with freight, unload them by hand, and stack the 
munitions and food. They work without counting the time, 
without sparing their strength. But there is a limit to 
everything. They cannot pay for the construction of barracks 
out of their own pockets. And neither more nor less than 102 
billion rubles must be paid to the rayon for the allocation of 
land for a testing range. 
  "That price is fair, in strict accordance with the law on 
the 
land," I was told by Nikolay Zhmykhov, head of the Bogucharskiy 
Rayon administration. "We realize that the military department 
now has no money from the budget -- let them give us vehicles 
for the countryside, equipment for processing agricultural 
products in exchange. After all, we must seek a way out of the 
situation -- every summer day counts. Otherwise the division 
will spend the winter in tents...." 
  The people who are not losing an hour, never mind a day, are 
the construction workers from Turkey. For German marks they 
will erect a whole town for the armored troops in Boguchar. Here 
there will be over 40 high-rise apartment blocks, a school with 
a pool and a greenhouse, two kindergartens, a sports center, a 
savings bank, and stores.... The cost of the contract is 153 
million deutschemarks. The deadline for commissioning is August 
this year. According to Mr. Akhmad Sarvash [name as 
transliterated], the construction chief, they are also 4-6 weeks 
behind the construction schedule. It is for that reason that 
over 2,000 workers are now working on constructing the city in 
three shifts -- day and night. Let me add that all work here is 
automated and with that pace the construction will probably be 
completed on time. The first new apartments for the armored 
troops are planned for early August. 
  ....I would like to end these far from gratifying notes with 
that impressive fact. But I cannot. Before my eyes is a peg 
with a little flag on the site of the future headquarters and a 
senior lieutenant in rubber boots standing along next to the 
tanks. How wet will they get under the rain and snow? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46600 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> REAR SERVICES, SUPPORT ISSUES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Methods of Economizing in Bleak Budgetary Era </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Methods of Economizing in Bleak Budgetary Era </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0441A Moscow TYL VOORUZHENNYKH SIL 
VOYENNO-EKONOMICHESKIY ZHURNAL in Russian No 4, Apr 1994 p 59 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0441A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow TYL VOORUZHENNYKH SIL 
VOYENNO-EKONOMICHESKIY ZHURNAL </F>

<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "Documents and Commentary: Plans and </F>
Resources--The Search for Ways To Achieve a Balance"] 
  [Text] It is no secret that funding for the Armed 
Forces is extremely inadequate today. However, some plans for 
military training plans are striking in their abundance and 
scope of activities. When are we going to stop dissipating our 
resources, when are we going to learn to economize?--Lieutenant 
Colonel V. Belousov. 
<H8>  * * * </H8>
  This question from a letter to the editors is basically 
rhetorical. But we decided not to ignore it and asked Colonel S. 
Ignatyev, an officer in the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Defense central staff, to discuss this topic. 
  The current situation with regard to funding the Armed 
Forces 
is very strained. And the defense minister has directed 
administrative agencies to search for ways to cut costs and 
ensure strict austerity and rational use of the financial 
resources appropriated for defense needs. The basis for this 
must be laid as we plan the development of the Russian 
Federation Armed Forces in 1994-1995. 
  I would like to identify basic areas of staff work that make 
it possible to conserve resources. 
  Combat- and mobilization-readiness plans and organization 
and 
methodological directives must be coordinated with amounts of 
appropriations and material and technical resources. 
  In planning command-staff, tactical, specialized tactical, 
demonstrative and other exercises, staff training exercises, and 
wargames, a careful analysis must be made of their usefulness 
and effectiveness. The composition of exercise participants, as 
well as the manpower and resources used to support them, must be 
the optimum choices. 
  It is essential to thoroughly reexamine the existing 
practice 
of holding training and assembly exercises that entail the 
consumption of valuable materials and financial resources for 
planning and implementation and the reimbursement of travel 
expenses and payment of per diems to assembly attendees, as well 
as keep assembly sites as close as possible to troops and forces 
and limit them to three to five days. 
  It is also necessary to sharply reduce the number of 
training 
assemblies and meetings held with commanders of districts, 
groups of forces, fleets, armies, and military educational 
institutions and that involve summoning a large number of 
officers to Moscow, St. Petersburg, and other major cities, and 
to arrange to hold clustered training assemblies and meetings 
and stop sending several commanding officers of military 
administrative agencies (commanding officers and their deputies, 
administration, department, and service chiefs, etc.) to them. 
  Operational, training, training and methodological and other 
training assemblies (classes) for commanding officers of large 
formations and military units and administrative officers of 
formations and military units (ships), military educational 
institutions, the military departments of state educational 
institutions for higher professional education, and military 
missions should be planned on a garrison basis, as a rule. The 
minimum necessary number of personnel and military equipment 
should be used to prepare and support training assemblies. 
Training camps, firing range operations, and field excursions 
must be put in proper order. 
  In planning measures involving physical training and sports, 
the main emphasis should be on holding large-scale competitions 
and sports festivals directly in military units and at military 
educational institutions. We must limit the amount of 
appropriations and number of championships among the branches of 
the Russian Federation Armed Forces, districts, groups of 
forces, fleets, and large formations and units, as well as 
competitions among military academies and schools. 
  In order to more coordinate operational and combat- and 
mobilizational-readiness plans with available appropriations and 
material and technical resources, plans should be subjected to 
comprehensive economic scrutiny and cleared with financial and 
economic agencies before being approved. Proposals for 
inclusions in the Russian Armed Forces training plan that are 
submitted to the Russian Armed Forces General Staff must be 
substantiated with necessary calculations of financial 
expenditures that have been cleared with the Russian Ministry of 
Defense Chief Military Budget and Financing Administration. 
  Balancing plans for combat training and material, technical, 
and financial support for planned activities will make it 
possible to maintain the required level of combat and 
mobilizational readiness in our Army and Naval Forces. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Voyenno-ekonomicheskiy zhurnal," 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46601 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Ukrainian Congress of Crimea Declaration </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0467A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 2 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0467A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed item: "It Is Good That It Is Not as Hot in </F>
Crimea as It Is Surrounding It"] 
  [Text] "The unprecedented flirting with separatists in 
Crimea has finally reached its logical conclusion," says a 
statement from the Kerch organization of the Ukrainian Civic 
Congress of Crimea [UHKK], which represents the interests of the 
700,000 Ukrainians of Crimea. 
  The Kerch organization of the UHKK asserts that "a 
totalitarian dictatorship based on Russian chauvinist 
principles, lightly coated with general democratic rhetoric, is 
now taking shape in Crimea." 
  The Kerch organization of the UHKK, and the Kerch 
organization of the Ukrainian Republican Party that is in 
solidarity with it, are demanding that official Kiev act 
immediately and decisively. Any further concessions to the 
separatist rebels will not only fail to appease them, but will 
rather motivate them to commit further acts to make Crimea 
secede from Ukraine and join Russia, the statement emphasizes. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46602 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    `Anti-State' Activity by Sevastopol City Council </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0467B Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 2 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0467B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed item: "Ukrainian Land Is Not Up for Auction!"] </F>
  [Text] So says a statement from the "State Independence of 
Ukraine," an all-Ukrainian political association. 
  The Sevastopol City Council, pursuing anti-state activity 
aimed at the departure of Crimea from Ukraine and the 
dissolution of Ukrainian statehood, resolved to conduct a poll 
on June 26 with the question, "Do you favor the status of the 
city of Sevastopol as the main base for the Black Sea Fleet of 
the Russian Federation in accordance with the Russian-Ukrainian 
protocol of September 1993?" It simultaneously proposes the 
redeployment of the Ukrainian Navy from Sevastopol to some other 
city. "We feel that such appeals are anti-state. The City 
Council does not have the right to assume the functions of the 
Ministry of Defense of Ukraine. The population does not have the 
right to determine the basing location of the Black Sea Fleet 
through a poll," indicates the statement. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46603 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   25 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    National Guard Presence in Accord With Laws </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0467C Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 25 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0467C </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Guards Lieutenant-Colonel Volodymyr Korkodym: </F>
"In Accordance With the Laws of Ukraine"] 
  [Text] Subunits of the National Guard of Ukraine [NHU] 
stationed in the Crimea are continuing to carry out, as before, 
the task of safeguarding public order as stipulated by law. 
According to a previously approved plan that was coordinated 
with internal-affairs bodies, details of Guardsmen without 
weapons are going out into the streets of Simferopol at night to 
protect the citizenry against criminal infringements. Classes in 
combat training are also continuing according to the usual plan. 
Topics are being practiced in particular that are envisaged by 
the training program for cleaning up the consequences of a 
natural disaster. 
  Some of the mass media, however, have tried to inflame the 
situation surrounding the units of the National Guard of 
Ukraine, which have been located in Crimea since 1992. All kinds 
of gossip surrounding BTRs [armored personnel carriers] that 
have arrived on the peninsula is spreading. The press service of 
the NHU command has been authorized to announce that the 
military hardware has returned to its units after the planned 
seasonal repairs at a plant. The means of transport on hand in 
the subunits are only 14 percent of the necessary standard 
quantity. Insinuations aimed at creating tensions around a 
military unit that is being formed in accordance with the Law of 
Ukraine "The National Guard of Ukraine" thus seem curious. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46604 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Guardsmen Maintaining Order in Simferopol </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0467D Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 1 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0467D </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed item: "Th Guardsmen Are Protecting Civic Order </F>
on the Streets of Simferopol"] 
  [Text] The press service of the NHU [National Guard of 
Ukraine] has announced that the personnel stationed in 
Simferopol from the military unit of the National Guard 
commanded by Guards Colonel Oleksandr Kostyukov is performing 
the task of protecting civic order on the streets of the capital 
of the Republic of Crimea, five times a week during the evening 
hours in conjunction with the police as envisaged by law. The 
Guardsmen are fighting street crime and trying to ensure the 
safety of the city's inhabitants against criminal infringements 
during their service. 
  More than 3,200 infractions have been halted this year on 
the 
patrol routes of the Guardsmen, seven crimes were discovered in 
progress and a quantity of firearms were confiscated. The 
results of the service are considerably better than last year. 
  The increased effectiveness of the protection of civic order 
has been achieved thanks to the increased quality of the combat 
proficiency of the soldiers and the planned increase in their 
numbers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46605 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    National Guard Facility Harassed </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0467E Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 1 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0467E </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article from press service of the NHU [National Guard of </F>
Ukraine] commander and Ukrinform under the rubric "In the 
National Guard": "Can You Have Forgotten That We Are Brethren?"] 
  [Text] The military compound of the subunit of the National 
Guard in the city of Sevastopol has been under the vigilant 
attention of persons unknown lately. Individuals armed with 
firearms have repeatedly penetrated the NHU facility, which is 
protected only by an unarmed day detail, at night. 
  Tactical classes of Marines from the Black Sea Fleet are 
being conducted immediately adjacent to the premises where the 
Guardsmen are based. 
  The operation of the Guardsmen's electronic-warfare (REB) 
systems was suppressed for several hours, while telephone 
communications were cut and were restored only with the aid of 
internal-affairs bodies. 
  Unknown persons in civilian dress but a clear military 
bearing are constantly near the checkpoint of the subunit. It 
has moreover been ascertained that someone has prepared 200 
meters of the common roadway leading to the military compound 
for demolition--the locations for the placement of explosives 
are linked by an electrical network. 
  A joint police and Guard patrol that was assigned to guard 
this area on the night of May 25 set up an ambush close to the 
NHU unit. Soon, around 1:30, the sentries noticed an unknown 
person who, seeing people in uniform, threw something away and 
took to his heels. But in vain. The detainee had on himself 
military kit, a pistol holster and the special matches of 
reconnaissance personnel. Five kilograms of TNT and a TT pistol 
were found at the scene of the incident. The unknown person was 
ascertained to be citizen D. Yoho, and was transferred to the 
proper authorities. An investigation is underway. 
  The press service of the National Guard of Ukraine is 
calling 
on all soldiers who are serving on the Crimean peninsula not to 
permit such acts of provocation among themselves, and to resolve 
problems in an evenhanded and friendly manner in the name of 
peace and harmony in the region. 
  Can it really be permitted that the servicemen of Ukraine 
and 
Russia fight, that mutual hatred fill our hearts? Think about 
it--to whose advantage is this? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46606 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ukraine's Crimea Concerns Aired, National Guard Involved </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Guardsmen Maintaining Order in Sevastopol </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0467F Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 4 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0467F </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Captain 2nd Rank Yuriy Kondratyev: "The </F>
Guardsmen Have Arrived to Maintain Order"] 
  [Text] The first subunits of a special battalion of the 
National Guard of Ukraine have arrived in Sevastopol. 
  The Center for Civil Liaison of the Ukrainian Armed Forces 
of 
the city has reassured Sevastopol residents, by announcing that 
the chief tasks of the National Guardsmen will be the protection 
of the constitutional system of Ukraine, work in conjunction 
with internal-affairs bodies, and assistance to the Border 
Troops in apprehending violators of the state border. 
  The decision to station subunits of the National Guard in 
all 
oblast and equivalent cities of Ukraine was made in 1993. The 
soldiers of the battalion will take part, in the near future, in 
measures planned by the Ukrainian Armed Forces in Sevastopol to 
protect civic order. 
  The leadership of the Directorate of Internal Affairs 
expressed the hope that the transfer of the National Guard 
subunits to the city will promote a preservation of the trend 
toward stability in civic order that has been noted in 
Sevastopol. 
  It only remains to add that the battalion of National 
Guardsmen is commanded by Lieutenant-Colonel Ihor Kurovskyy, and 
that its size at the end of May was 351 men. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46607 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ukrainian Nationalists Call for More Troops in Crimea </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ukrainian Nationalists Call for More Troops in Crimea </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0452A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 3 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0452A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Anatoliy Polyakov in Kiev and Vladimir Pasyakin </F>
in Sevastopol: "Crimean Knot: Should It Be Cut or 
Untied?--Nationalists in Ukrainian Parliament Demand That 
Additional Troops Be Sent to Crimea"] 
  [Text] All last week the Ukrainian Supreme Soviet heatedly 
debated the situation on the peninsula. President Leonid 
Kravchuk, who spoke first, proposed the appointment of a 
Constitutional Court that would issue a ruling on the Crimean 
Supreme Soviet's last law. Kravchuk pointed out that he himself 
does not have the right to rescind the Crimean parliament's 
decision, that he has such a prerogative only with respect to 
decrees issued by Yuriy Meshkov. 
  At the same time, he emphasized that "Russia will never give 
up its influence in the Crimea, just as the Russian population, 
which makes up a majority on the peninsula, will never give up 
close relations with Russia." "We realize," the president 
continued, "that Russia has no realistic alternatives to basing 
the Black Sea Fleet and must secure its southern borders. We 
must divide basing zones between the Ukrainian and Russian 
fleets, establish temporary leasing terms, and at the same time 
uphold the principle that the Russian Fleet must eventually be 
based on its own territory." 
  National-democratic deputies, without bothering to analyze 
the factors that have led to the current situation in the 
Crimea, blamed everything on Russia. They demanded that the 
Crimean knot be cut in the following way: make power-wielding 
structures subordinate to Kiev and remove the Black Sea Fleet 
from Ukrainian territory by January 1, 1995. Deputies 
representing the Ukrainian National Assembly-UNSO [Ukrainian 
People's Self-Defense Forces] demanded that the Crimean Supreme 
Soviet be dissolved immediately and that additional troops be 
sent there to "protect the population from extremists. Although, 
we should point out, leftist deputies reminded the "loggers" (as 
one deputy referred to his more zealous colleagues) that at 
stake is the fate of thousands of people, and that politicians 
just don't go swinging axes. Deputy Mikhail Doroshevskiy 
stressed that he knows of plans for a forcible change of power 
in Crimea, as he had seen documents in the working presidium 
confirming this. 
  Many deputies believe that some of the causes of the current 
flare-up of tension in and around Crimea are the imposition of 
ideological stereotypes of a nationalist slant, a 
self-isolationist policy on the part of the Ukrainian 
leadership, and ill-considered decisions on borders that have 
divided the Slavic peoples. 
  A decision which was adopted states that it is essential to 
submit proposals on bringing current Crimean legislation into 
conformity with the Ukrainian Constitution within two weeks. The 
Crimean Supreme Soviet is ordered to adopt a decision to the 
effect that Crimean legislation must conform to the Ukrainian 
Constitution within 30 days. Leonid Kravchuk is instructed to 
propose a list of actions he will take to normalize the 
situation in Crimea within six days. A Ukrainian parliamentary 
delegation led by Boris Oleynik left for Crimea on Thursday 
morning. That same day, as was to be expected, Leonid Kravchuk 
proposed that parliament postpone the presidential election to a 
later date. 
  The situation with respect to dividing the Black Sea is 
developing in an interesting way, in our opinion. At a press 
conference in Kiev on Wednesday, Ukrainian Defense Minister 
Vitaliy Radetskiy said that where the Ukrainian Navy will be 
based is Ukraine's internal affair and is not subject to 
discussion. The Crimean problem, he said, should be solved 
through dialogue. "We are taking Russia's interests into account 
with respect to its southern flank, but it is not taking our 
interests into account and allowing itself to engage in 
unilateral pressure," the minister said. 
  Meanwhile, negotiations on dividing the Black Sea Fleet are 
under way in Sevastopol, albeit behind closed doors and in the 
absence of the delegation chiefs--Russian Special Ambassador 
Yuriy Dubinin and Ukrainian Deputy Prime Minister Valeriy 
Shmirov. This has significantly lowered the talks' level, but it 
is a logical move: The military experts are at work. But we have 
learned from a well-informed source of an agreement to divide 
the ships 50-50, after which Ukraine would sell an agreed-upon 
number of ships to Russia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46608 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> CAUCASIAN STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Deputies View New Defense Minister Choice </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Deputies View New Defense Minister Choice </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1429A Tbilisi SVOBODNAYA GRUZIYA in Russian 27 Apr 94 p 
1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1429A </F>
<F P=104>  Tbilisi SVOBODNAYA GRUZIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Inga Abgarova and Tinatin Gviniashvili: "Lt. </F>
Gen. V. Nadibaidze Was Confirmed as Georgia's Minister of 
Defense"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Arguments of the Opposition Did Not Affect Results The </H5>
meeting of the Georgian Parliament, which was held yesterday, 
was declared closed. And no wonder. The question concerning the 
confirmation of the candidacy of the Republic's Minister of 
Defense was submitted to the verdict of members of Parliament. 
  Head of the State Eduard Shevardnadze put forward the 
candidacy of Lt-Gen V. Nadibaidze, who until yesterday served as 
Deputy Commander for Armaments of the Group of Russian Troops in 
the Transcaucasus. This factor caused dissatisfaction on the 
part of the opposition and, at the same time, was the main 
argument "for" in the camp of the parliamentary majority. 
  Irina Sarishvili, deputy of the National Democratic Party of 
Georgia, declared: 
  "I am of the opinion that it was not obligatory to confirm 
the candidacy of the Minister of Defense today. We have bitter 
experience with such a hasty appointment for this post. The head 
of the state could have appointed General Nadibaidze and 
observed for some time whether he justified such high trust. 
Unfortunately, professionalism, of course, is obligatory, but by 
no means the only quality that a minister of defense must have. 
Although, I do not deny, most of the opposition's arguments 
sounded simply foolish. 
  "I could not vote for this candidacy, because I do not know 
this man and I simply do not trust the personnel policy of the 
head of the state. In general, today reminded me of the 
ratification of Georgia's entry into the CIS. In any event, the 
composition of deputies was the same as then, which does not 
happen often." 
  Nevertheless, the position expressed by I. Sarishvili in no 
way affected the voting results. Deputies voted for the 
confirmation of the minister's candidacy by a majority vote. Out 
of the 158 present in the hall seven abstained and three voted 
"against." The parliamentary majority was 118 people. 
  Naturally, we were interested in the opinion of parliament 
deputy Tengiz Kitovani, who, as is well known, held the post of 
Minister of Defense at one time. 
  "Undoubtedly, V. Nadibaidze is a man with experience," 
Kitovani said. "And I will be very happy if he manages to do 
something for Georgia. Although I suspect that it will be 
difficult for him to work with our ambitious generals." 
<H5>  The Majority Is Certain That the Choice Was Made Correctly </H5>
  With regard to the parliamentary majority Vice-Speaker 
Vakhtang Rcheulishvili expressed its arguments. 
  "The chief thing that acted in V. Nadibaidze's favor was his 
professionalism," he said. "We were convinced that a normal 
battleworthy army could not be established with good intentions 
and patriotism alone. Professionalism is needed here. Taking 
into consideration the path traversed by General Nadibaidze in 
the Russian Army, this is one of the worthiest candidacies for 
the post of the minister of defense. 
  "If we want to build an army, naturally, we need Russia's 
help and, of course, real help. Keeping in mind our past and 
geopolitical situation, the Russian Army is a loyal ally for us. 
Undoubtedly, General Nadibaidze's personal contacts will help us 
to establish contacts with the Russian Army. Confrontation with 
Russia did not and will not bring us anything good. The policy 
adopted by Georgia for rapprochement with Russia and with the 
former Union republics and, above all, for a real functioning of 
CIS mechanisms requires precisely such a person at this post. 
  "The opposition's guarded attitude in connection with the 
fact that Nadibaidze was in active service in the army of a 
foreign state has no basis. In the world there are dozens of 
examples of a state, which does not have its own personnel base 
in a certain sector, inviting its compatriot from abroad for 
service. Estonia's Minister of Defense is an Estonian by birth, 
who served in the American Armed Forces and at one time took 
part in the Vietnam War." 
<H5>  `I Will Try To Justify the Trust and To Perform My Duty to </H5>
the Homeland...' 
  The minister of defense himself, immediately after the 
confirmation of his candidacy, gave an exclusive interview to 
SVOBODNAYA GRUZIYA. 
  [SVOBODNAYA GRUZIYA] What is your main task at this stage? 
  [Nadibaidze] The chief thing for me now is to build, or 
rather, to continue building Georgia's Armed Forces on the basis 
that we already have. 
  [SVOBODNAYA GRUZIYA] Does building the Georgian Army imply 
the possibility of Abkhazia's return by military means? 
  [Nadibaidze] Abkhazia is an issue for politicians. I am a 
soldier and my business is to establish the army. 
  [SVOBODNAYA GRUZIYA] Are you not afraid that the lot of 
General Kamkamidze, who left Georgia at one time, will befall 
you? 
  [Nadibaidze] I do not know which lot of Kamkamidze you are 
talking about. Today he is one of the best military figures. I 
have information that he left Georgia voluntarily. Personally, I 
will try to justify the people's trust and to fully perform my 
duty to the homeland. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46609 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Glukhikh: Reform, Stabilization of Defense Industry </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Glukhikh: Reform, Stabilization of Defense Industry </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0449A Moscow KONVERSIYA in Russian No 1, 1994 pp 3-6 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0449A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by State Committee of the Russian Federation for </F>
the Defense Sectors of Industry [Goskomoboronprom] Chairman 
Viktor Konstantinovich Glukhikh under the rubric "Politics, 
Economics": "The Development of Reforms and the Stabilization of 
the Activity of the Defense Sectors of Industry"] 
  [Text] The defense complex of Russia today is more than 
2,000 enterprises and organizations at which more than 4.5 
million people work. 
  What typifies the current state of the defense complex? 
First 
and foremost, powerful shifts in the structure of production and 
conversion. 
  The share of civilian products produced by defense 
enterprises has doubled over the last two or three years, and is 
almost 80 percent of their production today. 
  The amounts of financing of orders for the delivery of arms 
have meanwhile decreased by almost nine times over 1992-93, and 
for military NIOKR [scientific research and experimental design] 
by more than eight times. Defense orders are today providing for 
the utilization of only 10--15 percent of specialized production 
capacity as a result. 
  The small quantities of arms and military hardware being 
ordered are making their production economically 
disadvantageous. A real threat has arisen of the impossibility 
of the renewal, where necessary, of the production of some 
models of arms and military hardware, as well as the loss of a 
number of promising technologies. 
  An outflow of skilled personnel (about two million people) 
from the defense sectors is underway owing to the sharp cutbacks 
in military orders, worsened financial state of the enterprises 
and the low wage levels (they are roughly 1.6 times lower than 
for the national economy as a whole), and enterprises are 
beginning to refuse defense production. 
  A critical situation has taken shape where not only the 
defense security of the country, but its economic security as 
well, are threatened. 
  Goskomoboronprom, taking this situation into account, has 
developed a conceptual framework for an industrial policy in the 
defense complex, and is implementing a program of actions to 
stabilize the situation in the defense sectors of industry. The 
following priorities have been delineated: 
  --the creation of unsurpassable scientific work in progress, 
and the development and production of technically advanced and 
highly efficient systems and models of arms and military 
hardware; 
  --the integration of military and civilian production, with 
an orientation toward the widespread utilization of dual-use 
technologies; 
  --the formation of mobilization capacity and reserves based 
on contemporary principles; 
  --the restoration and expansion of cooperative ties with the 
defense complexes of the CIS member nations, and improvement of 
interaction with the regions of Russia. 
  The realization of 14 dedicated conversion programs has 
begun 
in accordance with the State Program of Conversion for 1993-95 
that was adopted by the government. 
  The work, including major NIOKR projects, is focused on such 
priority areas as transport and communications, the 
fuel-and-power complex, agriculture and the consumer market, 
medicine and ecology. 
  The first results have been achieved in the reconfiguration 
of defense product lines for the output of civilian products. 
The defense complex demonstrated new types of such products at 
fairs at Nizhnyy Novgorod, Vladimir, Irkutsk and at an 
exhibition in Tula. Production volumes are also being increased. 
Tens of thousands of new jobs have been created. 
  The impact could have been far more substantial if credits 
for conversion had been issued in the needed amounts and in a 
timely manner. The minimally necessary financing for the most 
important civilian types of NIOKR was able to be arranged after 
a long delay. 
  An opportunity has appeared today of planning the innovation 
process with great confidence--first and foremost research and 
development on priority civilian topics, which was disastrously 
lacking in 1991-92. 
  Goskomoboronprom is counting on the fact that industrial 
policy in the defense sectors will be pursued with the proper 
state support and budgetary financing for the research and 
development of dual-use (multisector) applications, as well as 
those types of NIOKR that are "breakthrough" types against the 
background of world scientific and technical development or are 
"critical" from the point of view of ensuring the defensive 
capabilities and economic security of the country. 
Goskomoboronprom is working today to clarify these key areas so 
as to provide for the most efficient utilization of the NIIs 
[scientific-research institutes] and KBs [design bureaus], as 
well as to manage the scientific and technical potential that is 
available in the defense sectors as efficiently as possible. 
  One main area of economic reform is institutional 
transformation, which includes the conversion of ownership, 
privatization, the reform of state enterprises and 
organizations, support for entrepreneurship and the development 
of a market infrastructure, the demonopolization of the economy 
and the formation of a competitive environment, the development 
of a financial market, and the improvement of legislation. These 
transformations also fully affect the defense sectors of 
industry as well. 
  Goskomoboronprom consistently carried out the state 
privatization program in 1992-92. 
  Shares of stock in more than 500 state enterprises were 
planned to be sold by the end of 1993. The conversion of more 
than 1,000 enterprises in the defense complex--that is, more 
than 60 percent of the overall number of enterprises in the 
defense sectors of industry--was predicted in 1994. 
  The State Privatization Program envisages the existence of a 
"core," consisting of 449 enterprises in the defense complex, 
where changes in the form of ownership would not be expedient. 
  The specific sector features of the privatization of 
enterprises and organizations in the defense complex and the 
basic directions for improving the methods of privatizing them 
are reflected in the Edict of the President of Russia "Specific 
Features of Privatization and Additional Measures of State 
Regulation of the Activity of Enterprises in the Defense Sectors 
of Industry" (No. 1267, 19 August 1993). 
  Goskomoboronprom, in accordance with a decree of the Russian 
government on a plan of actions for the realization of economic 
reform, is assisting the organization of joint-stock companies 
and financial-industrial groups in the defense sectors. The 
Vympel international joint-stock company, the Energiya NPO 
[Scientific-Production Association] imeni Academician S.P. 
Korolev Russian holding company and the Arsenal holding company 
(St. Petersburg), among a number of others, have already been 
created. 
  A new form of interaction of Goskomoboronprom with the 
joint-stock companies being created, in the form of equal 
agreements between it and those companies regardless of their 
organizational and legal forms, has been devised in the process 
of issuing shares of stock in the enterprises and organizations 
of the defense sectors of industry. 
  The enterprises of Goskomoboronprom can independently make 
far from all items without cooperative deliveries from the CIS 
countries, even though 80 percent of the capacity for the output 
of the most important types of products (first and foremost arms 
and military hardware) remained on the territory of Russia. The 
range of borrowed constituent items exceeds many thousands 
therein. 
  It would seem preferable not to waste trillions of rubles on 
the sweeping transfer of the production of those items to 
Russia, but rather to restore the necessary ties with the CIS 
enterprises. Goskomoboronprom is devoting the most steadfast 
attention to this. 
  Sixteen agreements and a resolution for cooperation with the 
corresponding bodies of those states were signed in 1993, and 
twelve intergovernmental agreements were prepared. 
Intergovernmental agreements are being prepared for signing on 
cooperation, the specialization of the defense enterprises and 
the list of mutual deliveries of constituent items. 
  There is another acute problem as well--the mobilization 
preparation of enterprises and organizations in the defense 
sectors is still conducted according to outmoded targets. The 
necessity of cutting back the number of customer requisitions 
that tie up significant production floor space and equipment for 
the volumes of deliveries of arms and military hardware during 
emergency periods has become acute with the adoption of the 
military doctrine. All of this has naturally had an effect on 
the work results for 1993, when defense enterprises continued to 
work under conditions of the complex and multilevel process that 
is the sweeping conversion of military production. The 
unsurmounted consequences of the deep cutbacks in the production 
of arms that was undertaken in 1992 also had an effect. This 
largely explains the decline of 17.2 percent in the volume of 
industrial production in November of 1993 compared to the 
corresponding period for 1992, and of 18.3 percent from the 
start of 1993 through November compared to the same period for 
1992. 
  The defense enterprises that possess unique personnel and 
production potential, essentially a national treasure of the 
country, are actively seeking their place in the market economy. 
  Goskomoboronprom is striving persistently in this regard to 
achieve an expansion of the capabilities of the enterprises and 
organizations in the realm of the export of products and 
services, as a condition for ensuring market competitiveness and 
obtaining additional funds for the structural restructuring of 
industrial enterprises and science. 
  A conceptual framework for the development of the armed 
forces and a program for equipping them for the future--an arms 
program that is balanced with regard to the economic 
capabilities of the country and ensures its defensive capability 
and security--will have to be developed and approved with a 
regard for the provisions of the country's military doctrine. 
Clarity must be achieved in defense orders, along with their 
financing for at least two or three years ahead. A stable 
defense budget and indexing of defense appropriations suitable 
to the increase in expenditures are needed. 
  A legislative basis in the realm of military-economic 
planning, along with the legislative codification of the status 
of the defense order and the status and rights of enterprises 
taking part in the fulfillment of the state order for the needs 
of defense, are necessary. The placement of defense orders 
should be by contract (aside from those cases stipulated by 
anti-monopoly legislation), which will rule out the forcing of 
an unprofitable order on an enterprise. 
  The contract for the fulfillment of the defense order should 
unconditionally be advantageous for the enterprise, both through 
the establishment of a contract price and through the granting 
of certain tax, export-import or other concessions, which should 
also be legislatively codified. Any discrimination according to 
the forms of ownership should be impermissible with regard to 
the status of the enterprises taking part in the fulfillment of 
the defense order. 
  The Law on Conversion--adopted but effectively not in 
force--is in need of a profound reworking in this regard, and it 
should envisage real compensatory guarantees for the 
cancellation or withdrawal of a defense order, including 
compensation for spending to refit production, the creation of 
jobs in the civilian sphere, the retraining of personnel, social 
assistance for laid-off workers and support for the regions most 
affected by conversion. 
  A state program adopted at the federal level is necessary to 
support the structural re-orientation of the defense industry, 
to include direct financing for the creation of new jobs, 
assistance to regions, targeted subsidies for specific 
conversion programs, tax concessions for the enterprises being 
converted and social assistance. 
  The enterprises in the defense complex have experienced a 
very difficult two years of very rapid conversion against a 
background of economic crisis and political instability. They 
have every opportunity not only to survive, but also to develop 
under market conditions. Assistance for that is therefore a most 
important task facing federal bodies and the new parliament. 
  The state of the greater portion of the enterprises and 
organizations in the defense complex remains a difficult one, of 
course, and much could be said about that for a long time. 
  Only one thing must be emphasized. The enterprises of the 
defense complex, albeit with great difficulty, are adapting to 
the new conditions nonetheless. This is finding support on the 
part of the government and other state administrative structures. 
  The assurance of the steady operation of the defense complex 
under today's difficult conditions is considered to be one of 
the defining tasks in the cause of the country's security and 
the effectiveness of the functioning of the economy as a whole. 
  The consideration of this issue by the Security Council of 
the Russian Federation testifies to the particular attention 
toward the situation. 
  The President has issued edicts on the specific features of 
the privatization of enterprises in the defense sectors and the 
stabilization of the situation of enterprises and organizations 
in the defense complex along with measures to provide for state 
orders. These edicts envisage, in particular, changes in the 
fixed levels of profitability of various types of products and a 
doubling of the threshold level of expenses for wages, and 
regulate advance payments for work under state orders. 
  A session of the presidium of the government was also held, 
and introduced clarity into the defense orders for 1994. 
  The conversion programs, in light of the requirements of 
Edict No. 1850 of the President of the Russian Federation of 6 
November 1993, should be reviewed in the near future proceeding 
from their economic efficiency. The shutdown of programs that 
have not justified themselves, the finding of additional 
opportunities for the financing of programs through local 
sources, the funds of enterprises and commercial structures and 
the provision of more profound substantiation of sales markets 
and the market competitiveness of products being created are 
what they have in mind therein. 
  The defense enterprises, with their specific nature, are an 
inseparable part of the overall industrial complex of the 
regions. It is namely for that reason that Goskomoboronprom 
proceeds in its industrial policy from the unity of its sector 
and regional aspects, and from the necessity of ensuring full 
accounting and balance of both federal and regional or local 
goals and interests. 
  The realization of these edicts of the President of the 
Russian Federation and the governmental decrees, along with the 
implementation of the basic guidelines that have been set forth 
and the provisions of the conceptual framework for industrial 
policy in the defense complex that have been devised, should 
facilitate the curtailment of crisis development, an increase in 
the controllability of this sector of the economy and the 
stabilization of its production activity. 
  IZANA, 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46610 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics on Deepening Crisis in Defense Industries </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Statistics on Deepening Crisis in Defense Industries </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0458A Moscow ROSSIYSKIYE VESTI in Russian No 99 (523), 1 
Jun 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0458A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKIYE VESTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by D. A. Belyayev, chief, Production </F>
Analysis and Forecasting Administration, Center for Economic 
Conditions under Russian Federation Government: "Conversion of 
Military Production"] 
  [Text] The production slump in defense sectors of industry 
continued to deepen in the first quarter of 1994. According to 
Russian Federation Goskomstat [State Committee for Statistics] 
data, the reduction in product output was 35 percent with 
respect to the first quarter of last year, which is more than 
for industry as a whole (25 percent). According to 1993 results, 
the production slump in the defense complex was 16 percent, 
i.e., it was equal to the Russian Federation industry average. 
  The drop in production affected all defense sectors without 
exception. Compared with the first quarter of 1993, product 
output was cut almost in half at enterprises of the aircraft 
industry and armament industry and by 40 percent in the 
electronics industry and communications equipment industry. A 
significant reduction in production volume also is seen in the 
atomic industry, previously distinguished by stability. 
  The output of defense products was reduced by 40 percent in 
the first quarter. Its rates of reduction continue to exceed 
those of civilian production, but a trend has appeared toward 
rates of decline in military and civilian production gradually 
drawing together. 
  The reduction in output of civilian products, which was 11 
percent in the defense complex according to 1993 results, 
accelerated in the fourth quarter of that same year, and during 
January-March 1994 reached 33 percent compared with the 
corresponding period of last year. For the first time during 
conversion the slump in production of civilian products proved 
more substantial than in civilian sectors of production. A 
further drop in output of civilian products for technical and 
production purposes was predetermined by the continuing limited 
nature of investment opportunities for all consumers of 
machine-building products. As a result of a drop in demand on 
the part of light industry, the agro-industrial complex, 
transportation and a number of other sectors, output of 
equipment for light industry in the defense complex fell by 55 
percent in the first quarter of 1994, output of equipment for 
processing sectors of the agro-industrial complex fell by 44 
percent, output of equipment for trade and public dining fell by 
41 percent, output of mainline freight cars fell by 76 percent 
and so on. At the same time, the need for replacing equipment in 
sectors where the defense complex is the major supplier remains 
very high. For example, the proportion of main technological 
equipment in light industry over 10 years of age was one-third 
as of the end of 1992, including more than a third of spinning 
machines and almost half of looms. Existing replacement rates of 
main kinds of technological equipment in light industry (around 
3-5 percent a year) make its overcoming of technological 
backwardness, transition to new technologies and output of 
competitive products problematical. The very same situation also 
is taking shape in other sectors of the economy putting out 
products needed by the country's economy and its population. 
  Production of consumer goods in defense sectors developed 
relatively successfully in 1993. With an overall 7 percent 
reduction for many of the most important kinds, a production 
growth of 7 percent was achieved for television sets (including 
4 percent for color sets), 7 percent for refrigerators and 
freezers, 1.2-1.4 times for small farm machinery, and more than 
one and one-half times for automobile spare parts. 
  But a trend toward a slump in production of non-food 
consumer 
goods (less light industry) appeared in the defense complex in 
the fall of last year, and their output in the first quarter of 
1994 was only 63 percent of the first quarter of 1993 (70 
percent for industry as a whole). The production of television 
sets (including color sets), knitting machines, electric meat 
cutters and juicers was cut by a fourth, and that of washing 
machines, electric vacuum cleaners, radios, bicycles, sewing 
machines, and paints and varnishes by half. The output of tape 
recorders, microcalculators, cameras and motorcycles was cut by 
almost two-thirds, and children's strollers and bicycles by 
three-fourths. Production of multipurpose kitchen appliances 
remained at the previous level. The production of double and 
triple refrigerators rose somewhat. Population demand is of 
greatest importance here. Imported durable goods are beginning 
to occupy an ever greater proportion in satisfying that demand. 
Therefore substantially increasing quality characteristics, 
technical level and, as a result, competitiveness of goods 
manufactured for the population while observing a sensible 
pricing policy becomes one of the main tasks of defense sector 
enterprises. 
  The process of a decline in capital investments in 
enterprises of Goskomoboronprom [State Committee for the Defense 
Industry] continued in 1993 against the background of an overall 
reduction in investments in all sectors of the national economy. 
  In 1993 Goskomoboronprom enterprises assimilated R530.2 
billion from all sources of financing, which, according to the 
center's calculations, is 36 percent lower in comparable prices 
than in 1992. The decline in volumes of capital investments was 
29 percent for industry as a whole, including machine-building. 
There was a reduction from 2.8 percent in 1992 to 2.1 percent in 
1993 in the proportion of capital investments assimilated by 
Goskomoboronprom enterprises and organizations in the overall 
volume of capital investments for the national economy. 
  Under conditions of a limitation of financial resources, 
there was a reorientation in use of funds in Goskomoboronprom 
enterprises from the construction of production facilities to 
the construction of nonproduction facilities. While 62 percent 
of the total volume of capital investments were expended for 
production construction in 1992, it was 55 percent in 1993. The 
proportion of funds being directed toward production 
construction was 60 percent for the national economy as a whole. 
As a result of a redistribution of funds, 1.6 million 
m[.sup]2[/] of housing were placed in use, which is 16 
percent below last year's level, but the overall reduction of 
investments for Goskomoboronprom was more significant. 
  Internal and borrowed funds of enterprises continue to be 
the 
basic source for financing capital construction, despite the 
fact that their proportion in the overall volume of capital 
investments dropped from 88 percent in 1992 to 84 percent in 
1993. 
  The proportion of centralized capital investments increased 
from 12 percent to 16 percent. In 1993 the volume of centralized 
capital investments increased, albeit slightly, at the expense 
of funds of local budgets, which previously essentially had not 
financed the defense industry. While R0.3 billion were allocated 
to defense enterprises from local budgets in 1992, it was R5.2 
billion in 1993 (in existing prices of the corresponding years). 
The greatest proportion of investments from centralized sources 
was directed toward developing the shipbuilding industry (21 
percent) and armament industry (18 percent). 
  Assimilation of capital investments in Goskomoboronprom 
enterprises on the territory of Russia in 1993 was concentrated 
basically in two economic areas, Central and Urals, where almost 
half of all capital investments were assimilated. With respect 
to centralized investments, the Central area accounts for a 
third. 
  The direction of qualitative improvement both of military as 
well as civilian products remains one of the main tasks of 
defense complex investment policy even under the extremely 
difficult conditions which have taken shape. It is necessary to 
consistently implement a line toward tieing in investment 
activity above all with qualitative parameters of manufactured 
products, since measures of state paternalism alone cannot 
protect the domestic market against the inflow of imported 
products nor preserve positions of military equipment in world 
markets. 
  The number of industrial-production personnel in the defense 
complex declined by 14 percent in the first quarter compared 
with the first quarter of 1993, which is somewhat greater than 
last year (12 percent). The outflow of the labor force from 
defense sectors is occurring faster than for industry as a 
whole. As happened last year, the greatest first quarter drop in 
numbers occurred in the electronics industry, where a deep 
production slump and the lowest pay (two times lower than for 
the industry average) are seen. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46611 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Defense Production Complex Falters </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Defense Production Complex Falters </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1606011594 </F>
<F P=103> OW1606011594 </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
BFN 

    [Editorial report] Moscow Russian Television and Dubl 
Networks in Russian at 2310 GMT on 4 June 94 carries its regular 
"Aty-Baty" program. This segment is dedicated to the economic 
plight of Russia's military industrial complex, and carries 
interviews with P. V. Romanov, deputy of the Federation Council 
and general director of Yenisey Chemical Combine Production 
Association in Krasnoyarsk, and A. A. Piskunov, deputy chairman 
of the State Duma Defense Committee. The interview starts with 
Romanov describing the situation in the country as a "threefold 
economical, political, and social dead end," and calls for an 
urgent review of the market policy to prevent unpredictable 
consequences. 
  Video cuts to show footage of an unidentified plant 
manufacturing engines while announcer compares Russian military 
production, which shrunk 42 percent in the last three years, to 
that of the United States and European countries. 
  In answering a question on the military industrial complex's 
economic situation, Piskunov says that soaring armament prices 
cause increasing tensions in both military units and the defense 
industry. Outlining national defense expenses, Piskunov says 
that pay for military personnel and expenses for energy, 
transportation, maintenance, and housing construction amount to 
about 70 percent of the defense budget, while expenses for 
purchasing arms and for research and development are close to 31 
percent. 
  Romanov then criticizes the privatization program as ill 
planned and too headlong, and says: "Three years ago, our 
economy was grinding to a halt, to put it mildly. Today the 
Russian economy is close to collapse. The difference between a 
collapse and a halt is while we used to have plants, factories 
and working crews, today all of this is entering a stage of 
dissolution." He goes on to say that an industrial system built 
around central state control cannot be converted to a market 
economy overnight, without a transition period. 
  Commenting on the possibility of strikes in the military 
industrial sector, Romanov says that the labor unions are 
"completely passive" and do not protect the interests of 
workers, who get no pay for several months on end. He says: 
"Proudly looking the Russian people in the eye from television 
screens, we say that we have lowered the inflation rate. But we 
lowered it by withholding pay and lowering the production rate." 
  Video cuts to show more shots of unidentified machine plant 
production line while announcer says that while several years 
ago the lives of about 30 million people were connected with the 
defense industry, today the number has fallen to 14 million. 
  Piskunov then further comments on defense expenses, saying: 
"We have reduced expenses for arms purchases sevenfold or 
eightfold in the last two or three years. While we used to buy 
thousands of units of certain categories of weapons, today we 
buy single units." He then cautions that the virtual stoppage of 
production at military plants causes irreversible processes, 
such as loss of specialists and cutting edge technologies. 
Piskunov then says: "In complex production spheres, such as 
plane building, missile building, and ammunition chemistry, we 
are close to finding ourselves in a situation where we are no 
longer able to produce armaments." 
  In speaking of workers' pay, Romanov tells of the inability 
to attract skilled personnel, who leave for better paying 
enterprises, some of them abroad, thus channeling military 
technologies there. He concludes his interview by emphasizing 
the need for a clear economic plan and the determination to 
carry it out. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46612 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma027___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DOCTRINAL ISSUES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lessons of Conflict on Russia's Periphery </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Lessons of Conflict on Russia's Periphery </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0462A Moscow VOYENNYY VESTNIK in Russian No 2, Feb 1994 
(signed to press 24 Jan 94) pp 14-17 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0462A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOYENNYY VESTNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Col V. Cheban, doctor of philosophical sciences: </F>
"Some Lessons From Armed Conflicts"] 
  [Text] In various regions of the former Union, 
pockets of armed conflicts die out and then flare up with new 
strength. They sow death and destruction; thousands of refugees 
end up without a roof over their head and without the means of 
existence. 
  Why have these tragic events become possible? What are 
their lessons? How do they reflect on the security of the 
Russian Federation? 
  Colonel V. Cheban, doctor of philosophical sciences, 
discusses these problems on the pages of the journal. 
  Armed conflicts in Nagornyy Karabakh, Moldova, Tajikistan, 
Azerbaijan, Armenia, and Georgia differ in scale, nature, and 
intensity, but have one thing in common. They are accentuated by 
the death and grief of many thousands of totally innocent 
people. The process of disintegration of the former Union and 
the sovereignization of individual republics is taking place 
considerably more painfully and tragically than initially 
seemed. There was no civilized division of the territory and 
economic, scientific-technical, and military potential of the 
once powerful superpower. 
  Just what are the bitter lessons of the armed conflicts 
taking place on the territory of the former Union? 
  Lesson One. Above all, what is striking is the 
fact that the creation of independent states is taking place on 
the basis of absolutization by certain social forces and 
sections of society of their interests exclusively, while 
completely ignoring the quite just interests of other people. 
Nationalism, political ambitiousness, and separatism have one 
common denominator--egoism. It is this that blinds leaders, 
social trends, and social forces when vitally important problems 
are being resolved. Inability, impatience, and unwillingness of 
leaders, social groupings, and government circles to resolve 
unsettled problems by a civilized method naturally bring egoism 
and ambitiousness to a most extreme and dangerous form of their 
manifestation--to armed violence. Here the assumption is made on 
using fear as the main instrument of socio-psychological control 
of society or its individual groups. A shifting of priorities of 
dominating or imposing one's will on others in the direction of 
moral and physical terror is indicated by the inability or 
unwillingness to handle the situation by other unarmed means. 
  Lesson Two. Destruction of statehood, the lack of 
a legal system of coordinates, the arising legal nihilism of 
citizens, aggravation of social contradictions, decline in the 
standard of living, endless wide-scale social experiments 
exhausting the patience of the people, and the limit of trust in 
the leadership at all levels create favorable conditions for 
armed conflicts. 
  In addition, extreme in criticism of law enforcement 
agencies, institutions of state security, internal affairs 
bodies, and the army, along with searching for real 
shortcomings, not only makes it difficult for these institutions 
to perform state functions but also undermines their authority 
as a barrier in the path of destructive forces and criminals. 
  The hasty and accelerated division of the armed forces and 
the rash "privatization" of combat equipment and armament 
resulted in weapons not only becoming a terrible tool in the 
hands of extremists and criminals but also one of the most 
popular instruments of "big-time politics." 
  Lesson Three. The long struggle with the "center" 
and the charged state of lower power structures and 
administrative formations for confrontation with higher 
authorities resulted in the boomerang effect: the initiator of 
criticism of the center is itself becoming the object of 
criticism "from below." The republics' struggle against the 
Union center turned into a struggle of autonomies against the 
former republics. For example, Georgia's persistent desire to 
leave the Union and the endless accusations against Moscow of 
"interference" and "imperial ways" led to Georgia itself being 
on the verge of collapse. Abkhazia and Osetia have tried to 
"swallow" sovereignty as much as they wanted, and the Georgian 
government sent military there. Now charges of "imperial ways" 
and "genocide" have been made against Tbilisi. 
  Moldova acted similarly with respect to the former Union. 
The 
desire to move a little farther away from the "totalitarian 
regime of Moscow" was encouraged in every way at the state and 
public levels. However, it took the Dniester region to declare 
its right to independence (particularly after a discriminatory 
law on a state language was passed in Moldova), and the 
leadership of Moldova began to restore "constitutional order" by 
force of arms. The struggle with "separatists" developed into a 
real war against its own people. 
  Ukraine also has not been spared from the boomerang of 
sovereignization. If you consider that the Crimea, Western 
Ukraine, and its eastern areas have an eye on independence, the 
future is not problem-free in this respect. 
  The development of events in the Dniester region is also 
similar to the Baltic region. Here there is an absolutization of 
only the national interests, with complete ignoring of the 
interests of the Russian-speaking population. 
  The epidemic of sovereignization has also infected Russia. 
Tatarstan, Bashkortostan, Chechen, and also regions of the 
Urals, Siberia, and the Far East are hatching not only 
theoretical but also practical plans for establishing their 
independence from the Russian center. So, the formula "trouble 
comes to him who makes trouble for others" is most appropriate 
for illustrating the current method of sovereignization, when 
the egoistic, aggressive method is the most popular. 
  Lesson Four. Armed conflicts have shown that 
despite the proclaimed end of the Cold War and the loud 
statements about the de-ideologization of international, 
interethnic, and other social relations, they are still tied to 
the old normal routine of the past of confrontation between 
social systems and ideological biases. Gravitation toward the 
old method of resolving unsettled problems leads to the fact 
that something fundamentally new is not emerging, but something 
old and well-known is being revived. 
  Thus, for the Baltic region, the "renewal" developed into 
the 
restoration of laws from the 1940's. 
  For the Transcaucasus, the 1920's have been taken as the 
reference point, when the violent processes of sovereignization 
took place against the background of a general transformation of 
the Russian Empire. 
  In Central Asia, renewal was directed even deeper into the 
past, out of loyalty to old medieval traditions, beginning with 
absolutization of religion and its role in the spiritual life of 
society and ending with the unprecedented honoring of the "great 
people": the bays, khans, emirs, and the like. 
  Renewal in Ukraine includes resuscitation of 
nationalistic-type trends, movements, and organizations, which 
in the past fought against the Soviet Union on the side of 
Hitler. 
  Armed conflicts also are not isolated from geopolitical 
relations and the interests of foreign states. Turkey, Pakistan, 
and Iran, not to mention the United States, Germany, Japan, 
France, and Great Britain, are closely observing events on the 
territory of the former Union. And observation is developing 
into an active military policy. 
  For example, a violation of human rights in the Baltic is 
not 
noticed by either the United States, Germany, Japan, France, or 
England, since they are traditionally impressed by the "bold 
actions of small states" against the "Russian Empire." They do 
not conceal the plans for armed intervention in the event 
"Russia attacks Lithuania." 
  Lesson Five. The same pattern of the outbreak and 
development of armed conflicts is repeated. Initially, one of 
the belligerents makes an unambiguous threat to use weapons. 
Then shots actually ring out, which "fortunately" do not result 
in casualties. Then exchanges of gunfire between "unknown 
persons" begin, this time resulting in casualties. 
  At this time, various versions and assumptions emerge and 
are 
circulated in public opinion, and the initiators of the conflict 
closely monitor the nature of the reaction to the armed clashes. 
If a wave of indignation rises over isolated incidents of 
terror, the armed actions temporarily die down. When they pass 
by the "angry vessel" of public opinion, the next step is taken: 
an armed attack of a wider scale is made. 
  It is natural that retaliatory measures immediately follow 
with such a development of events, and new victims appear. The 
initiators of the conflict present these victims as a reason for 
further escalation of tension and confrontation. A new spiral in 
the bloody fighting begins. 
  As an analysis of events shows, the flywheel of armed 
conflicts unwinds according to this sinister scenario largely 
because one of the main conditions for ending them is not met: 
the public does not receive a timely and specific answer to the 
question. Who is to blame? The concept of "aggressor" has 
virtually disappeared from diplomatic and political affairs. 
Meanwhile, the analysis and prevention of any conflict also 
begin with the clear definition of this "character." Dissolution 
of the "aggressor" in a mass of abstract factors gives him an 
incentive for further aggressive actions and makes the victim 
even more defenseless. 
  Lesson Six. Armed conflicts are noted for special 
cruelty with respect to the totally innocent population. This 
largely explains the great losses among residents of cities and 
villages. 
  The reason is that the use of weapons is intended not so 
much 
for destroying the armed enemy as for intimidating and 
frightening the unarmed person. 
  For what purpose is this done? 
  As fact indicate, in order to achieve success in their 
plans, 
the participants in armed conflicts strive to intimidate the 
population supporting the opposing side. However, the fear of 
being killed and the element of revenge for family and friends 
who have died even further deform people's psyche, already 
overloaded with negative emotions. All this leads to even 
greater bitterness in the merciless fight. Hence the 
guerrilla-like actions, hostage-taking, sporadic exchanges of 
gunfire, and the lack of a rigid centralization in the 
subordination of various paramilitary formations due to the 
"independence" of the fighters. 
  Lesson Seven. All the capabilities of the ties 
between themselves, both for vertical structures of the opposing 
sides (government--army--local authorities--local internal 
affairs bodies--individual citizens) and for contacts between 
them horizontally (government to government; army to army; 
social movements to social movements; local members of 
parliament to local members of parliament from the other side; 
fraternization of persons involved directly in the conflict), 
are far from being fully utilized for blocking and ending the 
armed conflicts. 
  The distinctive protective functions of the "monasteries," 
which virtually all military garrisons have and where 
peaceloving citizens can take shelter from terrorism, are also 
being used insufficiently. 
  A serious obstacle to putting a stop to armed conflicts in 
the initial stage is the false shame of ruling circles and 
social movements in taking decisive measures for fear of being 
categorized as "undemocratic," "uncivilized," "imperial," 
"hegemonic," "totalitarian," and the like. As a result, in 
striving to preserve political virginity, the governments of 
neighboring countries free the hands of the aggressor though 
their inaction. 
  Lesson Eight. In an interrelated and 
interdependent world, armed conflicts do not pass without a 
trace. They are transformed and influence many states and 
peoples through a system of economic, political, and 
geopolitical ties. Disruption or severing of economic and trade 
ties adversely affects the economic life of countries far from 
the conflict. In turn, discrediting, violating human rights, 
persecution, and genocide create a migratory wave that is 
capable of tearing down the social foundations in neighboring 
states, aggravating the internal situation in them, and causing 
new conflicts. 
  It is never someone else's problem. It is necessary to treat 
all conflicts with heightened attention. That is why one should 
master lesson nine. It is necessary to fight armed 
conflicts, as well as wars, long before them break out. For this 
purpose it is necessary to have a developed system of blocking 
armed conflicts and an effective mechanism for preventing and 
stopping them. 
  This discussion will continue in the next article. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46613 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Critical Shortages of Junior Officers </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Critical Shortages of Junior Officers </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0479A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 10 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0479A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Col Anatoliy Belousov: "Junior Officers Need the </F>
Help of Their Elders More Than Ever. Will They Get It?"] 
  [Text] How wonderful a lieutenant's years are! How can any 
of us, servicemen who have already lived and seen a few things, 
possibly not recollect an officer's youth with trepidation! 
  I remember three of us, lieutenants still wet behind the 
ears, arriving at our assigned unit. The surprises started 
almost right away. The equipment of the unit turned out to be 
more recent than what we had in the school. That meant doing 
some retraining. And there was a platoon-full of subordinates, 
every other one of whom was far from an expert. How were we to 
work with them? And even we weren't much of a gift to the 
company commander--there was always something about us that 
displeased him. 
  Nevertheless, life went on. In the evening, upon returning 
from our work area, we would wash off the dust and grease, fry 
some potatoes, and then spruce up and head for the Officers Club 
for some dancing and some socializing with tenth-year coeds. 
  But what is most memorable to me from those times is the 
people under whose direction I served, and the people with whom 
I was fortunate to serve. Of course we had different commanders, 
but I remember that first company commander we had, who seemed 
at first to be such an overly stiff, has-been soldier: How much 
unpleasantness he shielded us from, how many lessons he taught 
us about life! There were many of this sort who were truly 
concerned for us. 
  These of course aren't just idle recollections. Today the 
situation in the reforming Russian Army is such that we have to 
ask ourselves this question: Will today's young officers have 
such memories of father-figure commanders? Will they remain in 
the army, or will they leave for greener pastures? 
  The problem of young personnel has become extremely painful 
to the army and navy. In 1990-1993 (as of the beginning of this 
year) more than 95,000 young officers, up to 30 years old, left 
the army ranks. This was in a time when there is no one in the 
troops to appoint to primary officer positions. If you look at 
each of the armed services separately, you will find that the 
situation is most favorable in the Strategic Missile Forces. At 
least in recent times a tendency for young officers not to want 
to revert to civilian life can be clearly discerned. In the 
ground forces, 6,623 young officers left in 1993. Of 3,214 who 
left the Air Defense Forces, 1,206 did so because they wanted 
to, while the rest left because of incompatibility with service 
and for discrediting the honor of the military. In the navy, in 
the words of Rear Admiral Vasiliy Viktorov, chief of the navy's 
Personnel Training and Placement Directorate, the number of 
vacant primary positions now reaches into the thousands. Even 
with regard for this year's military school graduates, the 
personnel hunger in the lowest ship units will be less than 50 
percent satisfied. The picture is similar in the air force as 
well. 
  The reasons why young people leave are generally well known. 
Some long for the motherland--for what are now sovereign states, 
while others part with the army because of problems in 
establishing homes for their families, and still others are 
simply unable to feed their families. This is on the backdrop of 
a general decline in the prestige of military service. But I 
think it would be wrong to reduce everything just to this. 
  There can of course be no debate that a young person 
possessing the diploma of a military engineer and radio 
technician, a programmer, or a motor mechanic could set himself 
up reasonably well in civilian life. But let's think about the 
particular reasons why junior officers leave. Let's consider the 
two main ones--because they want to, and because of 
incompatibility with service. As it turns out, in most cases 
lieutenants and captains don't leave on their own, but are 
forced out. This is even considering the fact that some junior 
officers (who were unable to get an honorable discharge) were 
forced to commit violations, and thus they fell into the 
category of officers leaving due to "incompatibility with 
service." 
  What is behind this? Are they really professionally 
unsuited, 
or is there something else here, and namely, were they unable to 
find a person at the beginning of their career who could have 
supported them, taught them, and reinforced their faith in their 
own strengths? Can it really be true that there are no longer 
mentors of this sort in the army or, if you wish, the sort of 
educators that we associated with when we were lieutenants? 
  Of course there are. But our democratic society has become 
calloused and indifferent to the fate of others, and this bitter 
cup has not passed by the army either. Tell me, is it really 
normal for a school graduate arriving in his unit to begin his 
military career by serving as a sentry or unloading coal for a 
boiler plant? But even this could be understood. Because a 
battalion commander has only three soldiers to help him, and the 
post can't go without heat. A lieutenant, I believe, would 
understand this. If only they would talk with him in a civilized 
manner, speak kindly, explain the situation, and perhaps even 
ask him to participate. But no! His superiors wouldn't stoop to 
such pampering: That's an order, so do it! 
  In former times, and not really that long ago, a commander 
had to work directly with people. And he did. Now, with the 
advent of deputy commanders for educational work, many 
commanders took all of this all too literally: Our business is 
to lead, to command, and yours is to educate. So educate! In the 
meantime these deputies are often themselves unsure of what 
their new station means, and consequently junior officers find 
themselves left to their own devices. It is well known what can 
happen when junior officers fail to sense any real concern on 
the part of their superiors. And such a commander easily writes 
off the loss of a junior officer due to objective factors--our 
times are hard, the impoverished existence of 
lieutenants--that's why they don't want to serve. 
  The reason things aren't bad in the Strategic Missile Forces 
as an example is that real concern is shown here for junior 
officers. For each and every one of them. And they represent 
more than 40 percent of all officers in the forces. It is 
precisely upon them that the main burden of alert duty lies, 
especially where the work is the hardest--in the regiments. 
  "Young people are the future of the missile forces," feels 
Colonel-General Igor Sergeyev, commander-in-chief of the 
Strategic Missile Forces. "We have developed and are 
implementing a program of social protection for junior officers 
and their families. And so, despite the great financial 
difficulties, all junior officers receive the 12 months' pay 
they are supposed to get after graduating from school in order 
to arrange their personal lives. Even before they arrive in the 
unit, commanders hunt up apartments for them, reserve places for 
their children in preschool institutions, and find jobs for 
their wives. Junior Officers' Day has become traditional in the 
forces. Commanders regularly visit their families, and delve 
into their needs." 
  There isn't any need to invent anything new in the 
approaches 
to work with junior officers--the arsenal of these methods is 
sufficiently rich and diverse. The work itself creates the best 
impact upon the mood of people, if of course it is well 
organized--that is, if the officer is doing what he is supposed 
to be doing primarily--combat training. Many commanders in the 
forces and in the navy understand this well, and despite today's 
shortage of everything imaginable, they provide subordinates the 
possibility to exercise their lawful rights--the right to serve 
in their specialty, rather than being used as gofers and errand 
boys. A junior officer living in such an environment begins to 
develop work satisfaction, and pride in having the honor to 
belong to a glorious cohort of tankmen, or seamen, or 
paratroopers. 
  I'm not of course trying to say that a guardian "uncle" 
needs 
to be assigned to every school graduate, like they used to do 
with new recruits way back when. What I'm talking about is 
concrete assistance to junior officers on the part of their 
elders, which has always been a tradition in the Russian officer 
corps. Whether or not they will get it depends on us. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46614 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Ataman' Chechevatov of Far East MD Interviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Ataman' Chechevatov of Far East MD Interviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0474A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 18 Jun 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0474A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Colonel General Viktor Stepanovich </F>
Chechevatov, commander, Far East Military District, by Valeriy 
Usoltsev, place, date, and occasion not specified, under rubric: 
"A Military Leader Has the Floor": "These Will Not Be `Poteshny 
Troops'"] 
  [Text] Far East Military District Commander Colonel 
General Viktor Stepanovich Chechevatov is a person of 
indisputable authority for the region's Cossacks. They consider 
him one of them. And I think now it is understandable why the 
Cossack atamans of Far Russia unanimously chose Chechevatov as 
their "nakaznoy ataman" [Translator note: name given a Cossack 
ataman appointed by Czarist authorities in prerevolutionary 
Russia]... 
  [Usoltsev] Viktor Stepanovich, many political figures 
of the most varied calibers and ranks are flirting with the 
Cossacks today and trying to get into their good graces, i.e., 
to be in your position--love, esteem, respect... What do you 
think? What is moving these politicians toward the Cossacks? 
  [Chechevatov] Well, you turned out to have a whole 
"bouquet" of questions. So from my own experience I am to 
analyze the goals of people who, I assume, are simply using the 
Cossacks to achieve their own interests and advantages in 
politics? My experience will not serve. All my heart and soul is 
with the Cossacks. These are the kind of bright people which our 
homeland needs today! This is strength. That is why people stick 
to them. This is a special spiritual world order of our 
excellent ethnic "mix." And to "play" with the Cossacks today, 
to "flirt" with them, I believe, is to ruin, deliberately ruin, 
the sprouts of our state rebirth. They wish to use them, but for 
destructive purposes. And the Cossacks... They are an open 
people; they often trust those who lead them not at all where 
they should be going, where our Russia herself should be going... 
  Today so much "dirt" and "garbage" has attached itself to 
the 
Cossacks, and there are so many "masqueraders" among them... 
"Masqueraders" not just outwardly, but also inwardly, defective 
in their thoughts... 
  And it seems to me that there is practically no fight going 
on against all this that is false, counterfeit, and superficial 
in the Cossack environment. I often say this to Cossacks at 
meetings. For this compromises the whole movement and generates 
mistrust in the Cossacks among those around them in the best 
case, if such an expression is apropos in the given instance, 
and generates caustic gibes and open jeers in the worst case. 
  But I believe that the Cossacks still will not give up their 
banners and their military glory to the dirty hands of others. 
  Recently I returned from an official trip along the Amur and 
Ussuri. I spent time in Cossack stanitsas. Traditions are alive, 
and traditions are like roots for a tree. There are roots, they 
"pump" the earth's strength, allowing everything else to have 
knowledge and to exist. 
  Hereditary Cossacks again are here among us--the Kalmykovs, 
Nazarovs, Poluyanovs, Byankins. They know how to teach sense to 
Cossack "saplings," how to kindle love for the Motherland in 
their hearts, how to develop a sense of Duty, Honor and a 
soldier's self-sacrifice for the sake of the land on which they 
were born. 
  And the Cossack stanitsas themselves? It is as if you are in 
another world. Take Mogilevka, for example. Wise, strong 
Cossacks live and create here. The houses are a feast for the 
eyes, always with a good harvest, no despondency, and the people 
believe in tomorrow because they are preparing this tomorrow for 
themselves, without indulging in vain expectations. You know, 
after meeting with such people, you feel an absolutely spiritual 
uplift and the world seems brighter... 
  All in all, it turns out that the district commander has 
become sentimental. And as one of Aleksandr Kuprin's main 
characters noted, this is contraindicated for us military 
people. No? Has the time come to talk about Cossack soldiers? 
  [Usoltsev] Do you mean establishing Cossack subunits in 
the district? 
  [Chechevatov] You just now used the concept of 
"subunit." Some Cossacks and atamans are offended if we use this 
word and not "formation," let's say, or "unit" at worst. It is 
humiliating, they say. We, they say, are ready to field corps 
and armies today. You are not ready, I respond. Why do you begin 
to compromise a good thing? And then, what kind of new game in 
"gigantomania" is this? Don't make the first steps painfully 
wide, you can sprain an ankle. And who needs the lame? Not all 
of them understand the jokes and they take offence... As a rule, 
the ones arguing about "corps" are those who are not thinking 
about the job itself, but about themselves in the job so as to 
be in the public eye and be an important figure. In general, of 
course, many have appeared today who wish to command "corps" and 
be resplendent in a general's shoulderboards, considering that 
for some Cossacks, I notice, it is a rather simple matter with 
ranks--whatever I like, is okay, I will appropriate it. 
  By the way, there already has been a discussion about all 
this. 
  My opinion is that the time has come to begin serious work 
on 
a program for military training of young Cossacks "locally" in 
their native stanitsas. For previously how was it? A Cossack 
would come to serve after being already sufficiently trained 
professionally. 
  We began to undertake something in this direction. Classes 
are held in military affairs in a number of Cossack stanitsas 
under the direction of the atamans and with the help of officers 
and NCO's discharged to the reserve. The district command 
element makes available its training grounds and firing ranges 
for these purposes and allocates weapons and ammunition. Many 
active-duty officers also work with young Cossacks and prepare 
replacements for themselves--as a rule, on days off and on 
off-duty time; on personal time, as we say. This already is the 
most genuine, selfless devotion. It turns out that despite 
everything, genuine officers have not become extinct here. 
  Today Cossacks living along the border already know where 
they are to go in case the situation is exacerbated and a threat 
arises for Russia, where to draw weapons, and in what weapon 
emplacement to perform the combat mission. 
  We have begun making it a practice to involve Cossacks in 
security of military depots and other Army installations. By the 
way, security and defense of Big Ussuri Island even now has been 
assigned to Cossacks. A Cossack company has been established 
there and young Cossacks are serving worthily. 
  As district commander, I would like to name the best by 
first 
and last name. All are "hereditary stanitsa inhabitants": 
privates Aleksandr Chernyshov, Konstantin Mamontov, Vladimir 
Ivanov, Sergey Petaltsev. 
  The district command element views Cossacks as a real 
military force, as its reliable reserve, and of course we will 
not leave them one on one with problems. 
  [Usoltsev] Cossacks complain of the absence of a 
uniform and gear. All this now costs much money. And where to 
get horses? Can the district help here? 
  [Chechevatov] We will help the Cossacks with 
uniforms and gear. Consider this matter taken off the agenda. 
  With respect to horses, they have begun to be raised in 
stanitsas which are being revived. In that same Mogilevka. While 
he was a sovkhoz director, present Ataman Vladimir Torkhov 
founded a horse-breeding farm there, built a gallop-course, and 
involved dozens of boys and girls in classes in equestrian 
sport. It was from here for the first time in the region, and 
probably in the entire former Soviet Union, that young boys 
began leaving with their own horses to serve in the Border Guard 
Troops. No, any problem can be solved--if, of course, there is a 
desire to solve it. If there are people who dream of making 
Russia great and bringing up a new generation of her true sons, 
reliable defenders of native borders. 
  These will not be "poteshny troops" [Translator note: refers 
to the boy-soldiers of Peter I]. These troops will be the pride 
of our Armed Forces. 
  I believe this. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46615 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Cossack Epaulets, Rank Insignia </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Cossack Epaulets, Rank Insignia </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0474B Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 18 Jun 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0474B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Glushko, Mosfilm associate, under </F>
rubric "Zastava Workshop": "But Everyone Had the Same Stars"] 
  [Text] Aleksandr Glushko, Mosfilm associate, is the 
consultant. 
  Today let us talk about shoulderboards--one of the most 
vulnerable elements, I would say, in the uniform of our Cossacks 
of today. There is very great confusion and muddle here, and 
with a touch of "musical comedy" and "props," not to mention the 
"rank-mania" in many of those who "dress up" in Cossack uniforms 
nowadays. The impression is created that we have enormously more 
colonels and generals among Cossacks today than under the 
sovereign father. 
  Well then, the shoulderboards. 
  Lower ranks had dark blue shoulderboards with crimson piping 
on one side and camouflage color on the other. The numbering 
[shifrovka] was located one-half vershok [one vershok = 4.4 cm] 
above the lower edge. Digits and letters written in one line 
were seven-eighths of a vershok high, and numbering in two lines 
had a height of seven-eighths of a vershok for the upper line 
and three-eighths of a vershok for the lower line. Numbering was 
stencilled to the camouflage side in dark blue oil paint. 
  Field stripes of uryadniks [NCO rank] were orange. The light 
blue braid of cavalry scout-observers was sewn to the lower edge 
across the shoulderboard; cavalry reconnaissance had a narrow 
red stripe along the shoulderboards. 
  Officers wore a silver galloon with one or two blue central 
stripes (for junior or staff officers respectively), crimson 
piping, and blue edging between the piping and galloon. 
Officers' field shoulderboards were made of khaki-color cloth 
with blue braided central stripes. Shoulderboards also were 
encountered with sewn-on red edging of blue central stripes. In 
1916 the central stripe became all shades of brown and the 
edging essentially disappeared. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-028-04A>      Figure </FIG>


  The differences in ranks were as follows: 

  -  kazak [lowest rank]--bare shoulderboard (Fig. 
1); 
  -  prikaznyy [private first class]--shoulderboard 
with one narrow transverse stripe; 
  -  junior uryadnik--shoulderboard with two narrow 
transverse stripes; 
  -  senior uryadnik--shoulderboard 
with three narrow transverse stripes (Fig. 2); 
  -  vakhmistr [sergeant major]--shoulderboard with one 
broad transverse stripe (Fig. 3); 
  -  podkhorunzhiy [subcornet]--shoulderboard with one 
broad longitudinal stripe (Fig. 4). 


    The prikaznyy and uryadniks had white woollen stripes 1 cm 
wide and the vakhmistr and podkhorunzhiy had a silver galloon 3 
cm wide. The distance between stripes was 0.5-1.0 cm. The upper 
stripe would be sewn 3 cm from the center of the button to the 
upper edge of the stripe. 
  Shoulderboards of lower ranks, from the rank and file kazak 
up to and including the vakhmistr, were buttoned using [one word 
partially legible, possibly "eagle"] buttons 22 mm in diameter. 
The podkhorunzhiy wore buttons of medium (18 mm) diameter 
authorized for officers and generals. Shoulderboards of lower 
ranks to vakhmistr were five-sided, and beginning with the 
podkhorunzhiy they were six-sided. The width of the 
shoulderboard with edge was 6.5 cm, and length varied from 14 to 
16 cm depending on shoulder size. 
  Khorunzhiy [cornet]--shoulderboard of silver 
galloon with one central stripe and two stars, opposite the 
color of trimmings, located at the level of the center of 
numbering at its sides and at least 5 cm from the lower edge of 
the shoulderboard (Fig. 5). 
  Sotnik--shoulderboard of silver galloon with one 
central stripe and three stars, opposite the color of trimmings. 
The stars were placed at least 5 cm from the lower edge of the 
shoulderboard at the level of the center of numbering at its 
sides, and one above the numbering. If there was a monogram, the 
third star would be between the crown and the monogram. 
  Podyesaul [junior captain]--shoulderboard of 
silver galloon with one central stripe and four stars, opposite 
the color of trimmings, stars at the level of the center of 
numbering at its sides and at least 5 cm from the lower edge of 
the shoulderboard. Two more were on the central stripe above the 
numbering, one 2 cm above the other from center to center (Fig. 
6). 
  Yesaul [captain]--shoulderboard of silver galloon 
with one central stripe without stars. 
  Voyskovoy starshina [major]--shoulderboard of 
silver galloon with two central stripes and three stars, 
opposite the color of trimmings. Two stars were at the level of 
the center of numbering at its sides between the central stripes 
and the piping and at least 5 cm from the lower edge of the 
shoulderboard, and one was in the middle above the numbering 
(Fig. 7). 
  Colonel--shoulderboard of silver galloon with two 
central stripes without stars (Fig. 8). 
  Major general--shoulderboard of silver galloon 
with zigzag pattern, with two stars located as on shoulderboards 
of the khorunzhiy. 
  Lieutenant general--shoulderboard of silver 
galloon with zigzag pattern and three stars, located as on 
shoulderboards of the sotnik. The stars on all shoulderboards 
were the same, metal or sewn, with a diameter of around 16 mm. 
Stars on all shoulderboards were located at the same distance 
from each other, which applies to the sotnik, voyskovoy 
starshina and lieutenant general. And if the lower stars were 
moved upward because of the width of numbering, the upper star 
also was moved so that nearly an equilateral triangle of stars 
always was formed. 
  The general of cavalry wore a shoulderboard of 
silver galloon with zigzag and without stars. A full general did 
not have numbering, but he could wear the monogram of the 
sovereign if he was attached to the retinue. 
  Numbering of lower ranks was stencilled to the colored side 
of shoulderboards. The numbering itself requires a special, 
detailed discussion. I am ready to consult with whoever has 
questions and tell which regiments had a monogram and which 
simply had the number of the regiment (which, by the way, was 
crimson). 
  Well, I think that is all for today. Good luck to you, 
brother Cossacks. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46616 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> STRATEGIC DETERRENT FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   General Examines Nuclear Safety Concerns </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    General Examines Nuclear Safety Concerns </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WP0103A Moscow LITERATURNAYA GAZETA in Russian No 22, 1 
Jun 94 p 10 </F>

<F P=103> 94WP0103A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow LITERATURNAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Maj Gen Vitaliy Nikolayevich </F>
Yakovlev, deputy chief of the Main Administration of the Russian 
Ministry of Defense, by Kirill Belyaninov; place and date of 
interview not given: "Can the Nuclear Charge Be Lost: Major 
General Vitaliy Yakovlev From the Ministry of Defense 
Categorically Asserts That It Can't"] 
  [Text] It is said that some time ago, when the cult 
of personality had not yet been debunked, and people planted 
corn exclusively by their own wish, and not in response to a 
special order from the CPSU Central Committee, the Soviet 
military-industrial complex provided a certain number of Soviet 
schoolchildren with a not entirely ordinary visual aid. In the 
city of Semipalatinsk, where a smoky-brown mushroom created by a 
nuclear explosion rose above the horizon, young teachers led 
children into the schoolyard, and said as they pointed their 
finger in the direction of the test range: "That, children, is 
where the nuclear shield of our motherland is being forged!" 
  With time, of course, all that was left of the former 
"visual aid" was radiophobia, while the formerly vast nuclear 
shield was torn into such a quantity of chunks and pieces that 
it is now absolutely impossible to determine what part of it 
really remains. The Semipalatinsk test range is the property of 
Kazakhstan, while several of the design offices are the property 
of Ukraine, not to mention the radar stations and nuclear strike 
early warning resources, which remain on the territory of small 
but proud and independent Baltic states. And if we add to this 
the numerous treaties on disarmament, cessation and 
nonproliferation, the cases of misappropriation of nuclear 
materials, and the absence of money for scientific developments 
and to support any sort of subsistence minimum for our nuclear 
scientists, the question that arises is quite simple, but 
extremely unpleasant: Is Russia left with anything of the 
nuclear shield, of what it was that made it a great power? 
  It is unpleasant all the more so because skeptical 
voices are already being heard both from across the ocean and 
from the "vast expanses" of the near abroad. "If sufficient 
concern is not displayed toward the arsenal of a superpower of 
such dimensions during political and economic reforms, the 
result may be historically unprecedented leakage of nuclear 
technology, and a catastrophe as yet unwitnessed in the world," 
declared U.S. Assistant Secretary of Defense Ashton Carter a 
month ago. 
  [Yakovlev] You can't really say that the situation at 
enterprises of our nuclear complex is very bright. And of 
course, the fact that radioactive materials are being stolen is 
a bad symptom. But we mustn't forget that the number of such 
cases is relatively small, and that the uranium that has 
disappeared was enriched to 2-4, and rarely 30 percent. It has 
no relationship to nuclear weapon components. And besides its 
use in nuclear fuel assemblies, this kind of uranium isn't much 
good for anything but fishing: It might be good bait for 
frogfish in terms of its relative weight. 
  When in 1992, and in subsequent years as well, reports 
appeared that Kazakhstan had sold some sort of warheads to Iran, 
that the Chechen Republic had possession of two nuclear devices, 
and that a nuclear weapon cropped up in Azerbaijan, all we could 
do was laugh. There is, after all, an extremely strict system of 
controlling the presence and state of nuclear ammunition. All 
parts of such ammunition, even those not associated with 
fissionable materials--automatic units such as sensors for 
example--bear a plant number. There is a data bank that can be 
used to easily determine where a device is located, when it was 
made, and what work has been done with it. It can even tell us 
how many milligrams of precious metals a particular part 
contains. If any sort of work is done, written confirmation of 
what was inspected, what parts were replaced, and so on is 
transmitted immediately to the ministry's central administration. 
  Moreover there are also a number of organizational measures: 
Whenever a storage site is opened, entry of less than three 
workers is categorically prohibited, and when charges are 
shipped, not only is security intensified but also an escort 
system is established and so-called specialized back-up systems 
are put into place. I can therefore state quite certainly that 
it is impossible to lose not only a nuclear charge but even its 
vehicle or any other nonnuclear part of it. 
  [Belyaninov] Vitaliy Nikolayevich, Western specialists are 
especially alarmed at the situation involving our tactical 
weapons: nuclear artillery devices, ammunition for aviation, and 
short-range missiles. In contrast to strategic missiles, use of 
which requires creation of an entire infrastructure, tactical 
weapons may be used by practically any state of the world 
without any special trouble. Moreover, as they assert in the 
United States, the exact quantity of our tactical devices is 
still unknown to them. Officials in Washington state a figure of 
19,000, while independent experts such as, for example, Bruce 
Blaire from the Brookings Institution cites a figure of 43,000. 
  [Yakovlev] It's true that we never cited a figure. Having 
signed an agreement with the United States to eliminate tactical 
nuclear ammunition for rocket forces and for ground forces 
artillery prior to the year 2000, we regularly hold joint 
consultative meetings. But no figures are thrown around in these 
meetings. We report that as of the given day 17 percent of 
such-and-such forces and resources were eliminated. And that's 
all. Although I can say--these data haven't been made public 
anywhere yet--that of the total quantity of weapons withdrawn 
from Ukraine, we have already eliminated 1,500 units, or over 
half. 
  And if we consider the potential danger of proliferation of 
nuclear weapons.... Back during the time of perestroyka--and as 
we know, perestroyka meant instability--we gave some thought to 
this problem, and we began withdrawing weapons from Warsaw Pact 
states and from USSR republics. We began with the Baltic and 
Transcaucasian countries, such that by the end of 1991 we still 
had nuclear ammunition only in Ukraine, Belorussia and Russia. 
After the four-way treaty on elimination was signed in December 
1991, in which Kazakhstan participated in addition to the 
republics named above, we began withdrawing weapons from the 
territories of these states as well. 
  In this case complexities arose, and are arising now, only 
in 
regard to Ukraine. The Republic's Supreme Rada began doubting 
that we were really destroying the withdrawn weapons, rather 
than placing them into combat duty in Russia, and they stopped 
releasing our trains across the border. But we were able to find 
a solution. Beginning at approximately July 1992 we began 
eliminating these weapons under the observation of Ukrainian 
specialists. The agreement is still in force, and it also 
foresees the presence of specialists from Belorussia and 
Kazakhstan. But to be honest, this isn't cheap. Money has to be 
paid for the presence of specialists in Russia, for housing and 
the like, not counting health services. Apparently understanding 
this, neither Belorussia nor Kazakhstan sent their own observers. 
  As for Russia itself, all we are doing as far as tactical 
weapons are concerned is dismantling them. Our enterprises have 
not produced a single device since the time the agreement was 
signed with the republics. 
  [Belyaninov] How much time does it take to dismantle a 
single 
unit of ammunition? 
  [Yakovlev] Not much. The Americans, for example, have two 
main device dismantling "points." The main one of these--Panteks 
[transliteration]--eliminates around 2,000 a year. Our rate is 
not any lower. 
  But as with any other country, we are dismantling more than 
just tactical weapons. Our ammunition has a shelf life, and a 
guarantee period. Upon expiration of this period it is not only 
unsuitable but also unsafe to store it: The charge becomes more 
sensitive to mechanical effects, and the radiation background 
may rise. This is why strategic weapons are also sent to the 
dismantling enterprises. 
  [Belyaninov] Last year was marked by an entire series of 
conflicts between the Ukrainian and Russian defense ministries. 
Part of the strategic nuclear forces were transferred to 
Ukrainian jurisdiction, Russian specialists developing 
ammunition were deprived of access to weapons, and it became 
impossible to carry out routine repairs and maintenance. As a 
result several accidents occurred at bases in Ukraine. 
  [Yakovlev] It may sound somewhat cynical, but two factors 
saved the day: a visit to Kiev by the American President and 
Ukraine's economic difficulties. The Americans raised the issue 
of granting economic assistance to Ukraine that would be 
directly dependent on the timetable for withdrawal of missiles, 
while the crisis in atomic energy and the shortage of fuel for 
nuclear power plants, which was being produced only in Russia, 
compelled Ukraine to sign a trilateral treaty with fewer 
stipulations than before. This made our situation much easier. 
In accordance with the agreement Russia supplied fuel assemblies 
for reactors to the Republic, while our department was given 
permission to withdraw all remaining weapons and do all of the 
needed work at the bases. Such that we can now take 
responsibility for the safety of the weapons. But I'm not about 
to make any long-range forecasts: The situation changes so 
frequently that it is simply impossible to talk about any kind 
of stability. 
  [Belyaninov] Vitaliy Nikolayevich, the opinions of experts 
regarding American assistance differ. Some assert that we don't 
need this assistance at all, that while the Americans talk about 
hundreds of millions of dollars, they are barely appropriating 
hundreds of thousands, and that ultimately this is assisting not 
Russia but the American economy. 
  [Yakovlev] This is true to a certain extent. Little of the 
$400 million appropriated by the U.S. Congress this year has in 
fact been spent, but the American side shouldn't be the only one 
that is blamed. After all, each item in the agreements must pass 
through a very long and complex system of consideration and 
approval both there--in Congress--and here--in the Duma. 
  On the other hand any assistance of this sort consists not 
of 
cash transfers in the millions to the Central Bank, but of 
materials and equipment valued at this amount. The United States 
does place orders with American companies. But agreements to 
provide such assistance are in effect, and some of them have 
already been realized. As an example we have received so-called 
"Kevlar linings" to be used in transportation of the devices. 
They are unique in their properties: They offer good protection 
against environmental effects, and several layers of Kevlar can 
easily stop a bullet from an automatic weapon. We did not have 
such a material before. 
  We also received special equipment for emergency teams, and 
an agreement to produce special railcars to transport nuclear 
ammunition is being implemented. These cars are being developed 
in the United States, and they offer several levels of 
protection. The Americans supply parts for these cars, but they 
will be assembled in Russia. There are several agreements 
between the Ministry of Atomic Energy and the U.S. Department of 
Energy regarding construction of a new storage facility for 
plutonium extracted from warheads, regarding delivery of 
supercontainers to transport highly radioactive materials, and 
so on. 
  It is evident at least from this list that the total volume 
of American assistance already exceeds tens of millions of 
dollars. 
  [Belyaninov] Vitaliy Nikolayevich, many in the United States 
associate the volume of assistance being granted with access of 
American specialists to Russian technology for dismantling and 
destroying weapons. And during one of the sessions of the U.S. 
Congress Defense Subcommittee its chairman, John Murtha, 
declared that unless all Russian enterprises of the nuclear 
complex are opened to the Americans, including military ones, 
there will be "no money at all." 
  [Yakovlev] An agreement to deliver processed uranium 
extracted from warheads to the United States was signed by the 
Russian Ministry of Atomic Energy and the U.S. Department of 
Energy. And naturally the American side wants to make sure that 
the materials we are transferring are in fact coming from 
weapons. The actual issue is at what stage American specialists 
could be allowed in. We insist on the beginning of the 
processing cycle--that is, when the warhead has already been 
dismantled and the material has been extracted and delivered to 
the corresponding enterprise. In the meantime the Americans want 
to supervise the process from the very beginning, from the 
moment the warheads are dismantled. This is a more sensitive 
topic, this means access to weapon design, and access to our 
military secrets. 
  When it comes to my own point of view, the problem is easily 
solved: Weapon-grade uranium differs dramatically in its 
characteristics from that used in the fuel assemblies of nuclear 
power plants and nuclear submarine reactors. They're simply 
impossible to confuse: The characteristics of a material with 
this degree of enrichment are known to any specialist both in 
our country and in the USA. 
  [Belyaninov] There is one other problem that troubles many 
today: What is happening with the Russian nuclear program? The 
test ranges are closed, tests are not being conducted, and 
scientists are living on starvation rations. 
  [Yakovlev] Testing is in fact a difficult issue. A tombstone 
placed over the Semipalatinsk test range long ago, and it will 
never again be used to test nuclear weapons. Nor is there any 
sense in talking about Novaya Zemlya, as long as we aren't 
conducting tests there, and are supporting a policy of their 
prohibition. But when we--I'm referring to the military 
department--discussed the need for tests, what we had in mind 
primarily was not improving nuclear weapons but improving their 
safety. Only by conducting experiments, by conducting tests, can 
we be certain of the safety of a device that is in storage. But 
it would be useless to argue this now. World public opinion is 
so negatively oriented, and specialists of all countries 
possessing nuclear weapons are experiencing such problems. This 
is one of those issues that will not be resolved as long as no 
country violates the moratorium and conducts tests first. 
  As for the nuclear program, it existed before, and it exists 
today, although many scientific directions have either been 
curtailed or significantly reduced. We have weapon systems, the 
design systems have been developed, several systems of nuclear 
devices exist, and they have been tested and proven to be 
reliable. Such that we aren't under the threat of falling behind 
in this area as yet. 
  There are of course difficulties with specialists. Some of 
them will switch to jobs in the International Center for Science 
and Technology currently being established in Moscow. It is 
being built with American assistance. Testers from the 
Semipalatinsk test range will most probably work in one of our 
scientific institutes. And as for creating new forms and systems 
of weapons, that's something not worth thinking about today, 
it's too expensive a pleasure. Such that we are concerned more 
today with problems of disarmament. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46617 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> GROUND TROOPS </F>
<H3> <TI>   System of Fire of Motor-Rifle Battalion in Defense </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    System of Fire of Motor-Rifle Battalion in Defense </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0465A Moscow VOYENNYY VESTNIK in Russian No 2, Feb 94 
(signed to press 24 Jan 94) pp 60-62 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0465A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOYENNYY VESTNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Colonel V. Vorontsov, candidate of military </F>
sciences, under rubric: "To Assist Those Entering the Academy"] 
  [Text] The system of fire, structured in accordance with 
the commander's concept and with consideration of capabilities 
of all kinds of organic and attached weapons (see diagram), is 
one element in aligning the battalion defense. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-028-09A>      System of Fire of Motorized Rifle Battalion in the Defense (variant) </FIG>


  It includes the following: artillery (including mortar) 
concentrated and defensive fire sectors on approaches, ahead of 
the FEBA [Forward Edge of the Battle Area], on flanks, in gaps 
between company strongpoints, and in the depth of the defense; 
zone of fire of antitank weapons and zone of continuous 
multilayered fire of all kinds of weapons ahead of the FEBA, in 
gaps, on flanks and in the depth of the defense for destroying 
first and foremost enemy tanks and other armored targets; and a 
prepared maneuver of fire to concentrate it on any threatened 
sector or axis in a short time. 
  The system of fire is structured with consideration of fire 
capabilities of all kinds of battalion weapons, attached 
weapons, and fire strikes planned by the senior commander, and 
in combination with manmade obstacles and natural barriers. Its 
basis is the fire of tanks, BMP's, ATGM's, grenade launchers and 
antitank guns and the direct fire of artillery with 
consideration of employment of the regiment's antitank reserve 
and mobile obstacle detachment on a likely avenue of tank 
approach. 
  The necessary density of tanks, antitank weapons and BMP's, 
established in advance and maintained in the course of battle, 
is of decisive importance in achieving the goals of a modern 
defense. It depends above all on the makeup of the attacking 
enemy grouping. A battalion defense area may be assaulted by one 
and one-half to two battalion task forces--mechanized or tank. 
The expected number of tanks and IFV's (APC's) and their density 
are shown in the table. 


Table 

Battalion      Width of    Number              Densities per Kilometer 
Task Forces    Zone of 
               Advance 
               (km) 

IFV's          Tanks       IFV's     Tanks     Total 

Mechanized     3           39        14        13        5        18 
battalion 
task force 
(3 
mechanized 
companies, 1 
tank 
company) 

Tank           3           13        42        4         14       18 
battalion 
task force 
(3 tank 
companies, 1 
mechanized 
company) 

Total          -           52        56        17        19       36 


  In connection with the fact that capabilities of one 
antitank 
weapon permit fighting 2-3 armored targets, then based on 
exercise experience the density of antitank weapons per 
kilometer of frontage should be 6-9 to repel tank and IFV (APC) 
assaults. Organic battalion weapons permit creating such 
densities (17:3; 19:2) on likely avenues of tank approach. 
  The effectiveness of a system of fire also depends largely 
on 
selection of firing positions on the terrain for available 
weapons. Their disposition in the battalion defense area should 
be concealed and dispersed, support the creation of fire sacks, 
conduct of fire to maximum range and engagement of the enemy 
with high-density flanking fire, cross fire and surprise 
close-range concentrated fire, and there should be mutual 
contact. Their linear disposition is inadmissible. 
  Alternate and temporary firing positions and routes of 
forward movement to them are prepared for weapons in addition to 
the primary positions. The battalion may assign roving guns, 
tanks and BMP's to mislead the enemy regarding the system of 
fire. All weapons must be ready for wide, swift maneuver and for 
conducting fire at night and under other conditions of limited 
visibility. 
  Organizing the system of fire is a very important duty of 
the 
battalion commander. He performs this work based on the decision 
made in the course of ground reconnaissance and when assigning 
missions to subunits and organizing coordination. 
  In conducting ground reconnaissance, the battalion commander 
clarifies company fire zones, fire concentration sectors, and 
primary and alternate (temporary) positions of organic and 
attached artillery. He personally points out on the terrain 
firing positions and sectors of fire for tanks, BMP's (BTR's), 
ATGM systems and grenade launchers on the most probable avenues 
of enemy approach. Here, too, he gives instructions for 
organizing subunit small arms fire; outlines for them sectors of 
concentrated and defensive fire intended for securing flanks and 
boundaries with adjacent subunits and gaps between companies; 
and clarifies places for arranging fire ambushes and the lines 
of firing positions for the tank company and BMP-equipped 
motorized rifle company located in the second echelon (reserve). 
  In assigning combat missions for first and second echelon 
subunits, the battalion commander indicates zones of fire, 
secondary sectors of fire and fire concentration sectors, what 
forces and assets to use to secure flanks, boundaries and gaps 
and who is responsible for them. The procedure for engaging the 
enemy on his approaching the FEBA, deploying into battle 
formation, launching the assault and penetrating company 
strongpoints, and the procedure for engaging the enemy when 
supporting a counterattack by the second echelon is communicated 
to attached artillery subunits and the mortar battery. The 
battalion commander assigns the grenade launcher subunit primary 
and alternate positions, a zone of fire, secondary sector of 
fire, fire concentration sectors and defensive fire lines; he 
assigns the antitank subunit its place in the battle formation, 
deployment lines, and missions which it must be ready to execute. 
  In organizing coordination, the commander determines lines 
for commencing fire against the enemy from tanks, BMP's, ATGM 
systems, grenade launchers and other antitank weapons, and also 
company fire concentration sectors on the most important axes, 
time of commencing fire and procedure for conducting it. When 
the enemy comes right up to the FEBA, subunit operations are 
coordinated in such a way that a zone of massed, multilayered 
fire forms here--each point on the terrain in a zone of up to 
400 m should be under effective fire. Such a zone also is 
created in the most important sectors ahead of the third trench. 
Dead ground not covered by direct fire of guns and by small arms 
fire is engaged by artillery and mortar fire from indirect 
firing positions. 
  Readiness of the system of fire is determined by the 
occupation of positions by weapons, the personnel's knowledge of 
their missions, preparation of firing data, and availability of 
ammunition. The content of the system of fire is reflected in 
greatest detail in the battalion defense area diagram. 
  If a subunit shifts to a defense in direct contact with the 
enemy, the system of fire is organized during the assignment of 
missions to companies for consolidating a favorable or 
accessible line. It is developed subsequently in accordance with 
the decision made for defense. 
  COPYRIGHT: VOYENNYY VESTNIK No 2 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46618 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> GROUND TROOPS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Combined-Arms Battle: Security, Defense of Military </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Combined-Arms Battle: Security, Defense of Military </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Facilities 

<F P=102>   94UM0463A Moscow VOYENNYY VESTNIK in Russian No 2, Feb 94 
(signed to press 24 Jan 94) pp 21-25 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0463A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOYENNYY VESTNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Colonel A. Zemskov, candidate of military </F>
sciences: "Combined Arms Battle: Security and Defense of 
Military Posts and Installations"] 
  [Text] Many regions of the country today are characterized 
by an unstable, criminogenic situation. The number of grave 
crimes, including piratical attacks using all kinds of firearms 
and silent weapons, has risen sharply. 
  Experience of recent years shows that criminal elements are 
choosing military installations as "promising" targets more and 
more often: housing areas, storage areas with stockpiles of 
supplies and military property, and weapon and ammunition 
arsenals. Attacks on guardhouses, unit checkpoints, small posts, 
assigned personnel of on-duty services and the daily detail, and 
on individual servicemen have stepped up considerably. 
  Investigations of the enumerated incidents permit concluding 
that a rehearsed system of forcible seizure of weapons and 
combat equipment has taken shape in a number of areas where 
troops are stationed. A planned attack usually is preceded by a 
thorough study of the installation and its security system and a 
detailed coordination of the criminals' actions. In essence, 
organized groups and entire units are active, especially in "hot 
spots." Unit details and subunits supporting a 
state-of-emergency regime are subjected to simultaneous attack. 
There have been cases of seizure of weapons and military 
property by individual citizens. 
  To achieve their criminal schemes, the bandits study the 
security system: procedure and time of sentry relief, terrain in 
the vicinity of installations, nature of their outfitting with 
technical and engineer equipment, and organization of 
communications. For example, an attack was made twice in the 
course of a month on one of the Moscow garrison units to seize 
weapons. An investigation showed that the criminals were well 
informed concerning the security system and the procedure for 
sentries' performance of duties and their relief. 
  Other techniques also are used, such as provocations with 
hostages (wives and children of servicemen) used for an 
unhindered approach to bases, arsenals and other installations, 
and bribery of soldiers and of servicing and maintenance 
personnel. All this has been done in Georgia and in other 
republics and areas. 
  A brief survey of attempts and an analysis of methods used 
confirm the urgent need for improving all work connected with 
organizing troop duties in units and subunits. Reliable security 
and defense of installations and military posts should be 
ensured above all through proper, regulation assignment of 
routine garrison duty and guard duty. The latter holds a special 
place in troop life and activity. It must be regarded as 
performance of a combat mission in peacetime and it must become 
an important condition for maintaining high combat readiness and 
a subject of constant concern of the commander and staff. 
  The problem of which we are speaking is rather vast and 
impossible to cover in one article. Therefore I will dwell in 
more detail only on the substance of the concept and certain 
recommendations of a practical nature. 
  Security and defense of installations represent a complex of 
troop actions coordinated by goal, place and time in combination 
with technical, engineer and other measures. They are conducted 
to ensure safety of installations, keep outsiders from 
penetrating to them, and prevent seizure and loss of military 
property. 
  Technical and engineer measures consist of the arrangement, 
installation, proper operation and further upgrading of various 
technical and engineer security equipment. This equipment 
includes structures, obstacles and the following systems: 
signalling, communications, automatic equipment, telemechanics, 
mechanization, lighting and surveillance. 
  In organizing troop duties, the commander must see to it 
that 
installation security meets modern requirements--reliability, 
continuity of effect, activeness and flexibility--and has 
necessary depth. 
  Reliability is that state of security which precludes the 
possibility of intruders penetrating into installations or the 
illegal transporting (carrying) of arms and other military 
property from them. It is achieved by skilled construction of 
the security system, use of its most advisable methods, proper 
organization and precise performance of duty, maintaining high 
combat readiness of subunits and guard details, appropriate 
training of personnel, and constantly keeping technical and 
engineer security equipment in operating condition. 
  Continuity of security is where each installation checkpoint 
and perimeter sector is under surveillance and covered by 
particular forces and assets at any time. 
  Activeness of security presumes a wide maneuver of forces, 
assets and fire, and also decisive actions of subunits, guard 
details and sentries for ensuring reliability of installation 
defense. 
  Flexibility of security consists of reacting promptly to a 
change in the situation and concentrating efforts on avenues of 
the most likely intruder actions. 
  Depth of security is that disposition of forces and assets 
which provides for detaining intruders in or near the restricted 
area. This is achieved by an optimum distribution of forces and 
assets to lines of the zone and by assigning areas of 
responsibility to guards outside the installation when the 
situation becomes complicated. 
  With respect to practical recommendations, in my view it is 
apropos to look at the procedure for organizing the security 
system and one of its most important components, use of 
technical and engineer equipment. 
  The following are determined in organizing an installation 
security system: security methods; number and makeup of guards, 
security and defense sectors, guardhouse locations and procedure 
for personnel actions; number and kinds of checkpoints; number, 
kinds, purpose and locations of posts and the length of routes; 
nature of preparation of the restricted zone with technical and 
engineer security equipment, its density and the procedure for 
installing it; makeup of unit (subunit) reserves and procedure 
for their employment. 
  Special attention is given to outfitting the restricted zone 
with technical and engineer security equipment (one variant is 
shown in the diagram). Commanders proceed from the importance of 
the secured area in installing technical and engineer security 
equipment. Thus, a category one installation is outfitted with 
two or more lines of perimeter detection equipment and with 
installation security signalling and a category two installation 
with one line. Only installation security signalling may be 
installed at a category three installation. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-028-12A>      Variant of Preparing a Restricted Zone with Technical and Engineer Security </FIG>


   Based on troop experience, systems based on television, 
radar, vibration, electromagnetic and combination principles of 
action such as Luch, Klen, Shchit, Setka, Kvarts, Radian and 
others may find wide use. In sectors that cannot be viewed it is 
advisable to use remotely controlled television cameras 
operating with low illumination. 
  The use of troop details equipped with radar detection 
equipment is becoming a promising direction for improving the 
effectiveness of security and defense duty for military posts 
(installations). It is recommended setting up technical 
observation posts, which permit reliably covering an 
installation sector (perimeter) by creating a continuous radar 
surveillance zone. Each post can consist of one or two radar 
teams with the PSNR-2 [type of ground reconnaissance search 
radar] (or PSNR-5 or SBR-3 [type of short-range reconnaissance 
radar]). The posts are put out individually or included in the 
guard detail. 
  AMP-90, Luch-1 and Luch-2 searchlight stations and PZS 
[mobile battery charging station] searchlights powered from 
special mobile generators may find wide use at night. Use of 
various laser devices with a night and day branch, night vision 
devices of all types, and night sights is possible. 
  To strengthen reliability of security it is advisable to set 
up obstacles difficult to negotiate, such as two rows of 
12-strand barbed wire reinforced by a metal net and deflectors 
[kozyrki]. It is recommended setting up low wire entanglements 
between outer and inner perimeters of an obstacle, outfitting 
observation towers with bulletproof walls, and equipping 
personnel of the guard detail duty shift with Sirena, Palma or 
Romashka portable radios. 
  As spelled out in the Russian Federation Armed Forces 
Provisional Garrison and Guard Service Regulations, security and 
defense of installations equipped with technical and engineer 
security equipment can be accomplished with the posting of 
sentries or by the method of control and security team alert 
duty. Control and security team alert duty is the most 
effective. Here the technical and engineer equipment is 
consolidated in a unified system, which permits promptly sending 
intrusion signals to the guardhouse. Transportation is assigned 
to deliver such teams to the prescribed place, or armored 
equipment is assigned when there is an attack by armed criminals 
(units). 
  It is understandable that other measures also contribute to 
preventing weapon, ammunition and combat equipment thefts. In 
certain cases it is advisable to transfer weapons from scattered 
small depots for storage at one well equipped installation. A 
technique such as sealing off weapon storage rooms, rifle racks, 
and safes under control of the unit duty officer or officer of 
the guard has proven itself in the troops. This method also is 
used in storing combat equipment in closed bays of motor pools. 
Entrance gates in a number of units are equipped with a call 
button or code pad, and a two-way communications device is 
mounted on the gate for conversations with arriving persons. 
Gates are opened and closed automatically and the control panel 
is in the checkpoint building to preclude an attack on a sentry 
or a person on duty. 
  From the editors. 
  We request unit commanders, chiefs of staff, officers 
of combat arms and services, and all readers to share experience 
in organizing security and defense of military posts and 
installations and to express their views and recommendations on 
actions of commanders and staffs under emergency conditions. 
Your opinion will help gain a deeper understanding of the 
subject touched on and thereby will facilitate accomplishment of 
the troops' primary mission--maintaining their constant combat 
readiness. 
  COPYRIGHT: VOYENNYY VESTNIK No 2 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46619 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Creditors Plan To Sue Pacific Fleet </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Creditors Plan To Sue Pacific Fleet </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0477A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 11 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0477A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Item from Vladivostok by Natalya Piskunova: "Will the </F>
Pacific Fleet Stand Trial?"] 
  [Text] If Pacific Fleet navymen do not pay off the 
debt to ship repairmen, an action will be filed in court on 
behalf of labor collectives of the Far East Ship Repair 
Yard. 
  That was the decision made by a conference of labor 
collectives of ship repair enterprises after Fleet debt, in the 
opinion of specialists, exceeded R75 billion. Workers have not 
received wages for three months, many programs have been 
curtailed, and enterprises have been informed that utilities are 
to be shut off to the yards for debts. But the Fleet also is in 
no position to settle the debt even if the action is filed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46620 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Navy Bought Dud Torpedo To Counter U.S. Mk-48 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Navy Bought Dud Torpedo To Counter U.S. Mk-48 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0477B Moscow MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI in Russian No 104, 2 
Jun 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0477B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Dmitriy Kholodov: "`Precision Weapon' </F>
From the Soviet Military-Industrial Complex: Bow tubes... 
Logs... Fire!" Designation "Top Secret" is as published in 
original Russian source] 
  [Text] It is customary to believe that the Soviet 
military-industrial complex is something "cool," and that in 
contrast to everyday trash, equipment of exceptional quality 
goes to the troops. But in the country of the "biggest 
microprocessors" and "fastest clocks" it cannot be that one part 
of the economy does not work and another works. As it became 
known to MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI as a result of investigative 
journalism, a file is resting in the Main Military Procuracy 
under a "Top Secret" [as published] classification which 
overturns the impressions about our military-industrial complex. 
  All this resembles an anecdote. The Americans contrived the 
Mk-48 dual-purpose supertorpedo capable of engaging both 
submarines at a depth of more than 900 meters as well as surface 
ships at a range up to 46 km. The torpedo was guided to the 
target by wires, i.e., its warhead had a television camera which 
transmitted an image of the target to the weapon operator. In 
addition to remote control, the warhead had the usual acoustic 
homing system, which switched on and locked onto the target on 
the approach. The torpedo had an onboard computer based on the 
microprocessors which had just appeared at that time and which 
controlled everything. 
  The latest Soviet torpedo, also capable of carrying a 
nuclear 
warhead, evidently was being created to counterbalance the 
American one. The electronic circuit of the computer in the 
torpedo just did not begin to work and they gave up remote 
control right away. It proved incapable of it. Each time in 
testing the torpedo suddenly would change course and swim away 
in an unknown direction--toward our own cruiser, for example, 
instead of toward an enemy cruiser. It was necessary to place an 
old, antiquated guidance system on the new torpedo, i.e., 
guiding on its wake. They also had to forget about 
versatility--each time, the ship commander had to manually set 
the target, surface or submarine, against which to fire. But 
even this would have been a small loss. It turned out that the 
new Soviet torpedo did not know how to swim. Original, right? 
This is all the same as a missile which is unable to fly. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-028-14A>      Figure </FIG>


  The statistics are as follows: 70 percent of these torpedoes 
sink hopelessly. Imagine, with a nuclear warhead at that! Only 
from ten to zero percent of the torpedoes hit the target. But 
the money for developing the torpedo already had been spent, 
eaten up, and... the new "superweapon" was made operational. 
Just think, it sinks--what nonsense! The entire Navy, including 
modern Tayfun submarines, which Americans allegedly especially 
feared, was outfitted with the innovation. True, you 
imperialists around the world should tremble: God forbid that 
our submarine should fire a torpedo with a nuclear warhead--you 
will wear yourselves out getting it off the bottom later. The 
nuclear torpedoes on the submarine Komsomolets, about whose 
corrosion so much is being said now, are of this very type. The 
Dutch refused to get them even for a billion dollars. 
  But what about the military, you ask? The sailors of course 
were outraged. Each time they would receive "twos" in firings. 
The Northern Fleet even took the manufacturer, the Leningrad 
Torpedo Design Bureau, to court. The procuracy instituted 
proceedings. But this problem, too, was solved, and in our own 
way: the inspectors began receiving an order not to give "twos." 
CinC Navy Admiral Chernavin actually gave the okay for further 
rearming--the new dud torpedoes went to the fleets by the 
thousands and filled the depots. The old, rather weak, but 
reliable torpedoes were taken out of operation. Now they are 
unsuitable: their caliber (533 mm) is smaller and they will 
"rattle around" in the torpedo tubes. The criminal case was 
closed; from the very beginning they classified it and sent it 
off to the archives, where, as we were informed in the 
procuracy, it now safely abides. And seemingly everything is in 
order--no one knows anything. The Navy is fully armed, as they 
say. 
  And so we rearmed with the new torpedoes. Even logs are 
better--at least they float. It is unknown how many such files 
are hidden in the motherland's storehouses. It turns out the 
state military-industrial complex, untouched by competition a 
single time in 70 years, comes from the very same page as "the 
freest health care." Only the appetites are different. The 
Ministry of Defense now demands increasing the military budget 
by 1.5 times, including for that same planned 
military-industrial complex for arms deliveries. And the public 
just was not given an opportunity to familiarize itself with 
items of the defense budget, as is customary in civilized 
countries. But the fact is, the fight is for R55 trillion! This 
of course is a good figure, half of a lemon from each Russian, 
including children and retirees. 
  And it would be nice if the torpedoes swam. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46621 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> REAR SERVICES, SUPPORT ISSUES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Rear Services' Vorobyev on Military Legislation, Support </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Rear Services' Vorobyev on Military Legislation, Support </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Issues 

<F P=102>   94UM0440A Moscow TYL VOORUZHENNYKH SIL VOYENNO 
EKONOMICHESKIY ZHURNAL in Russian No 2, Feb 1994 (signed to </F>

press 26 Jan 94) pp 3-7 
<F P=103> 94UM0440A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow TYL VOORUZHENNYKH SIL VOYENNO 
EKONOMICHESKIY ZHURNAL </F>

<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Colonel General Vasiliy Vasilyevich </F>
Vorobyev, chief of Russian Federation Ministry of Defense Main 
Military Budget and Finance Directorate, by R. Chekmarev, 
military economics and finances department editor of TYL 
VOORUZHENNYKH SIL VOYENNO EKONOMICHESKIY ZHURNAL, date, place 
and occasion unknown, under rubric "Pertinent Interview": "A 
Package of Military Laws"] 
  [Text] Our correspondent's questions are answered by 
Colonel General V. Vorobyev, chief of Russian Federation 
Ministry of Defense Main Military Budget and Finance 
Directorate. 
  Colonel General Vasiliy Vasilyevich Vorobyev was born 
on 11 May 1946 in the settlement of Gidrotorf, Balakhninskiy 
Rayon, Gorkiy Oblast. He completed the Yaroslavl Military School 
imeni General of the Army A. V. Khrulev in 1966 and the Military 
Faculty at Moscow Finance Institute in 1974. He successively 
went through various positions in the troops: chief of finance 
service of a battalion, regiment, division, army and military 
district (Siberian Military District, Southern Group of Forces, 
Ural Military District, Far East Military District). He has been 
on the central staff since June 1990 (first deputy chief, then 
chief of the Main Directorate). Married, has two children. 
  [Chekmarev] Vasiliy Vasilyevich, our country is 
experiencing a very difficult time. It is fully natural that the 
situation which formed in the Russian Armed Forces fully 
reflects the socioeconomic and political situation in society. 
Therefore, evidently from the very beginning of establishment of 
the Russian Army the military leadership has encountered very 
difficult problems that demand solution without delay. In your 
view, which of these problems are most acute? 
  [Vorobyev] The first and probably most important 
one is the insufficient legislative base for Armed Forces vital 
activities. Because of this, so-called irregular situations 
often arise which make both the central staff and the troops 
feverish. Many of Russia's fundamental laws entering into the 
"military package" have not yet been adopted, and those which 
were adopted are not "working" to full capacity, since the 
mechanism for their realization has not been completely 
adjusted. In particular, this concerns the Russian Federation 
Laws "On Defense" and "On the Status of Servicemen." 
  One other very acute problem is establishment of a Russian 
Army military-technical base meeting modern requirements. It is 
no secret to anyone that after partition of the USSR Armed 
Forces our state basically got the troops of interior districts, 
i.e., the second strategic echelon, and Russia's share of the 
newest arms was only 20 percent. 
  Moreover, battle management, communications, intelligence, 
and missile and air attack warning systems and the system for 
providing troops with necessities of life and combat training 
were disrupted. 
  Closely adjoining this problem is the need for removing 
troops from the territory of other states and settling-in 
hundreds of thousands of officers, warrant officers and enlisted 
men at new permanent station locations, difficulties in solving 
problems of servicemen's social protection, and the near-crisis 
situation with manning of military units and ships. 
  And finally, economic disorders in the country, a new system 
of troop manning providing for contract service, conversion 
being carried out hastily and, unfortunately, not always in a 
well thought-out way, involvement of troops in regional 
conflicts, and also the very rigid framework of the military 
budget generate additional problems in Armed Forces 
organizational development. 
  [Chekmarev] What has been done lately and what is 
planned to be done to protect servicemen against inflationary 
processes occurring in the country and to improve pay for 
military labor? 
  [Vorobyev] The Russian Federation government 
periodically indexes pay by raising base pay and allowances. 
Thus, the position pay of all categories of servicemen was 
raised seven times just during 1992-1993. 
  Under conditions of inflationary processes occurring in the 
country the main emphasis beginning in 1990 has been placed on 
strengthening social protection of junior and mid-level 
officers, warrant officers and extended-term servicemen whose 
level of base pay and allowances (pay for position and rank) 
periodically was increased more significantly than the level of 
base pay and allowances of general and flag officers. 
  Payment of a monetary reward for a class rating was 
established for the first time beginning in 1990 as a financial 
incentive for officers at the troop level to perfect 
professional expertise. It presently is 10 percent of position 
pay. Payment of a monetary reward for a rating category was 
established in these same amounts for medical servicemen. 
  The Ministry of Defense worked purposefully to expand the 
benefits of servicemen performing their duty under special 
conditions and whose service involves risk to health and life 
(pilots, navymen, landing personnel and so on). 
  Specific work also was done to improve supplementary 
payments 
to servicemen performing duty in remote localities and in 
localities with difficult climatic conditions. For example, as 
of 1 January 1993 payment of higher position pay was established 
there in the amount of the regional factors applied to wages of 
workers and employees in corresponding localities, if an 
increase in servicemen's pay previously was not provided for 
there in amounts exceeding the amounts of these factors. A 
number of restrictions were removed on paying higher position 
pay to servicemen performing duty in these localities. 
  As of 1 January 1993 significant supplementary payments and 
benefits were established for those servicemen who serve on 
territories of Transcaucasian and Baltic states and in the 
Republic of Tajikistan, and also who perform missions under 
conditions of a state of emergency and in armed conflicts (these 
are payments of one and one-half or two times base pay and 
allowances, a preferential offset for years served for pension 
and so on). 
  That is when the Russian Federation Law "On the Status of 
Servicemen" was placed in force, providing for a number of 
benefits, guarantees and advantages in social protection for 
servicemen, citizens discharged from military service and their 
families. In general, this law deserves to be the topic of a 
separate conversation. Let us focus attention on the important 
thing. 
  Benefits and guarantees established for servicemen are in 
the 
nature of compensation. They have the purpose of compensating 
for restrictions on certain general civilian rights and freedoms 
dictated by features of military service, and unquestionably 
have the purpose of socially protecting servicemen and elevating 
the prestige of military service. 
  Guarantees of pay for military labor are legislatively 
incorporated for the first time in this important document. 
Thus, Article 12 of the Law points out that pay for initial 
military positions of privates and seamen performing contract 
military service cannot be less than five minimum amounts of 
pay, and pay for rank cannot be less than half of military 
position pay. Consequently, the Law now guarantees payment of 
base pay and allowances to servicemen performing contract 
service in the initial position in an amount of at least 7.5 
times the minimum amount of pay for labor. In addition, the 
amount of servicemen's station allowance was doubled, including 
for family members, on official reassignments. 
  The Law also did not ignore servicemen being discharged on 
reaching the maximum age for active military service and also 
being discharged for sickness and in connection with table of 
organization measures. As of 1 January 1993 the one-time 
allowance on being discharged for those reasons was set in the 
amount of from 5 to 20 times base pay and allowances (depending 
on overall duration of military service) instead of that 
previously paid in the amount of five times base pay and 
allowances. 
  Active work has been going on in recent years to unify the 
system of base pay and allowances for warrant officers, 
extended-term servicemen and officers in order to establish a 
uniform system for paying for the labor of servicemen performing 
contract service. For example, payment of a percentage increment 
for years served was introduced for extended-term servicemen and 
warrant officers in the very same amounts as for officers, and 
increments for special conditions of service, an increment for 
continuous service in remote localities, and others were 
established in identical amounts with officers. 
  The Ministry of Defense will continue systematic work to 
strengthen social protection of servicemen and their families 
and to improve the system of base pay and allowances, especially 
with respect to servicemen serving under contract. 
  [Chekmarev] Many critical letters about late payment of 
base pay and allowances and wages to Army and Navy personnel 
come to the editors, and probably also to the Main Directorate 
you head. And many are inclined to place the blame for this on 
military finance officers. I would like to learn your opinion on 
this problem. 
  [Vorobyev] There is no denying that an enormous 
load and responsibility will fall on the Armed Forces Finance 
Service in the situation at hand. On the one hand, a periodic 
or, more correctly, systematic increase in base pay and 
allowances, wages and pensions demands considerable labor inputs 
for recomputation. But on the other hand, the constant shortage 
of Russian Federation Ministry of Defense financing and its 
unsystematic accomplishment in terms of volumes and time, 
beginning with the Ministry of Finance and ending with the 
military unit level, create a nervous atmosphere in Army 
collectives and give rise to unfavorable criticism of Finance 
Service work. 
  And how many troubles are brought to us by the instability 
and contradictoriness of hastily adopted laws, which as a rule 
are not backed up economically! Whoever you like can argue about 
a poor rule of law, but just not finance workers. They must make 
decisions and assume responsibility for the blunders of others. 
I must declare with all responsibility that the heads of the 
Ministry of Defense and Main Military Budget and Finance 
Directorate are taking all necessary steps to stabilize the 
situation of financial support of the Army and Navy. But the 
state's economic situation is such that numerous efforts for now 
are not producing the desired result, and this circumstance 
cannot be blamed on the Finance Service, since on the whole it 
is coping with its tasks. Officials of our Directorate work a 
great deal in central economic and governmental entities, 
defending Armed Forces interests. We are giving most careful 
attention to ensuring a very strict regime of economy in 
expending the resources being allocated for defense, to 
strengthening fiscal control, and to coming up with proposals 
aimed at strengthening social protection of servicemen and Armed 
Forces veterans and their families. 
  [Chekmarev] One other important problem is the 
construction and procurement of housing for servicemen, 
especially those arriving on the territory of Russia from 
abroad. What kind of funds are being spent for these 
purposes? 
  [Vorobyev] In accordance with Russian Federation 
Presidential Edict No. 796 of 21 July 1992, the Ministry of 
Defense received the right to direct not only appropriations 
provided by the federal budget for financing centralized capital 
investments, but also extra-budgetary funds obtained from 
selling freed-up military property, for building and purchasing 
housing for servicemen. 
  In 1993 over R600 billion from the republic budget and an 
additional R5 billion of extra-budgetary funds for constructing 
and purchasing apartments were sent to pay for construction of 
housing under the state defense order. In 1994 it is envisaged 
allocating funds for building 73,300 apartments--more than in 
the past year. 
  [Chekmarev] Are Russian Federation Ministry of Defense 
enterprises and organizations subject to privatization? 
  [Vorobyev] In accordance with the State Program 
for Privatization of State and Municipal Enterprises in the 
Russian Federation for 1994, Ministry of Defense enterprises are 
not subject to privatization. Considering that Russian Ministry 
of Defense enterprises and organizations are a very important 
element in ensuring Armed Forces combat readiness and vital 
activities, in my view it is advisable to refrain from 
privatizing them even subsequently. It is necessary to perform 
purposeful work to strengthen the Army and Navy 
material-technical base, to outfit them with modern kinds of 
arms and military equipment, and to keep equipment service life 
at the proper level based on upgrading and developing the 
performance of military repairs. 
  [Chekmarev] Many letters come to journal editors from 
Armed Forces veterans who are military retirees on matters 
concerning their pension support, and in particular on ensuring 
timely payment of pensions in new amounts when there is a mass 
recomputation of them. How is this matter being resolved 
presently and what steps are being taken by the Main Military 
Budget and Finance Directorate to accelerate getting pensions in 
the increased amounts directly to military retirees? 
  [Vorobyev] A solution to this problem is very 
important at the present time under conditions of the rise in 
prices on goods and services and inflationary processes 
occurring in the country, inasmuch as a delay in paying a 
pension in the new amount devaluates it and lowers its buying 
power. 
  By decision of the Main Military Budget and Finance 
Directorate, almost all military commissariats were supplied 
with personal computers to improve pension support and shorten 
the time for getting pensions in the new amounts to military 
retirees. This permits recomputing pensions in 2-3 weeks, and 
even faster for those military commissariats where a small 
number of retirees are registered. In addition, pension entities 
of military commissariats are attempting to adjust close 
business contacts with Savings Bank establishments in order to 
help the latter's employees complete documents for payment of 
pensions. 
  And still there continue to be shortcomings in pension 
support work. The callousness and bureaucratism of some military 
commissariat workers have not yet been fully eradicated. Delays 
in assigning and recalculating pensions are allowed in places. 
There also are simply mistakes in determining the amounts of 
pensions and allowances, as a result of which the rights of some 
retirees are infringed. We see omissions and defects in the work 
of pension entities. Exactingness toward them has been raised. 
  The majority of military commissariats and finance and 
economic directorates of military districts have been reinforced 
by experienced officers of finance and pension entities by 
decision of the minister of defense in order to improve the 
quality of work of servicing retirees. In short, everything 
depending on us is being done and will be done to strengthen the 
social protection of Armed Forces veterans. 
  [Chekmarev] Vasiliy Vasilyevich, tell me, please, what 
social guarantees are envisaged for servicemen in case their 
health is harmed, and also for their families in case they are 
killed or die, for it is no secret that many Russians now serve 
in so-called "hot spots"? 
  [Vorobyev] I agree with you that many Russian 
servicemen presently are performing military duty honorably in 
areas with an unstable sociopolitical situation, under 
conditions of a state of emergency, and in regions where armed 
conflicts are taking place. In order to socially protect 
servicemen in case their health is harmed or to protect their 
families in case the breadwinner is killed or dies, the Russian 
Federation Law "On the Status of Servicemen" provides for state 
personal insurance. In accordance with this Law, insurance 
coverage norms which substantially strengthen the social 
protection of servicemen and their families were introduced 
beginning 1 March 1993 by decree of the Russian Federation 
government. 
  I will give just one example. In case a servicemen 
performing 
contract military service dies in the line of duty, his family, 
consisting of his wife, two children and parents, altogether 
will receive 125 times the base pay and allowances authorized 
the serviceman on the day of his death. 
  The procedure for completing documents and also for paying 
allowances and insurance is spelled out by the Russian 
Federation Minister of Defense Order of 6 May 1993. I would like 
to emphasize that it is the responsibility of the Military 
Insurance Company to make payments in accordance with the order 
I mentioned in order to shorten the time of paying the insurance 
sums so needed by families specifically at this moment. As of 
today, that insurance coverage answers the realities of the 
present moment. 
  The Military Insurance Company is joining more and more 
actively in the work of social protection of servicemen. To 
assist families with many children, it has transferred from its 
funds R50 million each to the Far East Military District and 
Northern Fleet and R75 million each to the Transbaykal Military 
District and Airborne Troops. The Military Insurance Company 
purchased 35 apartments for servicemen with an overall area of 
2,000 m[.sup]2[/], and other charitable acts are being 
carried out. Was such a thing really possible two or three years 
ago, when the Gosstrakh [Main Administration of State Insurance] 
"called the tune"?! Meanwhile, Army and Navy personnel still are 
making insufficient use of capabilities of the Military 
Insurance Company, although it can insure the lives of children 
and other members of the serviceman's family, a summer house, a 
car and much more. 
  [Chekmarev] Changes in the country's economy, the trend 
toward a reduction of defense expenditures and of the economic 
foundations of Russian Federation military doctrine dictate the 
need to perfect the mechanism for providing troops with arms, 
military equipment and other material-technical resources, and 
consequently also with finances, which are the circulatory 
system of the military economy. Our journal's readers would be 
interested in learning how the activity of the Armed Forces 
Finance Service will be transformed under market conditions. 
  [Vorobyev] You are right, the country's transition 
to market relations, the sharp reduction in defense 
expenditures, instability in allocating appropriations, and an 
expansion in Armed Forces relationships with enterprises and 
organizations with various forms of ownership require developing 
new approaches aimed at ensuring thrifty, rational use of 
resources being allocated for defense, especially for developing 
arms and military equipment programs and for capital 
construction. Successful performance of these tasks will be 
determined to a considerable extent by the status of economic 
activity at all levels of military management. 
  The Economic Service was established to develop and 
implement 
a unified economic and financial policy in the Armed Forces. Its 
tasks include performing an economic analysis of measures 
envisaged by basic provisions of Russian Federation military 
doctrine, forecasting military-economic decisions being made, 
and determining the economically substantiated need for 
appropriations for financing troops and naval forces and for 
socioeconomic development of enterprises and organizations 
engaged in industrial production and construction. The Economic 
Service is to function along with existing finance entities. 
Economic structures presently permeate all military management 
entities, beginning with formations. 
  [Chekmarev] In connection with the reduction in the 
Armed Forces, a considerable amount of arms, military equipment 
and property is being freed up. How does the Ministry of Defense 
plan to dispose of this wealth? 
  [Vorobyev] The Ministry of Defense is given the 
right to sell freed-up military property in accordance with 
Russian Federation Presidential Edict No 1518 of 30 December 
1992. In preparing the draft of this edict the Russian 
Goskomimushchestvo [State Committee for Administration of State 
Property] demanded that there be a maximum limitation on the 
number of persons engaged in sales to preclude instances of 
abuse in selling military property. In this connection it is 
permitted to sell Ministry of Defense property in the domestic 
market only through the Specialized State Cost-Accounting 
Enterprise, and in the foreign market exclusively through the 
Russian Federation Ministry of Defense Central Directorate of 
Material Resources and Foreign Economic Relations. 
  But it stands to reason that not all property will be sold 
directly to the national economy. A portion of it may be used 
only after presale preparation. In addition, arms and military 
equipment cannot be used directly in the national economy. For 
their effective use it is necessary to arrange for their parting 
and thorough conversion, using industrial enterprises. It is for 
these very purposes that special state programs are being 
developed for recycling arms and military equipment. 
  [Chekmarev] What are the main problems in selling and 
recycling arms, military equipment and property? 
  [Vorobyev] Improving the sales mechanism, for 
example. At the present time a considerable portion of military 
property is being sold on the exchanges, but used property, as 
you realize, is not considered exchange goods. The auction form 
of trading in property should have been developed to a greater 
extent, but unfortunately the advantages of auctions are not 
being used to the full extent for now. The question is being 
examined of organizing small wholesale and retail trade stores, 
which in our opinion will allow simplifying the very process of 
selling property. Today that process requires completing a 
considerable number of documents, which gives buyers of products 
certain inconveniences. 
  [Chekmarev] Vasiliy Vasilyevich, the final question: 
What is the role of fiscal control under conditions of market 
relations? 
  [Vorobyev] Under conditions of a reduction in the 
Armed Forces and the country's transition to market relations, 
the main task of fiscal control was to monitor fulfillment of 
Russian Federation Presidential Edicts, Russian government 
decrees and instructions, and Russian Federation minister of 
defense orders and directives on financial and economic matters, 
to monitor observance of state and financial discipline in 
expending funds, and to monitor timely, correct financial 
support to Army and Navy combat readiness. 
  A basic direction of control is the study of causes of 
deficiencies and disruptions in financial and economic activity, 
prevention of excesses and mismanagement in expending funds and 
supplies, development of proposals for improving financial and 
economic activity, and assistance to commanders and chiefs in 
organizing and managing finances. 
  Under present conditions, when commerce and, let's put it 
this way, illegal entrepreneurial activity of some heads of 
military force elements is actively penetrating the Armed Forces 
economy, Finance Service inspectors are faced with new problems 
concerning a check of the legality of this activity and 
computation of the amounts of damage and losses which our Armed 
Forces suffer because of this. Such commercial and 
entrepreneurial activity has assumed especially wide scope in 
the Air Force, Navy (Pacific, Baltic and Northern fleets) and 
GLAVTU [Main Transportation Directorate]. 
  Materials of audits and inspections of financial and 
economic 
activity of various military force elements indicate that a 
number of officials are taking advantage of connivance and the 
absence of control and are using aircraft for transporting 
commercial cargoes, personal cars and passengers. As a result, 
earned funds did not end up in the cash boxes of military units, 
but accumulated in the accounts of commercial organizations, 
which did material damage of many millions of rubles to the 
state. 
  During 1992-1993 a number of Air Force servicemen illegally 
were founders or held leadership positions in commercial 
structures. This is clear nonfulfillment of the Russian 
Federation Law "On the Status of Servicemen"... 
  Many violations have been uncovered by audits and 
inspections 
in connection with the sale of automotive and aviation equipment 
to outside organizations and commercial structures. Control over 
legality of operations and proper establishment of prices is not 
being carried out and the sale was made at underestimated 
prices, which was one of the reasons for material damage being 
done to the state. 
  Rather serious violations in commercial and business 
activity 
were uncovered, for example, in the Directorate of the 
Commander, Military Space Forces and in military units 
subordinate to him. 
  I would like to note that control and audit entities and 
Finance Service inspectors maintain close contact with entities 
of the military procuracy in their practical work. Based on 
materials of audits and inspections, criminal proceedings have 
been and are being instituted against guilty persons. 
  A number of orders of the minister of defense, commanders in 
chief of branches of the Armed Forces, commanders of military 
districts and fleets, and chiefs of main and central 
directorates of the Ministry of Defense have been issued based 
on results of audits and inspections. Guilty officials are being 
held strictly liable disciplinarily as well as financially. 
  The organization and accomplishment of control is a very 
important function of the Finance Service. In connection with 
this, it is necessary to continue the search for ways of 
improving it and raising its quality. The main efforts should 
henceforth be aimed at preventing financial violations and 
giving practical help in troop activity locally. And of course, 
the demand on officials who have allowed violations in use of 
funds and supplies must be strict, in accordance with demands of 
the laws. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Voyenno-ekonomicheskiy zhurnal", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46622 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> REAR SERVICES, SUPPORT ISSUES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Status of Black Sea Fleet Logistics </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Status of Black Sea Fleet Logistics </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0440B Moscow TYL VOORUZHENNYKH SIL VOYENNO 
EKONOMICHESKIY ZHURNAL in Russian No 2, Feb 1994 (signed to </F>



<TEXT>
press 26 Jan 94) pp 31-35 
<F P=103> 94UM0440B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow TYL VOORUZHENNYKH SIL VOYENNO 
EKONOMICHESKIY ZHURNAL </F>

<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Rear Admiral B. Bogdanov, deputy commander for </F>
Rear, chief of Fleet Rear of Black Sea Fleet, under rubric "Army 
and Navy Rear": "A Special Fleet in a Special Period"] 
  [Text] The Black Sea Fleet performs missions in its 
operational zone as a component part of the Russian Federation 
Navy. The missions are responsible and important and are aimed 
at achieving peace, tranquility and stability of the political 
situation in the given region. 
  Keeping Fleet forces in constant readiness and success of 
performing combat missions largely depend on the status of 
logistic and technical support systems, i.e., they are 
determined by the capacities and capability of these systems to 
bring permanent readiness forces up to full allowances of arms, 
ammunition, fuel and other supplies in a short time and carry 
out mobilization and deployment of Fleet forces in the logistic 
sense. 
  What are the features of functioning of the Black Sea Fleet 
logistic support system today? Above all it is the Black Sea 
Fleet's simultaneous operational subordination to two 
Presidents--of Russia and Ukraine. Fleet rear units and 
establishments are on the territory of two sovereign states, 
experiencing the painful process of reorganization of the 
economic base of CIS states and all complexities of the 
transition of their economy to market relations and of the break 
in economic ties. Financial resources for military expenditures 
have been reduced considerably and centralized deliveries of 
supplies have stopped. Regional conflicts (Georgia, Moldova, 
Abkhazia) have affected us directly. 
  Despite all difficulties and problems, the alignment, 
composition and manning of the Fleet rear, the availability of 
supplies and their echelonment as a whole for 1992-1993 
permitted supporting Fleet forces with everything necessary and 
getting prescribed standards of allowances to each seaman, 
warrant officer and officer. Along with performing missions 
inherent to it, the Fleet rear has performed much work to 
fulfill Russian government assignments. An operation was carried 
out to evacuate servicemen's families and the civilian 
population from Abkhazia, Poti and Batumi. A total of around 
50,000 persons were evacuated. Tens of thousands of tonnes of 
stockpiles were evacuated from the territory of Georgia and a 
peacemaking mission of Black Sea Fleet ships and naval infantry 
to the city of Poti was successfully supported to protect lines 
of transportation. 
  The operation of all rear elements was and is continuing to 
be carried out in an extremely unstable political and economic 
situation in the Crimea and Ukraine. The absence of a precise 
legal status of the Black Sea Fleet and of course of a 
legislative and legal base both for the Fleet as a whole as well 
as for the personnel and for servicemen's families is having an 
especially negative effect on the activity of rear entities. 
Together with Ukraine's discriminatory laws and with the 
constant ideological pressure on Fleet personnel and their 
families, the inaction of Russian Federation laws "On Defense," 
On the Status of Servicemen," "On Military Obligation and 
Military Service" and "On Pension Support to Persons Who Have 
Performed Military Service...," especially with respect to 
provisions on social protection and benefits and against the 
background of old social problems which remained, engenders a 
feeling of uncertainty about tomorrow and apathy in many. 
  And the duality of Black Sea Fleet operational subordination 
is causing serious problems and difficulties in timely, complete 
support of Fleet ships and units with supplies. The chief 
problem is that the procedure for financing and supplying the 
Fleet has not been worked out or defined up to the present time. 
The Yalta agreements between Ukraine and Russia are being 
violated unilaterally by Ukraine and are leading to disruption 
of centralized deliveries of supplies coming from Russia. 
  Thus, new Ukrainian customs rules placed in force as of 1 
April 1993 provide for a 0.15 percent customs duty on military 
cargoes; financial resources have not been allocated for these 
needs. Ukraine is taking enormous funds from the Fleet in the 
form of a tax on land (13 billion karbovantsy for 1993), which 
is leading to actual disruption of Black Sea Fleet financing. 
Officers and warrant officers arriving from Russia for duty in 
the Black Sea Fleet pay 300,000 karbovantsy each, i.e., almost 
one month's pay, for customs inspection of containers of 
household goods. Ten dollars, or this amount in karbovantsy at 
the bank rate of exchange, is collected for each flight of 
aircraft from the territory of Russia to the Black Sea Fleet. 
Five dollars is collected for each customs worker arriving to 
inspect the aircraft, and it is based on double rates if this 
occurs on days off or holidays. 
  Pay for Fleet servicemen in karbovantsy is much below the 
financial support to Russian Armed Forces servicemen in real 
buying power. Compare. The pay of a Black Sea Fleet officer is 
$15-20 according to the local rate of exchange. Benefits 
envisaged for a serviceman by Russian laws are not being applied 
in the Black Sea Fleet up to the present time. The Fleet has a 
colossal debt for fuel, food, electrical energy and water. Power 
and water supply agencies disconnect garrisons and housing areas 
where thousands of people live for systematic nonpayment of 
accounts. All the above leads to a strained social situation in 
the Fleet. 
  The established 50-percent support of the Fleet in equal 
proportions by Russia and Ukraine is not being upheld. The main 
reserves of supplies come basically from Russia. Thus, while 81 
percent of fuel oil, 88 percent of diesel fuel, 75 percent of 
aviation kerosene, and 67 percent of clothing and related gear 
were supplied from Russia in 1992, 100 percent of fuel oil, 
diesel fuel, clothing and related gear, and equipment came from 
Russia in 1993. In August of last year Ukraine unilaterally 
stopped all financial support of the Black Sea Fleet. The Fleet 
rear is supported only by Russia, which once again confirms that 
only an economically highly developed state is capable of 
maintaining and supporting the Navy and keeping its combat 
readiness at a sufficient level. 
  The reduction in the Armed Forces, reorganization of the 
country's economic base, and the need for increasing the 
effectiveness of work by rear units and establishments in the 
course of military reform dictate the advisability of 
accelerating a transition to a system of supporting Black Sea 
Fleet forces on a territorial principle. The main content of 
this principle must be an increase in responsibility and 
effectiveness of using rear units and establishments existing in 
peacetime for autonomous, reliable support of Fleet forces by 
making fixed bases, depots, and transportation, repair and other 
rear establishments into primary ones and investing them with 
additional rights and obligations. 
  The essence of the territorial principle of logistic support 
of Fleet forces is that a rear grouping deployed in a designated 
basing area supports all ships, units and formations performing 
missions in or near the given area, i.e., they are assigned to 
the corresponding rear grouping for support. The territorial 
(zonal) support system permits concentrating all Fleet forces 
and assets and all resources, maneuvering them flexibly and 
using them effectively in full accordance with the 
operational-rear situation. 
  Fleet rear departments, on whose basis we propose to 
establish Fleet logistic and technical support areas without 
increasing the numerical strength of the management apparatus, 
are the basis of the territorial system of Black Sea Fleet 
logistic support. In peacetime this will permit reducing the 
time periods for delivering supplies to consumers, organizing 
centralized supply, simplifying the system of records and 
accounts, increasing effectiveness of control over support to 
Fleet forces, and also using the local economic base most 
advisably. Most important, the alignment of the peacetime rear 
will correspond to the operational alignment of Fleet forces in 
the initial period of war. 
  And in wartime this will enable distributing and sheltering 
supplies promptly, increasing the survivability and autonomy of 
the system of logistic support to Fleet forces, improving the 
effectiveness of command and control of the rear and, of course, 
ensuring stability of the system of logistic support to Fleet 
forces because of the fixed base. 
  Subordinating the management entities performing logistic, 
technical, transportation, medical and basing support functions 
to one official must be the basic principle of operational 
development of the Navy rear. It is necessary to observe the 
unity of administrative and functional subordination. With 
consideration of this principle, in my view it is necessary to 
concentrate forces and assets in the makeup of rear management 
entities in fleets, naval bases and formations to perform tasks 
of providing all kinds of supplies; repairing ships, weapons, 
arms and equipment; providing basing and medical and other kinds 
of logistic support; and providing means of transportation for 
military movements and delivery of supplies. 
  The history of Navy development shows that the rear was 
centralized and unified for a lengthy period of many centuries. 
History itself moves us to conclude the presence of a stable 
trend, tested by war experience and peacetime combat training, 
toward development and perfection of a centralized, unified rear 
in the center and in the fleets, and a unified fleet logistic 
and technical support system. 
  Wherein does the positiveness of a unified fleet rear 
structure lie? First of all, under a unified command element the 
rear accomplishes a mutually coordinated, comprehensive, and 
complete integrated support of fleet forces in all zones and 
areas of support, which contributes to more effective and 
precise use of forces and assets. 
  Secondly, it meets requirements for centralized delivery of 
supplies, permitting performance of assigned missions with a 
lesser detail of forces and assets. 
  Thirdly, it permits increasing, in a logistic sense, the 
autonomy of combat force groupings by creating integrated, 
autonomous support subsystems in individual areas and on 
specific axes, which creates favorable conditions for 
performance of support missions by available peacetime forces 
and assets with the sudden beginning of combat operations. 
  The division of the rear which occurred in 1989 and the 
removal from its makeup of organs of technical and engineer 
support, medical service, military transportation service and 
armored service created difficulties in planning and 
accomplishing logistic support to forces, especially with the 
establishment of rear groupings for integrated support. Alas, 
planning and implementation of these plans were under the 
purview of two entities subordinate to each other. In essence, 
the unified system of integrated logistic and technical support 
was disrupted. The division of the rear occurred only at the 
fleet level; the organizational structure of formations and 
units did not undergo changes. As a result, the principle of 
identity of organizational structure at all levels of the fleet 
rear was violated. 
  The breakup of the rear complicated command and control of 
logistic support forces and assets in peacetime (especially with 
a transfer to a wartime footing). Therefore we propose to 
establish a Fleet rear organizational structure in the Black Sea 
Fleet that unites logistic, technical and engineer support 
forces and assets under a unified command of the Fleet chief of 
rear. 
  Successful functioning of the Fleet logistic support system 
is impossible without means of transportation. 
  The low strength level of basic types of vessels negatively 
affects the possibilities of support to Fleet forces in ocean 
and forward logistic support zones, at mobile basing facilities, 
at supply facilities, and at permanent station facilities of the 
Black Sea Fleet main logistic support zone. The auxiliary fleet 
has a special need for universal artillery ammunition carriers, 
marine dry-cargo carriers, technical tankers, seagoing harbor 
tugs, and water carriers. And in the future the construction of 
comprehensive and special support ships (vessels) with a fleet 
speed of 20-24 knots, of air-cushion transport vehicles (boats) 
with a speed of 80-100 knots and hydrofoils with a speed of 
50-60 knots is needed. This will allow increasing the 
operational use factor of vessels and lowering the need for them 
by 1.5-2 times, i.e., reducing the need for vessels and 
realizing the principle of preferential use of the floating rear 
in supporting ship groupings by increasing quality parameters. 
  An extremely serious situation has taken shape with 
auxiliary 
fleet ship repair. Today vessels are being operated with expired 
periods between repairs and periods between drydockings. The 
actual percentage of ship repair support in 1992 was 30. Because 
of the absence of financing, the question of accommodating 
vessels for repair has not been resolved up to the present time. 
  With the present nature of warfare, the effectiveness of all 
kinds of operations and combat operations of naval forces 
depends to an even greater degree on reliability of their 
logistic support. An analysis shows that the volume of logistic 
support in modern operations is growing by approximately 10-15 
times compared with the Great Patriotic War period. In 
conducting combat operations it is necessary to replenish 
supplies, above all of weapons and fuel. 
  The existing system of storing supplies in the Fleet shows 
that norms in force for dispersal and echelonment of unit-level 
operational supplies are not being sustained. 
  A high concentration of supplies in categorized cities with 
a 
low degree of their shelter in protected structures can lead to 
great losses in the very first days of war, since dispersing 
considerable volumes of weapons and supplies in short time 
periods is a very complicated task. The basic cause of the 
unfavorable state of affairs with dispersal and shelter of 
supplies is the poor state of Fleet support with depot spaces 
and fuel tanks. This means the status of the material-technical 
base for storing supplies in the Fleet does not conform to rates 
of development of Fleet needs, which in turn is determined by 
the absence of necessary funds for construction materials and 
poor capabilities of Fleet construction organizations. 
  A serious situation has formed with echelonment of supplies 
in the first echelon--on ships and in units and formations. The 
lowering of reserves in the troop rear due to a shortage or 
absence of depot spaces not only affects the combat readiness of 
unit and formations, but also in the final account leads to a 
disruption of the entire system of echeloning supplies in the 
Fleet and to an overloading of Fleet depots and fuel bases with 
unit-level supplies to the detriment of their containing 
operational-level supplies. 
  The lag of the material-technical base behind the 
quantitative and qualitative development of Fleet combat forces 
is a stable trend in the Black Sea Fleet, which is showing up 
especially at the present time. While in their development based 
on the newest achievements of science and technology, combat 
forces are at the level of the 1990's for many qualitative 
parameters, the material-technical base is at the level (yes, 
yes!) of the 1960's and 1970's. This relates above all to the 
basing system, to the ship and vessel repair and drydocking 
base, and to the presence and status of storage areas and tanks 
for keeping weapons, ammunition, equipment, fuel, provisions and 
other supplies. As a result of the insufficient capacity of the 
material-technical base, ship and vessel repair and drydocking 
time periods increase. The incomplete state of support involving 
storage areas and tanks does not permit keeping stockpiles in 
necessary amounts and leads to their losses and to a decrease in 
survivability of reserves. 
  The principal direction for solving this problem is the 
elimination of disproportions between the development of Fleet 
combat forces and development of the material-technical base. 
Development of the rear should be constantly balanced with 
consideration of quantitative and qualitative changes in the 
order of battle of Fleet forces and in its combat assets, arms 
and equipment. These changes should occur simultaneously and 
even with a certain lead time for entry into the Fleet of rear 
equipment needed for supporting new ships and for preparing and 
delivering weapons and other supplies. Realization of this 
direction can be achieved only by increasing the funds for 
development of the material base at the expense of a 
quantitative and qualitative reduction in the construction of 
new ships and by excluding obsolete ones from the Fleet makeup. 
  In my view, it is advisable to bring the material-technical 
base into line with needs for supporting forces along the 
following directions: 

  -  ensuring a proportional ratio between combat forces and 
their supporting forces (assets). Under conditions of a 
reduction in numerical strength of the Armed Forces, this ratio 
should be changed in the interests of the rear already in 
peacetime. In developing a long-range program for Navy 
development it is advisable to develop and provide for a ratio 
of 1.0-0.8 between combat forces and the rear; 
  -  achieving an outstripping development of rear equipment and 
armament, i.e., it is advisable to apply the principle that new 
rear equipment should be created and enter the Fleet before new 
ships and aircraft are included in the order of battle; 
  -  a balanced development of the shore (fixed and mobile), 
floating (surface, underwater and amphibious) and airmobile 
rear; 
  -  creating technical equipment on ships (vessels, transports) 
that supports mass, rapid transfer of cargoes from vessels 
(transports) to ships, and also the loading and unloading of 
vessels off an austere beach. 


    An improvement in the rear management system is impossible 
without accelerated establishment of an automated system for 
managing the Navy rear; without modelling logistic support 
processes using modern operations research methods permitting 
choice of the optimum option based on an evaluation of 
alternative options of decisions and logistic support plans; and 
without introducing methods of military and economic 
substantiation and forecasting of the directions of rear 
development and methods of a military and economic evaluation of 
rear operational and combat training measures. Realization of 
the main directions for development of the Fleet rear in 
peacetime will help attain stable logistic support of Fleet 
forces. 
  The Fleet rear has considerable plans. Would that energy, 
knowledge and persistence were enough. We must create a highly 
developed territorial system of support for the Black Sea Fleet 
meeting the defensive nature of military doctrine and the 
adopted structure of the national economy, ensuring effective 
satisfaction with everything necessary for life, everyday 
routine and combat training in peacetime and contributing to the 
buildup of the rear's forces and assets in a short time when it 
is mobilized and placed in full combat readiness. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Voyenno-ekonomicheskiy zhurnal", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46623 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Leaders Comment on Black Sea Fleet Division, Ukraine's </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Leaders Comment on Black Sea Fleet Division, Ukraine's </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Interests 
<H4>    Navy Commander Bezkorovaynyy Interviewed </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0459A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 1 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0459A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Ukrainian Navy Commander-in-Chief </F>
Vice-Admiral Volodymyr Herasymovych Bezkorovaynyy by NARODNA 
ARMIYA special correspondents Captain 2nd Rank Yuriy Kondratyev 
and Captain 2nd Rank Oleksandr Shcherbakov, Sevastopol: 
"Ukrainian Navy Commander-in-Chief Vice-Admiral Volodymyr 
Bezkorovaynyy: `The Problems of the Black Sea Fleet Are Being 
Resolved. The Naval Forces Are Being Replenished With New 
Cadres'"] 
  [Text] The latest round of negotiations of government 
delegations from Ukraine and Russia, headed by Yukhin 
Zvyahinskyy and Viktor Chornomyrdinyy, on the fate of the Black 
Sea Fleet have concluded in Moscow. 
  As in Sevastopol during the meeting of the ministers of 
defense of Ukraine and Russia, a final and mutually acceptable 
solution was still not able to be reached, but the negotiations 
will be continued in a few days. 
  The military delegation of Ukraine at the meeting in 
Moscow was Deputy Minister of Defense of Ukraine Colonel-General 
Ivan Bizhan, Commander-in-Chief of the Ukrainian Navy [VMSU] 
Vice-Admiral Volodymyr Bezkorovaynyy and the VMSU Operations 
Directorate Chief Rear-Admiral Viktor Fomin. 
  Vice-Admiral Volodymyr Bezkorovaynyy answered the 
questions of our correspondents immediately after his return to 
Sevastopol. 
  [Kondratyev, Shcherbakov] Volodymyr Herasymovych, the latest 
round of negotiations pertaining to the Black Sea Fleet have 
unfortunately ended with their postponement. But doesn't there 
have to be some resolution? 
  [V.H. Bezkorovaynyy] Yes, there has to be a resolution, and 
there will be. There is still no conceptual framework, however, 
that would satisfy both Ukraine and Russia. But there is much, I 
am confident, that will be accomplished by the delegations over 
the time until the next round, and our positions will move even 
closer together. I want to emphasize that the negotiations on 
the fate of the Black Sea Fleet are proceeding in constructive 
fashion for the first time, even though there are plenty of 
mutual claims. 
  [Kondratyev, Shcherbakov] What were the initial positions of 
the parties to the negotiations? 
  [V.H. Bezkorovaynyy] The Moscow Resolution of the presidents 
of Ukraine and Russia regarding the division of the Black Sea 
Fleet and the gradual split of the forces was made inherent in 
them. The data worked out by the military delegations in 
Sevastopol have become the base data on the vessel inventory. 
Our figures and the Russian ones, true, differed when they were 
put forward. The reason is that we did not have time to confirm 
the lists of ships in Sevastopol. The April negotiations, you 
may recall, were broken off suddenly. The military experts of 
the Black Sea Fleet that are part of the Russian delegation have 
now advanced new data with regard to the numerical composition 
of the ships in the fleet. We will return to this question and 
continue to coordinate it. 
  The aircraft and shore troops of the Black Sea Fleet will 
also be divided "fifty--fifty" in accordance with the Yalta 
agreement. 
  The most problematical issue in the negotiations is the 
basing of the fleets and the use of the infrastructure. It is 
too early to comment on that; it has not been worked out. 
  [Kondratyev, Shcherbakov] Volodymyr Herasymovych, you may 
recall that the Minister of Defense of Russia, General of the 
Army Grachev, stated in Sevastopol that the negotiations on the 
Black Sea Fleet could last into eternity with the Ukrainian 
approach to them. How would you comment on that statement? 
  [V.H. Bezkorovaynyy] The Moscow meeting proved that the work 
of both the Russian and the Ukrainian parties is being conducted 
in the required channels. Ukraine has a mutually accepted 
formula that permits the preservation of all constitutional 
provisions connected with the sovereignty and territorial 
integrity of the state. An enormous number of legal and economic 
aspects must be taken into account. 
  I have said earlier, and will emphasize again, that we are 
discussing deeply the details at the negotiations on the fate of 
the Black Sea Fleet for the first time. Because any political 
problem that is resolved from above but has not been worked out 
at the technical level will always be declarative, as it was 
before. The fact that we are working on each object in the fleet 
that is subject to division in profound and concrete fashion is 
a cause for optimism today. 
  [Kondratyev, Shcherbakov] What, in your opinion, is the 
difference between the negotiations in Sevastopol and Moscow? 
  [V.H. Bezkorovaynyy] The difference is that the Russian 
delegation has taken a clear-cut position for the first time in 
Moscow. They have been discussing the questions that came up in 
Sevastopol for the first time. It is felt from everything that 
the delegation has the aim of resolving the problem of the Black 
Sea Fleet. 
  [Kondratyev, Shcherbakov] The Minister of Defense of 
Ukraine, 
General of the Army of Ukraine Vitaliy Radetskyy, stated in 
Sevastopol that the servicemen of the Ukrainian Navy would be 
receiving the same pay as the sailors of the Black Sea Fleet. At 
what stage of resolution is that question? 
  [V.H. Bezkorovaynyy] That question has been coordinated with 
the government of Ukraine. It remains only to resolve the 
problem of the Black Sea Fleet. I think that the signing of an 
agreement on the fleet and an increase in pay for our sailors 
will coincide. 
  [Kondratyev, Shcherbakov] Draftees are coming into the Black 
Sea Fleet today only from Russia. How do you regard that fact on 
the eve of the division of the fleet? 
  [V.H. Bezkorovaynyy] I feel that it should be regarded just 
as it is. 
  [Kondratyev, Shcherbakov] The negotiations in Moscow on the 
fate of the Black Sea Fleet coincided with the well-known 
decision of the Crimean parliament and the unprecedented state 
of mind that is being fanned by the mass media... 
  [V.H. Bezkorovaynyy] The literally explosive situation on 
the 
peninsula has been created by those forces for which it is 
advantageous. Even Minister of Defense of Russia General of the 
Army Pavel Grachev has been drawn into the swirl of 
disinformation. I met with journalists from Ostankino. Even 
those people, with their particular approach to covering the 
situation in the Crimea, were struck by the unbridled nature of 
the sources of information, or rather disinformation. 
  The situation in the Crimea is calm, and is being monitored. 
There is no objective data regarding a worsened situation. 
Everyone needs to calm down and stop "making waves." I have to 
say on this account that several days ago there was scarcely any 
explosive situation in Izmayil. It was done by the hand of one 
person alone. 
  The commander of a brigade of river vessels of the Black Sea 
Fleet, very "relaxed," started issuing commands for which 
epaulets were removed during the times of the USSR. Sounding the 
alarm, he shifted the formation to heightened readiness. He did, 
in short, wholly intolerable things that even his subordinates 
did not accept, and they were forced to calm down their furious 
commander. 
  It seems to me that this occurred owing to the aggravation 
of 
the situation in the Crimea. Remember the television and 
newspaper "canards" about thousands of Ukrainian special-forces 
troops that had landed on the peninsula? This was funny and sad 
at the same time. This information, if I can call it that, after 
all, had a very strong impact on the nerves. The figure of 
60,000 special-forces troops was bandied about in the press. But 
what were these special forces? They were a specific subunit, 
very small in size. The number of these specialists in any 
nation is tens or, at a maximum, hundreds of people, or in any 
case not more than a thousand. You would only get 60,000 people 
if you added up the numbers of the Black Sea Fleet, the armed 
forces of Ukraine, the police and National Guard in Crimea 
anyway. So there was nothing for the Crimeans to be worried 
about. 
  [Kondratyev, Shcherbakov] Volodymyr Herasymovych, let us 
return to the affairs of the Ukrainian Navy. What were the 
results of the winter training period? 
  [V.H. Bezkorovaynyy] We recently summarized the results. A 
commission of the General Staff was working on it. The 
evaluations that we assigned to the formations, units and ships 
were confirmed. I personally regard the fulfillment of the plan 
for the winter period as successful. This was thanks to the fact 
that the staffs prepared the aircraft and shore troops well, we 
were supplied with fuel and the ships went out to sea. 
  [Kondratyev, Shcherbakov] The shipbuilding program has been 
lost to view under all of the political events. What ships will 
be joining the navy in the near future? 
  [V.H. Bezkorovaynyy] The missile cruiser Ukrayina and an 
air-cushion assault ship will be joining the force composition 
this year. A small hydrofoil ASW ship is virtually finished. 
  [Kondratyev, Shcherbakov] The idea is circulating that the 
Ukrainian Navy does not need the Ukrayina, and it could be 
bought by Russia. 
  [V.H. Bezkorovaynyy] If we had a considerable selection of 
ships, then we certainly could talk about that. But since we do 
not have such a selection today, we can make use of this 
cruiser. As for "buying" it, I feel that Russia is not able to 
do that. It has not found either the forces or the funds to 
finish the aircraft carrier Varyag that is at Mykolayiv. The 
cost of finishing off the Varyag is equivalent to the cost of 
the cruiser Ukrayina. 
  The Varyag has been abandoned, so the question of finishing 
it (I speak as an expert) has passed forever, even though some 
political figures of Russia, visiting Sevastopol, have announced 
that they are ready to buy the whole Black Sea Fleet, Sevastopol 
and a portion of Crimea all together right now. If they are that 
rich, why can't they buy an unfinished ship? Why can't they 
finish the repairs of ASW ships at our yards? Why are they not 
able to pay for the overhaul of ships in Bulgaria and pay others 
for the repair of a single ship? The question of finances is 
just as difficult for Russia as for us. The Varyag will most 
likely go for scrap, while the Ukrayina will "float." 
  [Kondratyev, Shcherbakov] We also hope that the Ukrainian 
Navy will soon become a mighty force, able to defend the 
interests of the state at sea. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46624 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Leaders Comment on Black Sea Fleet Division, Ukraine's </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Leaders Comment on Black Sea Fleet Division, Ukraine's </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Interests 
<H4>    Deputy Commander Ryzhenko Reviews History of Conflict </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0459B Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 4 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0459B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Rear-Admiral Oleksiy Ryzhenko, chief of staff </F>
and first deputy commander-in-chief of the Ukrainian Navy: "The 
Statements Are Reassuring, the Actions Are Dangerous--Once 
Again on the Myths and Realities Surrounding the Black Sea 
Fleet"] 
  [Text] The development of events lately has induced me to 
return to the topic to which my prior article, under the title 
"The Black Sea Fleet: Myths and Realities," was devoted. It made 
an attempt to dispel only one myth--the supposedly high combat 
readiness of the Black Sea Fleet and its ability to defend the 
interests not only of Russia, but also of Ukraine at the 
southern maritime boundaries. 
  In the article offered here I would like to dwell once again 
on some of the persistently widespread myths surrounding the 
Black Sea Fleet, and express my own view of the realities. 
  Since the time the state sovereignty of Ukraine was 
proclaimed, the command of the Navy of the Russian Federation 
and the Black Sea Fleet, many political figures in Russia and 
some highly placed officials in the Crimea and Sevastopol, 
Russian and pro-Russian, and the mass media so inclined, have 
obsessively and purposefully tried to instill in the 
consciousness of the citizenry the idea that Ukraine does not 
need its own Navy, that its interests, like the interests of 
Russia in the southern maritime regions, are soundly protected 
by the Black Sea Fleet. 
  My prior article discussed the emptiness of that assertion 
because of the poor fighting ability of the Black Sea Fleet, 
which is continuing to grow weaker, and its poor current and 
future combat readiness. That is just one side of the coin, and 
not even the main one. The main one is the fact, as practice 
shows, that the Black Sea Fleet has not once in the last two 
years shown itself to be disposed in a friendly manner toward 
Ukraine, to be passionate about its sovereignty and state 
interests. Its command and certain structures, including such as 
the editors of the newspaper FLAG RODINY, the press center and 
some others, are constantly spreading--among the personnel and 
inhabitants of Sevastopol, Crimea and outside its boundaries--an 
exclusively negative attitude toward Ukraine and its armed 
forces, especially the Navy. This frenzied anti-Ukrainian 
propaganda, often based on shameless lies and disinformation, is 
growing stronger. It is not for nothing that the Minister of 
Defense of Ukraine was recently forced to declare that the press 
center of the Black Sea Fleet, in being transferred to the 
territory of Ukraine, was waging direct subversive activity 
against it. 
  The command of the Black Sea Fleet, while constantly 
professing its readiness to protect the interests of Ukraine, 
acts quite the contrary when even small practical steps are 
required of it. When, for example, a mine was discovered 
recently at the mouth of the Danube, they refused passage to the 
Ukrainians to disarm it. The same thing had occurred in the 
Black Sea Fleet before, when ordnance was found on the territory 
of Holland. One cannot count on the Black Sea Fleet, as we see, 
even on such issues. But the events in Odessa and many other 
instances provide convincing grounds to conclude that even 
today, when the Black Sea Fleet is still the joint property of 
the two states, Ukraine not only cannot count on the protection 
of its interests, but is also itself in need of protection 
against its provocative and unfriendly actions. And what will 
happen when it becomes the property of Russia alone? 
  The situation that has taken shape in Crimea and Sevastopol 
shows that anti-Ukrainian political forces see in the Black Sea 
Fleet solid support for their attempts to violate the 
territorial integrity of Ukraine and separate the Crimea from 
it. The Black Sea Fleet command is not only not impeding the 
dragging of the fleet into political intrigues, but is even 
encouraging them and serving as an example of them themselves. 
  The command of the Navy of the Russian Federation and the 
Black Sea Fleet, trying in every way possible to discredit the 
Ministry of Defense of Ukraine and its Navy, accusing them of 
supposedly forcibly resubordinating some of the subunits and 
units of the Black Sea Fleet to themselves. Matters have even 
come to such absurd assertions as, they say, an officer of the 
Ukrainian Navy has in some way resubordinated more than a 
hundred units and subunits. They are quite silent about the 
"prigrabization" actions of the Black Sea Fleet therein. Those, 
meanwhile, are quite striking, and were launched much earlier, 
back in 1992. They are being carried out in three 
directions--seizing what is others', moving things to the 
Russian Federation, and selling things off. 
  The Black Sea Fleet, in unilateral fashion grossly violating 
the agreements that had been reached earlier between Ukraine and 
Russia, grabbed--so that they would not get into the armed 
forces of Ukraine--all of the units and subunits in the Black 
Sea region that used to be subordinate not to it, but rather to 
the USSR Ministry of Defense and the Naval Main Staff--that is, 
to central elements. 
  That fate befell, for example, the test center in Feodosiya 
with its subordinate units stationed on a territory of 256 
hectares. A shipyard in the same Feodosiya, which occupies an 
area of more than 30 hectares. The Metalist shipyard in the city 
of Balaklava was seized, with grounds of close to six hectares 
that belonged to it. In Sevastopol they include the 13th 
Shipyard (16.2 hectares), the missile and artillery weaponry 
repair plant (7.4 hectares), and certain design bureaus (0.72 
hectares). 
  The naval planning institutes, the general-contractor 
administration of the chiefs of operations, ZBI plants, plants 
for metallic structural elements, the directorate for production 
and engineering equipment and many other facilities of the navy 
of the former USSR in Sevastopol, Yalta, Yevpatoriya, Myrnyy, 
Sakakh and other garrisons passed to the possession of the Black 
Sea Fleet in the same manner. 
  The Black Sea Fleet began the redeployment of a number of 
ships and vessels and the removal of valuable equipment and 
property to the Russian Federation as early as February of 1992. 
Decoding gear whose estimated value is approximately 120 million 
dollars was removed from Odessa. 
  Three special vehicles of the medical service were sent to 
Moscow in May of 1992, along with five UAZ vehicles from the 
inviolable reserves of the Black Sea Fleet chemical service in 
Novorossiysk. An experimental submarine was sent for repairs in 
November, and has not returned to the Black Sea Fleet. 
  A similar practice of replenishing the other fleets of 
Russia 
at the expense of the Black Sea Fleet has continued in 1993 as 
well. Two assault craft and the VOKhR command of the Black Sea 
Fleet air forces were relocated from Sevastopol to Novorossiysk 
in May. A small ASW ship went to the Northern Fleet. This is a 
far from complete list of the transfers of forces and funds of 
the Black Sea Fleet to Russia without the consent of the 
Ukrainians. That is how the Black Sea Fleet is "protecting" the 
interests of Ukraine. 
  Seventy percent of the facilities from the system of 
communications gear uniting the 170 laboratories of the Black 
Sea Fleet have been commercially leased since the start of 1992 
by their chief, Colonel V. Kostrov. The Samarkand small 
enterprise was given a hectare of land at Kozachiy Bay for the 
organization of its production the same month by decision of the 
Black Sea Fleet command. 
  Eleven motor vehicles that belonged to the Black Sea Fleet 
medical service were sold to commercial structures for 300,000 
rubles apiece in August of 1992, with the sanction of the 
commander of the Black Sea Fleet. The commander of the Black Sea 
Fleet approved a purchase-and-sale agreement for a fleet 
facility for 60 million rubles the same month. 
  The commander of the Black Sea Fleet issued a directive for 
the refitting and sale of two motor vehicles of the chemical 
service of the Black Sea Fleet through the 115 traffic service 
offices in October of 1992. 
  The chief of the OFI of the Black Sea Fleet gave written 
permission in 1992 to the Akhtiar small enterprise to sell as 
scrap metal four decommissioned submarines on which the removal 
of equipment containing non-ferrous metals, including precious 
metals, had not even been carried out. 
  Two submarines and the PS Kuban that had been repaired in 
Bulgaria were left in that country, supposedly in payment for 
debt, in 1993 by decision of the deputy commander-in-chief of 
the Navy. 
  The Donbass exploratory vessel was sold to commercial 
structures that same year. 
  Ukraine is to receive 50 percent of the funds from the sale 
of Black Sea Fleet property in accordance with the international 
agreements. It has not received a single kopeck, however. That 
is how the Russian admirals show their "concern" for the 
interests of Ukraine and the combat readiness of the Black Sea 
Fleet; while selling off the Black Sea Fleet, they are noisily 
shouting that the Ukrainian Navy is encroaching on it, 
constantly increasing tensions so as to hide their dishonorable 
deeds. That is why they have offered so much resistance to the 
desire of the Ukrainians to inventory the Black Sea Fleet. 
  The Russian media, from the representations of the Black Sea 
Fleet press center, are constantly stirring up public opinion 
and making attempts to accuse Ukraine and its Navy of 
destabilizing the situation in the Crimea and Sevastopol. 
Numerous instances, however, testify to something else--the 
Black Sea Fleet itself is doing all its can for that purpose. It 
is today incapable of performing the operational-strategic tasks 
in the Mediterranean and other areas of the world's oceans that 
it used to be assigned; not knowing what to do in the Black Sea, 
it has, based on the territory of Ukraine, selected for itself 
one of the main tasks of opposing the affirmation of its 
independence and the building and emergence of its Navy. 
Corrupting itself and destroying itself, it has an attitude 
toward the Ukrainian Navy not as the fleet of a friendly nation, 
on the territory of which it resides and whose waters, land and 
means of existence it makes use of, but rather as its enemy. 
  Here are just a few instances of this aspect. As soon as the 
staff of the Ukrainian Navy [VMSU] had begun to be formed in 
April--May of 1992, a mobile reconnaissance system of the Black 
Sea Fleet mounted on a GAZ-66 truck made a systematic radio 
survey of the radio systems and radio emissions of the 
communications gear of the VMSU. 
  A group of Marines from the Black Sea Fleet made an 
incursion 
onto the territory of a SAM brigade of the Ministry of Defense 
of Ukraine on 31 March 1993, and attacked its servicemen. 
Private Levchuk was beaten, and the windows in the housing 
complex were smashed. 
  An Mi-8 helicopter of the Black Sea Fleet air forces made 
unsafe overflights and photographed the military compound of a 
battalion of Marines and other facilities on 2 July 1993. 
  The patrol service of the Black Sea Fleet at a checkpoint 
near the entrance to the city of Sevastopol committed the 
illegal act, on 12 July 1993, of detaining and listing 
servicemen from the Ukrainian Navy, with the discovery of the 
numbers of their military units, ranks, positions and so on. 
  Similar and more sweeping unlawful actions by the Black Sea 
Fleet against the armed forces, including the Navy, of Ukraine 
have not stopped. Periodic announcements to units and formations 
of "enhanced combat readiness," the recent attempt to attack the 
command post of a PPO [air-defense] unit in Sevastopol, the 
sending of their agents to naval subunits, the ban--by order of 
Chief of Staff of the Black Sea Fleet Vice-Admiral P. 
Svitashov--on unsanctioned contacts by officer personnel with 
the officers of the VMSU, the removal of some pilots of 
Ukrainian nationality from flights in units of the air forces of 
the Black Sea Fleet--this is a far from complete list of the 
"fraternal" acts of the Black Sea Fleet with regard to Ukraine 
and its servicemen. 
  Much could be said about the dishonorable acts of the Black 
Sea Fleet command. And however they may strain, whatever 
unpleasantness and ill will some Black Sea admirals and officers 
may resort to, independent Ukraine will never yield the right to 
have a mighty, battleworthy and modern Navy on the Black Sea. As 
for the statements of the commanders of the Black Sea Fleet 
about its high battleworthiness and ability to protect the 
southern borders of the interests of Ukraine and all of the CIS 
countries as well as Russia, that is nothing more than empty 
talk. As the facts cited above and many others testify, the 
Black Sea Fleet, first of all, does not want to do it, and 
second, as I emphasized already in my last article, it is 
not--to put it mildly--battleworthy. 
  The Black Sea Fleet had already begun to deteriorate as 
early 
as the end of 1989. As many as a hundred combat vessels have 
been decommissioned over the last year and a half alone. While 
its combat core used to be close to 350 ships, it has only 
15--20 percent of that number today. 
  The statements of Admiral A. Kalinin, the former commander 
of 
the Black Sea Fleet, are of a certain interest in this regard. 
He justly complained in a recent television appearance that 
whereas several years ago the combat might of the Black Sea 
Fleet was roughly at a ratio of 4:1 compared to the Turkish 
Navy, this year it is at 1:1 and could even fall further. The 
commander of one of the SKRs of the Black Sea Fleet that has 
been under repair for several years now declared quite candidly 
on that same television program that the Black Sea Fleet is 
aging, it is dying, that it would not be battleworthy at all in 
2--3 years. 
  And that is indeed so. Virtually all of the combat vessels 
of 
the Black Sea Fleet are 15--25 years old, and their planned 
repairs and dockwork are not being performed on time. Russia is 
not currently building a single ship for the Black Sea Fleet. 
They are pilfering, selling off and carrying off property, the 
shore support infrastructure for the ships and units. The Black 
Sea Fleet, as a result of all this, is already unable to perform 
the task of covering maritime sectors of the territory of both 
Ukraine and Russia. It requires protection itself now. Ukrainian 
PPO units are forced to provide air cover for its ships and 
shore facilities, insofar as it does not have its own system of 
air defense. 
  The interaction of the fleet with the Odessa Military 
District, which is part of the armed forces of Ukraine, and with 
the Ukrainian naval border units has been lost virtually 
entirely through the fault of the Black Sea Fleet command. 
  The financial situation of the Black Sea Fleet is very 
grave. 
It is, so to speak, in debt up to its ears. The officers and 
warrant officers have not received their pay for two or three 
months in some subunits and units, especially in Odessa, 
Ochakov, Izmayil and some other remote garrisons. 
  This situation is naturally having an effect on their morale 
and psychological state. And they are coming to serve in the 
Ukrainian Navy--a new and promising structure--entirely 
voluntarily, without any pressure on the part of the Ukrainians 
and without any promises whatsoever. 
  Some may not believe me, but the naval command has appealed 
to those collectives that have decided to pass under the 
jurisdiction of the Ukrainian fleet to think seriously about 
that step, warning that the salaries in the navy for both 
servicemen and for civil employees are lower than in the Black 
Sea Fleet. The commander of the Ukrainian Navy, Vice-Admiral V. 
Bezkorovaynyy, has moreover directed the attention of the Black 
Sea Fleet command to the alarming signals from the Ochakov, 
Mikolayevka and some of the other so-called remote garrisons. 
They have only promised "to investigate without fail" in the 
Black Sea Fleet, however. This ended with the fact that the 
people who did not want to be hostages to the situation, to 
watch as the fleet disintegrated and is sold off, made the 
choice in favor of the Ukrainian Navy. 
  I can thus state with all certainty that the information 
that 
has been spread about some forced resubordination of certain 
units and subunits to the Ukrainian Navy is malicious slander 
that cannot withstand any critical analysis. Only in 
contradiction to any common sense could one imagine that the 
navy would permit the formation of its subunits from people who 
were forcibly transferred into them. 
  The Ukrainian fleet is being built and developed. The fleet 
of Ukraine will exist despite any opposition. And only it should 
and will protect the national interests of its state on the 
Black Sea. And Ukraine, strictly speaking, has never made the 
request that the Black Sea Fleet protect its state or any other 
interests. We believe that it will not rely on such protection 
in the future all the more. And for granting its bases, its 
territory and facilities, its waters in lease to the fleet of 
Russia in the future, it has the right to count on a fraternal 
and good attitude toward it and respect for its laws, its armed 
forces, its citizens. How could it be otherwise? How could any 
lessor nation permit its own lessee to have an ill-disposed, the 
more so hostile, attitude toward it? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46625 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Leaders Comment on Black Sea Fleet Division, Ukraine's </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Leaders Comment on Black Sea Fleet Division, Ukraine's </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Interests 
<H4>    Supreme Council Head Moroz Comments </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0459C Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 1 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0459C </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed news item: "The Black Sea Fleet Can Be </F>
Divided, but the Black Sea Cannot..."] 
  [Text] Chairman of the Supreme Soviet Oleksandr Moroz, 
commenting at his first press conference on the status of the 
division of the Black Sea Fleet, indicated that the time when 
that fleet could have become an element of collective defense 
has already been lost. It must now be realized that the Black 
Sea zone is a zone of specific interests, both for Ukraine and 
for Russia. The question of the Black Sea Fleet must be resolved 
proceeding from that as well. 
  It seems to me, indicated Oleksandr Moroz, that we should 
provide guarantees to the officers and warrant officers of the 
Black Sea Fleet with regard to their treatment, and to all 
Ukrainians with regard to their rights, while working 
concurrently on the creation of our own fleet. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46626 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Leaders Comment on Black Sea Fleet Division, Ukraine's </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Leaders Comment on Black Sea Fleet Division, Ukraine's </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Interests 
<H4>    Shmarov-Bizhan Delegation Meets With Russians </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0459D Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 9 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0459D </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed news item: "From Sevastopol--The Problems of </F>
Division Are Being Clarified"] 
  [Text] A delegation led by Vice-Premier of the Government 
of Ukraine Valeriy Shmarov, which included Deputy Minister of 
Defense of Ukraine Colonel-General Ivan Bizhan, Deputy Minister 
of Foreign Affairs of Ukraine Borys Tarasyuk, Deputy Minister of 
Economics of Ukraine Leonid Minin and Chairman of the State 
Property Fund of Ukraine Volodymyr Pryadko, made a working trip 
to Sevastopol. 
  The purpose of the trip, as Valeriy Shmarov informed the 
journalists, was to clarify the problems of the city and to 
prepare for the next round of negotiations of the government 
delegations of Ukraine and Russia on the division of the Black 
Sea Fleet. 
  The high officials visited military garrisons of Sevastopol 
and Crimea where units of the Ukrainian Navy and the Black Sea 
Fleet are stationed and became acquainted with the state of the 
military facilities on the scene, as well as talking with 
representatives of the local authorities. 
  They talked about the political and economic situation in 
the 
state and the progress of the building of the armed forces of 
our nation at a meeting with officers of the staff and the 
directorate of the Ukrainian Navy, and answered a host of their 
questions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46627 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kravchuk: PGMs as Alternative to Weapons of Mass Destruction </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kravchuk: PGMs as Alternative to Weapons of Mass Destruction </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0479B Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 10 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0479B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Grigoriy Nesmyanovich: "A New Weapon May Be an </F>
Old One but Totally Forgotten"] 
  [Text] Ukraine essentially intends to turn to the idea of 
creating and producing high-precision weapons as alternatives to 
weapons of mass destruction. This was stated by Ukrainian 
President Leonid Kravchuk during a visit to the Zhitomir Higher 
Military Electronics School of the Air Defense Forces. 
  He emphasized that work has been going on for a long time in 
this direction in the United States, Russia and a number of 
other states. The main advantage of such weapons is guaranteed 
destruction of military objectives. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46628 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Prospects for Peacetime Use of Ukraine's Space Assets </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Prospects for Peacetime Use of Ukraine's Space Assets </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Examined 

<F P=102>   94UM0445A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 20 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0445A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by NARODNA ARMIYA correspondent Major Volodymyr </F>
Knysh: "American Nuclear Missiles No Longer `Cover' Ukraine"] 
  [Text] The strategic missiles of the United States 
will not be aimed at Ukraine as of 30 May 1994, and the launch 
stages of the SS-24 missiles may be utilized for the needs of 
the peaceful Ukrainian space program. 
  As is well known, a governmental delegation from 
Ukraine composed of Vice Prime Minister Valeriy Shmarov, Deputy 
Minister of Foreign Affairs Borys Tarasyuk, National Space 
Agency General Director Volodymyr Horbulin and Deputy Minister 
of Machine Building, VPK [the Military-Industrial Complex] and 
Conversion Valeriy Kazakov, has returned from Washington. 
  Meetings were held at the Pentagon with U.S. Secretary of 
Defense William Perry, at the State Department and at the 
National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA). 
Consultations were held pertaining to the fulfillment of the 
trilateral agreements among Ukraine, the United States and 
Russia, cooperation between Ukraine and the United States in 
conversion programs for the defense industry, the monitoring of 
missile and space technologies, power engineering and the safety 
of nuclear reactors. 
  Questions associated with the early deactivation of missile 
complexes in Ukraine, among other things, were explored during 
the meetings with the head of the Defense Department of the 
United States, W. Perry. 
  American strategic missiles, as journalists were informed at 
a recent press conference by Valeriy Shmarov, will no longer be 
"looking" in the direction of Ukraine. A joint statement of the 
governments of both countries was adopted in which their 
devotion to relations of partnership, mutual trust, respect and 
the development of relations in the realm of security and 
defense was affirmed. The government of the United States 
announced that American strategic missiles will no longer be 
targeted either at Ukraine or the territory of any other 
countries as of 30 May 1994. 
  Ukraine, in the words of U.S. Vice President Gore, has 
proved 
that it is a reliable and responsible partner, especially in 
matters of arms control and the non-proliferation of nuclear 
weapons. 
  Valeriy Shmarov called question number one the negotiations 
on Ukraine's joining with the control regime for the 
proliferation of missile technology and equipment for its 
production. 
  The idea that Ukraine has somehow refused to participate in 
that prospective area thus does not conform to reality. 
  A memorandum of understanding between the governments of 
Ukraine and the United States was adopted on the transfer of 
missile equipment and technology. This document, signed by Vice 
Prime Minister Shmarov and U.S. Vice President Gore, provides 
for strict monitoring of the proliferation of nuclear 
technologies, the performance of joint inspections, and 
consultations and an exchange of information in the event of the 
transfer of missile equipment and technology. It was emphasized 
that this missile technology control regime rules out the 
creation of impediments to the development of the Ukrainian 
national space program, or to cooperation with other missile and 
space powers in that sphere. 
  The United States has thus de facto recognized the 
right of Ukraine not only to preserve, but also to develop 
further its own scientific, technological and production 
potential in the missile and space field. Our country has also 
been recognized as a full-fledged participant in international 
cooperation and a participant in the world aerospace market. 
  Common missile-engineering interests exist, by the way, 
between Ukraine and Russia as well. Valeriy Shmarov, answering a 
question about this, stated that Russia is ordering missiles and 
satellites from Ukraine. And we are ordering missile engines. 
  As concerns the prospects for the existence of "Ukrainian 
space" programs and the participation of our state in the space 
market, Ukraine will "go in" for that if it has something to go 
with, and if there is a consumer for our goods... The legal 
support exists today. A harsh market fight is expected. We are 
already feeling pressure on the part of the American firms that 
dominate the space field today, said Valeriy Shmarov. 
  But the Americans acknowledge today, as they have before, 
that we have one of the best and cheapest launch vehicles, 
especially the Zenit-3, a modification of the well-known series. 
There is also a place for them in the Freedom-Mir program. It is 
acknowledged that our space components have "substantial weight" 
in that program. They are talking about systems for guidance, 
docking, on-board systems etc. There is interest in the United 
States in our developments in the field of space welding, and 
problems of the effects of gravity on the person. The general 
director of NASA acknowledged, during a meeting with Valeriy 
Shmarov, that the United States is prepared to cooperate with 
Ukraine in the world space field. 
  The utilization of converted launch stages is a very 
attractive project. The placement of a satellite in orbit using 
the launch stage of the SS-24 missile is entirely possible. The 
more so as we already have a legal basis for the activity in the 
missile and space sphere. 
  It was indicated that the Americans are implementing 
conversion programs somewhat slowly. A corresponding discussion 
pertained to this. The so-called "List No. 1" exists in the 
United States, on which there are 35 Ukrainian enterprises that 
are subject to conversion. The corresponding partners for them 
are already being sought in the United States. There is also a 
project being carried out by the American firm of Westinghouse 
and the Ukrainian firm of Khartron (Kharkiv)--the installation 
of an ASU [automated control system] for operation in 
nuclear-power plants and other power-engineering projects. The 
Nunn-Lugar fund allocates five million dollars, with another 20 
million from Westinghouse... 
  We will hope that the partnership of the two nations in 
conversion programs will develop in the future as well. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46629 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Weapons Control Official Interviewed on Warhead Removal </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Weapons Control Official Interviewed on Warhead Removal </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0445B Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 28 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0445B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Center for Administrative Management of </F>
Strategic Nuclear Forces of the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine 
Chief Colonel Oleksandr Serdyuk by NARODNA ARMIYA commentator 
Senior Lieutenant Serhiy Zhurets under the rubric: "First 
Interview in the New Post": "The Warheads Will Be Removed From 
Ukraine Over Three Years.--The Rest of the Problems of 
Nuclear Disarmament Will Be Gotten Rid of as Quickly as 
Possible"] 
  [Text] Background information on the 
interviewee: The military path of Colonel Oleksandr 
Serdyuk began from the Suvorov School, then on to the Kharkov 
Command-Engineering School and officer service. He served first 
in the Kartalinskyy Division, in an OS missile regiment, and 
then went to the Academy imeni Dzerzhinskyy. After graduation he 
was assigned to the Plesetsk test range. 
  Colonel Oleksandr Serdyuk returned to serve in Ukraine 
in 1992. We was deputy chief of the directorate for missile and 
space weaponry. and then was named by order of the Minister of 
Defense to the position of chief of the Center for 
Administrative Management of Strategic Nuclear Forces of the 
Ministry of Defense [MO] of Ukraine. 
  [S. Zhurets] A Ukrainian delegation headed by Vice Prime 
Minister Valeriy Shmarov recently returned from the United 
States. There they discussed, among other things, the question 
of deactivating the missile systems stationed in Ukraine. How do 
you, directly heading up the structure of the MO that is 
performing this crucial and difficult work, regard the status 
and prospects for the nuclear disarmament of our nation? 
  [O. Serdyuk] The fulfillment of deactivation is naturally an 
additional demand on the officers of the 43rd Army and the 
officers of our Center, insofar as the task of removing the 
missile systems from combat duty and performing the tasks of 
deactivating them are being added to the everyday tasks of 
maintaining the missile and special equipment in proper 
condition. These tasks are work of enhanced security in and of 
themselves, and their performance requires quite a bit of human 
and material resources. 
  The principal burden of performing this work lies on the 
officers of the 43rd Missile Army, with considerable 
organizational activity performed by the specialists of our 
center as well. 
  [S. Zhurets] And Ukraine will be able to fulfill 
unconditionally the obligations it has assumed at the 
international level, for the deactivation of the 46 SS-24 
missiles, within the ten-month time period stipulated in the 
trilateral statement of the presidents? 
  [O. Serdyuk] There are no grounds today to say that we will 
not be able to perform those tasks. The removal of the combat 
systems from duty is proceeding according to plan, and we are 
fulfilling the schedule that was approved by the government, as 
well as the schedule that was stipulated in addition to the 
trilateral statement of the presidents. We have already 
performed more than half of the deactivation work. 
  [S. Zhurets] The separation of the warheads from the 
strategic missiles is perhaps the simplest of what awaits the 
servicemen of the 43rd Army, with the more difficult 
problems--in particular the subsequent destruction of the launch 
stages and the missile silos, and the ecological support for 
that process--still ahead. That work, as is well known, 
envisages a comprehensive program of gradual cutbacks and the 
elimination of land- and air-launched nuclear weapons. How is 
the fulfillment of that program proceeding? 
  [O. Serdyuk] We are doing work in the preparatory stages of 
fulfilling this comprehensive program that was approved by the 
government. Ukraine, in accordance with the decree of the 
Supreme Soviet ratifying the START-1 Treaty, is to eliminate 36 
percent of the launch stages and launchers. Disarmament, as we 
see, is thus a very prolonged process, which must be provided 
with financial resources first and foremost. We have gotten into 
a paradoxical situation today--it is much cheaper to maintain 
the missile systems, to keep them in a proper state, than today, 
under conditions of harsh economic crisis, when we have to 
strain to remove those systems from duty. That process is not an 
advantageous one for us economically. The amount of money that 
we need for that has already been noted in the press. Without 
sufficient financing we could get into a situation where we will 
be forced, whether we want to or not, to lengthen the time 
period or halt the work. I have in mind here not the 
deactivation, but the work on the elimination itself. And it 
would be a shame, of course, if the funds that are allocated for 
the elimination measures (talking here about the trillion 
karbovantsi allocated by the budget of Ukraine for 1994 for 
elimination measures) were received very irregularly. As of 
today, with a whole quarter virtually gone by, we have received 
only approximately 27 billion karbovantsi of that required. That 
is far too little. The more so as the comprehensive program is 
not only, and not so much, the elimination measures alone. It is 
also the resolution of the social problems of servicemen in the 
strategic forces, which we have always put in first place. The 
discussion here concerns the building of housing for officers, 
the creation of jobs, medical support for the servicemen who 
take part in the elimination measures and deactivation work. 
  The officers of the strategic forces are laboring under 
highly strained conditions today. They have to perform three 
tasks simultaneously--be on combat alert duty and maintain 
combat readiness, remove the RS-18 missiles from service, and 
carry out the deactivation process. These are one and the same 
crews, one and the same people. And they, in performing their 
crucial work to destroy one of the largest strategic arsenals in 
the world, have to be certain of their future, of their social 
protections. 
  That is why under today's conditions, with inadequate 
financing, it would be expedient to adopt a model of the 
elimination process whereby that elimination is carried out in 
stages. After all of the work has been performed on one missile 
system--that is, it has been removed from duty, broken down and 
the equipment dismantled, social problems have been resolved and 
work has been completed on recultivation of the terrain--only 
then should the elimination of the next ballistic-missile system 
begin. And not the way it could occur--all of the missiles taken 
away, the silos closed up in accordance with the START-1 
procedure, the holes left and the social problems of the 
servicemen unresolved. 
  [S. Zhurets] What assistance can we expect from the United 
States--so much talked about, especially lately--under these 
conditions? 
  [O. Serdyuk] Comparative indicators of our expenditures on 
the path of nuclear disarmament with the actual payments to this 
process on the part of the United States is far from to the 
advantage of the latter. As of May, we have received just 2,000 
tonnes of fuel, three truck cranes and six specialized vehicles 
out of the promised American aid, defined as 185 million dollars. 
  The principal shortcoming of the American aid is moreover 
not 
so much the amount of it, as the very narrow area for its 
utilization. This was caused by the restrictions of Nunn-Lugar, 
which does not permit that aid to be directed to the resolution 
of such topical problems of the Armed Forces as social 
protections for servicemen who will be discharged from the Army 
owing to the elimination of the nuclear weapons. There will be, 
after all, no "real" money, we will receive only the material 
and technical means for the elimination work in the indicated 
amount. 
  It must be pointed out that the assistance of the United 
States should be considered not an act of charity, but rather as 
natural compensation for the military and economic losses of 
Ukraine connected with their nuclear weapons. 
  [S. Zhurets] One could perhaps recall here that one of the 
recent consultations pertaining to the distribution of the 
additional financial assistance of the Americans insisted that 
50 million dollars be directed, first and foremost, to 
dismantling the 46 SS-24 missiles. 
  [O. Serdyuk] Yes, that was the approach. The Americans have 
a 
vested interest in that elimination, and that is naturally why 
they pose such questions. We have, in my view, so many problems 
with regard to the elimination of those missiles whose guarantee 
periods have expired, the RS-18s, that to say that we should 
begin the elimination of the SS-24s would be absurd. Ukraine has 
not assumed any international obligations whatsoever on that 
score. 
  [S. Zhurets] We are to salvage more than a third of the 
launch stages. A considerable portion of them were manufactured 
in Russia. Wouldn't it be more advantageous to resolve the 
problem with the salvaging of those missiles at Russian plants, 
rather than invest funds in the expansion of a salvage base in 
Dnipropetrovsk that will scarcely be needed after that work? 
  [O. Serdyuk] The decision has already been made pertaining 
to 
the the building of a yard and neutralization station at the 
Pivdenne KB [Design Bureau]. That work has already started. That 
is first; second, the Russian Federation has actually offered to 
take those missiles for salvage. Those proposals, however, were 
far from being free. Taking into account the fact that the 
construction of the neutralization station is being done at the 
expense of the American funds, that approach would obviously be 
expedient. 
  [S. Zhurets] How do matters stand with fuel storage? 
  [O. Serdyuk] The construction of storage facilities for the 
missile-fuel components is being done today at the expense of 
that trillion for elimination, which is being allocated in very 
erratic fashion. Quite a bit of effort will have to be applied 
here to fulfill that task. 
  More than half of the heptyl could be used for the needs of 
the national space program. The guaranteed storage time of 
heptyl (close to fifteen years) would make it possible to count 
on such an option. 
  [S. Zhurets] Since you have already brought up the 
prospects, 
one fundamental issue concerns the future of the infrastructure 
of the 43rd Missile Army. It would be regrettable, after all, if 
those multi-billion facilities were to be reduced to nothing. 
  [O. Serdyuk] The infrastructure of the missile systems 
stationed on the territory of Ukraine could doubtless be 
preserved and used again, with the corresponding government 
decision and with the corresponding capital investment. It could 
be preserved and used or wasted irreversibly, since after the 
elimination of the missile launch silos in Ukraine, the aura 
that is created by the status of a nuclear-missile state would 
essentially be destroyed as well. 
  This decision is doubtless exceptionally important for the 
future of Ukraine. A considered approach, in my opinion, has 
been demonstrated by our parliament in designating a quota for 
the elimination of launch stages and missile silos--36 percent. 
The rest of the potential could and should be used for the 
accomplishment of tasks connected with ensuring the country's 
security. If all of this is destroyed, then we cannot expect 
that Ukraine will be able to restore that infrastructure some 
other time. 
  [S. Zhurets] Thank you for the interview, and I hope that 
NARODNA ARMIYA, with your assistance, will return again to the 
complex and exceptionally important topic for Ukraine of nuclear 
disarmament. 
  As the material was being prepared for press, it became 
known that an agreement has been signed between the governments 
of Ukraine and the Russian Federation on the fulfillment of the 
trilateral declaration of the presidents in Moscow. That 
document stipulates deadlines for the removal of nuclear weapons 
from the territory of Ukraine--no later than 1997--and the 
obligation of Russia to send fuel for nuclear-power plants to 
Ukraine and account for the value of the tactical weapons that 
were removed from our territory, to be counted toward our debt 
to Russia for power carriers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46630 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   National Guard Formation, Troop Training Explored </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    National Guard Formation, Troop Training Explored </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Kukharets, Staff Visit Pontoon Brigade </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0468A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 12 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0468A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Guard Lieutenant-Colonel Anatoliy Pihilov under </F>
the rubric "In the National Guard of Ukraine": "With Experience 
to the Pontoon Troops"] 
  [Text] The officers of the Main Directorate of the 
Commander of the National Guard of Ukraine, as well as the 
commanders of formations and certain units within the context of 
the training session being held, visited the military compound 
of a pontoon and bridging brigade of the Ministry of Defense of 
Ukraine. Unit commander Colonel N. Malkov, who received the 
National Guard personnel, personally familiarized them with the 
celebrated history of the military collective, and talked about 
the current daily life of the personnel. 
  The brigade, by the way, will be celebrating its fifty-year 
anniversary in August of next year. Its credits include the 
rebuilding and mine clearing of the city of Kiev, destroyed by 
the Germans, and the bridges across the Dnipro and other water 
arteries. In April of 1986, when Chornobyl caught fire, the unit 
was present at full strength at the scene of the disaster and 
worked to clean up the consequences of it. 
  The generals and officers of the Guard visited the sleeping 
quarters, enlisted-men's mess, subsidiary plots and combat 
vehicle motor pool, and saw with their own eyes the splendid 
organization of the daily detail service and the irreproachable 
regulation order in the facilities and on the grounds. And even 
though the "tourists" have many decades of service among them, 
many of the officers were not ashamed to note down in the course 
of their discussions the elements that interested them, so as to 
employ what they had seen in practice in the Guard collectives. 
  Commander of the National Guard of Ukraine Guard 
Lieutenant-General V. Kukharets warmly thanked the commanders of 
the unit for their hospitality, and wished the bridging troops 
new successes in their noble service to the Fatherland. 
  In the Guard collectives themselves, which are still 
undergoing an active process of emergence, many of the problems 
connected with the placement of personnel have to be resolved, 
so to speak, on the run, so as not to harm the most important 
thing--combat readiness. The Guard troops (this is the opinion 
of many officers), regardless of the difficulties, are able to 
create conditions for people that are in no way worse than those 
in the storied ranks of the pontoon troops. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46631 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   National Guard Formation, Troop Training Explored </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    National Guard Formation, Troop Training Explored </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    New Recruits' Education, Humanitarian Training </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0468B Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 26 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0468B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Guard Major Yuriy Sychov under the rubric "In </F>
the National Guard of Ukraine": "Maximum Respect to the Young"] 
  [Text] The ranks of the National Guard are being 
replenished with young personnel today. The youth from various 
corners of Ukraine, who after the corresponding training will be 
protecting the constitutional order and territorial integrity of 
independent Ukraine along with their senior comrades, will be 
protecting people against criminal infringements and protecting 
their rights and freedom. 
  The main concern today is to provide the young soldiers with 
suitable conditions for training and service. The discussion was 
about that at the meetings of deputy commanders of the 
formations and units, which discussed ways of increasing the 
effectiveness of indoctrination and humanitarian training for 
the young Guardsmen and expanding closer ties with the parents 
of the soldiers as well as resolved a number of urgent issues. 
  The meetings were conducted by NHU Commander Guard 
Lieutenant-General Volodymyr Kukharets. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46632 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   National Guard Formation, Troop Training Explored </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    National Guard Formation, Troop Training Explored </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Rear Services Personnel Training </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0468C Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 21 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0468C </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by KNGU press service officer Vira Valerko under </F>
the rubric "The National Guard Trains Cadres": "New 
Reinforcements for the Rear Services Troops"] 
  [Text] The Department of Military Management of the Kharkiv 
Higher Military School of the NHU [National Guard of Ukraine] 
was called before August of last year the Department of Food and 
Mat&eacute;riel Support, and employed military-economic gaming as 
an experiment with the cadets of the graduating class. Many 
changes have occurred today, and games have now become a 
constituent element of the educational process. Its title is 
"The Operations of the Rear Services of the NHU Regiment in 
Various Economic Situations." 
  This is, true, not just a game. The cadets took it 
seriously, 
since it revealed their capabilities and, most importantly, 
their ability as future military specialists. 
  The dynamism with which the action began during the game did 
not give them an opportunity to think for long, forcing the 
immediate resolution of any problems and, later--profound 
theoretical knowledge. The cadets played many roles over just 
one day: senior officers and deputy commanders of units, chiefs 
of the food and mat&eacute;riel services, young specialists in 
rear 
services. Business manager, say, or the chief of a bathhouse etc. 
  The point of the game, in the broadest sense, was to check 
the quality of the assimilation of the basic curriculum, 
evaluate the ability to orient themselves in situations that 
arise unexpectedly, and evaluate their decision-making skills 
and ability to plan and forecast their activity under the new 
conditions of economic activity and supervise subordinates. 
There was also one more important purpose of this game--to 
assist the cadets in understanding and being aware of the harsh 
realities of the present day. 
  It was carefully arranged into three stages: business, 
role-playing and organizational-business games. And while the 
first stage was an entirely pre-programmed affair with a plan 
known in advance and a finish that was a hundred percent 
predictable (the cadets were even permitted to use a great deal 
of reference material), just the problem was put before the 
cadets in the remaining ones. The actual methods, ways and 
quality of their resolution depended on the level of training of 
the cadets. Stereotyped scenarios thus had no success at all. 
Only new, fresh and original solutions were suitably evaluated. 
Each graduate was left alone with himself in the final stage, 
and could count only on his own knowledge, quick thinking and 
resourcefulness. Acting decisively, sometimes improvising, but 
only within the bounds of the law, they were able to achieve 
their aims and find foodstuffs, dress, technical gear, to 
achieve precise reasoning in a persuasive key in their 
discussions with the supplier, and to select that combination of 
actions that would lead to success. The cadets, in other words, 
were placed in extreme conditions that were as close as possible 
to the actual state of affairs in our life. 
  It can be believed that they will withstand the difficult 
trials of life in worthy fashion, as well as the rest of their 
educational ones. The good results of the military-economic game 
undoubtedly testify to that. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46633 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   National Guard Formation, Troop Training Explored </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    National Guard Formation, Troop Training Explored </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Some Recruits Unfit for Service </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0468D Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 27 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0468D </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vira Valerko of the NHU command press center </F>
under the rubric "Draft-94": "Are the Sick Are Being Taken Into 
the Guard...?"] 
  [Text] It is, of course, a rhetorical question. But the 
impression is being created that it may not be for all. How else 
to explain a situation where 16 young men from last year's fall 
replacements for the National Guard of Ukraine were immediately 
sent home as unfit to serve, and 78 were sent for medical 
examination to determine their fitness? 
  Incredibly, among the diseases with which the draftees were 
commissioned were stomach ulcers, cardiosclerosis, oligophrenia 
at the stage of mild debility, arthrosis and even psychopathy. 
Just what guided the physicians of the draft commissions, if 
they knowingly signed the documents on the supposedly 
satisfactory state of the health of the sick people? They must 
bear that responsibility as malefactors, among other things, 
since one such falsification ended tragically for Guard soldier 
Dmytry Reznyk, who died in December of last year from a 
perforated stomach ulcer. Strange? Only in November of that same 
year, after all, the military medical commission of Zavodskyy 
Rayon of the city of Dnipropetrovsk has officially established 
the full fitness of the youth to serve! 
  Why recall today these sad events, six months old? The new 
recruits will soon be welcomed. Reports are coming in from 
everywhere on the completion of the work of the groups for 
preliminary selection that were working in contact with the 
regional military commissariats. Certain oblasts have already 
sent the lists of the candidates selected. There is no assurance 
whatsoever, however, that the military commissariats are sending 
namely those youth to serve in the NHU. The experience of the 
prior draft--when, for example, the Ternopil city military 
commissariat sent only three of the 42 draftees selected for the 
National Guard--forces one to have doubts again. 
  The indoctrination of the draftees, their moral and 
spiritual 
qualities, their abilities and the state of their health require 
especially careful attention today, as was emphasized by Guard 
Colonel Vasyl Romanovskyy. That is possible, however, only 
provided there is personal contact with the future soldiers. 
Financial difficulties unfortunately hold sway here as well. The 
shortage of funds has led to the fact that business trips 
connected with preliminary selection have been cut back to a few 
days, while the transportation that could accelerate and improve 
that work is effectively lacking. So how many populated areas 
can you cover on foot in five days? So they have to familiarize 
themselves, as a rule, not with people but with their personal 
files. They are often highly falsified. It becomes a vicious 
circle. 
  The Guard is ready to receive its young replacements. The 
difficulties that are expected as a consequence of the 
quantitative imbalance between last year's and this year's 
replacements have even been taken into account. The training 
centers of the National Guard of Ukraine are awaiting their new 
recruits, and the officers are prepared to begin the training of 
the newcomers and to educate them as true Guardsmen. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46634 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   National Guard Formation, Troop Training Explored </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    National Guard Formation, Troop Training Explored </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Kukharets Meets Veterans' Affairs Leaders </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0468E Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 4 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0468E </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report from press service of the commander of the National </F>
Guard of Ukraine under the rubric "In the National Guard": 
"Music for the Veterans"] 
  [Text] Chairman of the Committee for Veterans Affairs 
General of the Army Ivan Herasimov and Chairman of the Council 
of Veterans of the Internal-Service Troops Major-General 
(Retired) Mykola Tytov visited the Kiev Division of the National 
Guard of Ukraine. The guests became familiar with the everyday 
life of the personnel and made note of the regulation order in 
the subunits, the clear-cut organization of service and the 
proficiency of the soldiers. They told today's defenders of the 
Fatherland about the honored traditions of the older generations 
of soldiers who routed the German fascists during World War II. 
  The respected veterans warmly greeted the commander of the 
National Guard of Ukraine, Lieutenant-General of the Guard 
Volodymyr Kukharets. The model orchestra of the National Guard 
arranged a concert for the participants in the meeting. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46635 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Simferopol Brigade Commander Justifies National Guard </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Simferopol Brigade Commander Justifies National Guard </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Presence 

<F P=102>   94UM0472A Kiev PRAVDA UKRAINY in Russian 14 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0472A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev PRAVDA UKRAINY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Colonel Aleksandr Kostyukov, commander of </F>
the Simferopol Brigade of the Ukraine National Guard, by Senior 
Lieutenant Igor Krol, press service officer of the Ukraine 
National Guard commander; place and date not given: "A 
Detachment Patrols the City..."] 
  [Text] [Krol] The situation surrounding the Ukraine 
National Guard troop unit created two years ago in the Crimea 
has recently become an intensely heated topic in certain of the 
mass media. Is everything truly taking place the way it is being 
presented in the sensational newspaper reports we have been 
reading? 
  [Kostyukov] In my view, the authors of many published 
materials on the Guardsmen lack objectivity in their approach 
and treatment of the issues surrounding the Guard's vital 
activity in Crimea. The problem lies in the fact that they make 
little effort to ascertain whether or not the facts they report 
on the pages of the newspaper conform to reality. On the other 
hand, no one forgets to saturate his material with sarcastic 
commentary, hang insulting labels on the soldiers and officers 
without justification, and make every possible "prediction" with 
respect to their future service on the peninsula... 
  Time and again I have been able only to marvel as I read the 
missions supposedly assigned the troop unit under my command. I 
could not even imagine that our brigade was to put its foot down 
somewhere or take the city by storm, that extended operation 
would cause our automatic weapons to burn out... 
  Although I am far removed from the journalism profession, as 
an individual entrusted with great responsibility I am directly 
concerned with seeing to it that truth alone prevails in the 
treatment of events taking place with respect to us. In 
developing their subject material, certain writers truly forget 
to look before they leap and simply throw out their report. Can 
it be permissible to relate to this issue in such a manner? 
  I want to tell everyone desiring to write about those under 
my command that the door to my office, and the doors to the 
offices of my deputies, are always open to receive editorial 
personnel. "Come in, be our guest!"--as they say. We are always 
happy to show you how we live and serve. We will answer any 
question of interest to you. 
  [Krol] What in your view are the reasons behind the 
appearance in the press of all kinds of attacks against the 
Guard? 
  [Kostyukov] I will tell you quite frankly that it is no 
accident all of this is taking place. Standing behind this flow 
of filthy propaganda is a certain political or other force whose 
agenda welcomes the newspaper accounts purposefully directed 
towards slandering our Guardsmen, accounts that intentionally 
create a negative impression of them among the local populace. 
  The Guard is standing in the way of certain destructive 
forces of society striving at any price to achieve the 
implementation of their plans to destroy the unity and integrity 
of Ukraine. These forces see us as a threat to themselves and 
are therefore fighting us with lies, aspersions, and mudslinging. 
  [Krol] In particular, there have been reports concerning a 
number of conflicts... 
  [Kostyukov] This is the way it happened. On 15 May, three 
soldiers in a special missions company, on leave, went into a 
cafe for something to eat. An intoxicated man came up to one of 
them and started taunting him, to the effect of--what are you 
doing here soldier, you with the Ukrainian uniform insignia? The 
soldier had to endure an abusive verbal assault, but decided not 
to get into a fight and did absolutely nothing in response to 
the insulting provocation. Only when the man put his fists in 
motion did the soldier respond with a professional rebuff. The 
servicemen sat in the cafe a while longer, then went for a walk 
in the city. However, they were soon subjected to attack by a 
militia group of eight men armed with automatic weapons. 
  Not understanding what was going on, the Guardsmen were 
forced to defend themselves from a group that constituted in 
fact their comrades-in-arms. In this regard, the latter acted 
without any explanation whatsoever... The soldiers were beat up 
and accused of involvement in a drunken brawl, although a panel 
of experts confirmed their absolute sobriety. After all was said 
and done, they were released to their unit. 
  I do not understand why the militia had to act in this 
manner, and under a false accusation to boot. Would it not have 
been wiser to report the incident to the military headquarters 
and have a patrol sent out instead of conducting an armed 
assault against innocent comrades? 
  [Krol] What kind of impression can such fabrications impart 
to people, especially if they do not have accurate information? 
  [Kostyukov] You can only imagine. If I were in their 
position 
I would feel far from good about it. I am horrified at the 
thought of such "defenders." But this has already become the 
system. God help us if people believe lies. As people used to 
say in bygone days: The truth cannot even manage to get started 
in the time it takes a lie to travel the world over. 
  [Krol] What is the military collective of the brigade doing 
today? 
  [Kostyukov] There is a great deal to be done in resolving 
problems concerning the rear, making the living conditions of 
the soldiers suitable. The main portion of our training time, 
naturally, is devoted to combat and special training. But the 
most important aspect is the official detail, operating five 
times a week, aimed at preserving public order in the city. We 
may assert that we have managed to attain fairly good results in 
the fight against crime, especially this year. We are assigning 
more and more military details to assist the militia. This is 
how citizens are afforded security with respect to criminal 
attempts on their lives and property. Since the beginning of the 
current year, soldiers have detained more than 3,200 individuals 
for administrative violations, seven persons for crimes. Three 
firearms have been confiscated. 
  A few nuances emerge here, however. In my constant 
inspections of duty performance procedure, I often discover that 
not all the internal-affairs personnel comprising a joint 
militia-Guard patrol treat the performance of their official 
duties in a fully responsible manner. 
  But I see my most important task as brigade commander in 
ensuring that all my subordinates become true Guardsmen 
representing the elite of the Armed Forces, that they serve as 
an example to all military servicemen. 
  Experience shows that wherever National Guardsmen are 
stationed and whatever missions they are carrying out, they have 
always earned the prestige of the local populace. Is there any 
reason for certain people to fear us? Yes--those who have 
decided to break the law, to profit from others' good deeds, to 
raise a hand against the weak... 
  By virtue of our calling, we have been and always will be 
found where conditions are the most difficult, where people need 
our help. The people of Crimea can put their complete trust in 
us, can rely on us for anything. We will not let them down. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46636 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Carpathian Military District Undergoing Inspection </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Carpathian Military District Undergoing Inspection </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Col-Gen Bizhan Interviewed </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0448A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 17 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0448A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Deputy Minister of Defense of Ukraine </F>
Colonel-General Ivan Vasylovych Bizhan by NARODNA ARMIYA 
correspondents Colonel Viktor Shvyrov and Lieutenant-Colonel 
Oleh Vachayev: "Everything Begins With Order"] 
  [Text] The troops of the 38th Army Corps (Carpathian 
Military District), as NARODNA ARMIYA has already reported, are 
conducting a performance evaluation for the winter training 
period. The center of the final drills was moved to the field, 
where the personnel report on weapons training, the driving of 
vehicles, tactics... 
  [I. Bizhan] The overall preliminary evaluation could be as 
follows. On the one hand, the diligence of the enlisted men and 
NCOs everywhere they were during these days--in the barracks, in 
the field, at the motor pool--was noticeable. 
  On the other, the low level of professional proficiency of 
the personnel when passing the disciplines that required the 
expenditures of large quantities of fuels and lubricants during 
the winter training period was noticeable as well. And we 
understand that. There were objective reasons for this, after 
all, that were connected first and foremost with the shortage of 
fuels. 
  There is, however, no justification for those commanders who 
are trying to use those reasons to cover their own passivity. We 
were present at firing exercises by a mechanized battalion 
yesterday where the organization of the exercises was far from 
normal. What do I have in mind? The instruction areas and target 
range proper had not been prepared, and the equipment of the 
gunnery range operated erratically. There were, for instance, 
disruptions in providing routine supplies for the troops in the 
field and informing them of the results, which ultimately led to 
an overall unsatisfactory evaluation of the subunit for day and 
night firing. There could have been no other evaluation. 
  I would like to emphasize once again--and I have reported 
this to the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine--that many of the 
commanders and senior officers who were complaining about the 
lack of money and fuels and lubricants are carelessly fulfilling 
their duties in the resolution of rudimentary tasks. 
  For example, the performance of a group exercise with the 
commanders of platoons of two subunits was rated unsatisfactory 
in the same mechanized battalion (regiment). Neither fuel nor 
money were required to conduct it, after all. All that was 
needed was systematic classes with the officers. 
  Take even the rudimentary questions of setting up the daily 
routine, organizing classes, maintaining stipulated forms of 
dress and the internal duty roster... Tell me, what funds are 
required for a regiment to have order, for a firefighting team 
to operate well in the motor pool? But it was clearly not 
working in harmony. 
  The time for the final evaluations has obviously not yet 
come. But I have serious complaints today toward the command 
personnel of the UPO for the organization of the final drills 
and the upholding of stipulated procedure. 
  [NARODNA ARMIYA] Ivan Vasylovych, the headquarters officers 
of a mechanized division and regiment and the personnel of one 
of the subunits were called out in a practice alert during the 
training session today. How do you rate their actions? 
  [I. Bizhan] We performed an evaluation of mobilization 
readiness with a regard for the situation that exists in the 
formation, and we checked out the system for notifying 
headquarters officers of the division and regiment. 
  It is still too early to be talking about final results. But 
there is quite a bit left to be done here. The written 
confirmation of the alert signal from the higher staff was 
received too late by the operations duty officer in particular. 
These are also rudimentary matters that people must learn that 
do not require any particular expenditures. 
  I would like to emphasize again that organizational 
conclusions will undoubtedly be drawn based on the results of 
the performance evaluation with a particular regard for the 
subjective factor that we were talking about before. 
  The question of how the problem of fully manning the 
mechanized division, especially at the platoon and company 
(battery) levels, with officer personnel is of particular 
attention in this regard. 
  The inspectorate includes representatives of the Main 
Personnel Directorate of the Ministry of Defense, who are 
studying this issue in detail. Everything possible has already 
been done on the part of the Ministry not only on this problem, 
but also on many of the other "sore spots" that exist in the 
division. 
  Work must also be done with the officers in the field, 
however. Their aspirations and needs must be studied more 
deeply, and their problems must not be brushed aside. I am sure 
that we will have fewer transfer or discharge requests from the 
young officers in that case. 
  [NARODNA ARMIYA] We have heard complaints more than once 
that 
bad things continue to happen in the determination of the 
optimal standard organizational structures of the formation. 
This has a negative impact on the proficiency and mood of 
people... 
  [I. Bizhan] This is, first of all, in the sphere of aimless 
discussions again. Take the mechanized battalion that I was 
talking about earlier. What reforms were made in it, say, that 
impeded the fulfillment of the weapons training program? There 
were none, but they are trying to use it to cover themselves. Is 
that good? 
  Second, everything that is being done is proceeding in 
accordance with the plan for the organizational development of 
the armed forces. I agree with the fact that everything is not 
being done as one would like here. Life itself makes 
corrections, and you cannot get away from that. One need not, 
however, put the problem of growth at the center. 
  We are not reforming the armed forces, we are building them, 
as has been emphasized repeatedly by Minister of Defense of 
Ukraine General of the Army of Ukraine Vitaliy Radetskyy. That 
is quite true. Everything is effectively being created anew, and 
you cannot avoid mistakes. 
  A large portion of the work lies ahead for us, and I am sure 
that the results of that will provide us with the opportunity of 
assessing, in objective and comprehensive fashion, the state of 
affairs in the formations and units of the corps being evaluated. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46637 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Carpathian Military District Undergoing Inspection </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Carpathian Military District Undergoing Inspection </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Command &amp; Control Exercise </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0448B Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 18 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0448B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report from "Inf. NA": "Overall Results--A </F>
Lesson, Not a Failure"] 
  [Text] The special tactical drills [TSZ] were a common and, 
at the same time, serious test for the officers and personnel of 
the field communications center commanded by Major Petro 
Alekseyev. Even though the drills are monitored from start to 
finish by exacting review officers, the supervisory functions 
belong to the command personnel of the unit that is actually 
performing the TSZ. 
  The subunit of Major Alekseyev was called up at dawn. The 
mobile portion of the unit, headed by the commander, soon made a 
march to the appointed area. Taking the scarcity of fuel into 
account, the route that was selected was intentionally a 
difficult one. Some 15 kilometers was enough for the review 
officers to evaluate the capability of the motor vehicles and 
drivers to carry out the assigned task. It should be stated that 
the column reached the planned area in full complement and 
without any serious incidents. The practical combat work then 
began--the very work that the communications troops had always 
considered, and still do consider, to be their professional 
honor and dignity. The officers and young specialists, 
regardless of the difficult situation in which they had to 
increase their specialist proficiency, acted in quite precise 
and confident fashion. The deadline for the entry into 
communications with other centers and, through a space 
communications station, with a radio link of the General Staff 
of the Armed Forces of Ukraine, the Carpathian Military District 
and the radio nets of the division staffs was met with time to 
spare. There were a few shortcomings, of course, which were 
recorded by the review officers. 
  They were able to fulfill their mission thanks to the 
efforts 
and skill of the experienced officers, warrant officers and 
young specialists. The deputy commander of the field center for 
indoctrination work, Major Valeriy Nedavniy, could not even 
single anyone out. After reflection, he named the chief of the 
telephone center, Captain Kostyantyn Lotostkyy, the chief of the 
space communications station, Lieutenant Hryhoriy Hrish, and 
equipment chiefs Warrant Officers Viktor Lepko and Serhiy 
Hudzevych. The concertmaster for the entire tactical-special 
exercise, as always, was the commander of the field 
communications center, Major Petro Alekseyev. It would not be 
the whole truth, as they say, if we were to fail to mention one 
other thing. The review officers, without looking at the 
confident professional actions of the communications troops, 
nonetheless gave the center only a satisfactory rating during 
the TSZ. 
  They noted some regrettable trifles connected with the 
immediate work in the field. This is entirely understandable. 
The minimal quantity of field trips the regiment was able to 
make during the winter, after all, owing to the shortage of 
motor resources, and the clear shortage of actual work had 
negative consequences. The proficiency of the subunits is 
dropping, and practical skills are being lost. The 
end-of-training-period special tactical drill testifies to this. 
It would be incorrect, however, to call it a failure. 
  This was a lesson--a lesson for the future. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46638 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Carpathian Military District Undergoing Inspection </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Carpathian Military District Undergoing Inspection </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Comments on 38th Army Corps </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0448C Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 21 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0448C </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed item from "Inf. NA": "Lessons for the Future"] </F>
  [Text] The inspection and final performance evaluation for 
the winter training period has been completed among the troops 
of the 38th Army Corps, commanded by Major-General Anatoliy 
Kalashnykov. It was carried out by a group of generals and 
officers from the central apparatus of the MO [Ministry of 
Defense] of Ukraine headed by Deputy Minister of Defense of 
Ukraine Colonel-General Ivan Bizhan. The results of the 
evaluation have been summarized. 
  The principal conclusion drawn by the commission from the 
inspection was the fact that the military formation is, as a 
whole, able to fulfill the tasks entrusted to it to protect the 
state sovereignty of Ukraine. 
  Many shortcomings were also noted as well, pertaining first 
and foremost to the professional proficiency of the staff 
officers, unit and subunit commanders and personnel. That 
proficiency was conditional upon both objective and subjective 
factors. The former include those connected with the difficult 
economic situation of the country, where funds, fuel and other 
material resources to support the combat readiness and everyday 
activity of the troops are lacking. This was taken into account 
in the inspection. But how to explain the negative attitude of 
some of the senior and command officers toward the organization 
of instruction in those military disciplines that do not require 
large expenditures? The latter pertain to the maintenance of 
discipline and regulation order, and the performance of official 
duties. The commission ascertained that the state of affairs is 
the worst in the military units headed by Colonel O. Kandiral, 
Lieutenant-Colonels L. Tkachenko and S. Manayev, and Major V. 
Ambros. A great deal of effort must be applied in order to 
instill order in the mechanized regiment commanded by Colonel V. 
Antsulov. The Deputy Minister of Defense of Ukraine became 
personally convinced of this when he visited the units and 
training areas. 
  However, as was pointed out at the council, the overwhelming 
majority of the officers and their subordinates have done 
everything in their power, despite all of the bad things and 
difficulties, and tried to demonstrate what they had learned 
during the last training period. The company tactical training 
exercise with live firing that was visited by Minister of 
Defense of Ukraine General of the Army of Ukraine Vitaliy 
Radetskyy could serve as an example of that. He encouraged a 
group of officers and soldiers in their skillful actions. The 
exercise in the mountain training areas itself received a high 
rating. 
  The troops of the 38th Army Corps (Carpathian Military 
District) have given an accounting of themselves. But the 
inspection continues. The baton has been passed to the Odessa 
Military District as of May 23. The 6th Army Corps has to pass 
final examinations. The conclusions that the commission from the 
central apparatus of the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine in the 
Carpathian Military District, one would think, will be taken 
into account there. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46639 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Fighter Pilot Training, Utilization Questions Examined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Fighter Pilot Training, Utilization Questions Examined </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Lack of Opportunity To Gain Experience </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0446A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 12 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0446A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lieutenant-Colonel Nykyfor Lysytsya under the </F>
rubric "Aviator Training": "Learn From Others, but Do Not 
Disregard Your Own"] 
  [Text] How can aviation be employed most effectively in 
conjunction with the ground forces in defensive battles? This 
question, very topical today, is arising more and more often for 
the commanders of flight units and formations. The young armed 
forces of our nation, after all, still do not have enough 
experience of their own. What was accumulated during the times 
of the former Soviet Union is not very useful--the army 
structures have changed and the Military Doctrine is completely 
different, as are views of the possible nature of combat 
operations and the employment of armed formations in general. It 
is thus necessary to gather, summarize and analyze, bit by bit, 
everything that we are able to get during flights and training. 
A whole series of measures have thus been carried out in the Air 
Forces of Ukraine for this purpose--practical-science 
conferences, seminars, operational-tactical training etc. The 
corresponding work in this area is being carried out by the 
lower echelons as well. 
  The 14th Air Army, commanded by Lieutenant-General Viktor 
Lyashenko, has conducted an operational-mobilization training 
session of the command personnel of the larger units and 
formations. It was held for five days at the Lviv training area. 
  Here is what Colonel Leonid Podnosov, acting chief of staff 
of the army, had to say about this session: "First, we 
studied--or rather, devised--new views on the utilization of 
frontal and army aviation in defensive combat operations," he 
said. "The participants in the session diligently studied the 
experience of combat operations during armed conflicts in recent 
years, and first and foremost the employment of aviation in 
them. A considerable role, by the way, was assigned to it. The 
combat operations in the Persian Gulf testify to that. The 
combined armed forces of the NATO countries carried out a quite 
prolonged bombing of the battle positions and military 
facilities of Iraq before the ground forces entered into battle." 
  "Aviation was used quite recently on the part of some 
Western 
powers on the territory of the former Yugoslavia in order to 
halt the combat operations of the warring sides. Other examples 
could also be cited. 
  "All of these were cases in which aviation was employed in 
order to carry out preemptive strikes. We need primarily skills 
in the utilization of air power in defensive combat operations, 
since Ukraine has no intention of being the first to attack 
anyone. We are thus trying to perceive the experience of the 
cases cited above in a different way. We are selecting only what 
we need. That was emphasized both in the lectures given by the 
chiefs of directorates and services, and in the speeches of 
participants in the session during the group seminar. 
  "However rich other peoples' experience may be, however," 
emphasized Colonel Podnosov, "you cannot get by without your own 
as well. And we do have some of our own, even if it is not all 
that rich. Tactical exercises were conducted recently, as is 
well known, by a motorized-rifle regiment with live firing at 
the Lviv training area. Aviation took an active part in it, with 
the delivery of on-board weaponry. The leaders of our army 
intentionally saw to it that more aircraft and helicopters were 
allotted to this exercise than were stipulated by tactical 
norms. This was done, first of all, so as to give as many of the 
fliers as possible, from all branches of aviation, the 
opportunity to gain some skills. They had one task--know the 
capabilities of your aircraft during the performance of combat 
operations, so as to defend the territory of our nation. And 
they were able to do so." 
  Almost all of the unit commanders whose aviation subunits 
were assigned to the exercises--the experienced pilots Colonels 
Anatoliy Baranov, Oleksiy Kotov and Volodymyr Tsymbal, among 
others--expressed their ideas during the session with regard to 
new forms of combat employment of aircraft and helicopters. All 
of this provided grounds to conclude that the assigned tasks 
were achieved by the session. All participants gained a certain 
amount of the experience that they need in their everyday combat 
training. 
  It would be worthwhile to add to the story of Colonel Leonid 
Podnosov that the assembly was conducted in quite interesting 
and intensive fashion. The most diverse types of instruction 
were employed in it. They included, aside from the lectures, 
tactical drills and seminars during which each of the officers 
was able to express his opinion or point of view, make a 
suggestion or share his own experience. Staff gaming was also 
conducted here, during which the operation of 
command-and-control structures was practiced. 
  A number of demonstration classes, including on the troop 
services, were also held for the participants in the assembly. A 
visit was organized to a tank regiment of the Zaliznyy Division, 
where the commanders of aviation units were shown how the 
soldiers of that model military garrison live, serve, train and 
relax. 
  It would also be worthwhile to point out that the assembly 
did not require a great deal of material funding. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46640 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Fighter Pilot Training, Utilization Questions Examined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Fighter Pilot Training, Utilization Questions Examined </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Training Constraints Mean Loss of Skill </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0446B Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 20 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0446B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by NARODNA ARMIYA special correspondent </F>
Lieutenant-Colonel Nykyfor Lysytsya: "Those Who Flew Augmented 
Their Experience"] 
  [Text] The weather decided to arrange the first test for 
the fliers on the day of the flight proficiency performance 
evaluation in the fighter air regiment commanded by Colonel 
Bohdan Spodarko. The black clouds crawled across Carpathia and 
immediately covered the ground with heavy rain and powerful 
lightning. The meteorologists, of course, would not give the 
go-ahead to the missile-bearing aircraft under such conditions. 
The pilots can take up the aircraft in a combat situation, and 
even in peacetime, under extraordinary conditions, since they 
are fighters. All-weather fighters. The likelihood that one of 
the fiery bolts that were tearing from the clouds could hit an 
aircraft, however, was quite large. The flight operations 
officer and the commander of the 14th Air Army, 
Lieutenant-General Viktor Lyashenko, who headed the commission 
to summarize the results of the performance evaluation, decided 
not to risk it. The start of the flight shift was moved from 
1500 to a later time, which forced certain corrections to be 
made in the flight schedule. This had no better effect on the 
mood of the aerial warriors. It is well known that a pilot 
begins his flight while still on the ground, readying himself 
psychologically and performing these or those operations in his 
mind, reflecting on each minute of the flight. And now the start 
was being pushed back, until who knows when, for what period of 
time, or whether it would go at all. 
  The engines of the MiG-29s roared to life at 2000 hours. 
Regimental commander Colonel Bohdan Spodarko took off. Behind 
him, in the rear cockpit, was the commander of the division, 
Colonel Ivan Ivanchuk, who performed the role of instructor 
during this flight. The commanders, as usual, were the first 
into the sky. 
  Reports soon started coming in from the aircraft to the 
command post--the headings of the route to the training area and 
some of the zones themselves, according to the data on the 
meteorological conditions, could be used for making the flights. 
  The aircraft called Hosha in the regiment was the next to 
taxi out to the runway. Whence the name? I would point out, 
before answering that question, that there is also a Kesha here. 
Those names were taken from an animated film, and the pilots 
called the aircraft that for their particular coloration, which 
reminds some of a parrot. 
  We have already noted in our newspaper that two MiG-29 
aircraft had made demonstration flights to the United States and 
Canada more than two years ago. They were painted over at that 
time accordingly. The missile aircraft returned to their 
Fatherland after the completion of the air show. They were once 
more in the order of battle, they were making planned flights, 
and it is worthwhile to point out that it is considered quite 
prestigious in the regiment to take up the Hosha or the Kesha. 
Many interesting elements can be discerned in this story. First 
of all, the fact that the pilots have never lost their sense of 
humor, even during the harshest of testing. One also senses that 
they love their aircraft, so they even give them names. The main 
thing is that our Air Forces are getting their own history, 
their own traditions. Possibly these two aircraft, which were 
the first to announce to the Canadians and the inhabitants of 
the United States the existence of the state of Ukraine and its 
armed forces, will someday take their place of honor in some 
museum. 
  Major Serhiy Dorofeyev once had occasion to make a flight on 
the Hosha. It is worth noting that he performed the exercises in 
piloting technique quite successfully, and made a takeoff and 
landing. During subsequent flights that were made before 
nightfall, as well as at night, all of the pilots demonstrated 
good aerial proficiency. Squadron commander Yuriy Protsenko 
received outstanding ratings in aerial navigation and for the 
interception of airborne targets. His colleague, Major Volodymyr 
Veherynskyy, also made a weapons-delivery flight in excellent 
fashion. Regimental Navigator Major Mykola Romanov received the 
highest grade for piloting technique and for the interception of 
airborne targets. Senior pilot Captain Serhiy Doroshenko and 
other aerial warriors also "brought home" a high rating to the 
airfield. The officers displayed considerable combat 
proficiency, flight experience and diligence. All of them are 
pilots of the highest qualifications, have been on combat alert 
duty to protect the airspace of our nation dozens of times, and 
strove to show themselves in the best light in the evaluation. 
  But do high results obtained in control flights testify to a 
high status of flight proficiency and combat training among all 
of the pilots in the fighter regiment? It would be a 
considerable exaggeration to say so. It should be noted that 
there were disruptions in the operation of aircraft hardware 
during the flight shift as well. The transmitter was not working 
for a certain time, for example, during the second flight on the 
aircraft of the regimental commander. The experienced pilot, of 
course, was able to get out of that non-standard situation 
successfully. There were also other problems that were not very 
substantial. 
  The main argument that was not in favor of the fliers, 
however, was the fact that the plan for combat readiness was not 
entirely fulfilled in the regiment. Fourteen flight shifts were 
carried out in all, on which the pilots spent just 240 hours in 
the air. Why so little? That almost sounds like a rhetorical 
question. But the fact that the air units have a miserly 
quantity of fuels and lubricants has been discussed repeatedly 
in the pages of our newspaper. No aircraft can go up without 
aviation fuel. The motor vehicles that support the flights 
cannot leave the motor pool without gasoline and diesel fuel. 
The sharp reduction in the number of pilot sorties also tells on 
the level of readiness of these aerial fighters. A considerable 
portion of them have already lost their professional 
skills--more than half of the pilots in this regiment. 
Lieutenant-General Viktor Lyashenko emphasized when summarizing 
the results of the evaluation. The pilots should either be 
flying or they have to be let go to the four winds--this quite 
categorical conclusion of the commander has solid grounding. A 
pilot who has not taken an aircraft up for more than a year, 
after all, cannot now even be called a pilot, since he needs to 
learn again almost from square one. And this should not be taken 
as an insult, but rather as reality; such is the specific nature 
of the profession of the pilot. He can lead the life of a 
vagabond if he does not have his own apartment, he can agree to 
a reduction in his ration of flights or his material supply, but 
he cannot fail to fly. The principal conclusion that could be 
drawn, after the performance evaluation conducted in this and 
other flight units, can be phrased roughly as follows: the most 
important problem, which requires immediate resolution, is the 
provision of fuels and lubricants. There will be true aerial 
warriors--not just a handful of them, but the overwhelming 
majority who hold flight positions today--when there is fuel. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46641 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> BALTIC STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Officials View Disposition of Facilities Left by Russian Army </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Officials View Disposition of Facilities Left by Russian Army </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1319A Riga NEATKARIGA CINA in Latvian 7 May 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1319A </F>
<F P=104>  Riga NEATKARIGA CINA </F>
<F P=105>  Latvian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Ilgonis Upmalis, chief of the bureau to </F>
control the withdrawal of the Army of the Federation of Russia, 
and Ludis Pavilonis, his deputy, by Viktors Berzins: "They 
Leave; Facilities Remain; The Russian Army Is Leaving So Briskly 
That the Latvian State Cannot Keep Up With Resolutions on the 
Former Army Facilities."] 
  [Text] In summary, the number of resolutions by the 
government, which would determine the future ownership of the 
facilities, is unable to keep up with the number of acceptance 
and committal acts. 
  [Pavilonis] During its time, the Supreme Council passed a 
resolution stating that the Council of Ministers must review the 
case of each such facility and adopt a resolution on awarding it 
to either the municipality or some other party, all within a ten 
day period. 
  In practice, this cannot be done because the process takes 
too long. Before the Cabinet of Ministers adopts the resolution, 
the resolution bill must be written, in conjunction with the 
judicial division and other institutions. In total, about 10 to 
15 signatures must be collected. When these and the archival 
reports are gathered, the case is reviewed by the appropriate 
committee of the Cabinet of Ministers, and if the latter finds 
that all of the documentation is in order, only then is it 
presented to the administration. In a meeting of the 
administration, the final resolution is adopted on the 
disposition of the facility. 
  [Berzins] Then a whole month would go by ... 
  [Pavilonis] Ye-es (drawing out the word)... You said one 
month? Now let's take a look at the list of facilities returned. 
For example, Cesis rayon, Sarkani, medical warehouses. Committal 
act -- April 27, 1993. Administrative resolution -- March 5, 
1994. Almost one entire year! Naturally, it doesn't take this 
long for everything. Now, here is another entry: committal act 
-- June 8, 1993, resolution by the Cabinet of Ministers -- 
January 4, 1994. Half of a year. And there are more and more. 
  [Berzins] At such a rate, we will never get rid of the 
Russian Army! 
  [Pavilonis] We are getting rid of the Russian Army, because 
they are no longer in these facilities. The Army says "so long" 
to those areas as soon as there is an acceptance and committal 
act. 
  [Berzins] What happens to the vacated facility during the 
time between the committal act and the adoption of the 
administrative resolution? 
  [Pavilonis] The municipality must provide protection to make 
sure that nothing happens, but it is not allowed to take over 
ownership. It cannot allow in a private organization, nor do 
anything else. 
  And what happens if the municipality has agreed to be the 
owner, but then some interested ministry turns up, which decides 
something as follows: Why should the municipality have it? We 
need it! We will turn it over to the municipality, then prepare 
a resolution to have it turned over to us. And they prepare and 
receive the resolution by the Cabinet of Ministers. Now the 
occupant selected by the municipality must be evicted. Can the 
municipality feel secure and confident: Although the Cabinet of 
Ministers is preparing these resolutions very slowly, they will 
be finished someday, and then -- who will be the legal owner of 
the facility? There have been numerous precedents where the 
facility has been taken away from the municipality. 
  Now about protection. The municipalities are not paid for 
providing protection, and they must find the money from internal 
reserves. But, when the municipality is turned out of some 
facility, it says: -- We are removing our protection, but pay us 
for the period during which we provided protection. -- But the 
ministries, in turn, have no money, and so they just don't pay. 
  [Berzins] What should be done to speed up the disposition of 
the former military facilities? 
  [Pavilonis] At the least, we should increase the number of 
members in the Ministry of Finances group that prepares the 
administrative resolution bills, so that we can catch up with 
the acceptance and committal acts. Naturally, this is impossible 
to do in ten days, since signatures cannot be obtained at such a 
rate, but let them attempt to do it in twenty days. Don't 
prolong it to a year. 
  [Upmalis] The next meeting of the commission led by Mr. 
Kosisis will be dedicated to a discussion on how to speed up 
production of these administrative resolutions. 
  In order to adopt a resolution, which will have a completely 
singular significance for the commission, and the 
administration, and so that there will be no basis for an 
argument by any entity, there must be clarity on what is under 
each facility; who owned the land? Has the owner submitted a 
claim? Who owned the facility built before 1940? All of this 
archival information is essential. Plus, we need the plans of 
the building or facility. In the beginning, while the military 
unit was still in there, they were impossible to obtain. Now, we 
have made an agreement with North West Military Group Commander 
Mayorov, and there are no longer any refusals. We even received 
them for the Maiznicas Street facility, which contains the 
counterintelligence unit. It is a complicated matter to gather 
all of the archival information, to obtain the necessary 
documents from the Land and Property Reclamation commissions. 
  If it is absolutely certain that the land under a facility 
belongs to the municipality, then, naturally, the facility 
belongs to the municipality. If a mistake is made at the meeting 
of the administration, then this could lead to the curious event 
that the administration, by its resolution, gives the 
municipality's land to some ministry. Mistakes happen, many 
mistakes -- because incomplete documentation is submitted. 
  Commercial organizations are very quick in using this to 
their advantage when they are interested in a certain facility. 
As you could say, they climb over corpses, with the help of 
false information, with various incomplete reports, to attempt 
and sometimes even succeed to establish the grounds for their 
claim. Municipalities are also guilty. And there are cases where 
all of the interested parties do not want to settle their claims 
in accordance with the law, and then the only way to clear up 
the confusion is by the prosecutor and the court. 
  There will be a "mad dash", there will. 
  [Berzins] Let us assume that the Russian Army will leave by 
August 31. The majority of military units will probably prolong 
the turnover of the facilities as long as they can. The "mad 
dash", presumably, will occur in July and August... 
  [Pavilonis] Maybe there will be much more of a "mad dash" 
towards the end, but I can say that at present they are turning 
over their facilities on a somewhat regular basis. As soon as an 
area is empty, they draw up the acceptance and committal act: 
please, take it and do what you will. It is no longer the way it 
was at one time, -- major discord: Mayorov was not signing the 
acts, Moscow was simply not allowing him to sign -- the military 
unit area was empty, but it was not turned over. Now these 
matters are being handled promptly. 
  [Berzins] There is probably still a great deal left to 
settle. 
  [Pavilonis] Yes. There are still 191 Russian Army units in 
247 facilities in Latvia. 
  [Berzins] How many have been turned over this year? 
  [Pavilonis] Twenty-one units with 86 facilities. 
  [Berzins] Twenty-one units in four months. For the remaining 
four months -- 191. How can this be accomplished without a "mad 
dash"? 
  [Pavilonis] There will be a "mad dash", there will... 
  [Berzins] They will make a "mad dash", but they are most 
likely prepared for it. But are we, likewise, prepared to handle 
such a mountain of returned property? The facilities should at 
least be protected. And it will also be necessary to make 
determinations... 
  [Pavilonis] Up until now, if there was an owner, the take 
over and protection did not create any major problems. 
  [Berzins] But there can be no owner until the Cabinet of 
Ministers confirms one. But that grindstone is turning very 
slowly. 
  [Pavilonis] The Cabinet of Ministers is issuing resolutions 
out of turn for certain facilities that may be needed more 
quickly. But even so, the number of resolutions has not managed 
to keep up with the number of committal acts. 
  [Berzins] So, we already couldn't keep up when there were 
relatively few facilities turned over. What will happen when the 
"mad dash" starts and there are many facilities to take over and 
decide on? How can these be protected to avoid their destruction 
and demolition? 
  [Pavilonis] It is possible that illegal activities will 
occur. If some official wants to "screw" someone, he could say: 
-- You are managing this property illegally, and I am suing you 
and throwing you out. 
  [Upmalis] The only positive thing is that for those 
facilities where the Army unit is still present, likely owners 
have already appeared. As for what remains -- I don't think 
there will be a problem with taking over facilities located in 
Riga. The major facilities -- training grounds, airfields -- 
have already been taken over. There is still the matter of Adazi 
and Dobele, where the 25th brigade is situated. There is still 
the matter of "Strautini" in the Aluksne rayon, where a few 
complications will most certainly arise. There is also the 32 
meter high radio-telescopic antenna in the Ventspils rayon, 
which has not been awarded to anyone, yet. In turning over this 
facility, we are looking for possibilities of better utilization 
and preservation, because it is so specialized and so far into 
the forest that it will be impossible for the municipality to 
preserve it. Discussions about this facility are being held with 
the Russian Scientific Academy about cooperation among 
scientists from Latvia, Russia and other nations, all united 
under of the "Kvazar" program. Although the problems are 
monstrous -- this facility takes up 209 hectares of the forest, 
Latvian scientists do not have the strength to manage it, and 
the Russian side does not have the strength to organize and 
finance it, because, in order to prepare this facility for 
scientific purposes, the equipment must be changed. There are 
also high ranking officials in Latvia who would like to see this 
unique antenna turned into ashes and dust, because this is what 
some foreign services have supposedly recommended. 
  However, delays can be foreseen in the preparation of the 
administrative resolution bills. It will be a major job, and, in 
my opinion, after just one year, it is doubtful whether we will 
have all of the administrative resolutions in order for a 
property to be legally registered, etc. 
  Insatiable ministries are swallowing up plans and 
priorities. 
  [Berzins] Four years have already elapsed since Latvia 
declared independence. Soon, it will be three years since Latvia 
was recognized as independent. After half of a century, the 
foreign army is finally leaving, but only now, at the last 
minute, we are starting to worry about what to do with the 
Latvian land and the buildings constructed on this land for 
military purposes. We are looking for owners. Haven't we 
composed any sort of comprehensive program? 
  [Pavilonis] There are no comprehensive programs. When the 
commission on the takeover of military facilities has examined 
the case agreed upon, the question may be raised: what do you 
intend to do in this facility? And this does not happen every 
time. 
  [Berzins] This question doesn't have to be raised? If no one 
else wants it, then just take it away? 
  [Pavilonis] Yes. But, if there is more than one contender, 
then each is asked what he intends to do there. 
  [Berzins] Is it possible that there are some good facilities 
that no one wants? 
  [Pavilonis] There are some. Then basically the Supreme 
Council's resolution is in effect that the municipality must 
provide protection. 
  [Berzins] Even if that means from now until eternity? 
  [Pavilonis] Let the municipality decide how to manage it. 
  [Berzins] But then it would manage everything which happened 
to be in its territory, as, for example, the cooperative and 
state cooperative farms, which appear to be unnecessary at 
present. 
  [Pavilonis] If no one wants to take over a facility, then 
the 
Russians could be requested to take down the facility and plant 
grass. A green meadow would be left behind. 
  [Berzins] Of course you can ask, but will they do it? And 
even if they would take it down, who will have the nerve to ask 
them, when everyone is celebrating that "Thank God! They're 
finally gone!" Let's keep them here, so they can dawdle with the 
demolition?... 
  [Pavilonis] In some cases, it was headed in that direction. 
The Ventspils military unit vacated the territory, but the 
Ventspils municipal government did not want to receive this 
territory, if it was not included as a property owner. However, 
this land belongs to the state. 
  [Berzins] It seems as though we have not had enough time to 
resolve these and other sticky questions. But then, while all 
details may not be worked out, we could at least form a general 
conceptual program... 
  [Upmalis] Such a program has been very difficult, if not 
impossible, to set up because the ministries and municipalities 
have been so greedy. In the beginning, when these facilities 
were still very far from being turned over, all of the 
ministries presented their proposals and requested so many 
facilities that, when they reached the stage of actual takeover 
and examined them with their own eyes, they understood: the 
territory is enormously large, and they would have to pay taxes 
on it, and so, at the very last moment, they started to refuse 
these facilities. 
  And all of our plans -- we had beautiful plans! -- were gone 
with the wind. For example, the Ministry of Defense was given 
absolute priority, and some others were also given priority. But 
now, the Ministry of Defense has refused, on more than one 
occasion, to accept facilities, which have been turned over 
already, and now, we don't know what to do with these 
facilities. Like the Daugavpils fortress, for example, and that 
is not the only one. In the Naujene rural district, close to 
Daugavpils, there is also a miliary facility that was requested 
by the Ministry of Defense, but then refused. After that, the 
Ministry of Internal Affairs refused it. In the end, after this 
facility was already ransacked, when there was no longer 
anything there, it was graciously offered to the municipality. 
But Mr. Geiba said: "Nothing can be done there anymore, so we 
are also refusing to take it". 
  The point is reached that a facility literally goes to ruin 
because of irresponsibility. That is what happened with Vainode 
airport, as well. If they had not granted the request by the 
Ministry of Transportation to be assigned this facility, without 
asking the Ministry of Transportation what it wanted to do with 
the Vainode airport, then, in my opinion, it may have been 
possible to save this facility. Now it has been totally 
ransacked, and a large number of residential buildings stand 
empty and destroyed. It all looks very sad. That is what happens 
when a ministry agrees to accept something, but when it is 
necessary to start managing the property, it is unable to do so. 
  [Pavilonis] The saddest aspect is that the residential 
buildings remain uninhabited. We see and hear in Riga that many 
have no place to live. But, there, they have large five story 
buildings remaining empty and going to ruin. 
  [Berzins] The misfortune lies in that the Russians could not 
take them along, and we cannot take them to Riga. Nor to some 
city closer. 
  [Pavilonis] And why not. Vietumis does that: the 
construction 
company can take apart a large five story panel building, bring 
it closer to the city and "set" it up. I am not sure what this 
accomplishes, but at least the materials don't have to be 
assembled from scratch. 
  In Paplaka, already quite some time ago, the municipality 
inherited large residential buildings that were unwanted by 
everyone. They said: -- We don't have anyone to put in them, 
because, for the majority, we have our own private homes. 
  Private firms, fighting for a place in the sun, have a 
propensity for buying former military facilities from the 
Russian Army. 
  [Berzins] But you are saying that all types of illegal 
actions are occurring, court hearings, one company, wanting to 
get in, chases out another one, which happens to be there 
already... 
  [Upmalis] Some of the returned facilities have been bought 
up 
by firms, which none of the Latvian institutions have been 
unable to determine what type of company they are. 
  For example, what is Lat-West-East, which has purchased a 
petroleum base still containing an army unit from Russia, and 
the sales contract states that this army unit can remain in 
Latvia and on the firm's territory, until such time that Russia 
decides to remove its Army from there. In such a case, who 
decides whether the Russian Army can be present here in Latvia? 
The administration of Latvia, Russia, or the firm? And, 
unfortunately, we are unable to do anything concrete. The only 
thing was when members of this military unit, which is located 
in the Viesturs Prospect petroleum base, and is owned by 
Lat-West-East, came to me and asked if I would please issue them 
driving permits for their automobiles, so that they could 
perform their routine activities, and I replied: -- You sold 
your territory, and you no longer have any here. 
  There are very many similar occurrences. 
  Furthermore. It is still possible for firms to purchase a 
facility from the Army, and backdate the sale. This is because 
it is still not down in writing that firms must register and 
notarize the contracts for the sale of these facilities. 
  If you are a military unit commander and you have a seal, 
and 
I am a firm representative and I have a seal, and we perform the 
sales transaction using sales checks, then we would have no 
problem concluding a document dated, for example, August 1, 1991. 
  If everything has been performed to the letter of the law, 
plus, if the firm at that time was registered in the Latvian 
Registry of Businesses, then, in my opinion, no Latvian legal 
institution will be able to prove that this was an illegal 
action. 
  There is another painful matter that I would like to focus 
attention on: various firms that manufacture firearms have 
turned up in Latvia. 
  I am still uncertain about the licensing of such firms. One 
has moved in to an army manufacturing plant, which remains 
un-returned. It has made the purchase from Russia, and in quite 
an unusual manner. As we know, all manufacturing plants in 
Russia are part of the State Property Fund (SPF). That is not a 
military structure. Thus, the firm has made its purchase not 
from the Army, but from Russia's SPF. Thus, it would seem that 
SPF has property in Latvia, since it is able to make the sale. 
  With respect to the firm La Con, in the Daugavgriva fortress 
territory, which, according to our views, is not operating in 
conformity with the laws of Latvia, we have submitted materials 
to the prosecutor's office for review. Our bureau does not have 
the right to review -- legally or illegally. We have not yet 
received the findings from the prosecutor, although we have in 
our possession agreements concluded between the firm and the 
Latvian naval forces on the use of the facility for 15 years. 
The facility is assigned to the Ministry of Defense, but the 
naval forces have already managed to conclude an agreement with 
the firm, without organizing any competitions, which they should 
have done. Many firms have signed up for this Daugavgriva port 
territory. 
  [Berzins] What is the major attraction there? 
  [Upmalis] Undoubtedly, the port. Agreements have been 
concluded with the blessings of the commander of the naval 
forces without, as far as I can tell, coordination with the 
Ministry of Defense. We can "thank" Mr.Zeibots, Mr. Zingis and 
the rest of the leading workers for this. This is no surprise, 
because the firm has a high ranking "benefactor", who is in the 
practice of lobbying. He is Mr. Kaza, who is attempting to 
support this firm with all sorts of means. I have a list of its 
founders. It was founded by the tradition principle: at the 
forefront is a person of Latvian nationality, who is a citizen, 
and all the rest -- people of Russian nationality. That is the 
traditional manner for companies. They say that the list of 
founders was later amplified with the name of Mr. Kaza. 
  I am most concerned in these cases, because they are not 
holding competitions on the basis of the business plan, as 
defined by the law. 
  This company, unfortunately, has taken down many major 
buildings which are still in unassigned territory. 
  I could mention many, many facilities for which the 
concluded 
actions will have to be reviewed by the prosecutor's office in 
time. This is because the documents concerning these actions, 
which we have available to us on the respective facility 
takeover, and those -- most interestingly! -- which the firms 
have not submitted, are, in our opinion, not too clean. 
  At one time, we had the plenary powers of the entire Council 
of Ministers, now we have only one -- the plenary power of the 
Ministry of Defense, and that is too little for us to be able to 
control the conclusion of all these actions. We also do not have 
to right to use sanctions against firms that pursue illegal 
actions. 
  Often with the help of a high ranking person, they go around 
the bureau, and have various ministries do the resolving, in 
accordance with their own views. 
  The bureau is not involved with the takeover of facilities. 
The bureau is concerned with the control of facility takeovers 
-- how they are turned over. 
  The commission led by Mr. Kosisis, -- the commission on the 
takeover of military facilities from the military forces of the 
Russian Federation, can also only make recommendations, and on 
the basis of such, the Cabinet of Ministers adopts resolutions 
on the utilization of such a facility. 
  Only they understand 
  [Berzins] Can we assume that the bureau has a complete 
picture of the Russian military units and military facilities 
still remaining in Latvia? 
  [Pavilonis] Yes. All have been accounted for and entered in 
the records. Nevertheless, there are times when some military 
unit shows up which is not in our records. Either it had been 
very well hidden, or was newly formed. That happened when the 
15th Air Army Headquarters at 55 Brivibas Street was eliminated. 
The military personnel remaining in Latvia relocated to Skulte 
airfield, where a new military unit was formed. Such a trick had 
not been anticipated in our documents. 
  [Berzins] Do they come to you for driving permits? 
  [Pavilonis] Not only that. If, for example, officers need to 
cross the border, drive somewhere on official business, they 
come to us for a permit. Permits to relocate automobiles. To 
bring out property. In this manner, we learn that a new unit has 
formed. This has been a rare occurrence recently. Thus, we have 
to assume that all of the military units present in Latvia have 
been accounted for. 
  [Berzins] When did it become clear that everything was 
included? 
  [Pavilonis] Two years ago, when the bureau started its work, 
two thirds of the military forces were known. The remaining 
third was accounted for in six months time. 
  When we started working, all units present in Latvia were 
considered to be secret. The Russian Army would not give any 
lists. When we could say: here you have such a military unit, 
there -- that type, when we brought all ends together, only then 
did the veil of secrecy fall away. Recently they released a 
formerly highly secret document -- a summary of how many 
military units have been in Latvia since 1940. And not only 
military units, but also equivalent units -- institutions with 
various names which did not have a military unit number, but 
were simply issued a number. However, they have not admitted 
that the secret units with box office box numbers are theirs. 
  [Berzins] Then who do they belong to? 
  [Pavilonis] We are now trying to find out who started 
issuing 
post office box numbers for secret workshops and secret 
factories. Our bureau does not have extensive materials on the 
post office box factories. 
  [Berzins] But don't the factories exist? And what about 
their 
products? 
  [Pavilonis] The factories exist, but the products, which 
required the "post office boxes", have not been manufactured for 
a long time. There were secret workshops in VEF, Komutators, the 
Liepaja agriculture machinery factory, and many other places. As 
soon as ownership of the All-Union factories was tuned over to 
the Republic of Latvia, the manufacture of military products was 
discontinued. 
  [Berzins] Minor battles are being waged over the special 
military factories. 
  [Pavilonis] We have to find a compromise. If both sides 
refuse to budge from their positions, then the factory will be 
ransacked. The Russian Army is secretly bringing out the major 
machinery. If they cannot manage to get it across the border, 
they sell it to some commercial concern, and the factory is left 
unable to function. 
  [Berzins] But maybe there is nothing wrong with bringing the 
machinery out. Let them do it in full force -- there won't be 
anything for the followers of Interfront to rally behind. The 
Latvian Army, most likely, will never have that many tanks to 
keep a factory busy doing repairs at full capacity for a whole 
growing season. 
  [Pavilonis] The factories that were not needed by Latvia 
were 
all low level and have already been eliminated. But there are 
also those, which can be utilized expediently, and which have 
relatively modern equipment. It is economically more practical 
to save them, instead of eliminating them. 
  [Berzins] But we already have factories standing, which 
cannot produce anything substantial. What good will it do to 
have additional factories? 
  [Pavilonis] While the products of Latvia's industries have 
remained in warehouses until now, none of the military factories 
have full warehouses. Everything was sold. Their products were 
not only for the needs of the military units, but also goods for 
their personal consumption. And, likewise, these did not remain 
in warehouses. They were either of better quality, or the 
management was more exacting in production, and issued only as 
many products as needed. 
  Worthy, worthless. 
  [Berzins] And nothing worthless will remain behind after the 
Russian Army leaves? 
  [Upmalis] There are at least three bunkers, which we don't 
know how to utilize. One in Adazi, in Muceniekos -- two. The 
15th Military Air Army Force Command Point in Muceniekos and the 
North Western Military Group Commander's Command Point in Adazi. 
They are two to three story underground buildings, containing 
equipment which consumes a great amount of energy to maintain 
suitability for occupancy -- pumping out underground water, etc. 
There is very high electrical consumption. 
  [Berzins] Let Mr. Mayorov take them along. 
  [Upmalis] We could allow him to do that. The demolition 
involves major problems. Likewise, with the bunker in Muceniekos 
-- it contains enormous amounts of reinforced concrete, all 
covered by soil. Should we allow it fill up with water? That is 
dangerous -- it could cause accidents. Blow it up and then bury 
it? Or maybe keep it as a historical monument and turn it into a 
tourist attraction. 
  Mr. Pavilonis, however, is very economically minded -- these 
bunkers would be suitable for mushroom cultivation, because a 
constant temperature and humidity can be maintained in them. The 
problem is that there are many bunkers and only one vegetable 
farming company, Riga, which would not be able to manage 
everything. If only there were funds to install an appropriate 
boiler system -- the one built by the Army is too large to use 
for such purposes. 
  [Berzins] Aren't there also doubts about utilizing the 
formerly Baltic Military District, now North Western Military 
Group's Pentagon (read -- headquarters -- V.B.) 
building for Latvian army purposes -- even though a huge 
quantity of all types of listening devices remain planted there? 
  [Upmalis] We will have a great deal of problems with it. But 
how can you compare listening devices with live KGB agents, who 
are employed by our leading firms?! 
  [Berzins] Our Saeima, with amazing sincerity and for a long 
time, has been occupied with the KGB sacks and the five deputies 
suspected of collaboration, while several hundred KGB staff 
members are living high off the hog. 
  [Upmalis] I personally know a person who admits that he 
worked for the KGB. Looking at the list of a certain firm's 
founders, he showed me names of people he had worked with. And 
this is a very famous firm's founders list. Thus, if these 
gentlemen have healthy, very powerful firms, then why talk about 
five Saeima deputies, who probably don't have the financial 
means to influence anything today. Such firms have much greater 
possibilities. Everyone knows that, but nothing is done about 
it. That is why we need a law on these KGB agents, which, I 
believe, we will have soon. 
  I like the position taken by Mr. Bojars from the very 
beginning: yes, I don't deny I was such, but now I work for the 
good of Latvia, and so, accept me for what I am. If everyone who 
worked there would come forward to confess, and regret his 
sins... Patriotism is not dependent on where a person 
worked, but, rather, on how he did his job, 
what he did in his place of work, and how 
he is acting at present. 
  [Berzins] The Pentagon on Elizabetes Street will probably 
leave at the very end of the withdrawal term. 
  [Pavilonis] The 15th Air Army Headquarters left, even though 
some of its military units were still here. We assume that the 
North Western Military Group Headquarters will do the same. In 
private conversations, they are saying that they won't be the 
last to leave their premises. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46642 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> CAUCASIAN STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shevardnadze Abolishes Military Police </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shevardnadze Abolishes Military Police </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0479C Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 10 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0479C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vitaliy Denisov: "The Military Police Has Been </F>
Ordered To `Live Long'"] 
  [Text] The military police were abolished by an order of 
Georgian Armed Forces Supreme Commander-in-Chief Eduard 
Shevardnadze as "a structure failing to meet modern 
requirements." The order notes that the reorganization is being 
carried out in order to confirm the principle of one-man 
command. Military policemen will be placed into the composition 
of motorized rifle units, the directorate has been disbanded, 
and the armament and equipment are being transferred to other 
units. 
  It is interesting that the republic's National Guard remains 
beyond the control of the Georgian Ministry of Defense. National 
Guard personnel were the main striking force of the coup of 
winter 1991-1992, as a result of which President Zviad 
Gamsakhurdia was removed from power. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46643 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> CENTRAL ASIAN STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Military-Industrial Complex Course Charted </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Military-Industrial Complex Course Charted </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1522A Almaty KAZAKHSTANSKAYA PRAVDA in Russian 18 Jun 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1522A </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty KAZAKHSTANSKAYA PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [KazTAG report: "A Planned Basis and Dynamism for the </F>
Development of the Defense Complex"] 
  [Text] A session of the Security Council was held on 16 
June under the chairmanship of President Nursultan Nazarbayev. 
The questions "Status of the Provision of the Armed Forces of 
the Republic of Kazakhstan With Equipment and Arms and Their 
Supply With Material and Technical Resources" and "Concepts of 
the Formation and Execution of Long-Term Defense Programs and 
the Development of the Defense Complex of the Republic of 
Kazakhstan" were considered. Reports were presented by General 
of the Army Sagadat Nurmagambetov, minister of defense, and Mars 
Urkumbayev, minister of economics. 
  Considering the difficult economic situation that has taken 
shape in the country, it was observed at the session, the 
Ministry of Defense and the corresponding departments are doing 
much to provide the troops with everything necessary and are 
using the allocated funds in extremely economical fashion. The 
arms and the pool of combat equipment of the units and combined 
units are being replenished mainly from the Russian Federation 
and Ukraine, in accordance with a number of agreements signed at 
chief of state level. But in practice the solution of these 
questions is attended by great difficulties. And it is necessary 
for overcoming them, a number of speakers believe, to exclude 
the services of middlemen, who are concerned primarily for their 
own profits, and to create an interstate conciliation commission 
for reciprocal military supplies within the framework of the CIS. 
  There was a detailed analysis also of the degree of 
provision 
of all branches and arms of the service with equipment and arms, 
fuel and lubricants, clothing and related gear, and food. 
Together with the positive aspects, there are many problems here 
also. Specifically, a particular quantity of the equipment of 
the radiotechnical troops, whose service life will expire in the 
very near future, of certain units of the air defense of major 
cities and industrial facilities is in need of replacement. 
There needs to be an improvement in the provision of the 
aviation units with fuel for the pilots to be afforded an 
opportunity to complete the prescribed minimum number of flight 
hours logged to maintain and [word illegible] their professional 
expertise. 
  Of the armies of the Commonwealth countries, the men of 
Kazakhstan are the best supplied with food. But this is far from 
being the case when it comes to clothing and related gear. This 
applies particularly to the officer corps. In order to rectify 
matters, it is necessary, it was said at the session, to change 
the production structure or create in the republic our own 
enterprises for sewing military uniforms and making 
load-carrying harnesses and field gear. And when it comes to 
providing the troops with everything necessary, it is important 
to exercise stricter supervision of the fulfillment of the 
government defense order. 
  As the minister of defense reported, despite the objective 
difficulties, the Armed Forces are capable as of this time of 
tackling the assignments pertaining to assurance of the security 
of our state. 
  Mars Urkumayev considers it necessary to cooperate more 
actively in the solution of defense questions with countries of 
the CIS and the far abroad, to alter the production structure of 
our own industry for military needs, and to assure the precise 
work of the operating defense enterprises manufacturing the 
product necessary for the normal activity of the republic's army. 
  The exchange of opinions was summed up by Nursultan 
Nazarbayev. We must clearly make up our minds as to what kind of 
army and in what numbers we need, he said. We need to solve 
immediately all questions connected with supplies to the Armed 
Forces and to reduce as much as possible imports of military 
products from outside and, as far as possible, make them 
ourselves. 
  The head of state set the task of the creation within a week 
of a military industry commission. Its chairman will be directly 
responsible for the state of affairs in this important sector 
providing for the sure defense capability of our sovereign state. 
  In its decision the Security Council approved the concept of 
the formation and execution of long-term defense programs and 
the development of the defense complex. It also confirmed 
certain changes in its composition. Specifically, Bulat 
Bayekenov was appointed secretary of the council. 
  Abish Kekilbayev, chairman of the Supreme Council, First 
Deputy Prime Minister Akezhan Kazhegeldin, deputy prime 
ministers Galym Abilsiitov and Asygat Zhabagin, leaders of a 
number of ministries and departments, and senior officials of 
the staff of the president and the Cabinet of Ministers took 
part in the session. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46644 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMS TRADE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lt. Gen. Hnatenko Interviewed on Ukraine's Arms Trade </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Lt. Gen. Hnatenko Interviewed on Ukraine's Arms Trade </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Opportunities 

<F P=102>   94UM0444 Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 21 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0444 </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with First Deputy Chief of Weaponry and Chief of </F>
Staff for Weaponry of the Armed Forces of Ukraine 
Lieutenant-General Lev Mykolayovych Hnatenko by Valeriy Korol 
under the rubric: "The Arsenal of Ukraine: Today and the 
Future": "Even a Hero Is Weak Without Weapons"] 
  [Text] The USSR and the United States once 
manufactured weapons independently in a self-contained cycle. 
Today, after the collapse of the empire, Russia, its legal 
successor, is trying to maintain the production and sale of 
weapons in the world market. How does Ukraine look against that 
background today? Our correspondent discusses that with 
Lieutenant-General Lev Hnatenko, first deputy chief of weaponry 
and chief of staff for weaponry of the Armed Forces of 
Ukraine. 
  [V. Korol] Lev Mykolayovych, what is the "arsenal" of the 
Armed Forces of Ukraine today, is there enough powder for our 
"powderhorns"? 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] The Ukrainian Army is not experiencing any 
particular lack of weaponry or hardware. All of these are 
moreover the latest models, which were in service at one time 
with the weaponry of the former Soviet Army. What sort of arms 
are they? For example, T-64, T-72 and T-80 tanks, BMP-1, BMP-2, 
BTR-70 and BTR-80 combat vehicles, MiG-29 and Su-27 aircraft, 
S-200 and S-300 air-defense systems... This list could go on. 
The Navy actually does not have an adequate quantity of vessels. 
I hope that this this problem, however, will be solved in the 
next few years. That portion of the Black Sea Fleet that goes to 
Ukraine will give us the opportunity of creating a powerful navy 
in the future. Approximately ten of the latest ships in various 
classes have also been laid down at Ukrainian shipyards. 
  [V. Korol] Even if the Army is equipped with the latest 
models of weaponry and hardware, it is still necessary to 
prepare for their replacement... 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] Yes, and there are many ways of resolving 
that problem--first, the creation of new models of weaponry; 
second, the upgrading of existing weaponry in order to increase 
its combat potential; and, third, procurements abroad. 
  [V. Korol] Which way is the most favorable for Ukraine? 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] We are now developing two state programs for 
the creation of weaponry. Minister of Defense General of the 
Army of Ukraine V. Radetskyy is devoting the most steadfast 
attention to them. One of the programs is intended for the 
period to the year 2000, and the other for the long term, to the 
year 2010. They are oriented toward bringing us as close as 
possible to a self-contained cycle for the production of 
weaponry and military hardware. 
  Ukraine unfortunately had almost no assembly plants. Our 
enterprises manufactured close to 30 percent of various elements 
and constituent items for weaponry and military hardware. We 
will thus obviously not have the capability of manufacturing all 
of these arms independently in the very near future. The 
solution of the problem of upgrading the weaponry and hardware 
will be pursued in comprehensive fashion--partly through the 
development and manufacture of our own weaponry, and partly 
through procurements abroad and, ultimately, the upgrading of 
existing models in cooperation with the CIS countries. You 
cannot get away from cooperation in this case, since most of the 
design bureaus are located on Russian territory. The solution of 
the problem of modernization is extremely difficult, and 
sometimes even virtually impossible, without the technical 
documentation they have and the necessary coordination. 
  We are also now developing a special program for the 
modernization of weaponry. We are studying the experience of its 
operation in the field, which suggests certain solutions 
pertaining to its further improvement. We are making attempts to 
set up, as I was saying, joint scientific research with the KBs 
[design bureaus] that created these or those models. We are 
carefully studying similar processes in the armies of other 
countries at the same time. The experience of Israel, which is 
upgrading the MiG-21 aircraft and giving it better qualitative 
features, for example, is very useful. 
  [V. Korol] But Lev Mykolayovych, Ukraine has strong 
scientific and production potential that is working for the 
Army... 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] Undoubtedly. The first evidence of that, for 
example, are the products from the Plant imeni Malyshev. It put 
out the T-34 tanks--the best in the world at one time--and the 
T-64 also came out of its gates. It is now "bringing to the 
surface" the T-80 UD tank, which has already won recognition 
among the military of many countries around the world. The plant 
also has long-term projects in the corresponding weaponry. The 
enterprise is also facing great financial problems today. 
  Another giant of the defense industry, the ANTK imeni O. 
Antonov, on the contrary, is on the rise today. The An-70 
aircraft created by that collective has no analogue in the world 
among aircraft in its class. The aircraft will be in series 
production in the near future, and almost 40 countries from 
around the world have displayed an interest in acquiring it. 
  Ukraine has great capabilities--and they are being 
realized--in shipbuilding. We can build the smallest vessels to 
missile cruisers. 
  We have also traditionally been strong in electronics, and 
in 
radio and instrument building. The appropriate financing is 
essential so that we do not lose those positions... 
  [V. Korol] Financing--the Achilles heel of our existence... 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] The Army has lived without a budget for two 
years, and only pay and food are being financed. The situation 
has changed little this year as well, even though a budget was 
approved. It provides, as before, for the pay and food for 
servicemen. We are getting virtually no budget funds for the 
development of weaponry and hardware. 
  [V. Korol] But there is also extrabudgetary financing... 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] Yes, for example, the sale of military 
property and hardware or arms, the offering of various types of 
technical services... The funds obtained from that, however, 
unfortunately go not for weaponry, but to pay for various debts 
of our department, the procurement of foodstuffs, medicines, 
fuels and lubricants etc. 
  Not a single kopeck from extrabudgetary funds has been 
directed to the development of weaponry for two years. The sense 
of seeking out extrabudgetary receipts thus is lost, and our 
reserves for selling are finally being exhausted; there is 
nothing with which to replace them so far. 
  We can sell property and hardware that has exhausted its 
service life to the public. The department is flooded with such 
requests. A mechanism for such sales has unfortunately not been 
devised--it is not known who should do the selling, who should 
receive the money, how the documents should be drawn up. The 
Cabinet of Ministers has to make the appropriate decisions. 
  [V. Korol] Lev Mykolayovych, the question of the gathering 
of 
by-products that contain precious metals has not been resolved 
for a long time as well. That would also be considerable funds... 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] For the simplest of reasons--the Ministry of 
Defense did not have a structure that would be occupied with 
that. A department has now been created under the weapons staff 
for the gathering and processing of precious metals and 
minerals. The staffers of that department have performed an 
inventory of most of the units, and have developed a system for 
gathering scrap that contains precious metals. A new plant was 
also finally launched at Pivdenmash in May for the processing of 
precious metals. I very much hope that at least some of the 
funds that are received from the sale of those products will go 
to the development of weaponry. 
  [V. Korol] The state order for 1995 is being developed at 
the 
Ministry of Defense today. How is it being fulfilled this year? 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] The Ministry of Defense formulated the state 
order for 1994 in good time. The procurement of weaponry was 
moreover in a certain order in the documents that were submitted 
by our department, in conjunction with the Ministry of 
Economics, for the consideration of the Cabinet of Ministers. 
But the money was not allocated for specific line items, as was 
envisaged, but rather as an overall sum for everything at 
once--foodstuffs, medicine, weaponry etc.; divide it up 
yourselves, they said. So only eight percent of the necessary 
amount was allocated for the procurement of weaponry this year. 
Those appropriations, moreover, did not take into account our 
debt to the defense industry for 1993. We were forced to cover 
it from the budgetary funds for this year. 
  [V. Korol] What is the way out of the situation that has 
developed? 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] There is one way out in this 
case--additional 
financing. The Ministry of Defense [MO] has sent the appropriate 
documents to the Cabinet of Ministers. 
  Our department, despite the financial difficulties, is 
already working on drawing up the state order for 1995. 
  [V. Korol] Have the financial difficulties also obviously 
strongly affected the state of military science? Is it realistic 
to hope for substantial achievements from the country's military 
scientists in such a state? 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] The scientific potential of Ukraine, 
including military, is one of the strongest in the former USSR. 
It is in a pitiful state today. Appropriations of 15 percent of 
the necessary amount were allocated for this year to the 
Committee for Scientific Research and Experimental Design of the 
MO. Those funds are moreover being received very irregularly. 
And if there is no money, then the science schools will 
collapse, and many design bureaus will be cut back by 30--40 
percent. The outflow of scientists is 50--70 percent for 
projects in high, science-intensive technologies. The number of 
staffers at the Academy of Sciences of Ukraine who are occupied 
with military sciences has been reduced from 25 to seven percent 
over the last two years. That is a catastrophe. We could lose 
military science. 
  The Ministry of Defense is doing everything possible to see 
that this does not happen. We have developed 28 programs of 
scientific research and experimental design, despite all of the 
difficulties. They are all directed toward the development of 
weaponry and hardware. 
  [V. Korol] Perhaps it would be worthwhile, in that case, to 
designate a few of the 28 projects as the most important ones, 
and to subsidize at least those in full? 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] Such proposals, as you know, come from the 
scientists themselves as well. That is an entirely acceptable 
solution at first glance. By supporting a few collectives, 
however, we risk losing the rest. Losing them forever. 
Continuity, after all, is very important in science. We can 
never, having ruined them, restore any special areas or science 
schools. 
  [V. Korol] There were large proving grounds in the former 
Union for trying out new models of weaponry. Where will 
Ukrainian innovations be tested? 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] We unfortunately have available only certain 
elements of scientific-research proving grounds and testing 
centers, which came to us as our inheritance from the former 
USSR. We want to create a unified state scientific-research 
proving ground that would include all of the leading test sites. 
Specialists form the Main Directorate for Science, Development 
and Testing that was recently created in the Ministry of Defense 
are currently engaged in the creation of a mock-up of such a 
proving ground. 
  [V. Korol] But if we find the territory to test models of 
conventional weaponry, where will we able to test missiles? 
Where and when will we be able to launch the first Ukrainian 
satellite? 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] The launch of the satellite--it will be the 
SICh-1 satellite--is planned for the end of 1995 or the 
beginning of 1996. It will be put into orbit by a launch vehicle 
that was manufactured at enterprises in Ukraine in cooperation 
with Russian plants and design bureaus. The satellite is 
intended for remote sounding of the Earth. Its launch will begin 
the practical realization of the national space program. The 
interests of the armed forces of Ukraine will be taken into 
account without fail in the fulfillment of that program as well. 
  There are no test ranges for the launch of satellites from 
Ukraine. We thus intend to restore disrupted ties within the 
confines of the CIS, and with Russia and Kazakhstan in 
particular. We are making efforts, at the same time, to set up 
cooperation with the space agencies of a number of European 
countries. 
  The Ministry of Defense is planning to sign a "framework" 
agreement with Kazakhstan on space. They have a cosmodrome and 
we have rockets, after all. Many Ukrainians are working and 
serving at Baykonur, and they once expressed the desire to 
foster the realization of the Ukrainian space program. 
Kazakhstan, however, as it has turned out, is not able to 
maintain such a unique space facility alone. Russia, which has 
leased Baykonur, could do it. If we do not arrange cooperation 
on this question with Russia, the fulfillment of our program 
will be much more complicated. 
  [V. Korol] Lev Mykolayovych, perhaps a last question. I am 
convinced that we will surmount all of the difficulties and 
create new weaponry for our Army. Will we be able to break into 
the international market by that time? 
  [L.M. Hnatenko] We are not expecting a cloudless future. Our 
first swallows will soon appear at international military-trade 
exhibitions. A mock-up of the T-80 UD tank has been prepared, 
for example, for an exhibition this summer in Saudi Arabia. 
Other models are being prepared for the exhibition as well. 
  We are planning to launch a permanent exhibition in Kiev as 
well. The location has not yet been determined--several options 
are still under consideration. One of them is at Darnytsya. 
Models could be seen in action there, on the proving ground of 
the Darnytsya Tank Repair Plant. 
  We are, finally, hoping to issue a series of advertising 
booklets in the very near future. Then the whole world will be 
able to find out about our achievements and capabilities. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46645 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Military Medics Lack Funds To Buy Conversion Products </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Military Medics Lack Funds To Buy Conversion Products </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0483A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 9 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0483A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Volkov: "Russian Defense Industry Aids </F>
Military Medics"] 
  [Text] Enterprises of the military-industrial complex 
demonstrated medical equipment, tools and instruments created 
within the framework of conversion at an expanded plenum of the 
scientific medical council of the RF Ministry of Defense's Main 
Military Medical Directorate, held in the Military Medical 
Academy. 
  Enterprises of the Ministry of Atomic Energy, the State 
Committee for Defense Industry, Arzamas-16, LOMO [Leningrad 
Optical-Mechanical Association], the Az NPF Joint-Stock Company 
and many others offered their products. The exposition of 
Russian defense industry enterprises evoked high interest among 
the plenum's participants. Unfortunately military medicine is 
presently experiencing the same financial difficulties as 
civilian medicine, which is why the interest displayed by the 
majority was purely academic. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46646 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   St Petersburg FSK Foils Enriched Uranium Sale </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    St Petersburg FSK Foils Enriched Uranium Sale </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0483B Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 9 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0483B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [News release by the Public Relations Center of the RF FSK: </F>
"Uranium Merchants Taken Red-Handed"] 
  [Text] The regional service of the FSK [Federal 
Counterintelligence Service] in St. Petersburg identified and 
detained a group of persons attempting to market over 3 
kilograms of highly enriched uranium dioxide through an illegal 
deal. 
  An investigation established that this radioactive substance 
had been stolen from one of the enterprises of the Ministry of 
Atomic Industry near Moscow. The traders in strategic raw 
materials intended to sell the uranium, including abroad. A 
criminal case was instituted on the basis of this incident. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46647 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94035" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Eighteen MiG-29s Sold to Malaysia </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Eighteen MiG-29s Sold to Malaysia </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0483C Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 9 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0483C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Valentin Rudenko: "Russian MiGs `Breach' the </F>
Malaysian Market"] 
  [Text] Difficult negotiations on the 
sale of 18 frontline MiG-29 fighters to Malaysia went on for 
more than 2 years. And even when it seemed as if all of the 
details had sorted themselves out (recall the well known 
statement by Malaysian Prime Minister Mahqthir bin Mohamad at 
the end of last year at the "Lima-93" International Naval and 
Aerospace Exhibition: "It's almost a done deal, and it's already 
time to order the champagne") suddenly some new sort of 
circumstances appeared, and signing of the contract was 
postponed indefinitely. 
  Sad as it may be to say this, but not only American firms, 
which have offered Malaysia the latest F/A-18 airplanes almost 
at dumping prices, but also Russian firms and even private 
individuals, which have literally besieged this country's 
government and military structures with assurances to one and 
all that they in particular had been granted the right to sell 
the MiGs, made their contribution to causing this deal to occur 
as late as possible and at the least advantage for us. According 
to the journal BROOKINGS REVIEW around 20 such firms visited 
Malaysia over a short period of time. The newspaper ROSSIYSKIYE 
VESTI asserts that there were 50 of them. 
  And in the meantime the exclusive right to conduct 
negotiations and sign a contract to deliver MiG-29 fighters to 
Malaysia was granted by a decision of the government of the 
Russian Federation to the Moscow Aviation Production 
Association. And it was precisely owing to the persistent and 
purposeful work by specialists of this association, as well as 
of the Rosvooruzheniye State Arms and Military Equipment Export 
and Import Company, with which the Moscow Aviation Production 
Association worked in close contact, that such a contract came 
into being. It is estimated at an amount on the order of $600 
million U.S. The initial proposal was to pay half of the 
contract with deliveries of palm oil. But as a result of 
negotiations conducted by First Deputy Chairman of the 
Government Oleg Soskovets, who headed the Russian government 
delegation that was to sign the contract, and his Malaysian 
colleague Anwar ibn Ibrahim, only a fourth of the value of the 
contract will be compensated with palm oil. 
  The first MiG-29 is to be delivered to Malaysia in April 
1995. The issue of creating a special technical center to 
service our fighters is presently being considered. 
  Malaysian Defense Minister Mohamed Najib bin Tun Haji Abdul 
Razak called the MiG contract "the largest deal with Russia," 
and expressed interest in developing military and technical 
cooperation further. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46648 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma028___94036" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-028 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DOCTRINAL ISSUES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Danilevich et al on Development, Problems of Military </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Danilevich et al on Development, Problems of Military </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Science 

<F P=102>   94UM0478A Moscow VOYENNO-ISTORICHESKIY ZHURNAL in Russian No 
3, 1994 (signed to press 11 Mar 94) pp 11-17 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0478A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOYENNO-ISTORICHESKIY ZHURNAL </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Individual articles by Colonel General A. A. Danilevich, </F>
candidate of military sciences; Major General (Reserve) Yu. Ya. 
Kirshin, doctor of philosophical sciences, professor; Major 
General V. I. Slipchenko, doctor of military sciences, 
professor, corresponding member, Russian Federation Academy of 
Natural Sciences; and Colonel O. A. Belkov, doctor of 
philosophical sciences, professor: "Abrupt Conceptual Change or 
Defamation of the Past? (On Development and Problems of Russian 
Military Science)"] 
  [Text] VOYENNO-ISTORICHESKIY ZHURNAL No 9, 1993 
published an account about a conference held in the Russian 
Federation Ministry of Defense Military History Institute. The 
question discussed was on the place of military historical 
science in day to day activity of the Russian Armed Forces, 
which caught the interest of many of our readers. Fulfilling 
their numerous wishes, the editors asked specialists for their 
opinions on this problem. At the same time, we do not consider 
the materials published below to be indisputable and suggest 
that readers continue the discussion. 
  The present state of Russian military science could be 
characterized by one word--crisis. It stands to reason that this 
relates not only to the area of military knowledge, but to all 
other social sciences as well: philosophy, political economy, 
political science, history and so on. All are experiencing a 
period of profound conceptual change. The previous 
scientific-methodological base is collapsing and basic views and 
many fundamental aims and propositions are being revised. 
Seemingly settled and unshakable categories and concepts are 
being swept aside to be replaced by new ones in a number of 
cases, but a void often forms in their place. Thus, a very 
complicated, contradictory process is going on in which both 
negative as well as positive trends, and elements both of growth 
and of decline are interwoven. 
  This clearly reflects characteristic features of Russian 
society's present development: the country's difficult 
situation, confused public thinking, loss of precise reference 
points and of the majority of previous values, painful 
transition to new economic relations, exacerbation of internal 
struggle, a change in the foreign policy course and a 
reorientation of very important military doctrinal aims. Hence 
also the vagueness of development of military-theoretical 
thought. 
  In the history of Russian military science this is not the 
first sharp turn caused by radical transformations in politics 
and in the material means of warfare. The October Revolution 
became one of the first critical, destructive stages, but at 
that time Soviet military science, the successor of previous 
traditions, still was able to create the nucleus of rational 
Russian military scientific aims by relying on what had been 
achieved in the past, was able to rework them with consideration 
of the altered historical conditions, and on this basis was able 
to achieve a high level of development, which helped us win the 
supreme victory in the Great Patriotic War. 
  Will the crisis in military science be overcome now? 
Evidently it will, but it is also obvious that this process in 
all likelihood will be more painful and will stretch out for a 
lengthy time. The present crisis in military science is 
extremely distinctive. At any rate, it is dictated by a very 
complex set of closely interwoven political, economic, 
ideological and strictly military reasons, by very profound 
changes for the better in the entire world military-political 
situation and, most important, by the intensive reideologization 
of the majority of aims and views. In cleaning communist dogmas 
from military science, modern theorists persistently try to 
reorient it toward standards of a new ideology. At times not 
just irrational, but also many rational kernels and true 
propositions are tossed overboard if they are based on Marxist 
dialectics or are linked with the names of classics of 
Marxism-Leninism and their statements, regardless of whether or 
not they meet the truth and actual practice. Doubt often is cast 
even on obvious things, particularly propositions about the 
essence of war as a continuation of politics by other, violent 
means, on the class sources of wars, on dependence of methods of 
waging war on methods of production and so on, although the 
truth of these propositions is confirmed clearly both by a 
millennium of experience as well as by everyday life. Almost all 
Soviet military history is being defamed. Instead of filling in 
the gaps in our country's history, many heroic pages of our past 
often are blackened. The very concept of "Soviet," "socialist" 
military science is refuted, just as is that of "bourgeois" 
military science, on the grounds that any truth is abstract, 
independent and international, although it is known that various 
social groups interpret many provisions of social sciences from 
their own standpoints, relying on different methodological 
principles. Doubt also is cast on the national character of 
military science, particularly the legitimacy of existence of a 
strictly Russian military science, in view of the fact that 
military knowledge knows no boundaries. The influence of 
national traditions and traits, which inevitably are reflected 
in the direction of military theory and practice and especially 
in the character of military organizational development, 
military strategy, operational art and tactics, is ignored, not 
to mention that it is impossible to separate military science 
from specific military thinkers, theorists and practitioners of 
military affairs and from their national soil. 
  It is without question that it would be incorrect to 
idealize 
Soviet military science and regard it as exceptional, sinless, 
and free of shortcomings and mistakes. Soviet military thinking 
interpreted many questions in a biased, tendentious, 
oversimplified manner, primarily from a class standpoint, giving 
little regard to other objective factors. Nevertheless, only it 
(with appropriate corrections, of course) can become the basis 
of modern Russian military science, which always essentially was 
its main nucleus. 
  The crisis of Russian military science is being aggravated 
now by decreased interest in basic military-theoretical research 
and by attempts at substituting chiefly applied and momentary 
short-term developments for it. In the future this is fraught 
with serious miscalculations, loss of a general course, and a 
general lag in studying fundamental problems of military 
affairs, of ensuring national security and of strengthening the 
country's defense. A serious danger also is being created in 
connection with the sharp reduction in financing of military 
science and RDT&amp;E and in connection with leading Ministry of 
Defense scientific research establishments being bled dry from 
the drain of skilled cadres. As a result, science's potential 
and capabilities are narrowing and timely, full-fledged 
development of military science problems demanding high 
professionalism and appropriate funds and time is being impeded. 
  Of course, with all this one cannot help but admit that 
Russian military science lately has succeeded in solving a 
number of important problems, moving forward in the study of new 
trends in development of military affairs, delving more deeply 
into problems of preventing war, and creating a scientific base 
for producing a new Russian military doctrine. But these 
achievements are relative and quite incommensurable with the 
enormous volume of problems which still must be solved. I would 
like to single out the following among the large number of 
problems facing Russian military science. 
  Evidently it is necessary to move away from the past 
narrowed 
interpretation of military science, which limited its subject 
only to one aspect of war, armed warfare, and that in a strictly 
professional sense. Obviously, war as a whole must become the 
subject of military science as a specific social phenomenon, 
including all its aspects and inner relations and new forms of 
warfare. This of course does not preclude the study of specific 
elements and components of war by other sciences, but their 
comprehensive study also is required, which can contribute to a 
deeper, more comprehensive understanding of war and to a 
revelation of its logical patterns, reasons for appearance, 
course and outcome. 
  Clarification of interrelationships of military science with 
other sciences and military art, and especially with military 
doctrine, is gaining urgency at the present time. This is 
determined by the fact that already now an intensive process is 
under way in the majority of world states for revising and 
reworking military doctrines. This is linked with global 
improvements in the disposition and correlation of world 
military-political forces. Radical changes in the direction of 
Russia's policy and new conditions for ensuring international 
and national security cannot help but affect all spheres of 
states' political and military activity. The Russian Federation 
presently has adopted a fundamentally new military doctrine, but 
its scientific substantiation and, most important, development 
of rational mechanisms for its realization are required. 
  Military doctrine relies on conclusions of military science 
in one way or another. Depending on the extent to which this is 
supported, military doctrine may be progressive (vital) or 
adventuristic (faulty). Progressive military doctrine usually is 
built on a firm scientific foundation; adventuristic military 
doctrine, submitting to the aims of politics, most often ignores 
the demands of military science and is founded on attendant 
factors. Such military doctrine, however, cannot reliably 
guarantee either a state's security or attainment of other 
military-political goals. Therefore sooner or later it leads to 
military collapse, as happened with fascist Germany. 
  The Russian Federation military doctrine presently adopted 
as 
a result of lengthy, strenuous work is scientific in its basis, 
but its theoretical substantiation has not yet been completed. 
Specific principles of implementing basic provisions also have 
not been developed; moreover, some are not distinguished by 
clarity and definiteness, are at times abstract and are outlined 
with insufficient precision. This relates in particular to the 
classification of possible wars and military clashes, to an 
assessment of the nature of military danger and probable 
military threats, and to a determination of methods of deterring 
and routing an aggressor. It is asserted that Russia has no 
enemies, but Russia is forced to reckon with a broad set of 
hypothetically dangerous actions. Politically this is 
understandable, but from a theoretical and practical aspect this 
is tantamount to admitting that all states may be potential 
enemies of Russia, not to mention that reality is ignored with 
that statement of the matter. Most important, it is impossible 
to conduct military organizational development and prepare armed 
forces purposefully, since it is impossible to build them 
regardless of with what means, against whom and under what 
conditions they may be employed. Military science must find a 
solution to this contradiction and come up with rational 
approaches to an assessment of the geopolitical and 
military-strategic situation; to an analysis of military 
threats, the sources and causes of war, and measures for 
preventing it; and to principles of waging war against an 
aggressor who is pursuing particular goals and possesses a 
varying military-technical potential. 
  Evidently the internal structure of military science also 
needs refinement. A new approach to principles of the general 
theory of war, which until recently was artificially substituted 
for by the methodological base of science, is necessary in 
particular. It would appear that in this initial, determining 
division of military science it is advisable to examine the 
totality of general, fundamental problems of war, including its 
essence, content, reasons for appearance, classification, laws 
of development, factors determining its course and end results, 
and all forms of warfare being used (armed, ideological, 
economic, diplomatic and so on). In our view, the opinion 
developed in the General Staff Military Academy is sufficiently 
substantiated in this respect. 
  Complex tasks arise in specific areas of military science, 
especially in theory of military art, theory of military 
organizational development, theory of military training and 
education, arms theory, military command and control theory, and 
in all closely related areas, above all military history. 
  The following are becoming very important tasks in 
developing 
the theory of military art: revealing the nature of possible 
wars, armed conflicts and other military clashes of varying 
scale and intensity both at the present time as well as in the 
future (for 10-15 years ahead at the very least); forecasting 
models of possible development of large-scale and limited wars 
waged using the newest and future weapon systems or only certain 
traditional kinds of military equipment; and revealing features 
of regional wars and armed conflicts. Not only must we take into 
account dominant traditional trends in the military-political 
and strategic situation and in the economic and 
military-technical base of warfare and means and methods of 
warfare, but also possible new objective and subjective factors 
affecting the content and forms of war as well as internal 
processes occurring in Russia and in the near, middle, and far 
abroad, new relationships forming in regions, the probability of 
disintegration or, conversely, unification of a number of states 
into regional blocs of varying orientation, and transformations 
of existing military-political alliances, above all NATO. A 
completely new page must be opened in this matter, since those 
wars toward which the Soviet Armed Forces oriented themselves 
and prepared for in the past, above all a global world war 
between the two world systems, now are absolutely ruled out. New 
forms of military clashes, insufficiently studied for now, have 
come to the foreground. 
  A theory of the modern system of armed forces operations as 
applied to missions of preventing war, deterring an aggressor, 
and being involved in medium and high intensity conflicts is to 
be studied comprehensively and essentially developed anew, and a 
finished theory of strategic and regional operations in their 
new conception and operations of defensive and striking forces, 
mobile groupings and peacekeeping forces is to be created. 
Special attention evidently should be given to researching 
methods of repelling aggression in its various forms and 
preparing and conducting protracted and fast-moving strategic 
and operational missile-air operations and joint operations of 
all branches, and to substantiating countries' broad military 
cooperation for ensuring regional and international security and 
organizing a collective defense and a defense designed primarily 
for one's own forces within limits of national boundaries or 
moved onto territories of neighboring friendly countries if 
necessary. 
  Fundamentally new directions are opening up in the theory of 
armed forces organizational development. We are speaking of 
developing fundamental principles of forming and developing a 
Russian military organization under new conditions with the 
country's altered geostrategic position and transformed 
political, economic and military systems. The urgency of this 
requires no proof. Military reform is proceeding with great 
difficulties specifically because it was begun not with 
development of new theoretical principles, but with the 
resolution of separate, scattered practical problems and 
measures, with the vacillations, miscalculations and other costs 
inevitably stemming from this. It would appear that Russian 
military science has to ensure formation of a refined concept of 
full-scale, comprehensive military reform envisaging not 
particular transformations, but implementation of fundamental, 
radical, long-term solutions encompassing all aspects of armed 
forces organizational development and activity without exception. 
  In the area of arms theory, scientific principles of a new 
Russian Federation military-technical policy and corresponding 
military-technical concepts for the transition period and 
subsequent years are to be developed, figuring on a radical 
modernization, reduction, standardization and universalization 
of arms with a simultaneous significant increase in quality 
characteristics using the most advanced technologies. It is 
important to concentrate efforts on problems of creating and 
producing (in rational amounts) above all advanced, highly 
effective weapons with full factual realization of the 
"effectiveness-cost-time" principle and with consideration of 
the economy's transition to market relations, deep conversion, 
introduction of dual technologies and the need for establishing 
new scientific-technical and production ties. A scientific base 
thereby should be created for forming the future technical look 
of the Russian Armed Forces, developing more rational arms 
programs, and faultlessly determining priority and superpriority 
systems and kinds of weapons and military equipment. 
  Very important, labor-intensive tasks arise in the sphere of 
military command and control theory. The question arises of the 
most rapid development of principles of many-sided perestroyka 
of entities, the material base and the entire armed forces 
command and control system in peace and wartime based on changed 
missions, new conditions for conducting military operations, and 
promising directions of military-technical progress opening up 
in information assets. Research and development of more 
effective forms and methods of command and control of troops and 
naval forces using new-generation automated systems and advanced 
communications equipment assume special significance. 
  Special mention must be made of military history. A new work 
front is opening up here connected with a reinterpretation of 
military-historical events of the past, with an in-depth study 
of World War II and the Great Patriotic War and their lessons 
and experience, with the development of military art, and with 
the study of military conflicts. At the same time, the need 
arises for a more thorough analysis of various military 
phenomena which accompanied past wars and of their immediate and 
long-term consequences. A fundamental assessment both of 
deciding battles as well as of many local (including unfinished) 
operations, and an objective demonstration of all processes of 
war and of the real military leadership hand of military leaders 
of all belligerents are required with consideration of new facts 
and data. In this connection an objective need has matured for 
an urgent renewal of work to create both a multivolume history 
of the Great Patriotic War as well as other capital works on the 
history of military art and on individual problems of war. The 
development of military art in Russia should be researched 
especially. At the same time, work must be activated to study 
foreign military experience, and the preparation of fundamental 
works on the history of wars and of military art from ancient 
times up to our days must be organized. 
  In other words, we are entering a new stage of development 
of 
Russian military science, realization of which will require a 
sharp intensification of military-scientific work at all levels 
and the conduct of a set of closely interconnected, basic and 
applied military-political, military-theoretical and 
military-technical research. In accordance with this, the entire 
system of the scientific research structure needs 
reorganizing--involvement of a wide circle of skilled military 
cadres in performing tasks of scientific support of armed forces 
organizational development, evolution and employment, and 
genuine mobilization of the country's entire military-scientific 
potential. The discussion which has unfolded in the journal's 
pages can contribute actively to successful resolution of these 
problems. 
  Colonel General A. A. Danilevich 
Candidate of Military Sciences 
<H8>  * * * </H8>
  Philosophical problems of military theory are especially 
pertinent now, when Russia's national-state interests and 
military policy are forming and the Russian Federation Armed 
Forces are being reformed. 
  To create a modern army it is necessary to develop new 
ideological principles, determine basic directions, and 
formulate value ideals distinct from those which existed in 
Marxist-Leninist ideology. This task can be accomplished within 
the framework of various sciences, both traditional as well as 
embryonic: military science, military-historical science, 
philosophy of war, military political science, military 
economics, military sociology. For this it is necessary to 
"audit" them to establish the truth and depth of cognition of 
war and the Army and, most important, create new concepts 
meeting Russia's socioeconomic and strategic situation. From 
this standpoint I would like to examine the interrelationship, 
social role and functions of totalitarian socialism and 
Marxism-Leninism. 
  Marxism-Leninism's function was to support CPSU and state 
political strategy theoretically, ideologically and spiritually 
and to protect and glorify the Communist Party and socialist 
system. 
  This task was accomplished both by developing true and 
truthful knowledge as well as by distorting reality and creating 
myths and legends. I will name some of them: world socialist 
revolution, dictatorship of the proletariat, complete and final 
victory of socialism, developed socialist, decaying capitalism, 
imperialism as the eve of socialist revolution, international 
duty, peaceful coexistence, and so on. 
  The Marxist-Leninist teaching on war and the Army played an 
important role in theoretical support of CPSU policy. This is 
explainable. It was impossible to achieve world socialist 
supremacy without armed violence and wars. Therefore the 
corresponding concepts, myths and legends were created here too: 
theory of socialist violence, absolutization of the economic 
factor as the source and cause of wars, concept of just wars, 
absence of a domestic function in socialist armies, victory with 
little blood, right to be first to initiate war, fight on 
foreign territories, victory in a nuclear war, the system of 
capitalism will cease to exist after a nuclear war, and so on. 
The very nature of the totalitarian socialist state was creating 
hothouse conditions for developing Marxism-Leninism and its 
teaching on war and the Army, and it contributed to 
establishment of its theoretical and organizational monopoly 
among all social and natural-technical sciences. It was more 
than the science of sciences. It was a superscience, having 
monopolized methodological and ideological functions with 
respect to all military theory. 
  Only party leaders and general secretaries acted as creators 
of Marxism-Leninism and the teaching on war and the Army. Only 
they could utter "truths." The CPSU created a powerful 
propaganda system, which forcibly introduced Marxist-Leninist 
ideology to the awareness of people, including Armed Forces 
personnel. The party created the "Iron Curtain" and isolated 
spiritual life and military-theoretical thinking from world 
spiritual values, from world military science. Party ideologues 
distorted scientific ideas of western scientists, falsified 
military history, and subjected the achievements of western 
military theorists to criticism using primitive arguments. 
  Political slogans and actual reality often contradicted each 
other in the Soviet Union. For example, party documents 
proclaimed that the socialist army performed only an external 
function, but practice did not conform to the myth. The army was 
used in putting down the Kronshtadt revolt, the Tambov uprising, 
and in Novocherkassk, Vilnius, Tbilisi and Baku. Therefore the 
question is especially acute today: Just what is to be done when 
Marxism-Leninism and its teaching on war and the Army are in a 
state of crisis? 
  Marxism-Leninism cannot be reformed, just as it is 
impossible 
to reform totalitarian socialism, although its evolution is not 
precluded. Marxism-Leninism and its teaching on war and the Army 
cannot be the spiritual, theoretical basis for creating a new 
Russian Army. World military-philosophical and 
military-theoretical thought, a great contribution to which was 
made by Russian and Soviet theorists, must become its basis. 
  Marxism-Leninism contains true and false knowledge; it 
cannot 
be expunged from the history of the 19th and 20th centuries. 
True knowledge of the Marxist teaching on war and the Army 
should, in my opinion, be included in the newly forming 
sciences, above all the philosophy of war, military political 
science and military sociology. False propositions of 
Marxist-Leninist teaching are subject to oblivion. 
  A system of scientific knowledge on war and the Army was 
created in the Soviet Army. It needs substantial correction of 
course. And the most important thing in it is the replacement of 
Marxism-Leninism and its teaching on war and the Army with new 
sciences: philosophy of war, political science, sociology and 
its military aspects. 
  In my view, in forming a new system of knowledge it is 
advisable to remember that any science has an international 
character. There was no Soviet, socialist or bourgeois military 
science. There is no American, Russian or Ukrainian military 
science now. There is a single military science. But the 
contribution of each state's scientists to various sciences is 
not equivalent. One can speak of leader states and their 
outstanding achievements in particular areas. One people left 
the world more of a military-theoretical heritage, and another 
less. We can be proud both of the Russian as well as the Soviet 
military-theoretical heritage. 
  A correction of the scientific system of knowledge on war 
and 
the Army and formation of a new methodological base will 
contribute to creation of a powerful Russian Army and to a 
theoretical and spiritual base of a new concept for educating 
its officers and men. 
  Major General (Reserve) Yu. Ya. Kirshin 
Doctor of Philosophical Sciences 
Professor 
<H8>  * * * </H8>
  The importance of the problem under discussion is difficult 
to overestimate. Military theory is the unified 
ideological-methodological basis for many theories encompassing 
military science as a whole. As a form of scientific knowledge, 
military theory provides an integral conception of its 
fundamental principles and in particular of its important 
components such as object, subject, structure, boundaries, and 
correlation with other sciences. It is systematic in nature and 
quite legitimately includes other interrelated theories of those 
relatively independent disciplines and sectors of knowledge 
which are its components. 
  It is common knowledge that there was a period in the 
history 
of domestic military science when it was called "Soviet military 
science," and it was then that it was dissolved in the teaching 
of "Marxism-Leninism on war and the Army." As the principal 
object of cognition and research of military science, war was 
studied above all by Marxist-Leninist philosophy, political 
economy and scientific communism. The objects of historical 
materialism were wars and armies in all historical epochs; 
objects of political economy were the interrelationships of 
economy, war and the Army; objects of scientific communism were 
revolutionary wars. And in the early 1960's a new direction also 
appeared--the "Marxist-Leninist teaching on protection of the 
socialist homeland, achievements of socialism, and communism in 
the process of being built." 
  This was one of the reasons why military science, divided up 
among many sciences, just was not recognized as an independent 
field of knowledge. And to this day there is no department of 
military sciences in the Russian Federation Academy of Sciences 
(previously the USSR Academy of Sciences). 
  The object of military science, war, and its subject, 
warfare, were defined fully correctly for military science. But 
it seems to me this now no longer fully reflects reality, since 
significant changes also occurred in the functions of armed 
forces. This is especially clearly visible in the new Russian 
Federation military doctrine recently adopted. Functions of the 
Armed Forces are defined here such as operational localization 
of the beginning of tension, stopping possible military 
operations, peacekeeping operations, involvement of Russian 
Federation Ministry of Defense troops in assisting organs of 
internal affairs and internal security troops, and so on. 
Nuclear weapons also have new functions now. They no longer are 
a means of conducting military operations, but have become a 
political tool for deterring aggression. 
  Thus, the subjective area of military science substantially 
broadened and went beyond the bounds of warfare. Perhaps for now 
only in the first approximation it can be called the "employment 
of armed forces," which would conform to these changes to a 
greater extent. 
  I agree that the new situation in Russia as well as in its 
Armed Forces requires resolution of long urgent problems of 
military theory. 
  The teaching of Marxism-Leninism on war and the Army 
considered general sociological laws and wars as a whole and was 
a unified methodological foundation of many sciences, including 
military science. Now this proposition is being revised. 
Basically this unified methodological foundation simply is being 
rejected, but nothing new is offered in its place. A distinctive 
vacuum has formed in military theory, which hardly will be 
filled by new areas of military knowledge which have appeared 
such as geopolitics, military political science and security 
theory. I would like to continue the thought connected with the 
study and research of military history problems. We studied this 
scientific discipline a long time with great distortions, since 
in fact military history and military art of the CPSU was 
studied in curricula of military educational institutions. We 
even looked at military history of ancient eras from this 
aspect. Evidently it still is not soon that we will have an 
impartial military history such as it must be in reality. Not 
everything also is correctly stated in the methodology of 
research of military history problems. 
  As a rule, scientific methods are absent from dissertations 
being defended in this science. Basically there is only an 
enumeration of what occurred when. In the best instance, new 
historical documents are placed in scientific circulation, but 
little attention is devoted to the direct development of 
military science. 
  Major General V. I. Slipchenko Doctor of 
Military Sciences Professor, Corresponding 
Member, Russian Federation Academy of Natural 
Sciences 
<H8>  * * * </H8>
  The ideological and moral reassessment of values generated a 
profound, largely painful turning point in the life of the 
country and world, and we are its contemporaries. Society found 
itself in a situation where past scientific work, moral 
reference points and regulative standards are not working, but 
there are no new ones which characterize modern realities with 
objective precision. This has a pernicious effect on all walks 
of life of society and all kinds of human activity. The absence 
of a generally recognized system of value orientations has a 
devastating effect on statehood and all its attributes and 
institutions, including the Army. 
  The eroded nature of ideological principles which 
consolidate 
the state's military organization and elevate people's military 
activity turns the Army into a phantom, whose existence becomes 
a useless or even harmful waste of people's efforts and state 
assets. 
  A particular theoretical resolution of ideological, moral 
and 
ethical questions as well as rejection of any resolution of them 
whatsoever hardly is only of cognitive significance. It either 
gives the state and society reliable reference points of 
endeavor or directs their activity into a false channel and 
leads to costs and defeats. Suffice it to recall that a 
unilateral interpretation of conversion turned out to be not 
only a ruinous destruction of the military-industrial complex, 
but also a weakening of the country's scientific-technical 
potential; official discussion about unified and then Combined 
Armed Forces of the CIS and about a unified defense space 
engendered many problems for Russia in military organizational 
development that are difficult to solve to this day; the slogan 
"the Army is outside of politics" seriously disoriented the 
political elite and counterelite (opposition), society, and the 
Army itself. Today the "Army's peacekeeping activity," as any 
use of the Russian Armed Forces and various forms of its 
activeness (including combat operations and "fire for effect") 
are called more and more often, is included among such phantom 
words today. 
  Thus, development of a political and philosophical concept 
of 
the state's military activity must precede the establishment of 
constitutional and legal rules regulating the military sphere of 
society's life and a determination of specific measures in this 
area. 
  Until recently the Marxist-Leninist teaching on war and the 
Army provided the "only correct resolution" of all such 
questions in our country. But the new conditions showed that 
this aggregate of officially approved theoretical propositions 
on the military-political realities of social life does not meet 
modern needs and requirements. 
  For familiar reasons, the "Marxist-Leninist teaching on war 
and the Army" acquired in fact the nature of an illustration and 
substantiation of decisions made by the country's political 
leadership and became a canonic code of ideologized dogmas, 
which did not explain life, but drove it into the framework of a 
given scheme, leaving everything that did not fit into it on the 
outside. 
  The sober, even harsh reassessment of values natural for a 
transition period leads to the conclusion that propositions 
brought together into the Marxist-Leninist teaching on war and 
the Army are not, strictly speaking, Marxist-Leninist, since 
they include many conclusions and assessments formulated not 
only by K. Marx, F. Engels and V. I. Lenin, but to a 
considerable extent before or after them, and they cannot be 
viewed as a teaching, since they do not provide an integral, 
comprehensive development of the theory of war and the Army. 
  In reassessing the system of knowledge in question from the 
standpoint of new political thinking, it is impossible to slip 
to the position of reckless denial. It is necessary to see that 
there are propositions in it that were incorrect and erroneous 
from the beginning, that there are assessments correct for their 
time but now obsolete, and that there are generalizations of 
permanent significance. The task is to separate the wheat from 
the chaff. How can this be done? What must come to replace the 
Marxist-Leninist teaching on war and the Army? 
  Without taking the liberty of providing an exhaustive final 
answer, I would like to direct attention to several points. A 
realization of the need for a social-science, humanitarian 
analysis of the military sphere of life is the result neither of 
Soviet nor of post-Soviet specifics. For example, N. N. Golovin 
was insisting on this back in the early 1930's. It is hardly 
possible and advisable to constitute a new system of views 
within the framework of a unified metascience. The nucleus of 
this system evidently is formed by military political science. 
This is a special branch of social science studying the theory 
and practice of military organizational development, the 
mechanisms, structures and institutions of military policy of 
modern states, and the status and development trends of 
military-political attitudes in individual countries and in the 
world as a whole. It studies those aspects of political life 
directly linked with the creation and use of military force as a 
factor of policy, and those military phenomena and processes 
which carry in themselves political content. This determines its 
difference both from general political science disciplines 
(science of the state, international relations theory, 
ethnology, conflictology and so on) and from military science 
(strategy, military art, theory of military organizational 
development and so on). 
  The development and spread of philosophical, political 
science, economic, psychological and other knowledge about war 
and the Army are not a strictly academic task and are of great 
practical significance. By acting as an important aspect of 
political culture of society and the individual, they help 
people independently understand political contradictions of 
history and modern times, see the deep-seated springs of 
political dynamics, and understand their own capabilities for 
entering into those dynamics. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Voyenno-istoricheskiy zhurnal", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46649 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma010__l94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-010-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     Tactics: Company, Battalion, Part II </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tactics: Company, Battalion, Part II </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94S90010A Moscow TAKTIKA (ROTA, BATALON) CHAST VTORAYA in 
Russian 1991 (signed to press 4 Feb 91) Voyennoye Izdatelstvo pp </F>



<TEXT>
1-464 FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94S90010A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow TAKTIKA (ROTA, BATALON) CHAST VTORAYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Book "Tactics (Company, Battalion), Part II", by Colonel A. </F>
V. Bykov et al, edited by Colonel General Ye. I. Krylov, 
approved by CinC Ground Troops as a textbook for cadets of 
higher combined arms and tank command schools, USSR Ministry of 
Defense, Voyenizdat, 495 pages; indented material with a line 
down the left-hand side is noted in text with "begin" or "end 
side line"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Chapter I - Soviet Military Doctrine </H5>
  The Soviet Union firmly and steadfastly follows a Leninist 
peaceloving foreign policy whose chief goal is to create 
favorable external conditions for further development of Soviet 
society and its revolutionary renewal based on perestroyka, to 
ensure that the Soviet people have an opportunity to work under 
conditions of peace and freedom, to eliminate the arms race and 
threat of a new world war, and to strengthen international 
security. Soviet military doctrine serves this goal. 
  It was the Great October Revolution that laid down 
foundations of contemporary USSR military doctrine, and the main 
credit for this goes to V. I. Lenin. He worked out political 
aspects of the doctrine, and the most important provisions of 
military-technical questions of Soviet military doctrine are 
his. He spelled out the purpose and missions of the Armed Forces 
and principles of their organizational development, training and 
employment, and formulated the fundamentals of the socialist 
state's military art. 
  It was in our state that a peace policy and the defense of 
freedom and equal rights of all peoples were proclaimed from the 
first days of its existence, as set forth in the very first 
state acts of Soviet authority adopted in October 1917. Armed 
defense of the October achievements and assurance of peaceful 
conditions for building socialism in our country became one of 
the especially important tasks in this period under conditions 
of fierce attacks by world imperialism and internal 
counterrevolution. 
  In the work "Yedinaya voyennaya doktrina `Krasnaya armiya'" 
["Red Army" Unified Military Doctrine], M. V. Frunze formulated 
the essence of military doctrine for the first time in 1921, 
singling out two fundamental components of its structure, 
technical and political, and directing attention to the fact 
that military doctrine must determine the nature of Armed Forces 
organizational development, troop combat training methods, and 
their "leadership" with consideration of assigned 
missions.[.sup]1[/] 
  Military organizational development of that period had a 
defensive direction, inasmuch as capitalist countries were 
threatening the country with aggression. 
  The Soviet state did everything necessary to prevent war and 
exclude it from the arsenal of means for resolving 
contradictions among states. The struggle to prevent war has 
been an inalienable and very important element of the political 
aspect of Soviet military doctrine since times of the October 
Socialist Revolution. 
  The Great Patriotic War and postwar period confirmed the 
correctness of provisions of Soviet military doctrine and its 
conformity to our socialist state's foreign policy line and to 
requirements for the country's development. At the same time, 
significant changes in the world situation, especially the 
increased aggressiveness of reactionary circles of the largest 
capitalist states, insistently demanded a clear emphasis on the 
defensive nature of Soviet military doctrine and clarification 
of the attitude toward war, above all nuclear war. 
  The contemporary stage of our state's development is 
characterized by revolutionary transformations in all areas of 
society's life and new political thinking in international 
relations. The Soviet Union and allied states base their foreign 
and military policy on the Leninist theory of peaceful 
coexistence and a policy of peace. 
  The USSR's peaceable, open policy finds support in broad 
circles of the world community, which led to important positive 
processes in international relations. It has been acknowledged 
that considering war to be a means of achieving political goals 
is amoral and criminal under present conditions. Today the 
majority of world countries reject the principle of force in 
resolving international problems. At the same time, the enormous 
military potential of the sides, especially the accumulation of 
a large quantity of nuclear weapons and the sharply increased 
casualty-producing properties of conventional weapons, made the 
problem of preventing a new world war extraordinarily acute. 
Under these conditions the Soviet Union advanced the concept of 
equal security for all based on a balance of interests and on 
exclusion of violence from the practice of relations among 
states. In accordance with this, the Soviet state's Armed Forces 
are given as the priority mission that of repelling an 
aggressor's invasion by defensive operations. 
  In connection with the new approach to problems of war and 
peace, Soviet military doctrine presently represents a set of 
officially adopted, fundamental views on prevention of war, 
military organizational development, preparation of the country 
and USSR Armed Forces for repelling aggression, and methods of 
fighting a war in defense of socialism. Stemming objectively 
from the nature of the Soviet social and state system, this 
doctrine has an unequivocally defensive direction and is 
subordinated to the primary mission of preventing war, both 
nuclear as well as conventional, and protecting the country from 
possible outside aggression. 
  The main goal of our military doctrine is to prevent war, 
strengthen international security and protect the homeland, 
inasmuch as herein lies the principal meaning of our foreign 
policy and a very important condition for the country's 
successful development. 
  Soviet military doctrine conforms to the goals of military 
operations in repelling aggression and at the same time it takes 
into account general USSR defense missions. In case of 
aggression the Soviet people and their Armed Forces will defend 
their Motherland with all determination. 
  Soviet military doctrine includes two aspects--political and 
military- technical. 
  The political aspect is the principal one, since 
it reflects Soviet state policy in the defense area and 
determines the attitude toward problems of war--its prevention, 
the nature of military threat to the USSR and its allies, and 
political tasks stemming from this. 
  The main direction of the political aspect of Soviet 
military 
doctrine consists of the following provisions: resolution of 
international issues only in a peaceful way; total exclusion of 
world war, both nuclear as well as conventional; and that the 
security of peoples can be only mutual and, within the framework 
of the international community, universal. 
  In accordance with these provisions the Soviet Union 
never will begin military operations first if it does 
not become the target of armed aggression itself. The Soviet 
Union never will employ nuclear weapons first. 
  While coming out in favor of mutual rejection of the use of 
military force, the Soviet Union at the same time is taking 
necessary steps to strengthen its defense capability. 
  The principal military-political tasks of the Soviet state 
stem from the political aspect of doctrine: a) in peacetime to 
keep the country's defense capability at the level of necessary 
defense sufficiency, not allow initiation of a world war by 
imperialism, and ensure constant readiness of the Armed Forces 
to repel armed aggression; b) in case of war to repel 
aggression, defend the Motherland, fulfill allied obligations, 
inflict decisive damage on the aggressor and deprive him of the 
capability to continue the war. 
  The military-technical aspect of Soviet military 
doctrine is subordinated to the political aspect. It determines 
the following provisions: nature of the military threat and 
warfare; the Armed Forces makeup and structure necessary for 
repelling aggression and defending the country; methods of 
employing the Armed Forces in case of war; and the direction of 
Armed Forces training to perform defense missions. 
  The following missions are the basis of this aspect of 
military doctrine: ensure military-strategic parity and not 
allow military superiority of armies of the probable enemy; 
maintain sufficient defense might; prepare retaliatory 
operations to repel aggression and give a crushing rebuff to the 
aggressor as the principal method of Armed Forces operations. 
  Considering the development of all kinds of weapons, 
including nuclear weapons, in armies of NATO countries, the USSR 
Armed Forces must be trained to repel aggression to an equal 
extent with or without the use of nuclear weapons. In case of 
nuclear war, the USSR Armed Forces must be capable of inflicting 
unacceptable damage on the aggressor. 
  Our state, which adheres to a defensive military doctrine, 
has no aggressive intentions with respect to other states and is 
not preparing to initiate military operations against them. It 
will begin retaliatory operations only in case it is subjected 
to armed attack itself. It carries out Armed Forces 
organizational development based on the concept of military 
sufficiency. 
  Defense sufficiency is understood to mean the level of 
military potentials of opposing sides (states) that ensures each 
of them guaranteed protection and repulse of aggression but is 
insufficient to conduct large scale offensive operations. The 
level of reasonable defense sufficiency is determined in such a 
way as to ensure strategic stability at the lowest possible 
level of the sides' military confrontation, reliable repulse of 
aggression, and successful performance of strategic missions 
while maintaining parity in strategic nuclear assets, equality 
of military forces in principal theaters of military operations, 
and their sufficiency for defense on other axes. 
  The defensive nature of Soviet military doctrine and the 
level of military sufficiency are determined by the fact that 
there are no classes in the USSR interested in war and that 
preemptive wars with a preventive or precautionary goal are 
alien to the nature of socialism. The USSR views attack, 
including nuclear attack or an attack using only conventional 
weapons, as a crime against the people of its country and 
against mankind as a whole. 
  But the Armed Forces must be in high combat and mobilization 
readiness to preclude surprise aggression, and in case of 
aggression they must repel an enemy invasion by an active 
defense and then rout him by counteroffensive operations. The 
immediate delivery of surprise retaliatory counterstrikes 
against the enemy is envisaged with the beginning of his 
aggression. Defense will be their basis at the beginning of a 
war. 
Footnotes 
  1. See M. V. Frunze, "Izbrannyye proizvedeniya" [Selected 
Works], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1984, pp 34-35. 
<H5>  Chapter II - Principles of Employing the Company and </H5>
Battalion in Battle 
<H5>  1. Combat Employment of the Motorized Rifle (Tank) Company </H5>
and Battalion 
  Modern combined arms battle is conducted through united 
efforts of all troops involved (Diagram 1), but the principal 
role in winning victory in combined arms battle rests with 
motorized rifle and tank subunits. Only they are capable of 
completing the enemy's rout and seizing his territory. They 
fight the battle, and subunits of other combat arms work 
together with them to perform these missions. 
  Organizationally the motorized rifle company [MRC] (tank 
company [TC]) is part of a motorized rifle battalion [MRB] (tank 
battalion [TB]). It is a tactical subunit and serves as a unit 
of calculation for various tactical calculations performed in 
the motorized rifle regiment [MRR] (tank regiment [TR]). 
  Organizationally the MRB (TB) is part of an MRR (TR). It is 
the basic combined arms tactical subunit and the tactical unit 
of calculation of the formation in planning battle and 
performing calculations for making a march and for transport 
movement by rail, water routes, air and so on. 
  The MRC (TC) and MRB (TB), outfitted with modern arms and 
with combat and other vehicles, have powerful fire, high 
mobility, maneuverability, armor protection, and the capability 
to resist effects of enemy mass destruction weapons. 
  A company (battalion) can march great distances and quickly 
exploit results of nuclear strikes to complete the enemy's rout. 
In coordination with adjacent subunits or independently, it is 
capable of successfully attacking or firmly holding an occupied 
strongpoint (area) in the defense on various terrain and in any 
weather, and of destroying enemy airborne assault forces, 
helicopters and other low-flying targets. 
  In the defense the MRC (TC) and MRB (TB) are capable of 
inflicting damage on the enemy by organized fire of all weapons 
on approaches to the FEBA; repelling his tank and infantry 
assaults and helicopter strikes; stubbornly holding an occupied 
strongpoint (defense area); and, when the enemy has penetrated 
the defense, completing his rout by a counterattack by the 
second echelon. 
  Coordinating among themselves as well as with artillery and 
subunits of other combat arms and special troops, the MRC (TC) 
and MRB (TB) perform the primary mission of immediate 
destruction of enemy personnel and weapons in close combat. By 
exploiting results of nuclear and fire damage of the enemy and 
skillfully combining fire and movement in the attack, they can 
assault the enemy swiftly and destroy his personnel, tanks, 
infantry fighting vehicles [IFV's], artillery and antitank [AT] 
weapons as well as means of nuclear and chemical attack, 
aircraft and helicopters. 
  They are capable of taking enemy defensive positions from 
the 
move, repelling counterattacks, and developing the attack in the 
depth at a rapid pace. They can conduct a meeting battle, force 
water obstacles from the move, negotiate obstacles and 
destructive damage, pursue a retreating enemy at a fast pace and 
capture intermediate defensive lines in the depth of a defense 
from the move. 
  As a rule, a company (battalion) fights as part of the MRB 
or 
TB (MRR or TR) or independently, and may operate in a 
reconnaissance detachment, in a forward security element or 
flank security element (advance guard, rear guard), in a 
tactical airborne assault force (raiding detachment) or an 
enveloping detachment; it may defend a forward position 
(positions in the security zone); and it also may fight a 
defensive battle in the mountains, the desert, and northern 
areas. 
  The battalion mortar battery and grenade launcher platoon 
[GLP] usually remain subordinate to the battalion commander and 
as a rule are used at full strength to support first echelon 
MRC's. Sometimes the GLP may be attached at full strength to an 
MRC defending on an axis of concentration of battalion main 
efforts or it may be attached by squads to first echelon 
companies. 
  The battalion antitank platoon [ATP] usually remains 
subordinate to the battalion commander and as a rule is used at 
full strength on a likely avenue of tank approach to repel 
assaults by enemy tanks and other armored vehicles. The platoon 
may be attached to first echelon companies at full strength or 
by squads on terrain providing concealment and rough terrain. 
  The attached air defense subunit as a rule remains directly 
subordinate to the battalion commander. 
  Company (battalion) reinforcement. For greater 
independence in fighting, subunits of other combat arms and 
special troops usually are attached to or assigned in support of 
a company (battalion). 
  Attached reinforcing subunits become fully subordinate to 
the 
company (battalion) commander. He assigns them missions in the 
course of battle, but if necessary they may be used to perform 
missions under the plan of the senior commander (chief). For 
example, in penetration of an enemy defense an artillery 
battalion attached to a maneuver battalion will take part in 
artillery preparation of the assault and engage the enemy under 
the senior commander's plan. 
  Supporting subunits remain subordinate to the senior 
commander (chief) and perform missions he assigns as well as 
missions assigned by the commander of the company (battalion) 
which they are supporting, within limits of allocated force 
assets (detail). 
  The number and makeup of subunits to be attached depend on 
the nature of the mission to be performed by subunits and on 
situation conditions. 
  A mortar or artillery battery and an AT, grenade launcher, 
combat engineer, and flamethrower subunit may be attached to an 
MRC and also a tank platoon [TP] in the defense and when 
attacking in the city, in the mountains and in the forest. 
  An artillery battery, motorized rifle subunit and combat 
engineer subunit may be attached to a TC. 
  An MRB (TB) may receive as reinforcement one or two TC's 
(MRC's), an artillery battalion or battery, a subunit of AT 
weapons, an air defense subunit, and also subunits of engineer 
and chemical troops. 
  Artillery subunits are intended for engaging enemy means of 
nuclear and chemical attack, precision weapon systems, 
artillery, tanks, IFV's, AT and other weapons, and also enemy 
personnel, helicopters at landing sites, air defense weapons, 
command and control [C[.sup]2[/]] facilities and electronic 
equipment. In addition, they demolish enemy fortifications and 
may carry out remote mining of terrain, provide illumination 
support in conducting a night battle, lay aerosol (smoke) 
screens and perform other missions in the course of battle. 
Artillery subunits perform fire missions from indirect firing 
positions, selecting them at a distance of 2-6 km from the 
friendly FEBA. In a number of cases (when fighting in a city, 
repelling counterattacks, penetrating a fortified area) 
individual pieces, platoons and batteries may be used to conduct 
direct fire to destroy enemy tanks, other armored targets and AT 
weapons. 
  Subunits of antitank guided missile [ATGM] systems and of AT 
grenade launchers are intended for repelling assaults by enemy 
tanks and other armored vehicles. In addition, they can be used 
to destroy weapons situated not only in open, but also in 
covered fortification structures, and in certain cases also 
enemy combat helicopters flying at low altitudes. 
  A grenade launcher subunit is a powerful fire delivery means 
of the MRB. It is intended for engaging enemy personnel and 
weapons in the open, in emplacements (trenches) and behind 
terrain folds. Grenade launchers are especially effective in 
repelling enemy mechanized infantry assaults ahead of the FEBA 
and repelling their counterattacks in the course of an attack. 
  The air defense subunit is intended for destroying the 
airborne enemy at extremely low and low altitudes. Being in the 
battalion battle, approach march, or march formation, it 
conducts fire against airborne targets in movement or from short 
halts, from afloat in forcing water obstacles, and from prepared 
firing positions on defense and when disposed at the halt. In 
addition, the air defense subunit may be used to combat enemy 
ground targets and targets on the water's surface. 
  Engineer subunits are attached to perform engineer 
reconnaissance of the enemy, terrain and installations; fortify 
strongpoints, positions and disposition areas; conduct engineer 
measures of maskirovka [lit. "camouflage", however, includes 
"concealment" and "deception" -- FBIS] and protection against 
precision weapons; emplace engineer obstacles; breach obstacles 
and rubble; clear mines from terrain and installations; prepare 
and maintain crossings during a forcing of water obstacles; 
perform measures of preparing and maintaining water supply 
points, and so on. 
  Subunits of chemical troops are intended for conducting 
radiological and chemical reconnaissance, radiological and 
chemical monitoring, decontamination of subunits, and maskirovka 
of subunits with aerosols (smoke), and for inflicting losses on 
the enemy with incendiary munitions. 
  Flamethrower subunits attached to the battalion are intended 
for engaging enemy personnel, weapons, and combat and other 
vehicles and creating centers of fire. The battalion commander 
usually attaches them to first echelon MRC's. As a rule, they 
operate in those companies' battle formations, firing 
flamethrowers on the move, from short halts or from in place. 
  The battalion signal subunit is intended for establishing 
and 
maintaining stable communications with subordinate (attached) 
subunits, supporting C[.sup]2[/], and maintaining 
communications with the senior commander (chief) and adjacent 
subunits. 
  Battalion support subunits are intended for servicing, 
maintenance and minor repairs of weapons and vehicles, 
maintaining reserves of ammunition, fuel and other supplies, 
delivering them to subunits, replenishing ammunition and fuel, 
and providing hot meals for the personnel. 
  The battalion aid station is intended for searching for the 
wounded, transporting or carrying them from the battlefield, 
giving paramedic assistance to the wounded and sick, and 
preparing them for evacuation. 
  Company (battalion) formations. An MRC (TC) or MRB 
(TB) may operate in march, approach march or battle formation 
depending on specific situation conditions. 
  The company (battalion) march formation is the 
alignment of subunits for column movement. It is used in making 
a march and executing a covert maneuver and should ensure a high 
rate of movement and rapid deployment into approach march and 
battle formation. The march formation also should ensure least 
vulnerability of personnel, weapons, and combat and other 
vehicles to enemy mass destruction weapons and air and precision 
weapon strikes, and maintenance of stable C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits. 
  The company (battalion) march formation usually consists of 
the main body column and security. Depending on specific 
situation conditions and presence of means of reinforcement, the 
company (battalion) main body column may have a varying 
alignment. When a battalion moves along an independent route, a 
forward security element consisting of a reinforced platoon or 
reinforced company is sent forward as security from the main 
body column to a distance of from 5 to 10 km, and patrol squads 
or tanks are sent to flanks and the rear. 
  The company (battalion) approach march formation 
is the alignment of company (battalion) subunits for movement in 
columns dispersed laterally and in depth. The company 
(battalion) approach march formation is formed by platoon 
(company) columns, and that of an MRC (MRB) operating in 
dismounted formation without BMP's (BTR's) also by squad 
columns. The position of platoons (companies) in the company 
(battalion) approach march formation may be in a line, wedge, 
reverse wedge, echelon right, or echelon left. 
  The approach march formation is used to ensure swift 
deployment of subunits into battle formation; least 
vulnerability of subunits to mass destruction weapons, air 
strikes, precision weapon strikes and artillery fire; attainment 
of high rates of advance; and rapid negotiation of various 
obstacles and areas of contamination, destructive damage, fires 
and floods. 
  The battalion commander determines companies' places in the 
approach march formation with consideration of the planned 
battalion battle formation. Places of platoons (squads) in the 
company (platoon) approach march formation are indicated only if 
necessary. They operate primarily in a fixed alignment of 
platoons (squads): the first in the center, second on the right 
flank, third on the left flank. 
  Intervals and distances are 150-300 m between platoon 
columns 
and 300-600 m between company columns. A company intended for 
operations in the second echelon or reserve proceeds at a 
distance of 1.5-2 km. 
  TC's (TP's) attached to an MRB as a rule proceed in front of 
the MRC's (MRP's). Motorized rifle subunits attached to a TB 
usually proceed behind the TC's (TP's). 
  Weapons which have been left directly subordinate to the 
company (battalion) commander proceed in places in the approach 
march formation indicated by the commander. 
  A company (battalion) deploys from march into approach march 
formation successively into platoon (company) columns and squad 
columns independently when they reach indicated deployment lines 
(points) or at a command (signal) from the company (battalion) 
commander. 
  The company (battalion) battle formation is the 
alignment of subunits for fighting. It should correspond to the 
mission received and the commander's concept and ensure 
successful conduct of battle with use both of nuclear as well as 
only conventional weapons; greatest involvement of weapons in 
battle and full use of subunit combat capabilities; swift 
exploitation of results of nuclear and fire damage of the enemy 
and favorable terrain conditions; timely buildup of efforts in 
the course of battle and timely execution of a maneuver. In 
addition, it should ensure stability and activeness of subunits 
in the defense; least vulnerability of subunits to strikes by 
all kinds of weapons, including precision weapons; maintenance 
of continuous coordination; and convenience of C[.sup]2[/]. 
  The company battle formation consists of first echelon 
subunits (and in the defense also second echelon subunits), 
company weapons and reinforcing subunits; it may include an 
armored group and fire ambushes. 
  The battalion battle formation consists of first echelon 
subunits; second echelon or reserve subunits; and weapons which 
remain directly subordinate to the battalion commander. 
  The battalion battle formation in the defense also may 
include an armored group and fire ambushes. 
  The battalion first echelon usually includes MRC's (TC's) 
with means of reinforcement. When the MRB battle formation is 
aligned in two echelons, the first echelon as a rule includes 
two MRC's and tank subunits attached to the battalion. An MRC 
usually is assigned to the second echelon. When the battle 
formation is aligned in one echelon, from a platoon to an MRC 
may be assigned to the reserve. 
  An attached artillery battalion or battery, air defense 
subunit, and ATP usually may be in the mix of weapons remaining 
at the battalion commander's disposal. 
<H5>  2. Methodology for Calculating Company and Battalion Combat </H5>
Capabilities in Battle 
  The MRC (TC) and MRB (TB) have rather powerful weapons and 
combat vehicles in the inventory, but war experience showed it 
has to be used skillfully and most effectively in battle, i.e., 
take fullest advantage of combat capabilities. Therefore the 
company (battalion) commander's thorough knowledge of combat 
capabilities of weapons which his subunit has, counting attached 
and supporting troops, and also of the personnel's morale and 
political attitude is an important condition for making a 
substantiated decision and permits exercising competent 
C[.sup]2[/] of subordinate troops in battle. 
  Frunze said that the commander's art is manifested in the 
ability to select from the diversity of means at his disposal 
those which will provide best results in a given situation and 
at a given time. 
  In organizing for battle, a large number of questions arise 
for the company (battalion) commander which he is obligated to 
resolve before the beginning of battle: How many and what forces 
will have to be put to use to perform the combat mission he has 
received? What result of battle should be expected with a given 
makeup of friendly and enemy forces and assets considering 
conditions of the terrain and meteorological situation, state of 
weather, time of year and day and so on? 
  He can obtain correct answers to the questions posed above 
if 
he knows and is able to assess the combat capabilities not only 
of friendly but also of enemy troops. 
  Just what should we understand combat capabilities to mean? 
  Combat capabilities in general terms customarily 
are understood to be quantitative and qualitative indicators 
characterizing subunit capabilities to perform specific combat 
missions in a prescribed time and in a specific situation. 
Combat capabilities depend on the number of personnel, the 
subunit (unit) in question, level of its preparedness for 
fighting, and availability and status of weapons and of combat 
and other vehicles; ability of command personnel to exercise 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits; and troop organizational structure 
and state of supply. They also depend on the enemy makeup and 
nature of opposition; terrain conditions; and meteorological 
situation (state of weather, time of year and day) in which the 
battle is being organized and fought. 
  Company (battalion) combat capabilities also depend on the 
kind and nature of upcoming battle. 
  Combat capabilities of subunits of different combat arms are 
expressed by specific indicators. For example, combat 
capabilities of the MRC (TC) or MRB (TB) are described in terms 
of the makeup of enemy forces and assets which they are capable 
of routing (destroying) in an attack (repelling an enemy attack 
in the defense); width of attack frontage (size of a defense 
area [or] strongpoint); depth of subunits' combat missions and 
their rate of advance; depth of fire effect against enemy 
targets; radius of actions of weapons and time for preparing 
them to deliver a strike, and so on. Fire capabilities for 
destroying enemy tanks, IFV's, aircraft and other weapons may be 
determined separately. 
  Company (battalion) combat capabilities can be examined in 
terms of kinds and means of destruction (tanks, BMP's, BTR's, 
artillery, small arms). In addition, the capability of creating 
necessary densities of forces and assets per kilometer of 
frontage is taken into account. 
  It is common knowledge that firepower, striking power and 
maneuverability are the components of company (battalion) combat 
capabilities. 
  The firepower of an MRC (TC) and MRB (TB) as a 
rule is formed from fire capabilities of organic and attached 
artillery, tanks, BMP's, AT weapons, air defense weapons and all 
kinds of small arms. Minefields also are included in firepower 
in conducting defensive battle. 
  The firepower of an MRC (TC) and MRB (TB) usually is 
expressed by the total scope of fire missions which can be 
performed by organic and attached reinforcing weapons with the 
amount of ammunition allocated in accordance with existing 
norms. Damage inflicted on the enemy and expressed by a certain 
degree of his neutralization or destruction is the result of 
realization of firepower. 
  The number of objectives (targets) to be engaged and extent 
of their damage (including platoon strongpoints) usually are 
included in the indicators of MRC (MRB) firepower. The number of 
enemy weapons and combat vehicles (especially tanks and ATGM's) 
destroyed and the mathematical expectation of damage inflicted 
on a grouping of enemy troops is determined without fail. 
  The striking power of an MRC or TC (MRB or TB) is 
manifested in the capability of these subunits to deliver 
powerful strikes against the enemy by a combination of fire and 
movement in an indicated direction. Organic, attached and 
supporting artillery, tanks, BMP's, BTR's, AT weapons, automatic 
grenade launchers and all kinds of small arms may take part in 
the company (battalion) in carrying out a strike. Fire is 
conducted on the move and from short halts. Taking advantage of 
the fire of senior chiefs and conducting fire from all kinds of 
their own weapons, company (battalion) subunits swiftly advance 
into the depth, destroying surviving enemy weapons and personnel 
in the course of movement and take indicated lines (areas) of 
the terrain or strongpoints in the enemy defense. 
  Striking power is characterized above all by densities of 
forces and assets established on the entire attack frontage and 
on the axis of concentration of main efforts and by the number 
of motorized rifle and tank platoons (companies), tanks, BMP's, 
BTR's, guns, mortars, and AT and other weapons per kilometer of 
attack frontage. Striking power in the defense is realized in 
routing an enemy who has penetrated the defense, i.e., in 
conducting counterattacks and completing the rout of an enemy 
who has penetrated. 
  The striking power of an attacking company (battalion) 
depends on the density of forces and assets of a defending or 
attacking enemy and is characterized by the ratio of opposing 
sides' forces and assets. 
  Obviously, the higher the densities of forces and assets 
established by a company (battalion) in battle and the less they 
are for the enemy, the greater will be the force of the 
company's (battalion's) attack and consequently it will perform 
the assigned mission faster. 
  As a rule, armored vehicles (tanks, BMP's, BTR's) with their 
weapons and personnel, which usually fight together, make up the 
basis of company (battalion) striking power. They are capable of 
destroying enemy weapons not only by fire, but also by tracks 
(wheels). Striking power and firepower are manifested in 
inseparable unity here, which is achieved by organizing and 
maintaining precise, continuous coordination of all forces and 
assets participating in the battle. 
  Maneuverability is a property of force elements of 
different branches of the Armed Forces, combat arms and special 
troops describing their degree of mobility and capability for 
quickly accomplishing movement and deployment in preparation for 
and in the course of combat operations, and the capability of 
military vehicles to change speed and direction of movement 
quickly. 
  Maneuverability of a company (battalion) is its capability 
to 
redeploy and change the mutual position of forces and assets in 
an organized, rapid manner; assume a particular alignment; make 
ready for particular operations at a certain time; build up the 
force of the initial attack; transfer efforts from one axis to 
another; cross zones of radioactive and chemical contamination 
and areas of destructive damage, roadblocks and fires; and 
retarget one's weapons for simultaneous engagement of the most 
important enemy targets. In addition, maneuverability in a 
defense describes the capability of subunits to occupy a defense 
in an organized, rapid manner and move battle formation elements 
to any threatened axis in short time periods for taking up a 
defense, conducting counterattacks, destroying a landed enemy 
airborne assault force and so on. 
  Preempting the enemy in opening fire and in delivering an 
attack is the result of realizing maneuverability, which 
contributes to fuller use of firepower, striking power and a 
favorable position. Preempting the enemy in seizing lines 
favorable for defense and building up efforts on threatened axes 
are the result of realization of maneuver capabilities of 
subunits in the defense. Maneuverability of the company 
(battalion) in the attack usually is described in terms of time 
indicators for execution of a maneuver by subunits. 
  Methodology of calculating company (battalion) 
firepower. Company (battalion) firepower is made up of the 
offensive potential of organic and attached subunits of 
artillery, AT and air defense weapons, BMP's, tanks, as well as 
small arms. Therefore the methodology of firepower calculations 
consists of a number of independent, individual methodologies 
for the kinds of weapons. 
  Methodology of calculating damage of the enemy by 
artillery fire. Combat capabilities of artillery are 
described in terms of fire and maneuver capabilities and range 
of fire. Fire capabilities are the basic indicator of artillery 
combat capabilities and are expressed by the scope of fire 
missions performed by it simultaneously or successively in 
specific situation conditions. 
  Artillery performs the following missions with its fire in 
battle: engages means of nuclear and chemical attack, precision 
weapon systems and artillery; engages tanks, IFV's, and AT and 
other weapons; engages personnel, helicopters at landing sites, 
air defense weapons, C[.sup]2[/] facilities and electronic 
equipment; demolishes enemy fortifications; performs remote 
mining of terrain and illumination support; and lays aerosol 
(smoke) screens. 
  Artillery subunits can have various artillery systems in the 
inventory. Their characteristics are given in Table 1. 


Table 1 - Principal Specifications and Performance Characteristics of Guns, 
Mortars and Fighting Vehicles 

                            Self- Propelled Guns 

Basic Data       D-30       122-mm SP    152-mm SP    120-mm     BM-21 
                 122-mm     Howitzer     Howitzer     Mortar     Fighting 
                 Towed                                           Vehicle 
                 Gun 

Range of fire,   15.3       15.2         17.3         7.2        20.7 
km 

Grazing-fire     940        940          580          - 
range, m 

Rate of fire,    6-8        5-4          3            615        40 
rounds/min 

Unit of fire     80         80           60           80         120 

Ammunition       HE-F,      HE-F, S-C,   HE-F, S-C,   HE-F,      HE-F, In 
types*           S-C, I,    I, L         I            In, S, I 
                 S, L 

Time of          1.5- 2.5   1            2            1-1.5      3 
change-over 
from traveling 
to deployed 
position, min 

March speed,     35         30           30           35         48 
km/hr 

Maximum speed,   60         60           60           60         60 
km/hr 

*Key: HE-F--HE-fragmentation; S-C--shaped-charge; I- illumination; S-- 
smoke; L--leaflet; In--incendiary 


  Service rounds are made up of shells for various 
purposes: high explosive, fragmentation, HE-fragmentation, armor 
piercing, shaped-charge, incendiary, special (illumination, 
smoke, leaflet) and proof and testing. 
  High explosive, fragmentation and HE fragmentation 
shells make up the bulk of ammunition in units of fire of 
artillery pieces and are intended for engaging personnel and 
combat vehicles and demolishing light, field-type shelters. 
  A shell's blast effect consists of its deep penetration into 
an obstacle and its burst within the obstacle (or soil). 
  A shell's fragmentation effect consists of its instantaneous 
burst on contacting an obstacle (or the soil). 
  A shell's blast-fragmentation effect consists of its burst 
at 
a certain depth in the obstacle (soil). 
  Armor-piercing shells are intended for engaging 
enemy armored targets. 
  The effect of armor-piercing shells consists of the 
penetration of armor and injury of personnel behind the armor by 
core fragments. 
  In contrast to armor-piercing shells, shaped 
charge shells penetrate armor not through kinetic energy of 
the shells, but thanks to the concentrated, directed effect of a 
burster charge with a shaped-charge cavity. Damage behind the 
armor is accomplished by fragments of the armor and gases from 
the burster charge. 
  Incendiary shells are used for firing against 
wooden structures, fuel and ammunition depots and other highly 
flammable targets and are intended for creating centers of fire 
and injuring personnel. 
  Illumination shells are used for illuminating 
terrain in the vicinity of a target at night (or placing marker 
lights). 
  Smoke shells are intended for laying smoke 
screens, registering and signaling. 
  Leaflet shells are used for delivering leaflets, 
official statements, appeals and so on to the enemy disposition 
to exert an ideological and political effect on him. 
  Fire missions of artillery subunits in engaging a 
target may be annihilation, destruction, neutralization or 
harassment, depending on the nature and importance of the target 
and combat situation conditions. 
  Annihilation of a target consists of inflicting 
such losses (damage) on it that it completely loses combat 
effectiveness. The individual- target kill probability is 
0.7-0.9 or the mathematical expectation of the number of targets 
damaged in the makeup of a group target is 50-60 percent. 
  Destruction of a target consists of putting it in 
an unserviceable condition. 
  Neutralization of a target consists of inflicting 
such losses on it and creating such conditions by fire under 
which it is temporarily deprived of combat effectiveness, its 
maneuver is limited (prohibited) or C[.sup]2[/] is disrupted. 
The mathematical expectation of the number of damaged targets 
will be around 30 percent. 
  Harassment consists of a moral-psychological 
effect on enemy personnel by the conduct of harassing fire by a 
limited number of guns (mortars) and a limited amount of 
ammunition for a prescribed time. 
  Artillery subunits employ the following types of 
fire (Fig. 1) in fire damage of the enemy: fire against a 
single target, concentrated fire, a single-line standing 
barrier, single-line rolling barrier, successive fire 
concentration, and rolling barrage. In addition, they 
participate in massed fire. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-09A>      Fig. 1. Types of fire employed by an artillery battalion (battery): </FIG>

  Fire against a single target is the fire of a 
battery, platoon or gun (mortar, fighting vehicle, ATGM 
launcher) conducted independently from an indirect firing 
position or by direct fire [ogon pryamoy navodkoy]. 
  Concentrated fire is fire conducted by several 
batteries simultaneously against one target. 
  A standing barrier is a continuous curtain of fire 
created ahead of the frontage of an assaulting 
(counterattacking) enemy. A single-line standing barrier is used 
to repel assaults (counterattacks) by enemy infantry. 
  The width of a standing barrier sector is set figuring no 
more than 50 m per piece. 
  Standing barrier lines are codenamed for names of trees such 
as Klen [Maple], Bereza [Birch] and so on. 
  Fire is conducted by HE-fragmentation shells with impact 
fuze 
set for fragmentation effect, by shells with proximity fuzes, 
and by shells with time fuze at one range setting. 
  In conducting single-line standing barrier fire, fire 
commences at the moment infantry and tanks approach the standing 
barrier line and is conducted until the infantry is cut off from 
the tanks and stops the assault (counterattack). If the enemy 
infantry has gone to ground, it is engaged by concentrated fire. 
  A rolling barrier is a continuous curtain of fire 
created at one line on the path of movement of enemy tanks, 
IFV's and APC's and shifted successively to designated lines as 
the bulk of tanks (IFV's, APC's) exits the zone of fire. The 
rolling barrier is prepared at several lines located on the path 
of movement of enemy tanks (IFV's, APC's). The distance between 
rolling barrier lines can be 400-600 m depending on their rate 
of movement. The width of a battery (battalion) rolling barrier 
sector is set figuring no more than 25 m per piece. Lines are 
given a common name of predatory animals such as Lev [Lion], 
Tigr [Tiger] and so on, and each line beginning with the far 
line is given its own serial number such as Lev-1, Lev-2 and so 
on. 
  Barrier-fire lines are assigned on terrain sectors 
observable 
from ground observation posts [OP's]. A battalion is assigned a 
sector on a barrier line which is divided into battery sectors. 
Each battery's place in the division sector is established in 
advance by the battalion commander. 
  A successive fire concentration is used during 
fire support of the assault. Successive fire concentration lines 
are assigned 300-1,000 m from each other with consideration of 
the enemy defense alignment. Successive fire concentration lines 
are codenamed for predatory animals such as Lev [Lion], Tigr 
[Tiger] and so on, and lines are numbered in the order of the 
sequence of conducting fire against them beginning with the near 
line. A battalion is assigned one group target or two or three 
single targets on a successive fire concentration line. The 
group target area should not exceed 9 hectares. A battery 
conducts fire as part of the battalion or independently. With 
independent conduct of fire, a battery is assigned a target 
whose size should not exceed 3 hectares for a 6-gun battery or 4 
hectares for an 8-gun battery. 
  The rolling barrage is used in fire support of the 
assault and is conducted against primary and intermediate lines. 
Primary barrage lines are assigned 300-1,000 m from each other 
and intermediate barrage lines every 100- 300 m between primary 
ones. Primary barrage lines are codenamed for predatory animals 
such as Bars [Snow Leopard], Lisa [Fox] and so on, and lines are 
numbered in the order of the sequence of conducting fire against 
them beginning with the near line. Intermediate lines are 
numbered separately from primary lines and are called first 
intermediate, second intermediate and so on. A battalion is 
assigned one sector on a barrage line, which is divided into 
battery sectors. The areas of battalion and battery sectors are 
determined figuring 25 m per gun and 15 m per mortar. 
  Massed fire is conducted simultaneously by all or 
the bulk of artillery against an enemy grouping with the mission 
of decisive damage of one or more important objectives (targets) 
in a short time. 
  Procedure for engaging different enemy targets 
(objectives). As a rule stationary, unobserved (visually 
from ground OP's), unarmored targets in the open are 
annihilated, while covered and armored targets are neutralized 
or annihilated. No less than a battery is used for firing on 
such targets. 
  Artillery and mortar batteries and platoons (sections) as 
well as individual pieces are engaged at firing positions. 
  SP gun batteries (platoons) usually are annihilated, while 
SP 
mortar platoons are neutralized. 
  As a rule, SP gun batteries (platoons) are engaged 
immediately on detection by fire assaults conducted by rapid 
fire. 
  Personnel and weapons in the open usually are annihilated. 
  Sheltered personnel and weapons usually are neutralized. 
  Enemy AT weapons (ATGM launchers and AT guns) and subunits 
of 
these weapons are annihilated or neutralized depending on the 
situation. Subunits of unarmored and lightly armored AT weapons 
in disposition (concentration) areas as well as single, 
unsheltered, unarmored AT weapons disposed at positions as a 
rule are annihilated. 
  Enemy platoon strongpoints, mortar platoons, command 
observation posts [COP's], radars, and companies in 
concentration areas [rayon sosredotocheniya] and on the march 
usually are objectives and targets for engagement by artillery 
fire. 
  Fire capabilities of artillery to engage enemy objectives by 
fire from indirect firing positions are determined by the nature 
of the targets, shell density used, number of available guns and 
mortars, amount and quality of ammunition issued, and the time 
in which missions must be accomplished. 
  The number of shells and mortar rounds which can be fired in 
this time is determined for each artillery system depending on 
the number of guns and mortars which a battery has, the duration 
of fire preparation and the method of fire. By dividing this 
amount by the average ammunition expenditure norm we obtain the 
number of objectives which can be neutralized (annihilated) 
during artillery preparation of the assault. 
  The following indicators are used in calculating fire 
capabilities of artillery firing from indirect positions against 
personnel and weapons in the open: 50 m per gun and mortar for 
placing a standing barrier; 25 m per gun and mortar for placing 
a rolling barrier; and 15 m per gun up to and including 100-mm 
caliber and mortars of all calibers, and 25 m for guns over 
100-mm caliber for conducting a rolling barrage. For a 
successive fire concentration based on the size of battalion 
sectors on one line: 6 hectares for battalions armed with guns 
up to and including 100-mm caliber and with mortars of all 
calibers; and 9 hectares for battalions armed with guns over 
100-mm caliber. 
  Methodology for calculating subunit capabilities to 
combat enemy armored targets and other targets by direct 
fire. The calculation methodology is based on use of combat 
effectiveness factors, which are given in Table 2. To calculate 
capabilities, multiply the number of AT weapons by their factor. 


Table 2 - Combat Effectiveness Factors of AT Weapons in Combating Enemy 
Tanks 

             Effectiveness Factor 

AT Weapons   In Penetrating a    In Repelling a    In the         In a 
             Defense             Counterattack     Defense        Meeting 
                                                                  Battle 

ATGM         0.3[.sup]1[/]/0.5    2[.sup]2[/]/2.5    2.5            2 
fighting                                           [.sup]3[/]/2 
vehicle 

Fagot ATGM   0.3/0.5             1.15/2            2/1.5          1.5 


Metis ATGM   0.3/0.5             1/1.5             1              1 


BMP          0.3/0.5             1.3/1.5           2/1.5          1.3/1.5 

Tanks        0.3/0.5             1/2               2.5/1.5        1.5 

SPG [heavy   0.1/0.15            0.8/1             1/0.8          0.8 
AT grenade 
launcher] 

RPG- 7       0.05/0.08           0.2               0.3/0.2        0.2 

1. Emplaced enemy tanks in numerator, tanks in open in denominator. 

2. Friendly AT weapons in open in numerator, emplaced friendly AT weapons 
in denominator. 

3. Emplaced friendly AT weapons in numerator, friendly AT weapons in open 
in denominator. 


  It is accepted that two or three AT weapons should be 
assigned to destroy one target in conducting direct fire on the 
FEBA and in the immediate depth of defense in the period of fire 
preparation of the assault. 
  In launching an attack from immediate contact with the 
enemy, 
three Metis ATGM's are used for this purpose in a BTR-equipped 
MRC. In a BMP-equipped company and in a tank company 50-60 
percent of tanks and BMP's are used. The above companies can 
destroy up to 5-6 targets with their own assets. 
  A BTR-equipped MRB in the defense may use 6 Metis ATGM's, 6 
Fagot ATGM's, 1 SPG-9 and 18 RPG-7's in aligning the battle 
formation in two echelons. There is a total of 30 AT weapons 
which can be used to destroy around 30 assaulting enemy tanks. 
  Capabilities of motorized rifle and tank subunits to combat 
enemy tanks in repelling a counterattack and in the defense are 
given in Table 3. 


Table 3 - Capabilities of Motorized Rifle and Tank Subunits to Combat Enemy Tanks, IFV's and APC's in Repelling a 
Counterattack and in the Defense 

                           In Repelling a Counterattack                 In the Defense 

                           Effectiveness Factor   Capabilities for      Effectiveness Factor   Capabilities for 
                                                  Destroying                                   Destroying 

AT Weapons      Number     Against    Against    Tanks      IFV's      Against    Against    Tanks      IFV's 
                of AT      Tanks      IFV's                 and        Tanks      IFV's                 and 
                Weapons               and                   APC's                 and                   APC's 
                                      APC's                                       APC's 

BTR-equipped 
MRC 

Metis ATGM      3          1.5        2.5        3-4        7 8        1          1.5        3          4-5 

RPG- 7          9          0.2        0.5        2          45         0.3        0.5        2-3        4-5 

Total           12         -          -          5-6        11-13      -                     5- 6       8-10 

BMP-equipped 
MRC 

ATGM on BMP     11         1.5        2.5        16-17      27 28      2          3          22         33 

RPG- 7          9          0.2        0.5        2          45         0.3        0.5        2-3        4-5 

Total           20         -          -          18-19      31-33      -                     24-25      37-38 

Tank company    10-13      2          3          20-26      30- 39     2.5        3          25-32      30-39 

BTR-equipped 
MRB 

Metis ATGM      9          1.5        2          13-14      18         1          1.5        9          13-14 

Fagot ATGM      6          1.5        2          9          12         2          3          12         18 

SPG-9M          1          1.0        1.5        1          1-2        1          2          1          2 

RPG-7           27         0.2        0.4        5-6        10-11      0.3        0.5        8          13 

Total           43         -          -          25-30      41-43      -                     30         56-57 

BMP-equipped 
MRB 

ATGM on BMP     33         1.5        3          49-50      99         2          3          66         99 

RPG- 7          27         0.2        0.4        5-6        10-11      0.3        0.5        8          13 

Total           60         -          -          54-56      104-110    -          -          74         112 

Tank            31-40      2          3          62-80      93- 120    2.5        3          78-100     93-120 
battalion 


  It is customary to consider that 70 percent of capabilities 
of AT weapons and tanks are used in combating enemy tanks and 30 
percent in combating enemy IFV's, APC's and other armored 
targets. Capabilities of those means to combat enemy APC's and 
IFV's are 2-3 times greater than against tanks, since APC's and 
IFV's have weak armor protection, which protects personnel only 
against bullets and against artillery and mortar round 
fragments, and naturally the APC's and IFV's will be disabled 
after being hit by the very first round. 
  Methodology of calculating company (battalion) 
capabilities for damaging the enemy by small arms fire. 
Mathematical expectation of damage done to enemy personnel is 
the basic indicator of company (battalion) capabilities of 
damaging the enemy by small arms fire. Fire capabilities of 
damaging the enemy by small arms fire usually are calculated 
only in subunits. 
  The calculation methodology is based on a comparison of the 
sides' small arms fire densities expressed by the number of 
bullets per meter of frontage in the indicated sector (zone) of 
fire. Experience has established that when a company attacking 
in dismounted formation comes to within 400 m of the enemy 
defense, it commences fire from all kinds of weapons against his 
forward edge with a density of at least 8-10 bullets per minute 
per meter of frontage and is conducted with that density for 4 
minutes (in an assault at a rate of 100 m in one minute). Such a 
fire density leads to enemy personnel losses of up to 30 percent 
on the forward edge of defense. 
  The procedure for calculating subunit fire capabilities of 
damaging the enemy by small arms fire is as follows: determine 
the number of a battalion's MRC's operating in the first 
echelon; count the number of assault rifles, machineguns and 
other weapons in each company; then, by dividing their 
cumulative effective rate of fire by the company (battalion) 
attack frontage, determine how many bullets will be fired in one 
minute per meter of frontage. 
  Methodology of calculating striking power of 
subunits. The magnitude of subunits' striking power is 
judged from the quantitative makeup, densities, and in the final 
account the number of forces and assets of opposing sides and 
rates of advance. The densities and ratio of close-combat forces 
and assets permit drawing a conclusion about the capability of 
routing the enemy and performing the assigned mission. Densities 
in a company are figured by squads and in a battalion by 
platoons. For example, to conduct a successful attack it is 
necessary to have a superiority of 23 times in favor of 
attacking subunits in the company (battalion) attack frontage, 
to create a superiority of 4-6 times in a penetration sector 
(i.e., overwhelming superiority over the enemy), and thereby, 
taking advantage of the superiority achieved, to assault the 
enemy swiftly right after the fire, rout him and capture the 
designated line from the move. 
  Nine motorized rifle squads [MRS's] and an AT squad carry 
the 
striking power of a BTR-equipped MRC. Usually up to 2-3 platoons 
of tanks operate together with the company on its axis of 
attack, which considerably increases its striking power. In a 
BMP-equipped company the main striking power consists of the 
BMP's (11 of them), which can successfully fight not only enemy 
personnel, but also his tanks and other armored targets. But 
even a BMP-equipped company must coordinate closely with tank 
subunits. 
  Nine MRP's and 33 BMP's are the basis of striking power of a 
BMP-equipped MRB. The experience of field fire exercises which 
have been held showed that a BMP- equipped MRB reinforced by a 
TC and attacking in a 1-2 km frontage is capable of destroying 
all main weapons in 2-3 platoon strongpoints at one line (400 m 
wide and 200 m deep, gaps of 200 m or more between enemy platoon 
strongpoints), expending 0.2-0.3 unit of fire of different 
ammunition for this. 
  A BTR-equipped MRB reinforced by two TC's also has the very 
same capabilities. The TB of an MRR usually is attached to 
MRB's. The striking power of MRC's and MRB's is considerably 
increased because of the tanks. The TB of a TR can 
simultaneously destroy weapons in 2-3 platoon strongpoints, 
i.e., up to a mechanized infantry company, by gun and machinegun 
fire of 30 tanks. Working closely together with the TC attached 
to the battalion, exploiting results of nuclear and fire damage 
of the enemy, and in coordination with adjacent subunits, an MRC 
is capable of completing the rout of an enemy in 2-3 platoon 
points during the time of battalion execution of the mission. 
For their part, an MRB reinforced by tanks and the TB of a TR 
are capable of completing the destruction of personnel and 
weapons in 8-9 platoon strongpoints successively at three lines 
in a day's battle, i.e., routing up to three enemy companies. 
  The magnitude of indicators of striking power of 
counterattacking subunits depends on the number and quality of 
TP's and MRP's being used for the attack which have tanks and 
BMP's (BTR's) in their makeup, and also on the number of AT 
weapons operating together with the counterattacking subunits. 
The higher the density of these forces and assets, the greater 
will be the indicators of striking power. Based on experience of 
the Great Patriotic War and postwar scientific research 
exercises using only conventional weapons, a superiority of 2-3 
times in forces and assets over the enemy in favor of the 
counterattacking subunits was considered sufficient for routing 
an enemy who had penetrated if he had not managed to consolidate 
at the line reached. If an enemy who has penetrated is being 
routed under conditions of the use of nuclear weapons, then 
equal or one and one-half times superiority is sufficient. 
  Based on field fire exercise experience, under conditions of 
the use of nuclear weapons a BMP-equipped MRC working together 
with a TP (TC) can rout a penetrated enemy of up to a mechanized 
infantry company in strength. 
  A BMP-equipped MRB reinforced by one TC and a BTR-equipped 
MRB reinforced by two TC's, with an expenditure of 0.2-0.3 unit 
of fire of different ammunition and delivery of an attack 
against the flank and rear of the penetrated enemy is capable, 
in coordination with adjacent battalions, of routing a 
penetrated grouping equal to its own makeup. 
  The TB of a TR has approximately the very same capabilities 
under the very same conditions. 
  Thus, a rout (or completion of a rout together with the 
regiment's second echelon) of an enemy grouping which has 
penetrated the defense can be the result of realization of the 
striking power of subunits in the defense. 
  The depth of possible advance of counterattacking subunits 
is 
determined by the depth of disposition of enemy forces and 
assets which have penetrated the defense. 
  Methodology for calculating maneuver capabilities. 
Maneuverability of the company and battalion is determined by 
the maneuver qualities of their organic and attached subunits in 
terms of speed, tempo, time, displacement and readiness for 
certain actions. The company (battalion) may employ a maneuver 
of fire, forces and assets. 
  A maneuver of fire is used for more effective 
engagement of the enemy. It consists of a timely concentration 
of the fire of organic and attached subunits against one target 
or a group of important targets, and the transfer of fire from 
one target to another and distribution of fire against several 
targets. The time from transmission of commands to the burst of 
a projectile (munition) at the target is the basic indicator 
characterizing capabilities of the maneuver of fire. It depends 
on the kind of target (objective) (planned or opportunity 
target) against which fire is commenced. The time of delivery of 
a fire strike against an opportunity target is formed from the 
time for transmitting commands and preparing firing data. If 
fire is conducted against a planned target, then time 
expenditures for preparing new firing data are not taken into 
account, since it was done in advance. 
  Maneuver of forces and assets (subunits). A 
maneuver is executed to occupy a more favorable position for 
delivering a strike against the most vulnerable place in the 
enemy combat formation, especially his flank and rear, and to 
move friendly subunits out from under an enemy strike. A 
maneuver of forces and assets can be accomplished along roads or 
cross country routes and by air or water. The maneuver should be 
simple in concept and be executed swiftly, covertly and as a 
surprise to the enemy. Timely, fullest exploitation of results 
of nuclear and fire damage of the enemy should be made the basis 
of a maneuver of forces and assets (subunits). A close 
envelopment, deep envelopment, their combination, and the 
withdrawal are kinds of subunit maneuver. The close envelopment 
is a maneuver executed to move subunits for an attack against an 
enemy flank. The deep envelopment is a deeper maneuver executed 
by subunits to attack the enemy from the rear. A close 
envelopment usually is accomplished in close tactical and fire 
coordination and a deep envelopment only in tactical 
coordination with subunits attacking from the front. A 
withdrawal is a maneuver used to move friendly troops out from 
under an attack by superior enemy forces, to win time and to 
occupy a more favorable line (area). A withdrawal is conducted 
only by permission or order of the senior commander. In the 
defense a maneuver is executed to replace or reinforce subunits 
which have suffered losses, conduct counterattacks, occupy 
alternate positions and lines of firing positions, and destroy 
an enemy who has moved to the flank or rear of a strongpoint 
(defense area). 
  The general content of a maneuver of company (battalion) 
forces and assets on the terrain is made up of the following 
actions: leaving occupied areas of a position or leaving 
occupied lines; closing up subunits into columns and extending 
the columns; shifting to new areas, positions or lines and 
deploying to perform the combat mission. 
  Time of executing a maneuver is the basic indicator of a 
maneuver of forces and assets (Table 4). 


Table 4 - Subunit Maneuver Capabilities 

Subunit Actions                            Time, min 

In the defense 

Occupying a battle formation and           55 
organizing a system of fire by MRC 

Changing a firing position by MRC (TC)     6 

Moving forward and occupying a line of     9 
firing positions by TC to repel an enemy 
assault 

In the attack 

Rate of subunit movement to the line of    15 20 km/hr 
departure 

Combat rates of assault: 

Dismounted                                 4-5 km/hr 

In BTR's, BMP's, tanks                     8-12 km/hr 

Time of deployment from march column 
into approach march formation: 

MRC (TC)                                   2 

MRB (TB)                                   4 

Time of deployment from column into 
battle formation toward the front: 

MRC (TC)                                   3.5 

MRB (TB)                                   8 

Occupying a line by MRC (with dismount)    5 
to repel enemy counterattack 

Time for changing from battle formation 
to approach march formation: 

MRC (TC)                                   1 

MRB (TB)                                   3 (4) 

Deployment of tractor-drawn artillery 
battalion into battle formation: 

In prepared area                           18 

In unprepared area (from the march         23 
during displacement) 

Deployment of SP battalion into battle 
formation: 

In prepared area                           7 

In unprepared area                         10 

Leaving firing position: 

Battery                                    2 

SP artillery battalion                     6 

Tractor-drawn battalion                    11 


  The following are considered initial data for calculating 
capabilities for a maneuver of forces and assets by a company 
(battalion): content and depth of the maneuver; rates of subunit 
movement along roads and cross-country routes with consideration 
of terrain accessibility; type of column; norms of time required 
by forces and assets to leave areas (positions, lines), close up 
into columns and extend them; time for a column to pull into a 
new area, deploy into battle formation and prepare to perform a 
mission. 
  The procedure for calculating the time for executing a 
maneuver of forces and assets on the terrain can be as follows: 

  -  analyze the goal and content of the maneuver; determine 
from a map the depth of the maneuver with consideration of 
corrections for terrain relief and map scale; break the route 
into 5-10 km segments and determine rate of movement along 
sectors with different trafficability. In breaking up routes 
into 5-10 km segments, make corrections for each segment; 
  -  figure the time for crossing each sector (divide sector 
length 
by movement rate), preparing for movement (leaving disposition 
areas, closing up and extending columns), deploying in the new 
area and preparing to execute the mission (using tabular data); 
  -  determine overall time for executing the maneuver by adding 
up 
the indicators obtained. 


    In calculating time for forward movement, take into account 
the following: have mixed columns move at average speeds of 
20-25 km/hr; move up to the line of departure at a speed of 
15-20 km/hr. 
  The time for subunits to concentrate in (pull into) an area 
is figured from the formula 
  T[.sub]pull-in[/]=D[.sub]col[/]D[.sub]area[/]/s, 
  where 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|D[.sub]col[/]                       |--depth of march column;              | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|D[.sub]area[/]                      |--depth of area;                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|s                                     |--rate of concentration (equal to one-| 
|                                      |half of march speed, i.e., 10- 12 km/-| 
|                                      |hr).                                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Example 1. Figure the time for commitment of a 
second-echelon battalion which is 6 km from the commitment line. 
  Solution. The battalion will arrive at the line 
for deployment into platoon columns in 16.5 minutes (5x1.1=5.5 
km); (5.5x6020=16.5 minutes). The battalion will move from 
the line of deployment into platoon columns to the commitment 
line in 3 minutes (1x6020). Deployment of companies into 
battle formation during the day will take 4 minutes. Twenty- 
four minutes are required for commitment. The battalion 
commander and staff will require up to 20 minutes for 
decisionmaking and assigning (updating) missions to companies. 
Thus, a regiment's second echelon battalion can be committed in 
44 minutes (16.5+3+4+20) after the combat mission has been 
updated for it (assigned to it) by the senior commander. 
  The maneuver of company (battalion) forces and assets when 
operating in a tactical airborne assault force includes company 
(battalion) movement up to the concentration area, boarding and 
loading, flight to the landing area and the landing. 
  The following are initial data for calculating the time for 
executing a maneuver by air: rates of forward movement of 
landing forces and assets under their own power; norms of time 
required for boarding (loading) and disembarking (unloading); 
distance of boarding sites from drop zones; and type and flight 
speeds of air assault assets. 
  The procedure for calculating time for landing of a tactical 
airborne assault force requires the following: determine flight 
distance from a map; calculate flight time of the assault force; 
determine the time for forward movement of landing forces and 
assets to concentration areas and time for boarding; establish 
the time for disembarking (unloading) after landing; determine 
overall time by adding up the indicators obtained. 
  Based on exercise experience, a reinforced MRC will take 
20-25 minutes and an MRB will take 45-50 minutes to board 
(disembark). 
  Consideration of moral-political attitude of subunits 
in assessing their combat capabilities. Firepower, striking 
power and maneuverability represent the potential capabilities 
of a company (battalion). As we already established, material 
resources are the basis of combat power inasmuch as the sides' 
mutual damage is the basic content of battle and is accomplished 
by material resources, above all by fire from all kinds of 
weapons. Consequently, the outcome of battle is decided by 
weapons, but weapons do not operate of themselves. The outcome 
of battle depends largely on what kind of moral-fighting 
qualities a person possesses. 
  The moral-fighting qualities of personnel are understood to 
mean the aggregate of the most important qualities of people 
determining their behavior in battle. This includes both 
individual as well as collective qualities of people. Individual 
qualities usually are subdivided into political, moral, 
psychological and professional. 
  People's moral qualities are the basic regulator of behavior 
in all spheres of their activity, including in battle. Moral 
qualities are characterized by such categories as a sense of 
duty, responsibility, conscience, honor and dignity. The entire 
set of moral-fighting qualities of personnel in battle is 
realized and materialized through professional qualities, and 
all qualities form and are manifested under the influence of 
political views. This must not be forgotten and must be taken 
into account in determining combat capabilities of the company 
and battalion in modern battle. 
  Constant consideration and use of the moral-political and 
psychological factor in the interests of performing an assigned 
mission are the most important condition for achieving success 
in battle. This is achieved by constant, profound knowledge of 
the personnel's political-moral and psychological state, by 
organization and conduct of active political work to strengthen 
such a state, by a systematic study of the enemy's 
moral-political qualities, by identification of his strong and 
weak points, and by creation of active opposition to his 
ideological subversion in propaganda. 
  In estimating the enemy, the company (battalion) commander 
takes the following into account: Subunit organization and 
strength level, combat experience and traditions; level of 
personnel's professional training; ethnic-psychological features 
of personnel; level of discipline and relationships between 
commanders and subordinates and among soldiers of different 
nationalities, and the attitude toward allied armies; system of 
brainwashing personnel and its effectiveness; servicemen's 
attitude toward socialism and war as a whole; and measures which 
must be carried out to undermine and weaken the morale of enemy 
troops. 
  In estimating the state of morale of friendly troops, the 
company (battalion) commander proceeds from the fact that our 
social system is a source of soldiers' high morale. Moral forces 
are not a constant value; they depend on the level of political 
and military education. Therefore in estimating the state of 
morale of friendly subunits the following always must be taken 
into account in addition to other questions of political work: 
state of ideological-educational work to strengthen military 
discipline, efficiency and order; the personnel's state of 
supply of necessary material resources for battle. 
  As a result, a conclusion is drawn about the extent to which 
the moral factor contributes (or does not contribute) to 
performance of combat missions and what measures must be taken 
to change the personnel's moral political attitude. 
<H5>  Chapter III - Command and Control of Subunits </H5>
<H5>  1. Principles of Command and Control of Subunits </H5>
  C[.sup]2[/] of subunits is the purposeful activity of the 
company (battalion) commander, his deputies and the battalion 
staff to maintain subunits' constant combat readiness, prepare 
them for battle and lead them in performing assigned missions. 
  C[.sup]2[/] of subunits includes the following: organizing 
and accomplishing measures to improve or maintain their combat 
readiness and ensure or restore their combat effectiveness; 
maintaining high morale, psychological stability, firm military 
discipline, efficiency and constant combat readiness in the 
subunits; continuously collecting, gathering, generalizing, 
analyzing and assessing situation data; making decisions; 
assigning missions to subordinate subunits; organizing and 
maintaining continuous coordination; organizing and fulfilling 
measures for political work and comprehensive support; and 
organizing C[.sup]2[/]. In addition, the commander and staff 
carry out practical work in subordinate subunits to direct their 
immediate preparation for battle, organize the performance of 
assigned missions in the course of battle, and perform other 
measures. 
  It is common knowledge that C[.sup]2[/] theory and 
practice also developed and changed along with the development 
of armed forces. Thus, before the appearance of mass armies 
C[.sup]2[/] was exercised directly by the commander (field 
general), since at that time he could observe the actions of all 
his troops and could issue necessary orders and command the 
troops personally or through adjutants, orderlies and messengers 
without the help of a special entity (a staff). 
  With the appearance of mass armies and consequently also 
with 
the increased scope of combat operations and changed conditions 
of preparing and conducting battle, it became more and more 
difficult for one commander to lead the troops and he could no 
longer cope with this mission alone. The need arose to establish 
a permanent, special C[.sup]2[/] entity. A Military Council 
under the commander in chief was introduced for this initially, 
then the army staff was established in the middle of the 18th 
century, and in the early 19th century staffs appeared in 
divisions, regiments and battalions. The staffs developed and 
were perfected and improved all the while, becoming the 
commander's irreplaceable assistants in C[.sup]2[/] both in 
peace as well as wartime. 
  New combat arms and special troops, which began to take part 
in battle, appeared in the course of further evolution of the 
armed forces of many states. This led to a further expansion in 
the circle of appointed persons used for leadership of 
formations, units and subunits. Chiefs of these combat arms and 
special troops appeared in the organizational structure of 
troops. 
  The basic content of C[.sup]2[/] of subunits consists of 
maintaining high political attitude and morale and the constant 
combat readiness of subunits; collecting and studying situation 
data and discovering enemy intentions; making decisions; 
communicating missions to subordinates; organizing and 
maintaining coordination among subunits of the battalion and 
other combat arms participating in battle; comprehensively 
supporting battle and monitoring its preparation and subunits' 
performance of assigned missions. 
  Timely, well organized, uninterrupted C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits facilitates seizing and holding the initiative, 
covertness in preparing for battle, surprise in delivering 
attacks against the enemy, swift exploitation of results of 
nuclear and fire damage of the enemy, and timely accomplishment 
of measures for protecting subunits against mass destruction 
weapons. In addition, it permits more effective use of the 
combat capabilities of all forces and assets involved in the 
battle. 
  Conditions for C[.sup]2[/] of subunits. 
Conditions for C[.sup]2[/] of subunits have become 
substantially more complicated in modern battle compared with 
the Great Patriotic War. In the past war C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits was exercised in a situation where the battle developed 
relatively slowly and its outcome depended chiefly on rifle 
subunits, sometimes reinforced by tanks and artillery fire. 
  As a rule, company and battalion COP's were disposed in 
battle formations of subunits, usually being in one and the same 
place for a lengthy time (especially in a defense). 
  The modern MRC and MRB became highly mobile and 
maneuverable. 
While a company (battalion) of the Great Patriotic War period 
had a rate of advance of 4- 5 km/hr, now it can march at an 
average speed of 20-25 km/hr. Under present conditions, if the 
enemy uses nuclear weapons the commander will have to control 
his subunits fighting in areas of contamination, destructive 
damage, fires and flooding. Now the combat situation on the 
battlefield may change often and substantially, which will 
necessitate updating a decision or organizing it anew. 
  The growth in spatial scope of battle, both defensive as 
well 
as offensive, and of its tempo of conduct leads to a more 
frequent change in locations of C[.sup]2[/] facilities and 
will force a commander to exercise control of subunits on the 
move. As we know, this hampers C[.sup]2[/] of subunits and 
complicates their protection and protection of the means of 
C[.sup]2[/] against nuclear and precision weapons, air and 
artillery strikes, and actions by enemy raiding parties, which 
as a rule will have the mission of knocking out command posts. 
  Changes which occurred in organization and technical 
outfitting of our own and enemy troops led to substantial 
changes in the content and nature of modern combined arms 
battle, in methods of its organization and conduct and in 
methods of C[.sup]2[/] of subunits. Battle became decisive, 
dynamic, maneuverable and fast-moving. The spatial scope of 
battle increased substantially compared with the Great Patriotic 
War period. Thus, a modern MRB may attack a deliberate enemy 
defense in a frontage up to 2 km and defend an area with a 
frontage of 3-5 km. 
  Under such conditions the company (battalion) commander will 
control subunits over radio communications equipment, as a rule 
in movement or from short halts. The volume of information on 
the enemy which the company (battalion) commander must quickly 
collect, generalize, study, analyze, make a decision on and 
report to the senior commander has grown substantially. 
  In modern battle the company (battalion) commander will be 
forced to make or update a decision at least 3-4 times in the 
course of a 24 hour period, in less time than was the case in 
the Great Patriotic War, and often under conditions where the 
COP will be in movement for a considerable time. Therefore the 
factor of time now has a deciding effect on all C[.sup]2[/] 
processes. Under these conditions the company (battalion) 
commander must think out and determine well the location of his 
COP and the organization of communications from it with 
subunits, adjacent subunits and the senior commander. 
  The company (battalion) commander's place should be a place 
from which he can confidently lead subordinates and exert an 
effective influence on them in preparing for and conducting 
battle. The presence of communications equipment (especially 
radio equipment) in the company and battalion gives the 
commander great mobility in choosing his location, but the 
commander's attachment to communications equipment should not 
contribute to his rejection of contact with subordinate, 
attached and supporting subunits. 
  The experience of the past war shows that a company 
(battalion) commander should have a good view from his COP of 
his subunit's battle formation and of the enemy whom he is 
fighting. 
<H5>  2. Requirements Placed on C </H5>[.sup]2[/] of Subunits 
  The highly maneuverable nature of combat operations as well 
as frequent, abrupt situation changes demand of a company 
(battalion) commander that C[.sup]2[/] be stable, 
continuous, efficient and concealed, and accomplished so 
the necessary degree of centralization of C[.sup]2[/] is 
combined with granting of initiative to subordinate commanders 
in determining methods of performing assigned missions. 
  Stability of C[.sup]2[/] of the company 
(battalion) is manifested in the constant influence of the 
commander and staff (in the battalion) on operations of subunits 
participating in the battle in the interests of their successful 
performance of assigned mission under any combat situation 
conditions. Great Patriotic War experience indicates that even a 
temporary loss of C[.sup]2[/] of subunits leads to 
nonperformance of the combat mission and in some cases also to 
defeat. 
  Stability of C[.sup]2[/] is achieved by knowing the combat 
situation which actually has taken shape and the combat mission 
received, making the decision promptly and assigning missions 
precisely to subordinate subunits; maintaining stable 
communications with subordinate, attached and coordinating units 
(subunits) and with the senior commander (chief), and ensuring 
reliability of its operation; and making comprehensive use of 
all C[.sup]3[/] equipment at the disposal of the company 
(battalion). In addition, back when organizing the battle 
measures are taken to protect friendly organic radio equipment 
and electronic C[.sup]2[/] systems and oppose enemy technical 
reconnaissance assets. 
  Continuity of C[.sup]2[/] consists of the 
commander's constant influence on the course of battle by word, 
action and means at his disposal in the interests of subunits' 
successful performance of the assigned mission. In battle the 
company (battalion) commander is obligated to carefully follow 
the course of battle and continuously conduct reconnaissance and 
know the enemy's actions and intentions. He must promptly assign 
or update missions to platoons (companies) and to attached and 
supporting subunits. Constant knowledge and analysis of the 
battlefield situation both within one's own boundaries as well 
as ahead of adjacent subunits, and foresight of the most 
important changes are necessary conditions for achieving 
continuity of C[.sup]2[/]. This will permit the commander to 
employ all organic and attached weapons skillfully in the course 
of battle and effectively exploit results of nuclear and fire 
damage of the enemy. 
  To achieve continuity of C[.sup]2[/] it is very important 
to select the site of one's COP, dispose it covertly and 
displace it promptly, especially when conducting battle at night 
and on rough terrain. The company (battalion) commander must be 
on the most important axis at a given point in time and exert 
timely influence on the course of battle with all forces and 
assets at his disposal. The commander must lead subunits in 
difficult moments of battle by personal example, showing 
boldness, initiative, resourcefulness and unshakable resolve, 
and perform the combat mission regardless of any difficulty or 
even a threat to life itself, instilling this resolve in all 
subordinates. 
  Back while organizing for battle the commander should 
appoint 
deputies for himself in addition to authorized ones and issue an 
order on them. The battalion commander and staff immediately 
take steps to restore C[.sup]2[/] disrupted in the course of 
battle. 
  Efficiency of C[.sup]2[/] consists of timely, 
swift accomplishment of all measures connected with leading 
company (battalion) subunits in preparation for and in the 
course of battle; constant knowledge of the situation and swift 
reaction to its changes; timely updating of a decision and of 
missions assigned to subunits; and the company (battalion) 
commander's ability to use the most effective work methods in a 
given situation and perform assigned missions within time 
periods ensuring preemption of the enemy in operations. In 
addition, great importance is attached to the ability of 
commanders at all levels in the company (battalion) to operate 
organic battalion communications equipment and conduct 
conversations briefly and using formatted documents. 
  Especially high efficiency is needed in the company 
(battalion) commander's work in organizing for battle in a short 
time and in the dynamics of battle, when it will be necessary to 
update a decision or organize anew. 
  For example, if company (battalion) subunits attack at a 
rate 
of 3-4 km/hr and a combat mission based on a new situation is 
communicated to them in 20 minutes, then during this time they 
will move forward 1 1.3 km, and may cover up to 2.6 km in 
pursuing the enemy at a rate of 8 km/hr. Therefore if a 
commander's reaction to the development of events is delayed, 
his orders (instructions) will be late and will not correspond 
to the actual situation. 
  A rapid situation estimate, timely decisionmaking and its 
timely communication to subunits are of decisive importance for 
maintaining C[.sup]2[/] efficiency. 
  Concealment of C[.sup]2[/] is achieved by 
following established rules and procedures for conversations 
over technical communications equipment; strictly fulfilling 
rules of secure C[.sup]2[/]; strictly complying with measures 
of maskirovka and of concealed placement of C[.sup]2[/] 
facilities; involving a strictly limited number of appointed 
persons for carrying out measures connected with preparation of 
battle and keeping the measures in strictest secrecy; using 
various ciphers and codes, tables of callsigns and signals, 
prearranged message codes and coded maps; prohibiting 
conversations in the clear; reliable maskirovka of COP's; and 
keeping all conversations concerning preparation and conduct of 
battle secret. 
  Concealment of C[.sup]2[/] was of great importance in 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits in past wars. Under present 
conditions it is given even greater attention in connection with 
the increased role of surprise of enemy operations, increased 
capabilities of enemy reconnaissance, and use of nuclear, 
precision and other kinds of weapons. Therefore keeping all 
measures connected with preparation and conduct of battle secret 
is a very important condition for concealment of C[.sup]2[/]. 
  Role of the commander and staff in C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits. It is common knowledge that the commander's 
decision is the basis of C[.sup]2[/]. The company (battalion) 
commander bears full personal responsibility for his subordinate 
subunits' combat readiness and preparation for battle, their 
proper employment and their successful performance of combat 
missions within prescribed time periods. In addition, he is 
responsible for political work, indoctrination, military 
discipline, psychological preparation and political attitude and 
morale of personnel. 
  The company (battalion) commander exercises C[.sup]2[/] of 
subordinate and attached subunits by issuing verbal operation 
orders and instructions and by commands and various prearranged 
signals. 
  The place and time of deployment of the company (battalion) 
COP and procedure for its displacement are specified in the 
order. 
  The company (battalion) COP should not lag behind or break 
away from subunits, especially in an attack at night and in the 
fog. The company (battalion) commander must observe the 
battlefield, receive timely situation reports and react 
immediately to situation changes. The battalion COP usually was 
disposed up to 300 m and that of the company up to 200 m from 
first echelon subunits in the attack, and up to 2 km and 800 m 
respectively in the defense. 
  When the battalion COP is disposed together with the COP of 
an attached artillery battalion, it may occupy an area up to 0.2 
hectares and vehicles are placed 30-50 m from each other. 
  For mutual recognition and for determining the affiliation 
and location of subunits, a recognition and identification point 
(post) [punkt (post) oboznacheniya] is assigned from a squad or 
crew specially trained for this purpose in each first echelon 
company (battalion) in direct contact with the enemy or 
conducting battle or reconnaissance in the enemy rear. 
  Subunits are located by activating visual and technical 
means 
of recognition from the recognition and identification point 
(post) at a command of the company (battalion) commander or 
battalion chief of staff in accordance with directions of the 
higher staff. 
  Usually no more than three persons, an NCO and two privates, 
are assigned to a company (battalion) recognition and 
identification point (post). It is supplied with observation 
devices (binoculars, stereoscopic telescopes) and a large-scale 
map or diagram of the terrain. In addition, a control log, 
compass, watch, flashlight, communications equipment (telephone 
or radio) and means of giving recognition, identification and 
warning signals are allocated for the point (post). Technical 
means of recognition and identification usually are set up near 
the battalion COP. 
  The point (post) makeup, location, observation sectors, and 
the recognition, identification and warning signals usually are 
indicated when a mission is assigned to a point (post). 
  C[.sup]2[/] of company (battalion) subunits in the course 
of conducting battle means above all the commander's continuous 
influence on the course of battle and direction of their efforts 
toward performing the assigned mission within prescribed time 
periods. 
  A battle is a two-sided process in which each side strives 
to 
achieve set objectives with forces and assets at its disposal. 
Therefore one should not get the idea that an attack that has 
begun, for example, will develop in full conformity with the 
outlined commander's concept. Enemy opposition by various means, 
by stubborn holding of strongpoints and lines and by 
counterattacks of reserves not only will hamper performance of 
assigned missions, but also fundamentally alter the situation 
and the nature of combat operations. 
  Depending on this, the need may arise for the company 
(battalion) commander to further detail the decision and update 
it in different stages of performing a combat mission. 
  The experience of the Great Patriotic War and field training 
exercises shows that in the course of battle the company 
(battalion) commander is required to have the ability to quickly 
collect data on the situation and on the nature of operations of 
enemy and friendly troops so as to immediately issue necessary 
instructions to subordinates. This is achieved by the company 
(battalion) commander constantly observing changes in the 
situation and assessing it. The extent to which this is 
important is apparent from the following example. In the course 
of artillery preparation of an assault in the Belorussian 
Operation (June 1944), B. Fedorov, commander of a rifle 
battalion of 61st Guards Rifle Regiment, 19th Guards Rifle 
Division, determined that the enemy had begun withdrawing from 
the first trench 30 minutes before preparation fire ended. He 
immediately reported this through channels. As a result the 
decision was updated, in accordance with which artillery fire 
was shifted into the depth and the battalion with tanks was 
committed into the fire corridor which formed. Such updating of 
the decision led to rapid capture of a crossing over the Luchesa 
River and performance of the assigned mission ahead of the 
prescribed time and with minimum losses.[.sup]1[/] 
  The commander must be on the most important axis and exert 
timely influence on the course of battle in its decisive moments 
in the course of an assault on the enemy defense, in repelling 
counterattacks, and in an enemy assault on a company strongpoint 
(defense area). 
  A battalion commander not only controls battalion subunits 
personally, but also through deputies and his staff. The 
battalion staff is the principal entity ensuring C[.sup]2[/] 
of battalion subunits. As a rule, the staff arranges all its 
work of organizing and preparing battle based on the battalion 
commander's decision and instructions, and also instructions of 
the regimental staff. 
  Such an entity in the company is the command group, which 
includes the deputy company commander for political affairs, 
senior technician (in his place in the TC is the deputy company 
commander for weapons), company first sergeant and medical party 
NCOIC. 
  The battalion chief of staff is the battalion commander's 
first deputy, and only he has the right to issue orders and 
instructions to subordinates on behalf of the battalion 
commander. He is fully responsible for organization and 
maintenance of continuous C[.sup]2[/] of subunits, their 
combat readiness, and combat support to battalion operations in 
all situation conditions. The battalion staff (and in the 
company the command group) organizes systematic collection and 
study of situation data; helps prepare necessary calculations 
and suggestions for the company (battalion) commander for 
employment of weapons, tactical employment of organic, attached 
and supporting subunits and for the decision as a whole; issues 
warning orders to platoons (companies) and plans battle in 
accordance with the commander's decision. In addition, by 
direction of the battalion commander the chief of staff 
communicates missions to subordinates, organizes reconnaissance 
and carries out other kinds of combat support. Special attention 
here is given to organizing communications with combat subunits 
and adjacent subunits and protecting communications against 
enemy ECM. 
  The battalion chief of staff is obligated to sign operation 
orders and instructions issued by the battalion commander to 
subunits and monitor their fulfillment. He must constantly keep 
an eye on the subunits' state of supply of everything necessary 
for fighting the battle, especially availability of ammunition, 
and promptly deliver it to subunits. 
  The battalion chief of staff must constantly organize 
reconnaissance both of the ground as well as the air enemy. To 
this end he is obligated to assign reconnaissance missions not 
only to the battalion reconnaissance platoon, but also to 
commanders of MRC's and separate platoons of the battalion, 
monitor their fulfillment, and through them communicate to 
subunits the methods and signals for recognition of friendly and 
enemy aircraft (helicopters). 
<H5>  3. Forces and Assets for C </H5>[.sup]2[/] of the Company and 
Battalion in Battle 
  Communications is organized in the company (battalion) in 
accordance with the commander's decision and with directions of 
the battalion (regimental) chief of staff. The company commander 
is responsible in the company and the battalion chief of staff 
is responsible in the battalion for the organization and status 
of communications. The battalion chief of communications (signal 
platoon commander) directly organizes communications and is 
responsible for its stable, precise operation. 
  There is a signal platoon to support C[.sup]2[/] in the 
MRB; it includes two control squads and a radio squad. 
  The signal platoon in a BMP-equipped battalion has 2 BMP-1K 
command vehicles and in a BTR-equipped battalion it has 2 
BTR-70K's. The radio squad is authorized 7 R-107M (R-159) 
radios, 15 R-157 (R-158) radios, a P-193M telephone switchboard, 
8 km of P-274 field telephone cable and 15 TA-57 telephones. 
  In addition, the headquarters platoon in a mortar battery 
has 
a signal squad with 4 R-107M (R-159) radios, 4 km of P-274 field 
telephone cable and 5 TA-57 telephones. 
  The TB signal platoon consists of the commander's tank, a 
control squad and a radio squad. 
  The battalion chief of staff's BMP-1K command vehicle is in 
the control squad. The radio squad has 3 R-159 (R-107M) radios, 
a P-193M telephone switchboard, 4 km of field cable and 5 TA-57 
telephones. The radio squad is accommodated in a BMP. 
  The BMP-1K command vehicle set has 2 R-123 radios, a TA-57 
telephone, R-124 tank intercom for five subscribers, ASh-4 
antenna, and combination whip antenna on an 11-meter mast. 
  The makeup of communications equipment in the BMP 
1K permits accomplishing the following: 

  -  telephone communications among officers and crew members 
within the vehicle; 
  -  radiotelephone communications on two VHF 
radio nets or links. 


    Two workstations for battalion staff officers are equipped 
in 
the vehicle. 
  The BTR-70K set has two R-123 radios and the R-124 tank 
intercom. 
  Communications equipment, other equipment and combat 
capabilities of the BTR- 70K are completely similar to the 
BMP-1K. 
  The commander's tank is equipped with R-123M and R-130M 
radios, R-124 tank intercom for four subscribers and ASh-4 
antenna. 
  Communications equipment of the battalion commander's tank 
supports telephone communications between commander and crew 
members within the tank, radio telephone communications over VHF 
and HF radio nets, and sound telegraph communications over the 
HF radio net. 
  Radios. The R-123M low-power VHF radio installed 
in BTR's, BMP's, tanks and maintenance vehicles is intended for 
supporting telephone communications among armored vehicles and 
control of subunits during battle. R-107M, R-157, R-158 and 
R-159 portable VHF radios serve to provide radiotelephone 
communications among subunits. 
  The R-130M low-power HF radio serves for telephone and sound 
telegraph communications. It is used in the TB for communicating 
with the regimental commander. 
  Wire communications equipment. The MRB has the P 
193M switchboard, P-274 field cable and TA-57 telephone sets. 
They are intended for setting up wire telephone communications 
at the battalion COP with subordinate subunits and for remote 
control of portable radios. 
  The P193M switchboard is intended for preparing a 
lowcapacity 
telephone exchange at the battalion COP. Switchboard capacity is 
10 numbers. Time for deploying the switchboard is 3-4 minutes. 
  Organization of C[.sup]3[/]. Radio, wire, 
mobile and signaling means of communications are employed in the 
company (battalion) for supporting C[.sup]2[/]. All 
C[.sup]2[/] activity of the company and battalion commander 
in battle is accomplished from the COP. 
  The company COP may include the company commander, deputy 
company commander for political affairs, senior technician (in 
the TC the deputy company commander for weapons), company first 
sergeant and medical party NCOIC. Technical equipment may 
include the company commander's BTR (BMP) or tank. A radio net 
is set up in each company made up of radios of all company 
fighting vehicles and radios of company and platoon commanders. 
Portable radios are used for maintaining communications when 
commanders are outside the fighting vehicles and for 
communicating with MRP's operating in dismounted formation. 
  In defensive battle, radios of attached tanks located in the 
company strongpoint may be included in the MRC radio net. Other 
subunits attached to the company also are included in this same 
radio net. 
  The commander of the artillery subunit attached to the 
company as a rule is with the company commander. During movement 
of COP's, communications between them is maintained by 
connecting the radio net of the commander of an attached or 
supporting subunit into the company commander's radio net. 
  Wire communications with the MRC (TC) usually is organized 
by 
the battalion commander in the defense, when the battalion is 
disposed at the halt, and in the assembly area [iskhodnyy rayon]. 
  Communications by mobile means in the company is used in all 
kinds of battle and also on the march and when disposed at the 
halt. Motor vehicles, BTR's, BMP's, foot messengers, and 
sometimes also tanks may be used as mobile means. 
  A group of couriers sent out from organic and attached 
subunits may be established in the company and sometimes also in 
the MRB; they usually are at the company (battalion) COP. 
  Communications signaling devices may be used in the company 
(battalion) in all kinds of battle for transmitting commands, 
reports, and warning, control and coordination signals. 
  Visual and audible means usually are used for giving 
signals. 
Signals must be simple, easy to memorize and permit sharp 
distinction of one signal from another. An observer with 
necessary means (binoculars, signal flags, pyrotechnic flares, 
flashlights, pointers and so on) is assigned in advance in each 
subunit for giving and receiving signals. All subunit personnel 
must know the warning signals. 
  Coordination communications between adjacent subunits in the 
battalion usually is organized from right to left and 
accomplished by wire and mobile means of the neighbor on the 
right. 
  The battalion COP includes the battalion commander, deputy 
battalion commander for political affairs, deputy battalion 
commander for weapons, chief of staff, deputy chief of staff and 
battalion chief of communications. 
  The battalion communications equipment at its COP usually is 
combined organizationally and technically into a communications 
center, which is considered one of the important elements of the 
battalion COP. It is intended for accomplishing reliable 
communications with the regimental command post (with the 
regimental commander and chief of staff) and with COP's of 
subordinate, attached, supporting and coordinating subunits. It 
usually includes a BMP-1K command vehicle, individual radios, a 
telephone exchange and a group of couriers. 
  The BMP-1K command vehicle is considered the basic element 
of 
the MRB (TB) COP communications center. 
  The telephone exchange is intended for providing 
communications over wire lines and remote control of radios. It 
consists of the P 193M switchboard and subscriber telephones. 
The switchboard usually is installed in the signal platoon BTR 
or a shelter. It includes cable lines laid from COP's of 
companies and attached subunits, the commander's BMP-1K and the 
battalion chief of staff's BTR, and also wire from the 
communications center of the regimental CP and the supporting 
(attached) artillery battalion. 
  As a rule, two radio nets are organized to provide reliable 
control of subordinate and attached subunits in the battalion: 
the battalion commander's net and chief of staff's net. 
  The battalion commander's radio net usually includes radios 
of the battalion commander and chief of staff and of commanders 
of MRC's, the mortar battery, support platoon and servicing and 
maintenance platoon. Radios of the commander of the ATP, 
reconnaissance platoon and GLP, and the BMP (BTR) radio net made 
up of R-123M (R-173) radios of all battalion BTR's (BMP's) also 
may be included in this net. Centralized control of companies, 
platoons and squads usually is accomplished over this radio net 
when making a march and fighting in BMP's (BTR's). 
  Radios of the reconnaissance patrol, if it is sent out, may 
be included in this radio net. 
  Control of tanks attached to the battalion is exercised over 
the radio net of the attached tanks. It usually includes the 
R-123 radio of the battalion commander and chief of staff. The 
commander of the artillery subunit attached to the battalion is 
at the battalion COP. When the COP is in movement, 
communications between them is maintained by including the 
artillery subunit commander in the battalion commander's radio 
net. 
  Communications with the regimental commander and staff is 
maintained over two radio nets: regimental commander's and chief 
of staff's. 
  Communications with the regimental rear control post and aid 
station is established over the rear radio net by having one of 
the battalion radios enter this net. 
  For C[.sup]2[/] in the defense, wire communications is 
organized between the battalion COP and COP's of subordinate 
subunits over cable lines run and serviced by signal platoon 
personnel. Wire communications lines are run to the MRC's 
(mortar battery) by links; communications with the ATP is 
maintained over a line run to the MRC or through the commander 
of the company with which they operate together in battle. 
  In the mortar battery a cable line is run from the COP to 
the 
battery firing position. 
  Features of organization of communications in the 
TB. The TB COP is approximately the very same in makeup as 
that of the MRB. Its communications center consists of the 
commander's tank, a command vehicle, individual radios, and 
sometimes also (in the defense) a team of couriers. In battle 
the TB commander controls subunits from the tank. The tank 
commander's R-130M radio is used for communicating with the 
regimental commander. The R- 123 radio usually is used for 
C[.sup]2[/] with subordinate subunits. 
  The BMP-1K command vehicle is the basic element of the 
communications center. Using the radios installed in it, 
communications is maintained with the regimental staff, with 
motorized rifle and artillery subunits operating together with 
it, and with the battalion's subordinate subunits. 
  The R-123M radio of the signal platoon BMP can be used for 
communicating with those radios not included in the radio net of 
the commander's tank or the BMP- 1K. 
  In organizing radio communications it is advisable to set up 
three radio nets in the battalion for continuous C[.sup]2[/] 
of subunits with any situation changes and with transition from 
one kind of battle to another. This will allow maintaining 
reliable communications both during battalion operations at full 
strength as well as during operations of TC's with MRB's. 
  When the TB is fighting at full strength, subunits are 
controlled over the battalion commander's radio net, which 
consists of radios of the battalion commander, chief of staff, 
and commanders of the TC's, platoons, line tanks, support 
platoon and servicing and maintenance platoon. 
  If TC's are attached to MRB's, the radios of all company 
tanks are switched into the radio net of the MRB commander and 
staff. The number of such radio nets may be according to the 
number of MRB's. 
  When a TB (less TC) is attached to an MRB, C[.sup]2[/] of 
them is exercised by the TB commander over his own radio net. 
  In addition, a technical observation post and a repair and 
recovery team are set up in the battalion and headed by the 
deputy battalion commander for weapons. The technical 
observation post usually is located together with the COP, and 
one of the communications center radios must be included in the 
regimental technical support radio net. Communications is 
accomplished over this radio net with the deputy regimental 
commander for weapons, with repair and recovery teams and with 
maintenance companies. Tanks and BMP's (BTR's) needing 
evacuation or technical assistance switch their radios into this 
same radio net. 
<H5>  4. Work of the Company (Battalion) Commander in Organizing </H5>
for Battle 
  The continuous development and upgrading of means of warfare 
inevitably leads to a change in the nature of battle and 
substantially affects the content and methodology of the work of 
the commander and staff to organize it. 
  The scope of tasks which a commander must perform in 
organizing for battle has grown considerably under present 
conditions, and time for performing this work has been reduced 
sharply at the same time. The time factor now has a deciding 
influence on all C[.sup]2[/] processes. While a battalion 
commander had several days to organize for battle in the Great 
Patriotic War, this work has to be done in a shorter time in 
modern war. 
  Making an advisable decision in a short time, when the 
commander assumes responsibility for the fate of the people 
entrusted to him, is a very important moment in his work. 
  The fact is that, like any other process in which a person 
takes part, the decisionmaking process has two sides--objective 
and subjective. 
  The objective side includes the combat mission and situation 
elements existing outside of our awareness and independent of 
our will and desire; the subjective side includes the commander, 
who possesses certain knowledge, experience and intellectual 
features. 
  In connection with the fact that something objective is 
reflected differently in the awareness of each person, a 
decision made by two commanders based on a study of one and the 
same situation elements also may differ in content. 
  A decision can be advisable only if the situation elements 
and other factors independent of the commander's will are 
grasped by him as precisely as possible. Therefore in order to 
make an advisable decision the commander must possess high 
command qualities and professional expertise, have detailed 
knowledge of the theory of modern combined arms battle and the 
organization and operating tactics of probable enemies, and be 
able to get his bearings quickly in a complicated, abruptly 
changing situation. 
  Those times have passed when a decision for battle could be 
made only on the basis of intuition and natural talent alone. 
Science, a scientific approach to military phenomena, precise 
calculations and substantiated conclusions now are the basis of 
military art. A correct decision is the result of the 
commander's painstaking mental work in studying situation 
conditions and his knowing to perfection military affairs and 
the laws and principles of conducting modern war. 
  At the same time, in order to be able to make a decision 
quickly and implement it boldly and firmly, in addition to 
knowledge a commander must possess such command qualities as 
decisiveness and determination, independence and high 
exactingness, bravery and purposefulness. 
  A commander without such qualities vacillates long and 
agonizingly in making a decision. He spends so much time on this 
that in the final account he is late in making a decision and, 
having made it but not having displayed proper determination and 
resolve, he cannot always achieve success even with superiority 
over the enemy. 
  Content and sequence of a company (battalion) 
commander's work of organizing for battle. Organization for 
battle includes a large set of measures taken by the commander 
and staff from the moment the combat mission is received until 
the moment subordinate commanders report subunit readiness to 
execute it. 
  The content and sequence of the company (battalion) 
commander's work of organizing for battle depend on the combat 
mission received, availability of time and situation conditions. 
  As a rule, the company (battalion) commander begins the work 
of organizing for battle on receiving an operation order 
(operational instructions, warning order) or after the battalion 
(regimental) commander has announced his decision for battle. 
  The battalion commander's work sequence may be as follows. 
On 
receiving a warning order (Fig. 2) he analyzes the mission; 
determines measures which must be taken immediately for swiftest 
preparation of subunits to perform the assigned mission; 
performs a time calculation (or approves a calculation offered 
by the chief of staff); orients his deputies on upcoming 
operations; issues directions to the chief of staff on preparing 
battalion subunits to perform the combat mission, on organizing 
reconnaissance, and on the time and procedure of work on the 
terrain; estimates the situation; determines his commander's 
concept and reports it to the senior commander (chief). Then he 
familiarizes his deputies with it, issues verbal warning orders 
to subunit commanders and gives instructions on organizing 
coordination, comprehensive support of battle, C[.sup]2[/] 
and political work. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-23A>      Fig. 2. Sequence of company (battalion) commander's work in organizing for battle on </FIG>


  On receiving the operation order the company (battalion) 
commander completes decisionmaking, performs ground 
reconnaissance, issues a verbal operation order and organizes 
coordination. Then he directs immediate preparation of subunits 
for battle and, within the prescribed time, reports company 
(battalion) readiness for performing the combat mission to the 
senior commander. 
  On receiving an operation order or operational instructions 
(Fig. 3), the work of the company (battalion) commander is done 
in the same sequence as on receiving a warning order, the only 
difference being that after the situation estimate, a decision 
is made to the full extent, which then is briefed to the senior 
chief (commander). After its approval the company (battalion) 
commander performs ground reconnaissance and issues the 
operation order. 
  The company (battalion) commander's work sequence also may 
be 
different depending on the situation and availability of time. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-24A>      Fig. 3. Sequence of battalion (company) commander's work in organizing for battle on receiving </FIG>


  Methodology of company (battalion) commander's 
decisionmaking for battle. The decision for battle is 
understood to mean a finally chosen plan of action of the 
commander for performing the assigned mission, which specifies 
in basic outlines the procedure for using available forces and 
assets in the upcoming battle. 
  The decision is a volitional act of the commander. It 
answers 
questions about what is to be done where, when, how, and by whom 
so as to perform the assigned mission with least expenditure of 
forces and assets. It contains important initial data for 
conducting all basic measures connected with organization for 
battle and with C[.sup]2[/] of subunits in the course of 
battle. 
  The content of the commander's decision for battle is 
spelled 
out by the "Boyevoy ustav Sukhoputnykh voysk" [Ground Troops 
Field Manual]. The company (battalion) commander makes the 
decision personally based on his analysis of the mission 
received and on a situation estimate. In the decision 
the company (battalion) commander specifies the commander's 
concept, combat missions for subunits, basic questions of 
coordination, and organization of C[.sup]2[/]. In addition, 
the decision may specify missions for kinds of support and for 
political work. 
  Decisionmaking is a very complex, important process in the 
commander's work requiring him to have not only a detailed 
knowledge of the theory and organization of modern combined arms 
battle and of combat capabilities of friendly and enemy troops, 
but also mastery of this work methodology developed by many 
years of experience of subunit commanders' activity and 
incorporated in the Manual. 
  As a rule, the company (battalion) commander performs the 
work of organizing for battle on the terrain. In those cases 
where the situation does not permit traveling onto the terrain 
(little time for organizing battle, open terrain), the company 
(battalion) commander performs this work from a terrain map 
(model). But even in this case he has to find time to travel out 
on the terrain to update missions for subordinates and organize 
coordination. 
  In all cases the commander must perform the work of 
organizing for battle so as to ensure continuous C[.sup]2[/] 
of subunits, timely decisionmaking and assignment of missions; a 
large part of the allotted time must be given to subordinate 
subunits for preparation and performance of the mission. 
  Analysis of the mission begins the company 
(battalion) commander's decisionmaking work. Company (battalion) 
efforts can be directed properly toward performing the combat 
mission only on condition that the commander has a clear picture 
of the goal of upcoming operations, the senior commander's 
concept, his own mission, his place in the battle formation and 
the role of his company (battalion) in performing the senior 
chief's mission. 
  In modern war knowing the senior commander's concept also is 
necessary to ensure greater independence in the company 
(battalion) commander's actions when communications with the 
battalion (regimental) commander is lost. By knowing the senior 
chief's concept the company (battalion) commander will be able 
to assume control if necessary. He can learn the content of the 
concept from the senior commander's order (operational 
instructions). 
  On receiving a mission personally from the battalion 
(regimental) commander, the company (battalion) commander 
usually analyzes it on the spot and while returning to his own 
COP (to the battalion staff). 
  Correctly understanding the senior chief's concept means 
firmly learning what enemy he intends to rout where and in what 
sequence; where he is delivering the main attack (concentrating 
main efforts); how he is exploiting results of nuclear and 
precision weapon strikes delivered by the senior commander, and 
how he is using conventional weapons, especially on the axis of 
company (battalion) operations; what kind of grouping of forces 
and assets the senior commander is establishing; and what kind 
of maneuver he envisages executing in the course of battle. 
  The role of the company (battalion) is determined by the 
nature and degree of its involvement in performing the mission 
assigned to the senior commander. Therefore in order to 
correctly understand the role of the company (battalion) in 
performing the mission assigned to the battalion (regiment), it 
is necessary to firmly learn the content of the company 
(battalion) combat mission, as part of what element of the 
battalion (regimental) battle formation it is fighting, what 
enemy grouping it must rout and what line to take (what 
strongpoint to hold), the depth of the combat mission, how much 
time is allotted for performing the combat mission, and 
readiness time. 
  Based on an analysis of the combat mission, the company 
(battalion) commander draws conclusions in which he determines 
the axis for concentrating main efforts (if not specified by the 
senior chief), combat missions for subunits, nature of the 
maneuver, alignment of the battle formation, rate of advance and 
other matters. In addition, the commander determines measures 
which must be taken immediately for preparing the company 
(battalion) and the calculation of time for organizing for 
battle. 
  Having analyzed the mission and drawn appropriate 
conclusions, the company (battalion) commander can 
determine measures which must be taken immediately. 
They can be divided into two groups: on preparing company 
(battalion) subunits for performing the combat mission and on 
the work of deputies (the staff) connected with decisionmaking 
and preparation for battle. The first group usually includes 
measures concerned with preparing vehicles and personnel, 
replenishing supplies, evacuating sick and wounded, taking 
immediate measures for protecting subunits against mass 
destruction weapons, providing replacements for subunits, 
repairing vehicles and weapons and so on. 
  The second group can include measures on organization of 
reconnaissance, on preparation of data for decisionmaking, on 
the time and procedure of work on the terrain and so on. 
  The time calculation is one of the most important 
conclusions made from analyzing the combat mission. The company 
(battalion) commander usually performs the calculation of time 
for organizing for battle himself. The following are initial 
data for calculating time for organizing for battle: time of 
receipt of the combat mission and company (battalion) readiness 
for executing it; time of briefing the decision to the senior 
commander; time periods for the commander's participation in 
measures conducted by the senior commander in organizing for 
battle on the terrain. 
  In performing the time calculation the company (battalion) 
commander first determines the presence of overall time 
available for preparing for battle and determines the length of 
daylight. Then he determines the following: how much time 
(including daylight) to give subordinate commanders for 
organizing for battle and to allot to himself for 
decisionmaking, assigning combat missions, performing ground 
reconnaissance, updating the decision, issuing the operation 
order, listening to and approving subordinate commanders' 
decisions, and organizing coordination; in what time periods to 
prepare subunits for performing the mission and to give them 
necessary assistance; and when to report readiness for 
performance of the combat mission to the senior chief. 
  In calculating time, its bulk should be given to 
subordinates. 
  Situation estimate. The situation estimate is 
understood to mean the aggregate of all objective conditions in 
which a company (battalion) has to perform the combat mission. 
In this stage conditions of the assigned combat mission usually 
are studied and factors are identified which will facilitate or 
hamper its performance. In other words, the situation estimate 
is where the commander comes to understand objective conditions 
of upcoming battle and finds the most correct ways of taking 
advantage of these conditions for successful performance of the 
assigned mission. 
  The enemy, friendly troops, adjacent subunits, terrain, and 
the NBC situation usually are elements of the situation 
estimate. In addition, the state of weather, time of year and 
day and their effect on preparing and conducting battle are 
taken into account. 
  The situation elements enumerated above have a varying 
effect 
in deciding one and the same question. In connection with this 
the conclusions at which a commander arrives as a result of 
their estimate also are not only different, but even 
contradictory. The greatest influence will be exerted in one 
instance by the status or position of enemy troops, in another 
instance by the status and position of friendly troops, in a 
third instance by features of the combat operations area, and in 
a fourth instance by time of year or day, visibility conditions 
and so on. But the enemy is the most important and dynamic 
situation element of all. He is the objective of combat effect. 
Actions of friendly troops largely depend on his actions. 
Therefore it is recommended that a situation estimate begin with 
an estimate of the enemy. 
  Enemy estimate. Destruction of the enemy in the 
attack (defense) frontage is the content of the company 
(battalion) combat mission. Success in accomplishing it 
naturally depends fully on a correct understanding of this 
enemy's makeup, position, intentions and capabilities. 
  The battalion commander estimates the enemy on the axis of 
attack of the battalion and adjacent subunits to the depth of 
disposition of the enemy brigade, and in greatest detail to the 
depth of the battalion combat mission. The company commander 
estimates the enemy to the depth of the battalion defense and in 
greater detail to the depth of the company combat mission. In 
the defense he estimates that enemy grouping which may launch an 
attack on the axis of company (battalion) defense and on the 
flanks. 
  As a rule, data on the enemy always will be insufficient and 
some may be unreliable, contradictory, obsolete and even false. 
But the company (battalion) commander must be able to compare 
available information on the enemy, take into account his 
tactics, troop organization, and possible nature of actions, and 
draw correct conclusions on the basis of this. 
  It is recommended that the enemy estimate be conducted in 
the 
following sequence: initially study and analyze the general 
nature of operations and the position, makeup, status and degree 
of protection of the enemy grouping in the zone of advance (in 
the defense sector) of the battalion (regiment); then estimate 
that part of his grouping which must be routed in performing the 
assigned mission, i.e., in the company (battalion) attack 
frontage; finally, relying on a knowledge of enemy tactics and 
knowing the degree of protection and the system of 
fortifications, fire and obstacles and having determined the 
enemy's strong and weak points, the commander uncovers the 
probable nature (concept) of his operations as the company 
(battalion) performs the mission. 
  The company (battalion) commander draws conclusions based on 
a detailed, comprehensive analysis of the enemy and the probable 
nature of his operations: what enemy is ahead of the company 
(battalion) and the probable nature of his operations; where the 
main body of the enemy grouping is whose destruction will 
sharply degrade his combat capabilities; the enemy's strong and 
weak points. 
  These conclusions enable the company (battalion) commander 
to 
determine the axis for concentrating main efforts (terrain 
sectors on whose holding the stability of the defense depends); 
what enemy to rout by what method and in what sequence; 
procedure for engaging the enemy by fire of organic and attached 
weapons; company (battalion) battle formation; combat missions 
for subunits; principal questions of coordination and the 
procedure for comprehensive support of battle; and on what to 
perform final reconnaissance and by what time. 
  In addition, the commander determines tasks for political 
work based on the enemy estimate. 
  The company (battalion) commander formalizes results of the 
enemy estimate on his working map. On it are plotted the 
position of mechanized infantry and tank subunits down to 
platoon (platoon strongpoints), artillery firing positions, 
command posts and other elements of the enemy battle formation 
and also possible directions and lines of counterattacks and 
commitment of follow- on forces in the defense, makeup and time 
periods for moving to them, and locations of radars, individual 
weapons and AT weapons (tanks, ATGM's, machineguns and so on). 
  Estimate of friendly subunits. Friendly subunits 
are understood to mean organic, attached and supporting subunits. 
  Like that of the enemy, a correct estimate of friendly 
troops 
is of great importance for decisionmaking, since its primary 
purpose is to determine combat capabilities of organic and 
attached company (battalion) subunits, determine their political 
attitude and morale, and find the best ways of using them to 
perform the assigned mission. 
  The company (battalion) commander as a rule will have 
exhaustive data on his own subunits. 
  According to requirements of manuals, in estimating friendly 
troops the company (battalion) commander studies the makeup, 
position, status, capabilities, degree of protection and state 
of supply of his own, attached and supporting subunits. 
  The company (battalion) commander draws individual 
conclusions in studying each element of the estimate of friendly 
subunits. For example, in studying the strength level, the 
battalion commander concludes that one of the companies suffered 
the greatest losses in battle and must be brought up to strength 
or moved to the second echelon. 
  The company (battalion) commander usually estimates friendly 
troops in the following sequence: initially he analyzes the 
position of organic and attached subunits, then studies their 
makeup and finally determines their combat capabilities for 
performing upcoming missions. 
  In estimating the position of friendly troops the company 
(battalion) commander studies the position of company 
(battalion) subunits with respect to the enemy and the nature of 
their actions (attacking, defending, located in an area, on the 
march); distance of subunits from the planned line of departure 
(defense area) and time needed for their forward movement; 
location, nature of actions, and time and areas of arrival of 
attached subunits, and time for changing the areas (positions) 
they occupy. 
  In the process of estimating the makeup and status of 
friendly subunits the commander analyzes the table of 
organization structure of the company (battalion), whether or 
not all organic subunits are present and, if not, where they are 
now and when they will arrive; makeup of attached subunits; 
political attitude, morale and physical condition of personnel 
and the condition of weapons and combat vehicles; training level 
and combat experience of subunits; and organizing abilities of 
subunit commanders. 
  In estimating the state of supply of friendly troops the 
commander determines the company (battalion) state of supply of 
material resources and time periods for establishing their 
reserves in subunits; norms of expenditure of material resources 
and requirements for them for performing the combat mission; 
organization of delivery and evacuation; and technical and 
logistic support. 
  In estimating combat capabilities of friendly subunits the 
company (battalion) commander determines artillery capabilities 
for engaging enemy objectives from indirect firing positions and 
for destroying tanks, ATGM's and other weapons; capabilities of 
air defense weapons for combating airborne targets; and 
capabilities of motorized rifle and tank subunits for 
establishing a superiority over the enemy in penetrating his 
defense (repelling assaults ahead of the FEBA). 
  Based on the estimate of the enemy and friendly troops, the 
company (battalion) commander performs a 
quantitative-qualitative analysis of their makeup, political 
attitude, morale and combat capabilities, and with consideration 
of this determines the absolute and quantitative-qualitative 
status of the sides' forces. 
  A comprehensive estimate of friendly troops permits the 
company (battalion) commander to draw conclusions about the 
general status, degree of protection and combat effectiveness of 
subordinate subunits; whether or not their position conforms to 
the nature of the combat mission received, whether or not a 
regrouping is necessary and time required for this; where to 
concentrate main company (battalion) efforts; how to align the 
battle formation and distribute forces and assets; what combat 
missions to assign subunits based on their capabilities; what 
main questions of organizing coordination and of comprehensive 
support of battle to plan; and how to organize C[.sup]2[/]. 
  Estimate of adjacent subunits. Adjacent subunits 
customarily are understood to mean subunits operating on flanks 
(on the right, on the left) and in front, or which are in the 
rear, but operate on the company (battalion) axis in the course 
of battle. 
  The main goal of estimating adjacent subunits is to 
determine 
their influence on company (battalion) performance of the 
assigned mission and to detail the procedure for joint 
operations with them to rout the enemy. 
  In estimating adjacent subunits the company (battalion) 
commander studies the makeup, position, and nature of actions of 
adjacent subunits and conditions of coordination with them. In 
estimating the nature of their actions the commander determines 
what they are doing as of the moment he makes the decision for 
battle and what maneuver they will execute in preparing to 
perform assigned combat missions. 
  In estimating conditions of coordination with adjacent 
subunits the commander determines how those subunits will 
contribute to routing the enemy; what assistance must be given 
them in performing combat missions; what maneuver of forces and 
assets to execute to exploit possible success of adjacent 
subunits; what measures to take to secure flanks; and what 
procedure of coordination with adjacent subunits to provide for 
in routing the enemy. 
  The company (battalion) commander can draw the following 
conclusions from the estimate of adjacent subunits: how actions 
of adjacent subunits influence performance of missions; where it 
is advisable to concentrate main efforts and what enemy must be 
routed in coordination with adjacent subunits; what enemy 
targets (objectives) to engage by company (battalion) weapons on 
flanks with adjacent subunits; alignment of the battle 
formation; with which adjacent subunits coordination should be 
organized most closely in routing which enemy and on what 
questions; what assistance to give adjacent subunits in joint 
destruction of the enemy; what maneuver of forces and assets to 
provide for to exploit possible success of adjacent subunits; 
what data must be additionally received from adjacent subunits 
and what questions must be coordinated in the interests of 
maintaining coordination and communications with them in the 
course of battle; how to support commitment of the second 
echelon and coordinate actions with it; and the procedure for 
passing company (battalion) subunits through battle formations 
of subunits operating in front. 
  Terrain estimate. The company (battalion) 
commander studies the terrain to determine its influence on 
combat employment of friendly and enemy troops. As a result of 
its study he determines the extent to which terrain helps the 
enemy organize and conduct a defense and helps our attack. 
  In estimating the situation it is necessary to study the 
nature of terrain and its influence on subunit operations and 
also to study the most likely axes of operations of enemy 
aircraft and helicopters and other airborne targets flying at 
low and extremely low altitudes. 
  The following methodology for studying terrain has been 
developed in troop practice. Initially terrain is estimated in 
the enemy disposition, then in the friendly troop disposition. 
Before beginning the terrain estimate the company (battalion) 
commander carefully studies changes which occurred on the 
terrain compared with the map as a result of the opposing sides' 
use of nuclear weapons. 
  Then the terrain usually is estimated in the following 
sequence: general nature of terrain; conditions for observation, 
fire, maskirovka and disposition; conditions of trafficability 
and protective features; and changes which may occur as a result 
of the use of nuclear weapons and in the course of battle. 
  In studying the general nature of terrain the battalion 
commander identifies the following: type of relief, local 
features, hydrography, and degree of ruggedness and 
observability; favorable lines for enemy defense and lines whose 
taking creates conditions for successful development of the 
attack by our troops. 
  In estimating conditions of observation, fire, maskirovka 
and 
disposition the company (battalion) commander determines the 
following: commanding heights and other places for observation; 
natural screens, cover, and favorable areas for disposing 
elements of the battle formation, C[.sup]2[/] facilities and 
rear subunits; favorable lines for deployment, departure, 
repulse (delivery) of counterattacks, and remote minelaying; 
conditions of maskirovka; probable axes of operations of enemy 
aircraft, helicopters and other airborne targets at low and 
extremely low altitudes, and so on. 
  In studying trafficability conditions and protective 
features 
of terrain, the commander determines the following: presence and 
status of roads and maneuver, supply and evacuation routes; 
nature of soil and off-road terrain passability; nature of 
natural obstacles; presence of water obstacles and engineering 
structures on them whose destruction can hamper operations of 
company (battalion) subunits, and so on. 
  In studying the terrain the commander forecasts changes 
which 
may occur as a result of the use of nuclear and incendiary 
weapons, destruction of dams, fires, flooding, torrential rains, 
snowstorms and so on. 
  As a result of the terrain estimate the company (battalion) 
commander determines the following: how the terrain influences 
employment of different combat arms and performance of the 
combat mission; most accessible axes for operations of friendly 
and enemy troops and where, based on this, it would be advisable 
to concentrate main efforts (and on the defense in addition, he 
determines terrain areas on whose holding stability of the 
defense depends); enemy objectives for engagement by fire of 
conventional weapons (artillery from indirect firing positions, 
tanks, ATGM's, AT weapons, grenade launchers and machineguns); 
how to align the battle formation and where to place its 
elements, support subunits and COP, and the direction of COP 
displacement; lines of immediate and subsequent missions of 
subunits (in the defense, locations of company and platoon 
strongpoints); second echelon commitment lines (in the defense, 
lines of firing positions, axes and lines of deployment for 
counterattacks); and sectors for forcing water obstacles. He 
also draws conclusions relating to questions of coordination, 
comprehensive support of battle and organization of political 
work. 
  NBC situation estimate. The NBC situation is 
understood to mean the situation which has arisen with use of 
mass destruction weapons as a result of contamination of 
terrain, air, personnel, equipment and various installations by 
radioactive substances, chemical agents and bacteriological 
warfare agents. The NBC situation estimate is made to identify 
its effect on subunits' combat effectiveness and determine 
advisable directions and methods of their operations, and to 
outline basic measures for protecting personnel against mass 
destruction weapons. 
  The NBC situation estimate is made on the basis of 
reconnaissance, forecasting and radiological monitoring data. 
Results of a forecast of the radiological and chemical situation 
in the area of operations usually are announced to the battalion 
commander by the regimental staff. 
  In estimating the scale and nature of NBC contamination of 
terrain, the company (battalion) commander determines the 
following: kinds, time, method and means of contamination of the 
company (battalion) disposition area and axis of attack; 
boundaries and nature of zones of radioactive contamination and 
how they can change by the beginning of company (battalion) 
subunit operations in them; type of chemical agents, boundaries 
of areas, duration of contamination, and depth of spread of 
contaminated air; kind of contagious disease pathogens; 
boundaries of contaminated areas; what subunits have entered 
(will enter) the zone of contamination and destructive damage; 
and levels of contamination. 
  In estimating the nature of the effect of contamination on 
company (battalion) subunits and possible consequences, the 
commander determines the following: possible radiation doses of 
personnel from radioactive substances (counting those received 
previously); possible degree of personnel injury by chemical and 
bacterial warfare agents; degree of contamination of 
communications equipment, weapons, supplies and water; possible 
personnel losses from contamination; and the need for performing 
decontamination (partial and complete). 
  As a result of the NBC situation estimate the company 
(battalion) commander usually draws the following conclusions: 
how the NBC situation can affect subunits' combat effectiveness 
and performance of the combat mission; measures for mopping up 
in the aftermath of enemy use of mass destruction weapons and 
for restoring subunit combat effectiveness; what instructions on 
protection must be issued in the given situation and to whom; 
the safest axis (area) for subunit operations and, in connection 
with this, where it is advisable to specify the axis for 
concentrating main efforts (in the defense in addition, also 
terrain sectors on whose holding stability of the defense 
depends); what enemy to rout, by what method and in what 
sequence based on the existing NBC situation; procedure for 
engaging the enemy by fire of organic and attached weapons; what 
battle formation to have and where to place it; and combat 
missions of subunits. He also outlines the main questions of 
coordination and the procedure for comprehensive support of 
battle, and determines organization of C[.sup]2[/], the 
method of crossing a contaminated area and tasks for political 
work. 
  In addition, in the situation estimate the company 
(battalion) commander takes into account the state of weather 
and time of year and day, since these factors have a very great 
influence on troop combat operations, especially with an abrupt 
change of weather, without knowledge and consideration of which 
it is impossible to make a substantiated decision. 
  Making the decision. The essence of the company 
(battalion) commander's work in this stage of decisionmaking 
consists of comparing conclusions drawn from individual elements 
(questions) of the decision (in the course of analyzing the 
mission, estimating the situation and making tactical 
calculations) for the purpose of final determination and 
formulation of component elements of the decision. The decision 
should not only conform to the real situation, but also contain 
elements of creativeness, aggressiveness, reasonable risk and 
use of operating methods unknown to the enemy, i.e., everything 
that ensures routing the enemy with a minimum expenditure of 
forces and in the shortest possible time. 
  The company (battalion) commander usually begins making and 
formulating the decision by determining the commander's concept. 
In the course of analyzing the mission and estimating the 
situation, he draws appropriate conclusions for each element of 
the commander's concept. Conclusions drawn from analyzing the 
mission and estimating the situation may be identical for some 
elements of the concept. Consequently, the commander could 
determine these elements of the concept once and for all back in 
the process of estimating the situation. Conclusions may be 
contradictory for other elements of the concept. For final 
determination of these elements the commander needs to compare 
the conclusions he drew previously and choose the most advisable 
one. 
  Thus, final determination of all or some elements of the 
decision is the concluding stage of the commander's work of 
decisionmaking. 
  Formalization of the decision. As the decision is 
made, the battalion commander together with the chief of staff 
(and the company commander independently) plots everything on 
the map that can be depicted graphically. As a rule, the 
following is plotted on the map: enemy battle formation; axis 
for concentrating main efforts (in the defense in addition, 
terrain sectors on whose holding the stability of the defense 
depends); company (battalion) missions, missions of adjacent 
subunits and boundary with them, and weapon missions to be 
performed by forces and assets of senior chiefs; missions of 
subordinate subunits and the methods and time periods for their 
performance; COP locations of battalion and companies and 
directions of their displacement. In addition, basic questions 
of coordination, C[.sup]2[/] and support of battle are 
reflected on the map. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-30A>      Figure </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-31A>      Figure </FIG>


  In addition to the graphic part, tables are drawn up on the 
working map which may show means of reinforcement, distribution 
and ratio of forces and assets, their densities and other 
matters. 
  Thus, by the moment decisionmaking work is done the 
commander 
has a plan of company (battalion) actions which has formed in 
his mind once and for all and is graphically displayed on the 
map. Now he can brief his decision to the senior commander, 
announce it to deputies and staff officers (subordinate 
commanders), and perform ground reconnaissance, issue the 
operation order and organize coordination. 
  Assignment of combat missions to subordinates is 
done by various methods depending on specific situation 
conditions. If sufficient time is available the company 
(battalion) commander issues a verbal operation order. Combat 
missions as a rule are communicated by verbal operational 
instructions or warning orders in organizing for battle in a 
short time, especially in the course of battle. 
  The battalion commander's verbal operation order must be 
entered in a workbook by the battalion chief of staff or his 
deputy. The order is not duplicated. 
  In operational instructions the company 
(battalion) commander indicates the following: conclusions from 
the enemy estimate; objectives to be engaged by the senior 
commander's weapons in support of the platoon (company); the 
combat mission and readiness time for executing it. If necessary 
the operational instructions may indicate missions of adjacent 
subunits and other data. 
  In a warning order the company (battalion) 
commander usually indicates the following: information on the 
enemy; objectives to be engaged by the senior commander's 
weapons in support of the platoon (company); the combat mission 
with a degree of detailing corresponding to the decision made by 
the senior commander as of the time the warning order was 
issued; readiness time and basic measures of preparing for 
battle; time and methods of communicating missions, and other 
data. 
  Organization of coordination is an important 
measure taken by the company (battalion) commander in organizing 
for battle. Coordination is organized by missions, time, place 
and possible options of operations. 
  The company (battalion) commander organizes coordination 
with 
the participation of his deputies and the commanders of platoons 
(companies) and attached subunits. As a rule, it is organized on 
the terrain to the depth of visibility, or on a terrain model 
(map) to the full depth of the combat mission received. 
  Coordination may be organized by two methods: by the method 
of reports by subordinate subunit commanders on the procedure 
for their subunits' operations in performing assigned missions, 
with a run-through of the main tactical episodes; and by the 
method of commander's instructions. This method usually is used 
when battle is being organized in an extremely limited time. 
  In organizing coordination the company (battalion) commander 
has to coordinate efforts of organic, attached and supporting 
subunits in performing the assigned mission; achieve uniform 
understanding by all commanders of the goal of battle, combat 
missions and methods of their performance; and outline and 
coordinate options of subunit operations and measures for 
deceiving the enemy which take account of the possible nature of 
enemy operations. The company (battalion) commander also is 
obligated to indicate warning, control, coordination, mutual 
recognition and target designation signals. During battle 
coordination is accomplished continuously, is constantly 
updated, and is organized anew with abrupt situation changes and 
when a new decision is being made. 
  In organizing C[.sup]2[/], the company 
(battalion) commander indicates the following: places and time 
of deployment of COP's of the company (battalion) and attached 
subunits and the procedure for their displacement in the course 
of battle; procedure for maintaining communications and radio 
traffic, and methods and time periods for submitting reports; 
degree of engineer preparation of COP's and procedure for their 
security. 
Footnotes 
  1. See N. Alekseyev, "Oskolkom oborvannaya zhizn" [A Life 
Cut 
Short by a Fragment], Moscow, Politizdat, 1978, pp 72-74. 
<H5>  Chapter IV - The Defense </H5>
<H5>  1. Principles of Defensive Battle </H5>
  As one of the basic kinds of battle, the defense arose 
simultaneously with the offense. Upgrading of existing weapons 
and appearance of new ones, a change of troop organization, and 
defenders' use of new means of warfare increase subunit combat 
capabilities, give the defense new features, make it more stable 
and active, and change the kinds of defense and methods of 
operations of subunits and units. On the other hand, an 
attacking enemy also uses modern weapons and combat vehicles 
permitting him to deliver powerful, precise strikes to a 
considerable depth and create breaches in the defense in a short 
time. In developing new and upgrading existing methods of 
attack, the enemy pays special attention to achieving surprise, 
creating a decisive superiority in forces and assets, and 
delivering massed strikes. Reliance is placed above all on 
precision weapon systems, by which it is proposed to inflict 
damage on defending subunits and units in a short time to the 
full depth of their battle formation. For timely exploitation of 
results of fire damage, the enemy envisages decisive operations 
of attacking subunits and units from the front in combination 
with wide use of aviation, airborne assault forces and EW assets. 
  Under present conditions defenders will have to repel 
assaults of an enemy who has a superiority of 5-6 times in 
personnel and combat vehicles. As a result, the defense must 
successfully withstand a powerful enemy attack and support the 
repulse of massed air and precision weapon strikes and the 
assaults of his tanks and mechanized infantry. 
  A defense may be occupied on a deliberate or forced basis to 
perform these missions. Subunits or units shift to the defense 
deliberately when more active (offensive), decisive operations 
are inadvisable, and on a forced basis as a result of a 
situation that has shaped up unfavorably. In addition, it may be 
prepared in advance before the beginning of combat operations or 
organized in the course of battle. At the beginning of a war the 
defense will be the most prevalent kind of battle. 
  Inasmuch as defenders are inferior to the attacking enemy in 
forces and assets, the possibility of repelling his attack 
largely is determined by the ability of subunit and unit 
commanders to take advantage of strong aspects of the defense. 
  Defending subunits above all must skillfully use the 
terrain's protective features, since they choose the place of 
battle. For this it is important that positions, trenches and 
strongpoints be disposed where possible behind natural barriers, 
on slopes, on commanding heights and in other terrain sectors 
affording a good field of view and fire toward the enemy to 
maximum range of their weapons. Natural barriers in themselves 
hamper operations not only of mechanized infantry, but also of 
tanks. 
  Occupation of lines favorable for defense, use of the 
terrain's protective features and its skillful engineer 
preparation also considerably reduce the effectiveness of enemy 
employment of nuclear and conventional weapons, including 
precision weapons. For example, just the simplest foxholes 
reduce subunit losses from nuclear weapons by approximately 
three times, and losses from artillery fire by seven or more 
times. 
  Weapons possess comparatively greater capabilities in the 
defense than in the offense. For example, in the war years 
neutralizing an enemy battalion attacking in dismounted 
formation and inflicting 20-30 percent losses on it (forcing it 
to give up the attack) required using three artillery battalions 
and expending 0.3-0.4 unit of fire, but inflicting the very same 
losses on a battalion in the defense with engineer preparation 
required at least nine artillery battalions and their 
expenditure of the entire unit of fire. 
  Having modern weapons, defending subunits and units are 
capable of delivering preemptive strikes against the most 
important enemy objectives in concentration areas, on routes of 
advance and on lines of deployment for an assault. This permits 
inflicting considerable losses on him even before he arrives at 
the FEBA and deprives him of an opportunity for a simultaneous 
assault. 
  The possibility of wide, advance use of various obstacles, 
especially minefields, is an important advantage of defenders 
over attackers. They permit holding up or reducing the rate of 
forward movement, deployment and assault of tanks, IFV's and 
APC's and thereby increasing the effectiveness both of AT 
weapons as well as of artillery fire by several times. In 
addition, in crossing minefields the enemy will suffer losses 
not only in vehicles, but also in personnel. 
  Subunit maskirovka capabilities increase in the defense. By 
concealing the true and showing a false trace of trenches and 
the location of strongpoints, firing and other positions, and 
COP's, subunits force the enemy to deliver strikes against empty 
places or secondary objectives and expend a considerable number 
of artillery and mortar rounds and missiles. 
  Being on defense, subunit and unit personnel can study the 
terrain in detail, create a system of trenches, strongpoints and 
firing positions both at the first position as well as in the 
depth, and thoroughly organize fire. Commanders can provide for 
the maneuver of forces and assets, prepare routes of advance for 
counterattacks and lines of firing positions, create a flexible 
C[.sup]2[/] system, supply subunits with an additional amount 
of ammunition, and carry out maskirovka measures. Thus, 
defending subunits are capable of destroying a comparatively 
large amount of enemy personnel, tanks and other armored 
vehicles and repelling his assaults with fewer forces. 
  The principal goal of the defense is to repel an attack by 
superior enemy forces, inflict maximum losses in personnel, 
weapons and vehicles, hold important terrain areas (objectives) 
and thereby create favorable conditions for launching an attack. 
  Ways of achieving the goal of defense can be as 
follows. 
  First of all, by engaging above all the main enemy 
grouping by fire of all weapons (combat helicopters, artillery, 
mortars, tanks, BMP's, small arms) both during forward movement, 
deployment and the assault on the FEBA as well as when he 
penetrates into the depth of the defense. 
  Thus, a battalion can engage the enemy by mortar fire 5-6 km 
from the FEBA and conduct a successful fight against armored 
vehicles at distances of 3 km from the FEBA by the fire of 
tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and ATGM's. 
  Secondly, the goal of the defense is achieved by a 
broad maneuver of fire, forces and assets. War experience showed 
that the defender countered an attack by an enemy of superior 
strength not only by stubborn resistance at occupied positions, 
but also by a broad maneuver of fire, forces and assets. 
  For example, in the Battle of Kursk on 7 July 1943 the 
Germans concentrated up to two infantry battalions and six tanks 
for the next assault in front of the center of the sector of 
151st Rifle Regiment, 8th Rifle Division. Executing a maneuver 
of trajectories, subunits of 476th Mortar Regiment and a guards 
rocket launcher battalion disrupted the enemy's intentions with 
massed fire and his assault did not take place.[.sup]1[/] 
  Thirdly, the goal of the defense is achieved by 
firmly holding important terrain areas, among which are areas 
which include tactically favorable sectors with natural barriers 
intercepting probable axes of enemy attack. Without a tenacious 
defense of such areas it is impossible to ensure effective fire 
against the enemy and execution of a bold, swift maneuver. 
Meanwhile, holding such terrain sectors permits immobilizing the 
attacker and creating favorable conditions for engaging the 
enemy by fire of all weapons and destroying him by a 
counterattack. 
  And fourthly and finally, the goal of the defense 
is achieved by skillful destruction of an enemy who has wedged 
into its depth. 
  Based on this, the essence of the defense lies in repelling 
the attack of superior enemy forces by inflicting damage on him 
by air strikes and fire of all weapons, with wide use of 
obstacles ahead of the FEBA and in the depth in combination with 
a maneuver of fire, forces and assets and decisive 
counterattacks, with the simultaneous tenacious holding of 
important (key) positions and terrain areas, thereby creating 
favorable conditions for launching an attack. 
  Subunits may shift to the defense under different situation 
conditions. The latter should be understood to mean the 
aggregate of factors of the combat situation in which the 
defense is prepared and a transition is made to it. Such factors 
are the position, the status and nature of terrain, time of year 
and day, state of weather and so on. 
  The position of subunits with respect to the enemy is a 
deciding condition for shifting to the defense. Depending on 
this and the mission received, a company (battalion) may shift 
to the defense in advance before the beginning of combat 
operations or the shift may be organized in the course of 
battle, out of contact with the enemy or in direct contact with 
him. An advance shift of subunits to the defense may be carried 
out both in peacetime as well as wartime. A shift to the defense 
in peacetime will be accomplished to cover border areas and 
repel an enemy invasion. 
  For example, subunits of 715th Rifle Regiment, 122nd Rifle 
Division shifted to the defense to cover our country's northern 
border in one of its sectors. They cut two roads leading from 
Kotala and KelloselkÆa to Kuola-Yarvi several days before 
the 
beginning of the war.[.sup]2[/] This permitted completing 
construction of the main defensive zone by the beginning of the 
enemy attack. 
  An advance shift to the defense in the course of war may 
occur where an attack is inadvisable or impossible for a number 
of reasons and situation conditions (on secondary and 
hard-to-reach axes, on a seacoast, on islands and in other 
cases). Under the given conditions subunits shift to a defense 
out of direct contact with the enemy. Subunits which are part of 
followon forces of units and formations in the deep rear of 
defending troops also may shift to the defense out of contact 
with him. 
  Under such conditions in particular subunits of 1075th Rifle 
Regiment, 316th Rifle Division shifted to the defense in the 
decisive period of the Battle of Moscow. Not having direct 
contact with the enemy, they prepared the occupied areas for 
four days beginning on 12 October 1941.[.sup]3[/] 
  The possibility of shifting to the defense out of contact 
with the enemy even in the course of an attack is not precluded. 
For example, on 26 October 1944 17th Rifle Division was 
successfully attacking in East Prussia. On the evening of that 
same day reconnaissance reported an imminent counterstrike by 
enemy reserves. To mislead him and create favorable conditions 
for the division main body to shift to the defense, the division 
commander ordered one company of each battalion to continue the 
attack and the main body to shift to the defense on a favorable 
line.[.sup]4[/] 
  As Great Patriotic War experience shows, subunits' shift to 
the defense in direct contact with the enemy will occur most 
often in the course of an attack when repelling counterattacks 
of superior enemy forces, consolidating captured lines, securing 
flanks of attacking troops, or with an unsuccessful outcome of a 
meeting battle. 
  Thus, in November 1943 the enemy tried for two days to halt 
an attack by subunits of 1147th Rifle Regiment, 353rd Rifle 
Division southwest of Dnepropetrovsk by counterattacks. All 
enemy counterattacks were successfully repelled, but on 5 
November the power of the enemy counterattacks rose and subunits 
shifted to the defense to repel them.[.sup]5[/] 
  The shift of subunits to the defense also is possible with 
an 
unsuccessful outcome of a meeting battle. This also is shown by 
the past war's experience. Thus, on 1 August 1944 a meeting 
battle occurred in the vicinity of Iodzhimyay during which 
subunits of 729th Rifle Regiment, 145th Rifle Division routed up 
to an enemy battalion and took the populated point. But during 
subsequent attacks they encountered strong resistance of the 
enemy, who counterattacked 729th Rifle Regiment subunits with 
forces of up to two battalions with 12 tanks and supported by 
the fire of three artillery battalions. By this time four 
infantry battalions already were operating against the regiment. 
The subunits were forced to hold up the attack and shift to the 
defense.[.sup]6[/] 
  In the course of an attack subunits and units often will 
have 
to force water obstacles and seize and hold bridgeheads. Great 
Patriotic War experience showed that battles for bridgeheads 
were characterized by high activeness on the enemy's part. 
  Thus, after forcing the Tisza River in the vicinity of 
Mehesz 
on the night of 27/28 October 1944, 4th Rifle Company of 795th 
Regiment took up a defense 200- 300 m from the water obstacle. 
The enemy repeatedly assaulted the defending subunit with forces 
of up to two infantry companies supported by artillery and 
mortar fire, but all his attempts to eliminate the bridgehead 
failed.[.sup]7[/] 
  Shifting to the defense in direct contact with the enemy is 
exceptionally difficult. This is determined by the fact that as 
a rule the defense will be organized under enemy fire in a short 
time, not always on a favorable line and as a rule on a line 
without engineer preparation. Subunits will have to perform 
several missions simultaneously: conduct a fire fight with a 
defending or counterattacking enemy, repel his air strikes, take 
steps to mop up in the aftermath of enemy use of nuclear, 
chemical and precision weapons and of fire strikes, reorganize 
the battle formation, replenish reserves of ammunition, fuel and 
other supplies, and organize the battle, the system of fire, and 
engineer preparation of occupied positions and strongpoints. 
  In addition, the situation also will be complicated by being 
understrength in personnel, weapons, vehicles and supplies 
caused by losses in the course of the attack. 
  Often it will be necessary to improve subunits' positions by 
battle or shift to the defense at the line which has been 
reached. In the first instance the need arises to destroy the 
opposing enemy by an attack, capture the line indicated for 
defense, consolidate on it, then shift to the defense. In some 
cases subunits will be forced to withdraw to the most favorable 
line. 
  In shifting to the defense out of contact with the enemy, 
subunits may have greater time for preparing the defense and 
better conditions for studying terrain ahead of the FEBA and in 
the depth of their defense, selecting more favorable positions 
and strongpoints with consideration of natural barriers, 
aligning the battle formation, organizing the system of fire and 
maneuver, and making wide use of engineer vehicles and 
improvised materials for preparing positions. 
  Meanwhile, absence of direct contact with the enemy does not 
preclude the possibility of his exerting an effect on subunits 
shifting to the defense by means of artillery, MLRS, aviation, 
raiding and reconnaissance parties, and precision weapons. This 
in turn requires taking measures for preparing the defense with 
observance of measures of maskirovka, security and protection. 
  Combat experience shows it is very difficult to shift to the 
defense during the day, especially in direct contact with the 
enemy. In this case the subunits' success is determined by the 
speed of their actions in taking the indicated line, timely 
assignment of missions to subordinates, organization of 
observation, a system of fire and engineer preparation, and 
skillful use of terrain relief and smoke in combination with 
fire damage of the enemy. In this period special attention 
should be given to destroying enemy AT weapons, helicopters and 
aircraft, and steps should be taken for protection against 
nuclear and fire strikes, including by precision weapons. 
  The most favorable conditions are created when shifting to 
the defense at night, under other conditions of limited 
visibility, and on terrain offering concealment. The nighttime 
and limited visibility (snowfall, fog, heavy rain and so on) 
reduce activeness of operations by enemy ground troops and 
aviation; in addition, at night the depth to which he conducts 
reconnaissance by observation and the effectiveness of fire is 
reduced considerably and conditions improve for performing 
engineer work. At the same time, selection of terrain sectors 
suitable for the defense is hampered, which necessitates 
updating positions and strongpoints with the arrival of dawn and 
updating conditions for organizing the system of fire. 
  The influence of these and other conditions should be taken 
into account by the subunit commander in organizing and 
conducting defensive battle. In launching an attack, the enemy 
may employ nuclear, chemical and precision weapons, airborne 
assault forces, airmobile and raiding and reconnaissance 
subunits, a large number of tanks, IFV's, APC's and aircraft 
(helicopters), and the massed fire of artillery, mortars and 
other weapons; he may remotely mine terrain to a considerable 
depth; and finally, he may assault swiftly with superior forces. 
In order to withstand the strikes of all these kinds of enemy 
weapons, repel his massed assaults and hold occupied areas 
(lines), the defense must be impregnable. Impregnable means 
stable and active, capable of withstanding strikes by all kinds 
of weapons and an assault by large masses of enemy tanks and 
infantry and conducting an active fight against his airborne 
assault forces and airmobile and raiding and reconnaissance 
parties. In addition, the defense must be antitank, antiaircraft 
and antilanding, deeply echeloned, and ready for lengthy battle 
under conditions of enemy use of mass destruction and precision 
weapons and EW assets. 
  Impregnability of the defense is achieved by tenacity, 
staunchness, determination and high morale of defending troops; 
continuous reconnaissance of the enemy and timely discovery of 
his preparation for an attack and of possible axes of attack; 
thorough maskirovka of the battle formation and misleading the 
enemy regarding the defense alignment and the concept of 
operations; skillful, varied defense alignment; skillful use of 
favorable terrain conditions and its engineer preparation; 
creation of a carefully organized system of fire, especially AT 
fire, in combination with systems of engineer obstacles, 
strongpoints and firing positions; reliable air defense; a 
timely maneuver of units (subunits), weapons and fire to 
threatened axes; immediate destruction of an enemy who has 
penetrated the defense and of his assault forces which have 
landed; use of unexpected tactics in the defense that are 
capable of stunning the enemy, placing him in a difficult 
situation and imposing one's will and initiative on him; 
constant fulfillment of measures for protection against enemy 
mass destruction and precision weapons; and tenacious, lengthy 
holding of defense areas (strongpoints) in combination with 
participation in conducting counterattacks. 
  Counterattacks are conducted under favorable conditions to 
destroy an enemy who has penetrated the defense or to take a 
line favorable for defense. Stability should be understood to 
mean the capability of withstanding powerful enemy strikes by 
all kinds of weapons, repelling an attack by his superior 
forces, holding occupied positions, strongpoints and important 
terrain areas and destroying the enemy in case he penetrates. 
Subunits must defend occupied positions tenaciously and hold 
them under all circumstances, even out of tactical contact with 
adjacent subunits and under conditions of total encirclement. A 
tenacious defense is a matter of the defenders' honor. They do 
not have the right to leave occupied positions and withdraw 
without an order of the senior commander. Successful performance 
of this mission depends on the subunit personnel's morale and 
fighting qualities, staunchness and determination, efficiency 
and firm military discipline, excellent combat proficiency and 
the desire to perform the assigned mission no matter what 
without sparing themselves. A deep alignment of the battle 
formation; a skillfully created system of fire, especially AT 
fire, in combination with obstacles; skillful engineer 
preparation of occupied positions, strongpoints and areas; and a 
ground-based air defense--all this also contributes to tenacious 
holding of defended positions. 
  Impregnability of a defense is inconceivable without its 
activeness. The defense will be active when the 
attacking enemy is constantly engaged by fire of all weapons on 
distant approaches to it during forward movement, deployment, 
and ahead of the FEBA, in the course of repelling an assault, 
and also in the depth of the defense in case the enemy 
penetrates. A maneuver of forces, assets and fire is the basis 
of activeness of the defense. A maneuver executed covertly, 
suddenly and swiftly permits placing friendly subunits in the 
most favorable position and inflicting decisive damage on a 
numerically superior enemy with fewer forces. It stands to 
reason that activeness of the defense is impossible without 
firmly holding defended positions. 
  Consequently, activeness of the defense consists of 
continuous engagement of the enemy by all available means, 
imposing one's will on him, creating unfavorable conditions for 
the attack, and conducting a broad maneuver of fire in all 
stages of battle. 
  It is common knowledge that nuclear weapons possess the 
greatest destructive properties. Therefore the defense must be 
stable in the antinuclear sense, i.e., possess the capability of 
withstanding nuclear weapon strikes and preserve the necessary 
number of forces and assets for repelling enemy assaults. This 
problem is solved in subunits basically by dispersal of elements 
of the battle formation, skilled use of terrain and its engineer 
preparation. 
  In the course of an attack the enemy also will employ tanks 
en masse for penetrating the defense. Great Patriotic War 
experience also attests to this. 
  Based on experience of the past war and local wars, the 
fight 
against tanks and other armored vehicles in the defense today 
acquires priority importance. Therefore it also has to be an 
antitank defense, capable of withstanding massed tank assaults 
and destroying them both ahead of the FEBA as well as in the 
depth of the subunits' defense. This is achieved by skillful use 
of the terrain's protective properties and its engineer 
preparation, skilled alignment of the defense, skillful 
organization of fire, especially of AT weapons, and creation of 
a system of obstacles in combination with natural barriers. 
  The defense can be positional or mobile 
depending on the mission received, combat capabilities of 
subunits and units, nature of terrain and extent of its engineer 
preparation, and the selected method of conducting battle. 
  The positional defense is the basic kind of 
defense. It most fully meets the principal objective of the 
defense and is conducted by inflicting maximum losses on the 
enemy ahead of the FEBA and in its depth. A positional defense 
is based on holding a number of defensive positions established 
by subunits within limits of occupied areas for a certain time, 
making maximum use of subunits' fire capabilities, and fullest 
possible engineer preparation of terrain. 
  The basic method of conducting a positional defense is to 
destroy the enemy by fire of all weapons as he approaches the 
FEBA and stubbornly hold tactically favorable terrain areas 
prepared for defense. A positional defense is used on the 
majority of axes, above all where loss of territory is 
impermissible. 
  The mobile defense is conducted to inflict losses 
on the enemy, gain time and preserve friendly forces by 
successive defensive battles at preplanned lines echeloned in 
depth in combination with brief counterattacks, wide use of fire 
ambushes, and organization of obstacles and the demolition of 
important installations. 
  It should be noted that as a rule a battalion conducts a 
positional defense. In individual cases it may participate in a 
mobile defense or may conduct it independently when assigned to 
defend a security zone. 
  The mobile defense allows abandoning certain areas of the 
territory and can be used for repelling an enemy invasion and 
when conducting battle in a security zone. 
  At each line the battalion occupies a defense area in which 
separate company and platoon strongpoints are established 
intercepting the most likely axes of enemy advance and helping 
to hold favorable terrain sectors. In the course of such a 
defense the battalion forces the enemy to advance in a direction 
in which a stable positional defense is prepared, or the enemy 
is drawn into an area providing favorable conditions for routing 
him by counterattacks. 
  As a rule a company (battalion) defends as part of the 
battalion (regiment) in coordination with adjacent subunits and 
with support of the senior commander's assets. A company 
(battalion) may occupy any place in the battalion (regimental) 
battle formation and perform various missions in the course of 
battle. 
  Based on this, a company (battalion) may be in the first or 
second echelon. When defending in the first echelon, depending 
on the mission received, a company (battalion) may defend on one 
of the flanks or in the center of the battle formation on the 
axis of concentration of battalion (regimental) main efforts. 
  In addition, a battalion (company) may make up a combined 
arms reserve or be in an antilanding reserve. A battalion 
(company) may receive a mission to operate in a security zone or 
at a forward position. During disengagement and withdrawal a 
battalion may be assigned to a rear guard and a company may be 
assigned to a rear (flank) security element or for operations as 
a covering- force subunit. 
  The company (battalion) role in the defense will depend on 
the place it occupies in the battle formation of the 
battalion (regiment) and the mission the company (battalion) is 
performing. The role of subunits will change constantly in the 
course of a defensive battle. Thus, in repelling an enemy 
assault ahead of the FEBA, a company (battalion) defending in 
the first echelon on the axis of concentration of battalion 
(regimental) main efforts will play the principal role in 
performing missions of the defense, since it will have to repel 
the assault of superior enemy forces, inflict significant losses 
on the enemy and hold the occupied area. 
  At the same time, a second echelon company (battalion) 
disposed in the depth of the defense is in readiness to perform 
assigned missions. Its role in this period primarily will be 
secondary. The company (battalion) begins to perform the primary 
role in case the enemy penetrates into the depth of the defense, 
since stability of defense not only of the battalion, but also 
of the regiment, depends on successful operations. 
  The content of missions to be performed and makeup of means 
of reinforcement are determined for a subunit depending on its 
role and place in the defense. 
  Thus, a mortar (artillery) battery, TP, AT subunit, grenade 
launcher subunit and combat engineer subunit may be attached to 
an MRC defending in the first echelon; an artillery battery, 
motorized rifle subunit and combat engineer subunit may be 
attached to a TC. 
  An artillery battery (an artillery battalion on the axis of 
concentration of main efforts) may be attached to the MRB (TB). 
In addition, a battalion may receive a TC (MRC), combat engineer 
platoon, AT subunit and air defense subunit as reinforcement. 
  In addition, a company (battalion) may be supported by an 
artillery battalion (battery) in the course of a defensive 
battle. 
  A first echelon company of the battalion defends a 
strongpoint in the first and second trenches with the mission of 
inflicting damage on the enemy by fire of all weapons and not 
permitting his penetration of the FEBA. 
  A first echelon battalion defends an area with the 
mission of repelling an enemy attack, destroying him ahead of 
the FEBA and when he has penetrated the defense at the first 
position, and also holding an important terrain area and 
creating favorable conditions for routing the enemy. 
  The tank battalion of an MRR as a rule is used for 
reinforcing the MRB's, and some of its forces are used in the 
combined arms reserve. It also may be in the second echelon. 
  The MRB of a TR as a rule is used for reinforcing the TB's. 
It also may operate independently, occupying a defense at the 
first position or in the security zone (at a forward position). 
  A second echelon company of the battalion has the 
mission of halting and under favorable conditions also 
destroying by counterattack enemy subunits which have penetrated 
the first and second trenches. A TC (BMP- equipped MRC) in 
addition may perform the mission of destroying enemy tanks by 
fire from lines of firing positions. 
  A second echelon battalion of the regiment 
occupies a defense at the second position, as a rule on an 
important axis. Its mission is to hold the occupied area firmly, 
reinforce (replace) first echelon subunits in case they lose 
combat effectiveness, execute counterattacks, and also destroy 
enemy airborne assault forces and airmobile subunits. A TB and 
BMP-equipped MRB in addition perform missions of repelling enemy 
tank assaults from lines of firing positions (by fire from in 
place). 
  A battalion making up the combined arms reserve 
occupies the indicated concentration area (defense area) and is 
in readiness to perform opportunity missions or to reinforce 
(replace) first echelon subunits in case they lose combat 
effectiveness. 
  A battalion assigned for defense in a security 
zone, operating as a forward detachment, has the mission of 
misleading the enemy regarding alignment of the first position, 
delaying the advance of his superior forces, forcing them to 
deploy prematurely and advance in a direction unfavorable for 
him, inflicting losses on him and winning time for preparing the 
defense. 
  A company (battalion) may defend at a forward position in 
case a security zone is not established. Such a position is 
established 4-6 km from the FEBA by decision of the senior 
commander to mislead the enemy regarding the trace of the 
forward edge and the defense alignment, prevent an enemy 
surprise attack on first echelon subunits, repel his 
reconnaissance in force and force him to deploy his main body 
prematurely. 
<H5>  2. Defense Alignment </H5>
  The company and battalion defense alignment (Diagram 2) 
includes the battle formation, system of strongpoints and firing 
positions, system of fire and system of engineer obstacles. All 
these elements represent a single whole and are mutually 
dependent. 
  In each specific case the defense alignment should conform 
to 
the commander's concept and take into account the nature of 
terrain and enemy operations. It should mislead the enemy 
regarding the trace and alignment of positions, battle formation 
and disposition of weapons, hamper his selection of targets of 
fire strikes, and thereby force him to deliver strikes against 
dummy, weakly occupied or unoccupied sectors. 
  The defense alignment as a whole should support growing 
opposition permitting prevention of enemy penetration of the 
defense area (strongpoint) and create conditions for his 
destruction. 
  The battle formation is the alignment of subunits 
for battle. it should correspond to the mission and concept of 
upcoming battle and ensure the following: defense stability and 
activeness; successful conduct of defensive battle both using 
only conventional weapons as well as using nuclear and other 
weapons; fullest use of subunits' combat capabilities for 
engaging the enemy during forward movement, deployment, and when 
launching an assault (or in the attack position [iskhodnoye 
polozheniye dlya nastupleniya]), when repelling an assault by 
his tanks and infantry ahead of the FEBA and destroying them 
during penetration of the defense area (strongpoint); least 
vulnerability of subunits to strikes by all kinds of weapons; 
maneuver of fire and subunits in the course of battle; maximum 
use of favorable and concealing properties of terrain; 
possibility of repelling enemy air strikes and destroying his 
airmobile and raiding and reconnaissance parties; and 
maintenance of continuous coordination and C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits. 
  The company (battalion) battle formation basically depends 
on 
its mission, importance of the defended axis, strength level of 
subunits, makeup of attached assets, size of the strongpoint 
(defense area), expected force and axes of enemy assaults, and 
nature of terrain. 
  The battle formation of the MRC (TC) is formed in one or two 
echelons (Diagram 3). 
  The company first echelon consists of MRP's (TP's) 
with means of reinforcement. It is intended for inflicting 
maximum damage on the enemy by fire of all weapons ahead of the 
FEBA and tenaciously holding important terrain sectors 
(objectives) on the FEBA. With a single echelon alignment of the 
company battle formation, it includes all MRP's (TP's) with 
means of reinforcement, and with its two-echelon alignment two 
platoons are assigned to the first echelon and one to the second. 
  The company second echelon is intended chiefly for 
firmly holding a strongpoint in the depth of the defense (in the 
second trench) and destroying an enemy who has penetrated. 
  Depending on the nature of terrain, platoons in a company 
strongpoint may be disposed in a reverse wedge or have an 
echelon or other disposition which provides best organization of 
the system of fire ahead of the front and on the strongpoint 
flanks. First echelon platoons are disposed at the first trench 
and the second echelon platoon at the second trench. 
  A battalion battle formation may be formed in two echelons 
or 
one echelon (Diagram 4). It consists of first echelon subunits, 
a second echelon or reserve, and weapons and subunits of 
reinforcement remaining directly subordinate to the battalion 
commander. In a single-echelon alignment of the battle formation 
a reserve is assigned made up of at least a platoon. Such an 
alignment usually is used with a shortage of forces and assets, 
on terrain difficult of access for enemy operations, in a 
defense in the second echelon or on another axis, and during 
battle in the security zone. 
  A battalion may have a varying disposition of companies 
depending on the mission to be performed and nature of terrain. 
One company may be moved forward or backward, forming a fire 
sack, and on open terrain be disposed in an echelon [left or 
right]. In all cases company strongpoints should be disposed so 
they intercept probable enemy axes of advance. 
  The first echelon of an MRB (TB) consists of MRC's 
(TC's) reinforced by tank (motorized rifle) subunits, ATGM's and 
combat engineer subunits. It is intended for destroying the 
enemy ahead of the FEBA and when he penetrates into its depth, 
firmly holding important terrain sectors and preventing a 
breakthrough of the occupied defense area. 
  With a single-echelon alignment of the battle formation, the 
first echelon may include all MRC's with their means of 
reinforcement, and with a two-echelon alignment it may include 
two companies. First echelon companies defend strongpoints at 
the first and second trenches. 
  The battalion second echelon is intended for 
defending a strongpoint in the depth of the defense with the 
mission of halting and under favorable conditions also 
destroying by counterattack an enemy who has penetrated the 
first and second trenches. A company usually is assigned to the 
second echelon; it defends a strongpoint at the third and 
sometimes also the fourth trench. 
  The battalion reserve (at least a platoon) 
occupies a concentration area in which it prepares a strongpoint 
for defense and is in readiness to perform opportunity missions. 
  The mortar (artillery) battery and grenade launcher subunit 
usually remain subordinate to the battalion commander and as a 
rule are employed at full strength for supporting the battle of 
first echelon MRC's. Sometimes the GLP is attached to first 
echelon companies by squads or attached at full strength to an 
MRC defending on the axis of concentration of battalion main 
efforts. 
  The AT subunit of the battalion (a platoon) usually remains 
subordinate to the battalion commander, occupies a concentration 
area and as a rule is used at full strength on a likely avenue 
of tank approach to repel assaults by enemy tanks and other 
armored vehicles, cover an exposed flank and support a 
counterattack. On terrain affording concealment and on rugged 
terrain it may be attached to first echelon companies. The AT 
subunit performs its missions from firing positions or from 
lines, the number of which is determined by the battalion 
commander. 
  As a rule, air defense subunits remain directly subordinate 
to the battalion commander and are disposed in company 
strongpoints and in the vicinity of the battalion COP so as to 
provide reliable cover of subunits against air strikes. 
  An armored group and fire ambushes may be part of the 
company 
(battalion) battle formation depending on the situation. 
  The company (battalion) armored group is established to 
increase activeness of the defense, promptly reinforce its 
stability on the most threatened axes, and close breaches which 
have formed as a result of enemy fire strikes. In addition, it 
is established to perform other missions as well which require 
swift, mobile operations and effective fire damage of the enemy 
and also to make more complete use of combat capabilities of 
tanks, BMP's and BTR's. The armored group makeup may include 
several tanks, BMP's or BTR's (usually without a mounted force) 
assigned from first and second echelon subunits defending 
outside of axes of concentration of main efforts. 
  With occupation of a defense by the company (battalion), 
tanks and BMP's (BTR's) intended for operating as part of an 
armored group usually are disposed and make ready for battle in 
their own platoon strongpoints. Then at the prescribed time they 
concentrate in an area with reliable protective and concealing 
features of terrain (in ravines, on reverse hillslopes, in the 
forest and in other sheltered places), carefully conceal 
themselves and prepare to perform missions assigned to the 
armored group or to occupy a defense in their own platoon 
strongpoints. 
  One of the deputy platoon commanders may be appointed 
commander of a company armored group and one of the platoon 
commanders of a second echelon company may be appointed 
commander of a battalion armored group. 
  A fire ambush is organized to inflict maximum damage on the 
enemy by direct fire commenced suddenly, by surprise close-range 
concentrated fire, and by use of minefields. 
  A platoon (squad, tank) reinforced by flamethrower operators 
and combat engineers may be assigned to a fire ambush. 
  A system of strongpoints and firing positions is 
established for performing defense missions in a company 
(battalion) in accordance with the commander's decision, combat 
capabilities of subunits, time available and nature of terrain. 
It includes the following: combat security outpost position (in 
the battalion); strongpoints of platoons and companies 
consolidated into a battalion defense area; firing positions of 
tanks, BMP's (BTR's), ATGM systems and other organic and 
attached weapons; trenches and communication trenches. 
  The combat security outpost position is established to 
prevent an enemy surprise attack and his conduct of ground 
reconnaissance. A reinforced platoon usually is sent out as a 
combat security outpost from a first echelon battalion to a 
distance up to 2 km. The platoon is assigned a position up to 
500 m in frontage which is prepared for a perimeter defense. 
Obstacles are arranged ahead of the platoon position and on the 
flanks. 
  A combat security outpost is not sent out when in direct 
contact with the enemy. In this case its missions are assigned 
to subunits occupying the first trench. 
  Battalion defense areas, which unite company strongpoints, 
are the basis of each defensive position. 
  A company strongpoint (battalion defense area) is a terrain 
sector (area) of specific size with engineer preparation in 
accordance with the commander's decision, adapted for a 
perimeter defense and occupied by a subunit. 
  A company defends a strongpoint 1-1.5 km in frontage and up 
to 1,000 m deep. An MRC strongpoint is prepared as two trenches 
or one trench and consists of strongpoints of MRP's and 
positions of weapons of the company and attached subunits 
interconnected by a unified system of fire, obstacles and 
communication trenches within limits of the company strongpoint. 
A TC strongpoint consists of the strongpoints of TP's and 
positions of attached subunits. 
  Tanks attached to an MRC occupy a defense in its strongpoint 
and reinforce its capabilities to combat enemy armored targets, 
and motorized rifle subunits attached to a TC usually occupy 
positions ahead of the tanks and also in gaps between TP's and 
on flanks. 
  Communication trenches must be used widely for a perimeter 
defense of a company strongpoint, platoons must be assigned 
secondary sectors of fire, and alternate firing positions are 
prepared for weapons with consideration for conducting fire 
toward flanks and to the rear. Some weapons should be disposed 
in the depth of the defense. Obstacles are arranged on flanks, 
in gaps between platoons and in the rear of the strongpoint. 
  Gaps between company strongpoints may reach 1,000 m and must 
not fail to be under continuous observation; covered by 
flanking, oblique and cross fire of all weapons, especially AT 
weapons; and also covered by fire ambushes, artillery fire and 
obstacles. Trenches and alternate positions are prepared in gaps 
between platoon (company) strongpoints. 
  A battalion defends an area 3-5 km in frontage and 2-2.5 km 
in depth. It builds the defense within one position and prepares 
3-4 trenches. A battalion defense area consists of company 
strongpoints and the positions of organic and attached weapons 
interconnected by a unified system of fire, obstacles and 
communication trenches. 
  The width and depth of a battalion defense area and the 
distance between trenches, subunits and weapons are not constant 
values. In each specific case they must ensure repulse of enemy 
tank and mechanized infantry assaults ahead of the FEBA and 
their destruction when wedged into the defense; convenience of 
situating elements of the battle formation; dispersal of 
subunits for least vulnerability to enemy nuclear strikes, 
artillery fire and precision weapons; and an opportunity to 
execute a maneuver of fire and subunits. For example, the 
battalion defense frontage may be greater on terrain that is not 
accessible everywhere for operations of attacking troops and 
also when defending in a security zone. 
  Company strongpoints are disposed in a battalion area so 
they 
intercept the most likely axes of enemy attack by their 
disposition and fire, preclude stereotype in aligning the 
defense, and ensure stability of defending subunits. 
  Firing positions are prepared within the subunit battle 
formation to perform fire missions and improve survivability of 
weapons. A firing position is a place with or without engineer 
preparation occupied or intended for occupation by a tank, BMP 
(BTR) or other weapons. Skillful selection of firing positions 
is an important condition for successful performance of assigned 
missions. 
  Firing positions must be selected so they provide a good all 
around view of terrain and the conduct of fire in primary and 
secondary sectors of fire, possibility of firing to maximum 
range in given directions, engagement of the enemy by 
concentrated fire, reliable maskirovka and shelter of weapons 
against various enemy weapons, a concealed passage from the 
primary to an alternate position, a convenient move into a 
counterattack or a withdrawal, and an opportunity for mutual 
fire support and conduct of fire into gaps, from behind flanks 
and over the heads of friendly subunits. 
  Firing positions are subdivided according to 
purpose into primary, temporary, alternate and dummy. 
  Primary firing positions are intended for 
performing assigned missions in the course of battle. They are 
prepared for BMP's (BTR's), tanks, ATGM launchers, machineguns, 
grenade launchers and other weapons. 
  Temporary firing positions are prepared for duty 
weapons, BMP's (BTR's) and tanks and are intended for performing 
individual missions and misleading the enemy regarding the true 
alignment of the system of fire. Fire is conducted from these 
positions to destroy an enemy attempting to perform 
reconnaissance, breach obstacles or penetrate into the depth of 
the defense. After performing assigned missions, weapons occupy 
primary firing positions by direction of the company (battalion) 
commander. 
  Alternate firing positions are intended for 
executing a maneuver in the course of a defensive battle, and 
also in case it is impossible to perform the assigned mission 
from the primary position. It is advisable to designate one or 
two alternate positions for each kind of weapon. The transfer to 
and occupation of alternate positions is done only by order of 
the commander. 
  Dummy firing positions are established to mislead 
the enemy regarding the true position of weapons. For fighting 
vehicles these positions (emplacements) usually are prepared 
10-15 m from the primary firing position with simulation of the 
main revealing signs. 
  Depending on the degree of cover against ground observation, 
firing positions may be direct fire or indirect fire positions. 
Tanks, BMP's (BTR's), AT weapons and machineguns occupy and 
conduct fire from direct fire positions. 
  Firing positions should be established in such a way as to 
ensure dispersed placement that is not in a straight line. 
  Trenches and communication trenches should provide 
convenience in conducting fire, especially flanking, oblique and 
cross fire, sheltered disposition of subunits and weapons, and 
their swift, concealed maneuver laterally and into the depth, 
and also hamper the enemy in discovering the battle formation 
and system of fire. 
  The first trench of the first position is the 
forward edge, which is designated by the senior commander. 
Antitank and antipersonnel obstacles are established ahead of 
the first trench. It is selected where possible behind natural 
antitank barriers and should provide good observation of the 
enemy and best conditions for creating continuous fire of all 
kinds ahead of the FEBA, on flanks, in gaps and from the depth 
of the defense. Terrain ahead of the FEBA should hamper enemy 
observation and his choice of sheltered areas for concentrating 
tanks and infantry and concealed approaches to the FEBA. 
  The second trench is prepared 300-600 m from the 
first so its defending subunits could destroy an enemy on 
approaches to the FEBA by their fire, cover obstacles in front 
of the FEBA and support subunits located in the first trench. 
  The third (fourth) trench is prepared 600-1,000 m 
from the second (third) trench. It should allow its defending 
subunits to conduct fire in the belt between the second and 
third (fourth) trenches, and in some sectors also ahead of the 
FEBA, and use it to maneuver to threatened axes. 
  Communication trenches are used for fighting an enemy who 
has 
penetrated the defense, for concealed maneuver of subunits, and 
for evacuating wounded and delivering ammunition and food. At 
least one communication trench is dug for each platoon from the 
first to the second trench and at least one communication trench 
is prepared for each company from the second to the third 
(fourth) trench. This will permit organizing a perimeter defense 
in a short time if necessary. Trenches and communication 
trenches should be dug full profile and in some sectors 
strengthened by revetments to reduce losses from the effect of 
enemy nuclear weapons, artillery fire and air strikes. Covered 
sectors, dugouts [blindazh] and bunkers [ubezhishche] are made 
for personnel in trenches and communication trenches, and niches 
and small excavations are made for ammunition and other supplies. 
  Trenches and communication trenches are used for personnel 
movement to platoon, company and battalion assembly areas [rayon 
sbora] when disengaging and withdrawing. 
  Fire is the basic means of destroying the enemy in the 
defense. To perform this mission the company (battalion) has 
diverse weapons (assault rifles, machineguns, RPG's, BMP's 
(BTR's), tanks, ATGM's, automatic grenade launchers, mortars, 
air defense weapons) differing both in range and effectiveness 
as well as in type of targets engaged and degree of protection. 
To ensure the most effective fire, it must be organized in a 
unified system corresponding to the concept of upcoming battle. 
In addition, the defense is organized as a rule to fight an 
enemy considerably superior in forces. Consequently, the enemy's 
quantitative superiority in tanks and mechanized infantry must 
be countered by quality of fire, which is reflected in a 
specific system of the disposition and use of available weapons. 
  The system of fire should be understood to mean 
the disposition of weapons organized under a unified plan and 
the combination and distribution of their fire missions by 
targets, place and time with consideration of maximum use of 
their fire capabilities in accordance with the commander's 
decision for engaging the enemy on his approach to the FEBA, his 
deployment and his launching of an assault; and repelling an 
assault by enemy tanks and mechanized infantry ahead of the 
FEBA, on flanks, and with penetration of the strongpoint. 
  Considering the great importance of the system of fire in 
performing defense missions, the subunit commander builds it 
with consideration of fire capabilities of all kinds of weapons 
at his disposal and their close interworking in combination with 
engineer obstacles and natural barriers. 
  The system of fire must ensure creation of a zone of fire of 
AT weapons and continuous, multilayered fire of all kinds ahead 
of the FEBA, in gaps, on flanks and in the depth of the 
strongpoint (battalion defense area), and a rapid transfer, 
distribution and concentration of fire on any threatened axis or 
sector. 
  The company (battalion) system of fire includes the 
following: sectors of concentrated fire and defensive fire lines 
of artillery and mortars prepared on approaches to the defense, 
ahead of the FEBA, on flanks, in gaps between company 
strongpoints and in the depth of the defense; zones of fire of 
AT weapons and continuous, multilayered fire of all kinds of 
weapons ahead of the FEBA, in gaps, on flanks and in the depth 
of the defense above all for destroying enemy tanks and other 
armored vehicles; and a prepared maneuver of fire to concentrate 
it on any threatened axis or sector in a short time. The basis 
of the company system of fire is the fire of tanks and BMP's; 
the basis of the battalion system of fire is the AT fire of 
companies, organic and attached AT weapons and direct fire of 
artillery, with consideration for employing the regiment's AT 
reserve and mobile obstacle detachment on a likely avenue of 
tank approach. 
  Thorough organization of AT fire is a very important 
obligation of all subunit commanders. Weapons must be disposed 
covertly in the company strongpoint (battalion defense area) 
with consideration of terrain relief. Their disposition must 
ensure conduct of fire to maximum range and engagement of the 
enemy by flanking, cross and surprise close-range concentrated 
fire, they must have fire coordination with each other and they 
must create fire sacks. 
  To keep the enemy from uncovering the system of fire, 
weapons 
must be carefully camouflaged and a broad network of alternate, 
temporary and dummy positions and of roving tanks, guns and 
BMP's must be established. Linear disposition of weapons is 
impermissible. 
  To combat enemy tanks and other armored vehicles the 
battalion (company) commander specifies the zone of AT weapon 
fire. It represents a terrain sector ahead of the subunit 
forward edge, on flanks, in gaps between strongpoints and in the 
depth of the defense against which fire is prepared in advance 
and conducted from tanks, ATGM's, BMP's and other AT weapons. 
  In modern battle the enemy will attempt to take advantage of 
the gun fire of tanks and BMP's (BTR's) at maximum grazing range 
during an assault and, if the vehicles have launchers for firing 
ATGM's, to destroy the defenders' armored weapons. Based on 
this, the above enemy weapons should be expected to commence 
fire when they come to a line 2-3 km from the FEBA. 
  The depth of the AT fire zone should ensure engagement of 
enemy tanks and BMP's (BTR's) when they move into the impact 
zone of defenders' AT weapons. The far boundary is specified 
(established) depending on the range of effective fire of the 
weapon being used with consideration of terrain conditions ahead 
of the FEBA, on flanks and in the depth of the defense. The 
range of effective fire of a weapon (subunit) is the range at 
which a target is killed with a single round (volley) with a 
probability of 0.5. For example, it is 2-2.5 km for modern tanks. 
  A zone of continuous, multilayered fire of all kinds of 
weapons is created to repel enemy massed tank and infantry 
assaults. It represents a terrain sector (area) in which each 
terrain point is under effective fire. Within this zone small 
arms fire is reinforced by fire of machineguns mounted on BMP's 
(BTR's), and fire of AT weapons is reinforced by RPG's. 
  In each specific instance the depth of the zone of 
continuous, multilayered fire is determined by the nature of 
terrain and range of effective fire of weapons involved and may 
be up to 400 m. 
  Establishing zones of fire gives a defense a monolithic 
nature with respect to fire. Lines for commencing fire from 
various weapons are designated in these zones for organized 
engagement of the enemy. When the enemy moves to these lines 
fire is commenced by ATGM launchers, tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and 
small arms. 
  Special attention in organizing a system of fire should be 
given to creating fire sacks. A fire sack is a terrain sector 
ahead of the FEBA or in the depth of the defense against which 
high density fire of all or the bulk of subunit weapons is 
prepared from flanks and from the front to inflict maximum 
damage (loss) on the enemy in a short time. It is created by 
skillfully disposing platoon (company) strongpoints and weapons 
with consideration of terrain conditions so the terrain within 
its limits is covered by cross, flanking and frontal fire of all 
weapons. Fire sacks may be created by a maneuver of fire, 
weapons and subunits in the course of a defensive battle. 
  Minefields are laid and artillery, mortar and concentrated 
small arms fire is prepared within the fire sack. 
  The size of a fire sack can be 900-1,000 m in frontage and 
up 
to 1,000 m in depth when created ahead of the FEBA, and 500-800 
m in frontage and up to 1,000 m in depth when created in the 
depth of the defense area (strongpoint). 
  Concentrated and defensive fire of artillery (mortars) and 
concentrated fire of tanks, BMP's and small arms is prepared for 
engaging the enemy on possible forward movement routes, 
deployment lines, and axes of his attack and penetration. 
  Concentrated fire is conducted against a precisely detected 
target or group of targets by several tanks, BMP's (BTR's), 
machineguns, assault rifles and other weapons as well as by one 
or more of the company subunits. In some cases prepared 
concentrated fire may be conducted for neutralization, 
annihilation or prevention of enemy advance. Neutralizing a 
target consists of inflicting such damages (losses) on it which 
temporarily deprive it of combat effectiveness, restrict its 
maneuver or disrupt C[.sup]2[/]. 
  Annihilation of a target consists of inflicting such damage 
(losses) on it that it completely loses combat effectiveness. 
  Concentrated fire is conducted at the following ranges: 
2,000 
m from the KPVT [14.5 mm Vladimirov heavy machinegun], 1,000 m 
from the PKT [Kalashnikov tank machinegun], and 800 m from 
machineguns and assault rifles. When concentrated fire is 
conducted by subunits, this range increases and is 2.5 km for a 
BMP- equipped MRP, 3.5 km for a TP, 4 km for a BMP-equipped MRC 
and 5 km for a TC. 
  Fire concentration sectors usually are designated against 
road junctions, crossings, defiles, forest openings and other 
terrain sectors constraining enemy actions or compacting his 
battle formation. 
  The size of fire concentration sectors in frontage and depth 
are determined by subunit fire capabilities. It should 
correspond in width to the size of the fragmentation effect zone 
of a shell and be 40 m per gun for tanks and 25 m for BMP's. The 
width of fire concentration sectors should correspond to the 
amount of shell dispersion and be 100 m for tank guns and 50 m 
for BMP's. Based on this, fire concentration sectors can be 120 
m in frontage and 100 m in depth for the TP and up to 75 m in 
frontage and up to 50 m in depth for the BMP platoon. The width 
of a fire concentration sector when firing small arms is 
designated with consideration of ensuring a fire density of 
10-12 bullets per meter of frontage and depends on the number of 
weapons in subunits and involved in the battle. With subunits at 
authorized strength, the fire concentration sector can be up to 
150 m for a platoon and up to 300 m for a company. 
  Firing data are prepared with the help of the longitudinal 
level and traverse indicator to support conduct of tank and BMP 
fire against a fire concentration sector at night or under 
conditions of poor visibility. 
  The method of conducting concentrated BMP and tank fire can 
vary: systematic fire, rapid fire and salvos. In conducting 
systematic fire, the firing BMP's (tanks) fire rounds in a 
certain sequence at set time intervals. Such fire is used during 
registration and to ensure observation of results of fire when 
shifting to fire for effect. 
  Rapid fire is conducted when BMP's (tanks) are ready for the 
next round, and at the maximum rate. It is used during fire for 
effect. 
  In conducting salvo fire, all firing BMP's (tanks) fire 
rounds simultaneously at the subunit commander's command. 
  Frontal fire, flanking fire, cross fire and surprise, close 
range concentrated [kinzhalnyy] fire is prepared to 
increase the effectiveness of engaging the enemy. 
  Frontal fire is fire directed perpendicular to 
target frontage; it is more effective in engaging deep targets. 
  Fire conducted against the enemy (target) flank is called 
flanking fire and is most suitable in firing on 
targets operating across a wide front. Cross fire is 
fire conducted against a target from two or more directions. 
Fire commenced suddenly from close range in one direction is 
called surprise close-range concentrated fire. It is 
prepared at distances not exceeding grazing range for 
head-shoulders chest figure targets and is conducted from 
carefully camouflaged positions at maximum intensity until total 
annihilation of the enemy or interdiction of his attempts to 
advance in a given direction. 
  The company (battalion) commander organizes the system of 
fire when assigning missions and organizing coordination. Zones 
(sectors) of fire, secondary sectors of fire and fire 
concentration sectors are assigned to subunits (weapons). 
  A subunit zone of fire should be at least the width of the 
strongpoint (defense area) in frontage and is indicated on the 
terrain (map, diagram) by four reference points: first on the 
right, then on the left into the depth. The depth of the zone of 
fire is determined by the range of effective fire of subunit 
weapons. To cover boundaries and gaps between subunits by fire, 
the zones of fire of adjacent subunits must overlap at distances 
of 400-500 m from the FEBA. 
  Sectors of fire are indicated for BMP's (BTR's), tanks, 
machineguns and other weapons. Fire of RPG's is prepared in the 
zones of their own squads. 
  Readiness of the system of fire is determined by occupation 
of positions by weapons, preparation of firing data, and 
availability of missiles and ammunition. 
  An important element of the defense alignment is the system 
of engineer obstacles being created by decision of the commander 
to the full depth of defense to inflict damage (losses) on an 
enemy, delay his advance, hamper (constrain) maneuver or force 
him to advance in a direction favorable for the defenders and 
thereby contribute to his destruction by fire and counterattacks. 
  The system of engineer obstacles includes 
minefields, mine clusters, integrated obstacle complexes, 
abatis, other antitank and antipersonnel barriers, and 
installations prepared for demolition (mining) created ahead of 
the combat security outpost position, ahead of the FEBA, in gaps 
and on flanks of the battalion (company) to the full depth of 
the battalion defense area. It is created in accordance with the 
commander's concept in combination with the system of fire with 
consideration of natural barriers and the maneuver of subunits 
(your own and adjacent ones). 
  Minefields emplaced by combat engineer subunits are the 
basis 
of the obstacle system. The procedure for demolishing 
installations in the depth of the defense is determined by the 
senior commander. 
<H5>  3. Preparation of the Defense </H5>
  Preparation of the defense represents an entire set of 
measures taken by the company (battalion) commander for 
successful performance of assigned missions. It begins with 
receipt of the combat mission from the senior commander and 
includes the following: organization for battle (decisionmaking, 
assignment of combat missions to subunits, ground 
reconnaissance, organization of coordination and a system of 
fire, comprehensive support to battle and C[.sup]2[/]); 
development of a diagram of the company strongpoint (battalion 
defense area); preparation of the company (battalion) for 
performing the combat mission; occupation of the defense; 
creation of the battle formation and system of fire; engineer 
preparation of the strongpoint (defense area); organization and 
conduct of political work; practical work of the company 
(battalion) commander, his deputies and staff in subordinate 
subunits; and other measures. 
  The duration and procedure of the commander's work of 
organizing the defense depend on conditions for 
shifting to the defense, mission received, how far away the 
enemy is and the nature of his operations, nature of terrain and 
time available. With time available, the defense is organized 
with measures carried out to the full extent; if time is 
lacking, then it is done in a short time with measures carried 
out to an abbreviated extent. In all cases it should not delay 
subunits in taking up a defense and creating a system of fire. 
  When shifting to the defense out of contact with the 
enemy the commander usually arranges his work in the 
following order: analyzes the mission; determines measures which 
must be carried out immediately for most rapid preparation of 
subunits to perform the assigned mission; makes or approves a 
time calculation; gives instructions to commanders of 
subordinate and attached subunits for preparing to perform the 
combat mission and on the time and procedure of work on the 
terrain; estimates the situation; makes the decision and briefs 
it to the senior commander; communicates the decision to his 
deputies and subunit commanders; performs ground reconnaissance, 
during which he updates his decision; issues the operation 
order; and organizes coordination, a system of fire, 
comprehensive support of battle and C[.sup]2[/]. 
  Then he moves the company (battalion) to the indicated 
strongpoint (defense area), organizes its engineer preparation 
and performs practical work of preparing subunits for defense. 
At the prescribed time he reports readiness to perform the 
combat mission to the battalion (regimental) commander. 
  On receiving a combat mission for shifting to the defense 
in direct contact with the enemy, the company 
(battalion) commander arranges his work in the following order: 
analyzes the mission received; determines measures which must be 
taken immediately for a most rapid shift to the defense; makes a 
time calculation; and organizes the capture and consolidation of 
the indicated (favorable) line. In the course of consolidating 
the line he estimates the situation, makes the decision, assigns 
missions to organic and attached subunits (by radio or 
personally), organizes coordination, the system of fire, 
C[.sup]2[/], and protection against enemy mass destruction 
and precision weapons, issues instructions on basic questions of 
comprehensive support to battle, and organizes engineer 
preparation of the strongpoint (defense area). 
  Then the commander performs ground reconnaissance, during 
which he updates missions for subunits, the coordination 
procedure, and if necessary also other matters. 
  In all cases company (battalion) subunits must be ready to 
repel an enemy attack and air strikes, to destroy an airborne 
assault force and subunits of airmobile troops, and for 
protection against precision weapons. 
<H5>  4. Company Commander's Work of Organizing the Defense Out of </H5>
Contact With the Enemy 
<H5>  (Variant) </H5>
  Tactical situation (Fig. 4) 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-44A>      Fig. 4. 5th MRC commander's decision for defense </FIG>


  The 2nd MRB, alerted on 15 June and having made a 100 km 
night march, concentrated in Gustoy Forest 3 km east of Ivanovka 
(not on diagram) by 0400 hours 16 June, where it is preparing 
weapons and vehicles for battle. (Not all local features cited 
in the text are shown on the diagram due to its small scale.) 
  As 0515 on 16 June the 5th MRC commander received a combat 
mission, from which he learned the following: 
  1. The enemy is concentrating his main body in assembly 
areas 
for an attack [rayon dlya nastupleniya]. His attack should be 
expected to be launched on the morning of 18 June, and with 
consideration of battle in the security zone his arrival at the 
FEBA is possible as follows: forward subunits by 1330-1400 and 
main body by 1500-1600 18 June. 
  2. 2nd MRB with 1st TC shifts to defense of area Hill 134.2 
(not on diagram), Ploskaya Hill, Okunevo (not on diagram) with 
mission of preventing penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in 
direction of Grusha Hill, Hill 129.0. Battle formation is in two 
echelons: 4th and 5th MRC in the first and 6th MRC in the second. 
  It is planned to have three trenches in the defense area: 
first--west slopes of Hill 137.0, lone house, ruins, rocks; 
second--quarry (not on diagram), Hill 129.0, west slopes of 
Dlinnaya Hill, Karevo; third--Hill 122.3 (not on diagram), Hill 
112.0, Hill 109.2 (not on diagram). 
  Subunits of 1/3 MRR are defending in the security zone. 
  3. 4th MRC of adjacent regiment is shifting to the defense 
on 
right with mission of preventing enemy penetration in direction 
of Grusha Hill, Kuskovo (not on diagram). 
  1st MRC, 1st MRB is shifting to the defense on left with 
mission of preventing enemy penetration in direction of Hill 
110.0, Sapozhnikovo (not on diagram). 
  The regimental artillery battalion is preparing concentrated 
and barrier fires on possible deployment lines and on axes of 
assault against sectors 201, 202, 203; standing barriers Bereza 
[Birch], Sosna [Pine], Klen [Maple]; and rolling barrier Tigr 
[Tiger]. 
  4. 5th MRC with 2nd TP, 1st TC and a grenade launcher squad 
is shifting to defense of the strongpoint Hill 136.8, Ploskaya 
Hill, Kedrovka with mission of preventing penetration of enemy 
tanks and infantry in direction of Hill 80.1, Kedrovka. Zone of 
fire: on right--lone house, north edge of Kruglaya Grove; on 
left--rocks, Hill 74.5. Secondary sector of fire--to right in 
direction of ruins. Company fire concentration sectors: 
SO-1--rocks, bushes; SO-2--lone tree, curve in road. 1st Battery 
is supporting. 
  5. Ammunition expenditure for mission accomplishment: 0.4 
unit of fire for small arms and 0.6 unit of fire for tanks and 
BMP's. 
  Occupy defense by 1030 16 June. Readiness of the system of 
fire 1120 hours 16 June, readiness of engineer obstacles and 
first-order engineer work by 1030 17 June. 
  7. Battalion COP on Hill 119.2 as of 1030 16 June, company 
COP on north slopes of Dlinnaya Hill as of 1035 16 June. 
  Company is 95 percent strength in personnel, weapons and 
vehicles. 
  [Begin side line] On receiving the combat mission the 
company 
commander analyzes it and makes a time calculation. 
  The mission analysis has the purpose of ensuring 
decisionmaking for shifting to the defense in accordance with 
the battalion (regimental) commander's concept. In analyzing the 
mission he has received, the company (battalion) commander must 
understand the goal of the defensive battle, the senior 
commander's concept, and above all the direction for 
concentrating main efforts; the holding of which terrain sectors 
supports stability of the company (battalion) defense; procedure 
for engaging the enemy by fire of organic and attached weapons 
during his forward movement, his assault on the FEBA and his 
destruction in the depth of the defense; and objectives 
(targets) to be engaged by senior commanders' weapons in support 
of the company (battalion). In analyzing the mission the 
commander also has to understand the combat mission, place of 
the company (battalion) in the battalion (regimental) battle 
formation and its role in the upcoming battle, missions of 
adjacent subunits and procedure for coordinating with them, and 
readiness time to perform the mission; and also analyze the time 
for occupying the defense, readiness time of the system of fire, 
and the sequence and time periods of engineer preparation of the 
strongpoint (defense area). 
  In conclusions from the mission analysis, the company 
(battalion) commander usually determines the following: on which 
axis and on holding which sector he must concentrate main 
efforts and for what actions he must be ready; how to align the 
battle formation; how much time is available for organizing the 
defense and what must be done to maintain coordination with 
adjacent subunits. [End side line] 
  Mission analysis 
  2nd MRB is shifting to defense of the area Hill 134.2, 
Ploskaya Hill, Okunevo (1.5 km east of Ivanovo) with the mission 
of preventing penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in 
direction of Grusha Hill, Hill 129.0. 
  Battalion is concentrating main efforts on holding area Hill 
137.0, Ploskaya Hill, Osinovka (not on diagram). 
  Battalion battle formation in two echelons. 5th MRC with 2nd 
TP and grenade launcher squad shifts to defense in first echelon 
on battalion left flank on axis of concentration of main efforts 
with mission of preventing penetration of enemy tanks and 
infantry in direction of Hill 80.1, Kedrovka. 
  4th MRC on right shifts to defense of strongpoint Hill 134.2 
(not on diagram), Hill 137.0, bushes with mission of preventing 
penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in direction of Grusha 
Hill, Kuskovo (not on diagram). 
  1st MRC, 1st MRB on left shifts to defense of strongpoint 
Kamennaya Hill, cemetery, Karevo with mission of preventing 
enemy penetration in direction of Hill 110.0, Sapozhnikovo (not 
on diagram). 
  Occupy defense by 1030 hours 16 June. Readiness of the 
system 
of fire 1120 16 June. Readiness of first-order engineer work by 
1030 17 June. 
  Conclusions: 
  1. Based on 2nd MRB commander's concept, concentrate main 
efforts on axis Hill 80.1, Kedrovka and on firmly holding Hill 
136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Dlinnaya Hill. 
  2. Align battle formation in two echelons, have platoon 
strongpoints on Hill 136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Dlinnaya Hill. 
  [Begin side line] Having drawn conclusions from analyzing 
the 
mission received and having determined the measures which must 
be taken immediately for most rapid preparation of subunits to 
perform the combat mission, the company commander makes a time 
calculation. 
  The time of receiving the mission, time of occupying the 
defense, readiness time of the system of fire, and time of 
briefing the decision (commander's concept) to the battalion 
commander are initial data for the time calculation. 
  In calculating time, determine how many hours set aside for 
preparing for battle are in daylight. It is also necessary to 
determine how much time to set aside for issuing instructions on 
preparing subunits for battle, situation estimate, ground 
reconnaissance, assignment of combat missions, and organization 
of coordination. Having analyzed the mission received and 
performed the time calculation, the company commander begins the 
situation estimate. [End side line] 
  Company commander's time calculation for 
shifting to defense 
  Mission received at 0515 hours 16 June. Occupy defense by 
1030 16 June. Readiness of system of fire 1120 16 June. Total 
time for organizing defense 5 hours. 


                                Time 

Measures To Be Taken            Beginning                  End 

Issue instructions on           0530                       0540 
preparing subunits for battle 


Situation estimate              0540                       0550 

Decisionmaking and              0550                       0620 
communication of decision to 
one's deputies and subunit 
commanders 

Participate in ground           0620                       0720 
reconnaissance conducted by 
battalion commander 

Conduct ground reconnaissance   0720                       0810 
with commanders of 
subordinate and attached 
subunits 

Issue verbal operation order    0810                       0910 
and organize coordination, 
system of fire, comprehensive 
support to battle, and 
C[.sup]2[/] 

Company occupation of           0910                       1030 
strongpoint 

Report occupation of defense    1030 
to battalion commander 


  [Begin side line] In the situation estimate the 
company (battalion) commander clarifies the following: enemy 
makeup, situation, status, degree of protection, possible 
forward movement routes and deployment lines, strong and weak 
points and nature of his operations; makeup, situation, status, 
capabilities, degree of protection and state of supply of his 
own, attached and supporting subunits; makeup, situation, nature 
of terrain, and its effect on company (battalion) operations, 
and the most likely directions of enemy aircraft and helicopter 
operations at low and extremely low altitudes; and the NBC 
situation. 
  In addition, in the situation estimate the state of weather, 
time of year and day and their effect on preparing and 
conducting defensive battle are taken into account. 
  As a result of the situation estimate the company commander 
draws conclusions, based on which he subsequently makes his 
decision. 
  The enemy estimate in organizing the defense is 
made based on his operating tactics with consideration of the 
nature of terrain and other situation conditions. An enemy who 
may attack in the company (battalion) defense frontage, his 
probable axes of forward movement and deployment lines, methods 
and axes of assault, procedure for enemy buildup of efforts in 
the course of battle, and most likely directions of his aircraft 
and helicopter operations are estimated especially carefully. 
  The company (battalion) commander determines the following 
in 
conclusions from the enemy estimate: enemy makeup and 
capabilities, probable axis and time of launching an attack; 
axis where it is advisable to concentrate main efforts and 
terrain sector on whose holding the stability of company 
(battalion) defense will depend; and alignment of the battle 
formation with consideration of taking maximum advantage of the 
capabilities of one's weapons and the terrain. 
  An estimate of own subunits is necessary for 
taking measures which will permit preparing the company 
(battalion) for performing the assigned mission and correctly 
determining the place of subunits in the company (battalion) 
battle formation and their missions considering their state of 
supply and combat capabilities. 
  In studying the situation of his own, attached and 
supporting 
subunits the company (battalion) commander determines within 
what time periods it is possible to establish the battle 
formation and what maneuver must be executed to arrive at the 
designated strongpoint (defense area). 
  In estimating the status of his subunit, he clarifies the 
strength level of the company (battalion), degree of radioactive 
exposure, morale, mental state and combat experience of 
personnel, commanders' job qualities, and technical condition of 
combat vehicles. Then he determines capabilities for combating 
enemy tanks and other armored targets as well as steps which 
must be taken to replenish supplies. 
  In conclusions from the estimate of friendly troops the 
company (battalion) commander outlines the following: what 
subunits are advisable to have on the axis of concentration of 
main efforts and how to distribute means of reinforcement and 
align the battle formation; in what sequence to engage the enemy 
on his approach to the FEBA, during his deployment, when he 
launches an assault, and when he penetrates; what measures to 
take to replenish supplies. 
  In the estimate of the adjacent subunits it is 
necessary to analyze their makeup, situation, nature of 
operations and missions being performed. As a result of the 
estimate of adjacent subunits the company (battalion) commander 
draws conclusions in which the following are determined: 
influence of adjacent subunits on performance of assigned 
missions and on choice of axis of concentration of main efforts; 
with which of the adjacent subunits and in the performance of 
which missions to have closest coordination; measures for 
securing flanks, boundaries and gaps (what forces and assets are 
assigned and the procedure for their operations). 
  The terrain estimate is made by the commander 
initially by studying it on approaches and then in the depth of 
the defense. 
  On approaches to the defense and ahead of the FEBA the 
general nature of terrain (open, offering concealment, semiopen) 
and its influence on the method by which the enemy launches an 
assault are taken into account. Based on this the following are 
determined: probable axes of enemy forward movement, his lines 
of deployment and departure, axis of concentration of main 
efforts and axis of his air operations; firing position areas of 
artillery, mortars and ATGM's and areas of COP's; terrain 
sectors which hamper operations of fighting vehicles and affect 
organization of the system of fire; and places for emplacing 
obstacles ahead of the FEBA. Then the axes are determined for 
which there is a good view to maximum depth. 
  In estimating terrain in the depth of the defense, he also 
studies its general nature (protective and concealing 
properties, condition of roads and so on) and influence on enemy 
operations. The following are determined based on this: axes of 
concentration of main efforts of the enemy and one's own 
subunits and terrain sectors on whose holding stability of the 
defense depends; alignment of the battle formation; trench trace 
and strongpoint locations. In addition, conditions for 
maskirovka, observation and conduct of fire toward the enemy, on 
flanks and in gaps are studied and COP locations of platoons, 
companies and the battalion are selected. 
  The following are determined in conclusions: probable axis 
of 
enemy assault and commence-fire lines for various weapons; axis 
of concentration of main efforts and terrain sector on whose 
holding the stability of the defense depends; alignment of the 
battle formation and locations of platoon (company) strongpoints. 
  In estimating the NBC situation, the company (battalion) 
commander studies the degree and nature of radioactive and 
chemical contamination of terrain in the strongpoint (defense 
area) for the given time and determines the level and doses of 
radiation which personnel received and the effect of these 
factors on conduct of the defense. 
  In his conclusions the company (battalion) commander 
outlines 
the following: basic measures for protection against mass 
destruction weapons and for restoring combat effectiveness; the 
battle formation and locations of strongpoints with 
consideration of the nature of terrain and its contamination; 
forces and assets for performing radiological and chemical 
reconnaissance and their missions. [End side line] 
  Situation estimate 
  The enemy is concentrating his main body in assembly areas 
for the attack [iskhodnyy rayon dlya nastupleniya]. Counting the 
time needed for replenishing supplies and organizing for battle, 
his attack should be expected on the morning of 18 June, arrival 
of forward subunits at the defensive line by 1330-1400 and of 
the main body by 1500-1600 hours 18 June. Operations of his 
aircraft and raiding and reconnaissance parties are possible at 
any time with the beginning of the attack. Konyayevo, Stepanovo, 
Hill 119.2; and Stepanovo, Ivanovo should be considered the most 
likely axes of enemy approach to the defensive line. 
  Enemy deployment into platoon columns is possible on the 
line 
Bezymyannaya Hill, Hill 128.0, and possible line of departure is 
rocks, lone tree. Considering enemy operating tactics, it can be 
presumed that an attack of up to one and one-half company task 
forces, the basis of which will be tanks, should be expected in 
the first echelon ahead of the company defense frontage. In the 
course of battle the enemy may commit the battalion second 
echelon (up to a mechanized infantry or tank task force) with 
the taking of platoon strongpoints located on the FEBA. 
  Conclusions: 
  1. The attacking enemy's most probable axes of operations 
are 
along field roads. 
  2. Company main efforts must be concentrated on holding Hill 
136.8, Ploskaya Hill and Dlinnaya Hill. 
  3. Organize the defense as a system of platoon strongpoints 
prepared for a perimeter defense. It is advisable to align the 
battle formation in two echelons, with two MRP's reinforced by 
tanks in the first echelon and one platoon in the second. 
  The company is at 95 percent strength in personnel, weapons 
and vehicles. There is 0.8 of a fueling. The personnel 
understrength will not substantially affect performance of the 
combat mission. The political attitude and morale of personnel 
is good; 20 percent of them have experience in conducting combat 
operations. The attached TP is at full strength in personnel, 
vehicles and ammunition. 
  Conclusions: 
  1. Based on the strength level of platoons, their training 
level and commanders' experience it is advisable to have 3rd MRP 
on the right flank, 2nd MRP on the left flank and 1st MRP in the 
second echelon. 
  2. Dispose attached tanks in first echelon strongpoints. 
  3. The company's basic efforts must be concentrated on the 
Stepanovo, Dlinnaya Hill axis. 
  4. Refuel equipment by 0730 16 June and complete servicing 
and maintenance of vehicles and preparation of weapons for 
battle by 0830. 
  Subunits of 1st MRB, 3rd MRR are defending in front in the 
security zone with the mission of holding up the enemy, 
inflicting damage on him, forcing him to deploy the main body 
and attack in a direction unfavorable for him, and gaining time 
for preparing the defense. 2nd MRP, 4th MRC is shifting to the 
defense on the right on Hill 137.0 with the mission of 
preventing penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in the 
direction of Grusha Hill, Kuskovo. 
  1st MRC, 1st MRB is shifting to the defense on the left. Its 
mission is to hold the strongpoint and prevent enemy penetration 
in the direction of Hill 99.8, Karevo. 
  Gaps between adjacent subunits are 600-700 m, which requires 
covering them by fire not only of small arms, but also of AT 
weapons. 
  Conclusions: 
  1. To secure flanks it is necessary to assign platoons 
secondary sectors of fire and assign missions to the following 
weapons: tank and machinegunner in 3rd MRP and BMP in 2nd MRP. 
  2. Organize coordination with adjacent subunits to destroy 
the enemy who has penetrated into gaps. 
  Terrain relief ahead of the FEBA is level, with the presence 
of small hills and individual groves, and is accessible for 
operations of all kinds of vehicles. Dirt roads leading from 
west to east toward our FEBA create favorable conditions for 
moving forward from the depth. 
  Berezovyy Forest and Dubovaya and Kruglaya groves as well as 
Bezymyannaya Hill and Hill 128.0 enable the enemy to move 
forward and deploy into approach march and battle formations 
covertly. Enemy deployment into platoon columns is possible with 
his arrival at the line Bezymyannaya Hill, Hill 128.0. 
  Almost all terrain closer to Bezymyannaya Hill and Berezovyy 
Forest is open and easily viewed from our side. 
  The presence of Bezymyannaya Hill, Hill 128.0 and Hill 80.1 
will allow the enemy to conduct observation in our disposition 
up to the line Pridorozhnaya Grove, Malaya Grove. An enemy 
assault most likely will begin from the line rocks, ruins, which 
is 400-600 m from our FEBA. The most convenient axes of advance 
of enemy tanks are along the roads Stepanovo, Hill 119.2; and 
Stepanovo, Ivanovo. 
  The marshy sector on right and left flanks will hamper enemy 
use of tanks in gaps with the adjacent subunit on the right. 
Terrain in the strongpoint of the company and of adjacent 
subunits basically is level and open and permits a favorable 
disposition of platoon strongpoints by taking advantage of Hill 
136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Dlinnaya Hill, with a good field of view 
and fire in the direction of the enemy. 
  Conclusions: 
  1. Based on terrain conditions, the probable axis of 
concentration of main enemy efforts will be in the direction 
Stepanovo, Dlinnaya Hill. 
  2. Dispose platoon strongpoints as follows: 3rd MRP on Hill 
136.8, 2nd MRP on Ploskaya Hill, 1st MRP on Dlinnaya Hill. 
  [Begin side line] After analyzing the mission received and 
analyzing conclusions from the situation estimate, the company 
(battalion) commander makes his decision. 
  The basis of the decision is the commander's 
concept, which specifies the following: axis of concentration of 
main efforts and terrain areas on whose holding stability of the 
defense depends; procedure for fire engagement of the enemy on 
his approach to the FEBA, his deployment, and launching of his 
attack; procedure for destroying an enemy who has penetrated the 
defense; axis of possible counterattacks; battle formation and 
system of strongpoints and firing positions; and methods of 
deceiving the enemy. [End side line] 
  Decision (concept) 
  I decided: concentrate main efforts on axis 
Stepanovo, Kedrovka and firmly hold Hill 136.8, Dlinnaya Hill. 
  Exploiting results of air strikes and taking advantage of 
artillery fire and favorable terrain conditions, inflict damage 
on the enemy and repel his assault by the fire of tanks, BMP's 
and small arms beginning from line Dubovaya Grove, dairy farm; 
and as he approaches the FEBA. 
  In case the enemy penetrates the strongpoint, firmly hold 
Hill 136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Dlinnaya Hill and inflict damage on 
and destroy him by flanking and cross fire of all weapons and by 
actions of fire ambushes and the armored group from occupied and 
alternate positions. 
  Align battle formation in two echelons: 2nd and 3rd MRP's 
reinforced by 1st TP and grenade launcher squad in first echelon 
and 1st MRP in second. 
  Mislead the enemy regarding alignment of the battle 
formation 
by creating a dummy platoon strongpoint in the center of the 
battle formation and dummy tank and BMP firing positions 
simulating their real position. 
  [Begin side line] Having made the decision, the company 
commander communicated it to his deputy and to platoon 
commanders and traveled out to work on the terrain with the 
battalion commander. On completing the work he arrived at Hill 
136.8 by 0720 hours 16 June to conduct ground reconnaissance 
with subordinate commanders. 
  During ground reconnaissance the company (battalion) 
commander usually studies terrain, designates (indicates) 
reference points and updates the following: 

  -  situation, possible enemy forward movement routes 
(assembly areas) and deployment lines, and likely avenues of 
tank approach; 
  -  FEBA trace, strongpoint (defense area), 
boundaries and missions of the company (battalion); 
  -  axis of 
concentration of main efforts and terrain sectors on whose 
holding stability of the defense depends; 
  -  trench and 
communication trench trace, platoon (company) strongpoints, 
combat security outpost position, places for arranging fire 
ambushes and area for armored group if it is established; 
  -  positions of attached tank (motorized rifle) subunit and of 
other means of reinforcement; 
  -  zones of fire of platoons 
(companies) and fire concentration sectors; primary and 
alternate (temporary) positions of organic and attached 
artillery; firing positions and zones of fire (sector of fire), 
fire concentration sectors and defensive fire lines of subunits 
(weapons) intended for securing flanks and boundaries with 
adjacent subunits and gaps between platoons (companies); 
primary, alternate (temporary) launch (firing) positions of air 
defense subunit and its maneuver routes; axes and deployment 
lines for counterattacks of TC and BMP-equipped MRC in the 
second echelon (reserve), and lines of firing positions for the 
armored group; 
  -  sequence and time periods of engineer 
preparation, locations for laying minefields and passages left 
in them, and locations of dummy strongpoints, positions and 
trenches; 
  -  measures for protecting against enemy mass 
destruction and precision weapons, securing boundaries and 
flanks, destroying airborne assault forces, raiding and 
reconnaissance parties, and airmobile parties, and [protecting 
against] subunit operations at night and under other conditions 
of limited visibility; 
  -  locations of COP and of technical 
support and rear subunits as well as of motor vehicles of 
motorized rifle subunits. [End side line] 

  Ground reconnaissance 
  [Begin side line] After briefing his decision to the 
battalion commander at 0700 hours 16 June on Hill 136.8, the 
company commander selected as reference points local features 
easily visible day and night and most resistant to destruction, 
numbered them and determined distances to them. 
  Platoon commanders and the 1st TP commander arrived on Hill 
136.8 at 0720. The company commander oriented the officers on 
the terrain, indicated to subordinates the reference points, 
local features and their codenames ahead of the company defense 
frontage and on its flanks, and began ground reconnaissance. 
[End side line] 
  The enemy is concentrating his main body in areas for the 
attack along the state border 70 km from the defensive line 
(points it out on the map). His launching of an attack is 
possible on the morning of 18 June and arrival of forward 
subunits at the FEBA should be expected by 1330-1400 hours and 
arrival of the main body by 1500-1600 hours 18 June. Operations 
of enemy aviation and raiding and reconnaissance parties are 
possible at any time from the moment he invades. 
  Based on terrain conditions, the most likely axes of enemy 
approach to the strongpoint occupied by the company will be the 
roads Konyayevo, Stepanovo, Hill 119.2; and Stepanovo, Ivanovo. 
  Enemy deployment should be expected on the following lines: 
into platoon columns--Bezymyannaya Hill, Hill 128.0; into battle 
formation--rocks, lone tree. 
  If our withdrawing troop subunits do not succeed in 
disengaging from the enemy, his arrival at the FEBA should be 
expected in approach march or battle formation. 
  Considering terrain relief features and enemy operating 
tactics, up to one and one-half company task forces, the basis 
of which will be tanks, may attack ahead of the company defense 
frontage. In the course of battle, commitment of the battalion 
second echelon (up to a mechanized infantry or tank company task 
force) is possible along field roads (indicates them on the 
terrain) with the taking of first echelon platoon strongpoints. 
The most likely axis of concentration of main enemy efforts is 
Hill 80.1, Kedrovka and the most convenient axes of attack of 
his tanks are along the roads Stepanovo, Hill 119.2; Stepanovo, 
Ivanovo. The possibility of tanks bypassing Hill 136.8 from the 
north is not precluded. 
  The presence of marshy sectors in the gap with 4th MRC and 
ahead of the south slopes of Ploskaya Hill will hamper the enemy 
in using tanks on these axes. 
  Enemy air and helicopter strikes should be expected from the 
Kruglaya Grove, Pridorozhnaya Grove and the Stepanovo, Dlinnaya 
Hill axes. 
  5th MRC with 1st TP and the grenade launcher squad is 
shifting to defense of the strongpoint of north slopes of Hill 
136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Kedrovka, having the FEBA along the line 
lone house, bushes on south slopes of Hill 136.8, west edge of 
Gustaya Grove, Ploskaya, rocks. The company is concentrating 
main efforts on the axis Hill 80.1, Kedrovka and on firmly 
holding Hill 136.8, Dlinnaya Hill with the mission of preventing 
penetration of enemy tanks and infantry. Zone of fire: on 
right--lone house, north edge of Kruglaya Grove; on left--rocks, 
Hill 74.5. Secondary sector of fire--to right in direction of 
ruins. Company fire concentration sectors: SO-1--rocks, bushes; 
SO-2--lone tree, curve in road. 
  3rd MRP with grenade launcher squad in coordination with 
tanks Nos 206 and 207 is to defend strongpoint of lone house, 
bushes on south slopes of Hill 136.8, Ovalnaya Grove (excluded). 
Concentrate main efforts on the Nizkiye Bushes, Ovalnaya Grove 
axis with mission of inflicting damage on enemy by fire of all 
weapons and preventing penetration of his tanks and infantry 
along field road. Prepare one squad position in depth of 
strongpoint 100 m behind trench to strengthen stability of 
defense. Zone of fire: on right-- lone house, north edge of 
Kruglaya Grove; on left--bushes, Hill 80.1. Secondary sector of 
fire- -to right in direction of ruins. Fire concentration 
sector- -clump of trees, Barrow +2. Secure gap with 2nd MRP, 4th 
MRC by fire of BMP and light machinegun. 
  2nd MRP in coordination with Tank No 208 is to defend 
strongpoint of ruins, rocks, black knoll. Concentrate main 
efforts on holding Ploskaya Hill with mission of preventing 
penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in direction of clump of 
trees, Sukhaya Grove. Have squad positions in one trench. Zone 
of fire: on right--ruins, Nizkiye Bushes; on left--rocks, Hill 
74.5. Secondary sector of fire--to right in direction of Barrow 
+2. Fire concentration sector--clump of birches, corner of green 
field. Secure gap with 3rd MRP by fire of tank and light 
machinegun. 
  1st MRP is the second echelon and is to defend strongpoint 
of 
pine on north slopes of Dlinnaya Hill, field road, Kedrovka, 
having the FEBA along west slopes of Dlinnaya Hill. Mission: 
prevent penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in direction of 
Gustaya Grove, Kedrovka. Have one squad position in depth of 
strongpoint 150 m behind trench. Zone of fire: on right--pine, 
clump of birches; on left--knoll, curve in road. Secondary 
sector of fire--to right in direction of Ovalnaya Grove. Fire 
concentration sector-- southeast edge of Gustaya Grove. 
  1st TP is to prevent penetration of enemy tanks in direction 
of Hill 80.1, Dlinnaya Hill. Have tank firing positions as 
follows: No 206 near bushes on north slopes of Hill 136.8. 
Primary sector of fire--east edge of Kruglaya Grove, Nizkiye 
Bushes; secondary--to right in direction of ruins. Alternate 
firing position near knoll. Primary sector of fire--Redkaya 
Grove, rocks; secondary--to right in direction of bushes in 
marsh. No 207- -near wide bush on south slopes of Hill 136.8. 
Primary sector of fire-- felled area, Hill 80.1; secondary--to 
left in direction of clump of birches. Alternate firing position 
near knoll on east slopes of Hill 136.8. Sector of fire--Hill 
129.0, lone tree; secondary--to right in direction of Hill 
119.2. No 208--near knoll on north slopes of Ploskaya Hill. 
Primary sector of fire-- Nizkiye Bushes, north outskirts of 
Stepanovo; secondary--to left in direction of Hill 74.5. 
Alternate firing position--200 m southeast of primary firing 
position. Sector of fire--south outskirts of Stepanovo, Hill 
99.8; secondary- -to left in direction of Kamennaya Hill (not on 
diagram). Platoon fire concentration sector--Nizkiye Bushes, 
ruins. 
  Commence-fire lines: ATGM's--Dubovaya Grove, dairy farm; 
tanks--Grusha Hill, Hill 74.5; BMP guns and machineguns--east 
edge of Kruglaya Grove, Hill 80.1, lone tree; prepare zone of 
continuous fire along line Redkaya Grove, Barrow +2, Pit -3. 
  The company armored group consists of 1st MRP fighting 
vehicles. By 1400 hours 17 June it concentrates in Pridorozhnaya 
Grove in readiness to destroy enemy tanks. I will assign 
missions personally. Group commander is deputy commander of 1st 
MRP. Tank No 207 will operate in a fire ambush; ambush site near 
ruins on north slopes of Hill 80.1. 
  Begin engineer preparation of strongpoints immediately as 
they are occupied by the platoons and as missions are assigned. 
First and second trenches will be dug mechanically from 1040 
until 1400 hours. Complete first- order work by 1030 17 June, 
second-order by 0400 19 June. Combat engineer subunits begin 
laying minefields ahead of strongpoints of 2nd and 3rd MRP's 
from 1220 hours; No 1 extending 200 m in sector of grassy knoll, 
ditch; No 2 extending 450 m in sector of broken birch, 100 m 
west of Sosnovaya Grove, pit; No 3 extending 250 m ahead of 
right flank of 1st MRP. It is planned to make an AT ditch by 
explosive method ahead of right flank of 3rd MRP. A mined abatis 
is being emplaced on road in Sosnovaya Grove. 1st MRP commander 
is to place five persons at the disposal of the combat engineer 
subunit commander from 1820 until 1900 hours. 
  A passage will be left in the minefield along the road ahead 
of the 3rd MRP frontage for passage of our withdrawing troop 
subunits. Commanders of 2nd and 3rd MRP's are to be ready to 
provide fire cover for the combat engineers' work of laying 
minefields. Ammunition supply point and company medical aid 
station are in Malaya Grove. Company COP is on northwest slopes 
of Dlinnaya Hill as of 1025. 
  [Begin side line] After completing ground reconnaissance 
work, the company commander issued a verbal operation order on 
Dlinnaya Hill and organized coordination. 
  In the operation order for defense the company 
(battalion) commander indicates the following: 
  First paragraph--brief conclusions from enemy 
estimate. 
  Second paragraph--objectives and targets to be 
engaged by senior commander's weapons ahead of the company 
(battalion) defense frontage, and missions of adjacent subunits. 
  Third paragraph--company (battalion) combat 
mission and the commander's concept. 
  Fourth paragraph--combat missions are assigned 
following the words "I order": 
  --For first echelon platoons (companies)--means of 
reinforcement; strongpoints and axes for concentrating main 
efforts; missions for repelling an attack and destroying an 
enemy who has penetrated the defense; number of trenches and 
their trace; zones of fire, secondary sectors of fire and fire 
concentration sectors; with what forces and assets to secure 
flanks, boundaries and gaps and who is responsible for them; who 
is supporting; 
  --For second echelon platoon (company)--the very 
same as for first echelon platoons (companies), and for the 
company in addition the axes and deployment lines for 
counterattacks; for the TC and BMP- equipped MRC in addition, 
lines of firing positions; 
  --For reserve--strongpoint (concentration area), 
missions to be ready to execute; for the TC and BMP-equipped MRC 
in addition, lines of firing positions; 
  --For armored group--makeup, area and time of 
assembly in it, lines of firing positions and missions to be 
ready to execute; 
  --For fire ambush--makeup, location, missions for 
destroying an attacking enemy and procedure of operations after 
performing the mission; 
  --For attached artillery subunits and the mortar 
(artillery) battery--procedure for providing fire support 
of combat security outpost, missions for fire damage of enemy on 
his approach to FEBA, his deployment, his launching of the 
attack and his penetration of the defense, and for support of 
second echelon counterattack; and primary and alternate 
(temporary) firing positions; 
  --For grenade launcher subunit--missions for 
supporting first echelon companies and repelling an enemy 
infantry assault; primary and alternate positions, zone of fire, 
secondary sector of fire, fire concentration sectors and 
defensive fire lines; 
  --For AT subunit--place in battle formation and 
direction of possible operations, deployment lines, procedure 
for occupying them and missions to be ready to execute; signals 
for commencing and ceasing fire, procedure of operations after 
performing the mission; 
  --For air defense subunit--missions, launch 
(firing) positions, sectors for reconnaissance of the air enemy 
and conduct of fire, time and degree of readiness, procedure for 
conducting fire; 
  --For subunit assigned to combat security outpost- 
-position, mission, what weapons assigned for support, procedure 
for calling in their fire, and procedure for withdrawal. 
  Fifth paragraph--expenditure of missiles and 
ammunition for conducting defensive battle. 
  Sixth paragraph--readiness time to perform the 
combat mission, time of occupying the defense, readiness time of 
system of fire and engineer obstacles, sequence and time periods 
for performing measures of maskirovka and engineer preparation 
of the strongpoint (defense area). 
  Seventh paragraph--place and time of deployment of 
COP, and the deputies. [End side line] 
  Operation order 
  1. Enemy is concentrating subunits and units in assembly 
areas for the attack 70 km from the defensive line. Launching of 
an attack is possible on the morning of 18 June, and arrival of 
forward subunits at the defensive line by 1330-1400 hours and of 
the main body by 1500-1600 hours 18 June. Operations of his 
aviation and raiding and reconnaissance parties are possible at 
any time. 
  2. Subunits of 1/3 MRR are operating in front in the 
security 
zone with the mission of holding up the enemy, forcing him to 
deploy, inflicting losses on him and gaining time for preparing 
the defense. 
  The enemy is engaged by air strikes and by concentrated and 
defensive fire of the senior commander's artillery during battle 
in the security zone, his approach to the defense, his 
deployment and his assault. 
  4th MRC is defending on Hill 137.0 on right with the mission 
of preventing enemy penetration in direction of Grusha 
Hill, Kuskovo. 
  On the left 1st MRC, 1st MRB is defending the strongpoint of 
Tankovaya Hill, cemetery (not on diagram), 
Karevo with the mission of preventing enemy 
penetration in direction of Hill 99.8, Karevo (not on 
diagram). 
  3. 5th MRC with 2nd TP and grenade launcher squad is 
shifting 
to defense of the strongpoint of north slopes of Hill 136.8, 
Ploskaya Hill, Kedrovka with the mission 
of preventing penetration of enemy tanks and infantry in 
direction of Stepanovo, Kedrovka. Have FEBA (first 
trench) along line of barn, bushes, west edge of 
Gustaya Grove, west slopes of Ploskaya 
Hill, rocks; second trench--west slopes of Hill 129.0, west 
slopes of Dlinnaya Hill, east edge of 
Malaya Grove. Zone of fire: on right--lone tree, 
north edge of Kruglaya Grove; on left--rocks, lone 
tree. Secondary sectors of fire--to right in direction of ruins. 
Company fire concentration sectors: SO- 1--rocks, bushes; 
SO-2--lone tree, curve in road. 
  1st Battery of regimental artillery battalion is supporting. 
  I decided: concentrate main efforts on axis Stepanovo, 
Kedrovka while firmly holding Hill 136.8, 
Dlinnaya Hill. 
  Exploiting results of the senior commander's air strikes and 
artillery fire and taking advantage of favorable terrain 
conditions, inflict damage on the enemy and repel his assault by 
the fire of tanks, BMP's and small arms beginning with the line 
Dubovaya Grove, dairy farm and as he approaches the 
FEBA. 
  In case the enemy penetrates the strongpoint, firmly hold 
Hill 136.8, Ploskaya Hill, Dlinnaya Hill, 
inflict damage on him and destroy him by flanking and cross fire 
of all weapons and by operations of fire ambushes and the 
armored group from occupied and alternate positions. 
  Align battle formation in two echelons: 2nd and 3rd MRP's 
reinforced by a TP and grenade launcher squad in first echelon 
and 1st MRP in second. 
  Mislead the enemy regarding alignment of the battle 
formation 
by creating a dummy platoon strongpoint in the center of the 
battle formation, tank and BMP firing positions simulating their 
real position, and a ramified system of trenches and 
communication trenches. 
  4. I order: 
  3rd MRP with grenade launcher squad in coordination with 
tanks Nos 206 and 207 is to defend strongpoint of lone tree, 
bushes on south slopes of Hill 136.8, Ovalnaya Grove 
(excluded) with mission of preventing enemy penetration along 
road. Concentrate main efforts on axis of Nizkiye 
Bushes, Ovalnaya Grove. Have FEBA along line of lone 
tree, bushes. Battle formation is in two lines. 
  Zone of fire: on right--lone tree, north edge of 
Kruglaya Grove; on left--bushes, Hill 80.1. Secondary 
sector of fire--to right in direction of ruins. Fire 
concentration sector--clump of trees, Barrow +2. Secure gap with 
adjacent subunit on right by fire of BMP and light machinegun. 
  2nd MRP in coordination with Tank No 208 is to defend 
strongpoint of ruins, rocks, black knoll. Concentrate main 
efforts on holding Ploskaya Hill with mission of 
preventing enemy penetration in direction of clump of trees, 
Sukhaya Grove. Have FEBA along west slopes of 
Ploskaya Hill. Have battle formation in a line. Zone 
of fire: on right--ruins, Nizkiye Bushes; on 
left--rocks, Hill 74.5. Secondary sector of fire--to right in 
direction of Barrow +2. Platoon fire concentration sector--clump 
of birches, corner of green field. Secure gap with 3rd MRP by 
fire of tank and light machinegun. 2nd MRP commander is 
responsible. 
  1st MRP is the second echelon and is to defend strongpoint 
of 
pine on north slopes of Dlinnaya Hill, field road, 
Kedrovka with mission of preventing enemy penetration 
in direction of Gustaya Grove, Kedrovka. 
Concentrate main efforts on right flank, have trench on west 
slope of Dlinnaya Hill. Battle formation in two 
lines. Zone of fire: on right--pine, clump of birches; on 
left--knoll, curve in road. Secondary sector of fire--to right 
in direction of Ovalnaya Grove. Fire concentration 
sector-- southeast edge of Gustaya Grove. 
  1st TP is to prevent penetration of enemy tanks in direction 
of Hill 80.1, Dlinnaya Hill by fire from occupied 
positions. Have tank firing positions as follows: 206--near 
bushes on north slopes of Hill 136.8. Primary sector of 
fire--east edge of Kruglaya Grove, Nizkiye 
Bushes; secondary sector of fire--to right in direction of 
ruins. Alternate firing position--near knoll. Primary sector of 
fire-- Redkaya Grove, rocks; secondary--to right in 
direction of bushes in marsh. 207--near wide bush on south 
slopes of Hill 136.8. Primary sector of fire--felled area, Hill 
80.1; secondary--to left in direction of clump of birches. 
Alternate firing position--near knoll on east slopes of Hill 
136.8. Primary sector of fire--Hill 129.0, lone tree; 
secondary--to right in direction of Hill 119.2. 208--near knoll 
on north slopes of Ploskaya Hill. Primary sector of 
fire--Nizkiye Bushes, north edge of 
Stepanovo; secondary--to left in direction of Hill 
74.5. Alternate firing position--200 m southeast of primary 
firing position. Primary sector of fire--south edge of 
Stepanovo, Kamennaya Hill. Platoon fire 
concentration sector--Nizkiye Bushes, ruins. 
  Company armored group consists of 1st MRP BMP's. Assemble in 
Pridorozhnaya Grove by 1400 hours 17 June in 
readiness to destroy enemy tanks from dummy strongpoint, close 
breaches formed as a result of enemy fire strikes, and cover gap 
between 3rd and 2nd MRP's; operate in own strongpoints and from 
following lines of firing positions: No 1--bushes on south 
slopes of Hill 136.8, lone tree; No 2--south slopes of 
Dlinnaya Hill, Malaya Grove. Group 
commander is deputy commander of 1st MRP. 
  Fire ambush is Tank No 207, ambush site is near ruins. On 
north slopes of Hill 80.1 be ready to inflict damage on enemy 
tanks by direct fire, prevent their organized deployment into 
battle formation, and occupy firing position on south slopes of 
Hill 136.8. 
  5. Ammunition expenditure for performing combat mission is 
0.7 unit of fire for tanks and BMP's and 0.4 unit of fire for 
small arms. 
  6. Occupy defense by 1030 hours 16 June. Readiness of system 
of fire 1120 16 June, system of engineer obstacles by 0700 17 
June, and first-order engineer work by 1030 17 June. 
  7. Company COP is on northwest slopes of Dlinnaya 
Hill as of 1025 hours. Deputy is 1st MRP commander. 
  [Begin side line] After assigning combat missions, the 
company (battalion) commander organizes coordination, the 
system of fire, C[.sup]2[/], and protection against mass 
destruction and precision weapons. 
  The commander organizes coordination by missions, probable 
axes of enemy attack, time, and place by running through the 
main tactical episodes in terms of possible actions of his 
subunits. All work is done with the involvement of commanders of 
subordinate and attached subunits by the method of instructions 
or the method of subordinate commanders' reports with a 
successive rehearsal of actions of all subunits. 
  When time is extremely limited, especially when shifting to 
the defense in direct contact with the enemy, the commander 
usually organizes coordination by the method of instructions. 
  In organizing coordination the company (battalion) commander 
coordinates actions of platoons (companies) among themselves and 
with actions of the armored group, fire ambushes, subunits of 
artillery and other weapons, and adjacent subunits for 
destroying the enemy during his forward movement to the FEBA, 
when he deploys, when he launches the assault (in the attack 
position), and when repelling an assault of enemy tanks and 
infantry during penetration of the strongpoint (defense area). 
  The company (battalion) commander indicates (updates) the 
following for engaging the enemy during his forward movement, 
when deploying and when launching an attack (or in the attack 
position): fire missions for artillery subunits, grenade 
launcher subunit, AT subunit and other weapons for destroying 
the enemy; procedure for actions of subunits defending a forward 
position (combat security outpost position) with actions of 
first echelon platoons (companies) and subunits of attached and 
supporting artillery for holding a forward position (combat 
security outpost position), and the procedure for withdrawal of 
subunits defending it; procedure for actions of duty tanks, 
BMP's (BTR's) and other weapons (which ones to assign from whom 
and to where) and subunits for destroying individual enemy 
groups attempting to perform reconnaissance, breach obstacles or 
penetrate into the depth of the defense. 
  In organizing coordination for repelling an enemy tank and 
infantry assault ahead of the FEBA, the company (battalion) 
commander determines (updates) the following: fire missions for 
artillery, grenade launcher subunit and AT subunit for 
destroying (neutralizing) the enemy ahead of the FEBA, on flanks 
and in gaps between strongpoints; procedure for conducting 
observation and for subunits to move out of cover; commence-fire 
line for tanks, BMP's, ATGM launchers, grenade launchers and 
other AT weapons, as well as platoon (company) fire 
concentration sectors on the most important axes and the 
procedure for conducting fire; procedure for actions of first 
and second echelon platoons (companies) with actions of the 
armored group, artillery subunits, grenade launcher subunit, AT 
subunit, attached combat engineer subunit, subunits (weapons) 
operating in fire ambushes, and roving weapons for repelling 
enemy tank and infantry assaults, cutting off infantry from 
tanks, destroying the enemy ahead of the FEBA, on flanks, in 
gaps and on boundaries with adjacent subunits and when he 
penetrates the defense, and combating enemy airborne assault 
forces; procedure for commencing and conducting fire against 
enemy aircraft and helicopters by air defense and motorized 
rifle (tank) subunits; methods and signals for recognition of 
friendly aircraft and helicopters and for marking one's 
position; procedure for actions of forward air controllers and 
recognition and identification posts (points). 
  To destroy the enemy on an axis of possible penetration, the 
company (battalion) commander indicates (specifies) the 
following: missions for artillery and weapons to destroy a 
penetrated enemy and the procedure for performing them; terrain 
sector which must be held firmly to prevent a further spread of 
the enemy into the depth and toward the flanks, and with what 
subunits to hold it; procedure for actions of subunits and 
conduct of fire. 
  In organizing coordination by axes of counterattacks to be 
conducted by the battalion (regimental) commander, the company 
(battalion) commander indicates axes of counterattacks and 
missions for subunits intended for destroying the enemy by fire 
of company (battalion) assets during forward movement and 
deployment of counterattacking subunits, and actions of company 
subunits when they launch an assault. 
  The content of questions to be decided in organizing 
coordination can vary. In each specific case it will be 
determined by situation conditions, time available and the 
commander's experience. [End side line] 
  Coordination instructions 
  In destroying the enemy during his forward 
movement toward the FEBA and his deployment: aircraft and 
artillery neutralize him on forward movement routes and 
deployment lines under the senior commander's plan; with the 
beginning of enemy fire preparation, at the signal Grom 
[Thunder] or a series of red flares, shelter personnel in 
covered slit trenches (dugouts), in readiness to quickly take 
their places at positions to repel the assault; observers, duty 
weapons and squad and platoon commanders remain to observe the 
enemy; BMP and tank crews are in the vehicles; with the enemy's 
arrival at the line Bezymyannaya Hill, Hill 128.0 artillery 
inflicts damage on him by fire concentration against sectors 201 
(edge of Dubovaya Grove), 202 (where road exits Berezovyy 
forest), and 203 (intersection of field roads), neutralizing his 
personnel and weapons; the company destroys his armored 
vehicles, above all tanks, by ATGM and tank fire. The TP is in 
readiness to conduct concentrated fire at the signal Udar 
[Strike]-111 or a green flare; as the enemy approaches the 
forward edge of the company strongpoint, artillery neutralizes 
him by concentrated fire and the company destroys enemy tanks by 
fire of tanks, ATGM's and BMP guns, and destroys dismounted 
infantry by machinegun fire. 
  In performing the mission of repelling an enemy tank and 
infantry assault ahead of the FEBA: aircraft continue 
to deliver strikes against enemy artillery and second echelons; 
with the enemy's arrival at the line of east slopes of Grusha 
Hill, west edge of Stepanovo, at the signal "To battle" or a 
series of green flares, personnel occupy positions and make 
ready to repel the assault, and artillery and mortars inflict 
damage on tanks and other armored vehicles and place the enemy 
battle formation in disarray by standing barrier fire against 
lines Sosna [Pine] and Bereza [Birch] and by rolling barrier 
fire Tigr [Tiger]; when the enemy launches an assault tanks and 
BMP's destroy enemy tanks and APC's by fire of guns and ATGM's. 
At the signal Udar [Strike]-111 or a green flare, 2nd and 3rd 
MRP's conduct concentrated fire from all kinds of small arms and 
the armored group destroys enemy tanks by BMP fire from the 
dummy strongpoint; as the enemy approaches the FEBA, fire of all 
company weapons is brought to highest intensity; tanks are 
destroyed by fire of BMP's, tanks and RPG's; enemy infantry is 
cut off from tanks and destroyed by small arms and machinegun 
fire; the armored group continues to destroy enemy tanks and at 
the signal Shtorm [Gale]-555 occupies the disposition area; 
infantry which has penetrated the forward edge of platoon 
strongpoints is to be destroyed by point-blank fire and grenades 
and in hand-to- hand combat, and tanks are to be destroyed by 
RPG's and by BMP and tank guns. 
  In performing the mission of destroying an enemy who has 
penetrated the company strongpoint: aircraft and 
artillery engage second echelons and neutralize enemy COP's, 
artillery and mortars; in case the enemy penetrates the company 
strongpoint between 3rd and 2nd MRP, artillery neutralizes his 
personnel and weapons by concentrated fire; at the signal Udar 
[Strike]-111 or a green flare 1st MRP commences fire against the 
fire concentration sector, and the BMP destroys tanks and APC's; 
firmly holding platoon strongpoints, 3rd and 2nd MRP's repulse 
the assault ahead of the FEBA. The penetrated enemy is destroyed 
by flanking fire of squads, tanks, BMP's and machineguns and is 
not permitted to spread out laterally and into the depth; the 
armored group occupies Line No 1 or 2. 
  When enemy tanks and infantry wedge into the gap with 
4th MRC: artillery neutralizes his personnel and weapons by 
concentrated fire and prohibits envelopment of the 3rd MRP 
strongpoint; firmly holding the north slopes of Hill 136.8, 3rd 
MRP neutralizes the enemy by fire of all weapons in coordination 
with 4th MRC, destroying his tanks and APC's above all. 
  In case the enemy penetrates the gap with 1st MRC 
on the left flank: artillery neutralizes enemy personnel and 
weapons by concentrated fire and places his battle formation in 
disarray; firmly holding Ploskaya Hill and repelling the enemy 
assault from the front, 2nd MRP destroys the penetrated enemy by 
fire of the left-flank squad, BMP's and tanks from the alternate 
firing position in coordination with 1st MRC; 1st MRP is in 
readiness to destroy enemy tanks and infantry which have 
penetrated by fire from the occupied strongpoint. 
  In conducting a counterattack with the battalion 
second echelon: artillery neutralizes the penetrated enemy 
between strongpoints of 2nd and 3rd MRP's and his tanks are 
destroyed by helicopters; firmly holding the strongpoints, 2nd 
and 3rd MRP's inflict damage on the enemy by fire, not 
permitting him to spread out into the depth and toward the 
flanks; 1st MRP destroys the penetrated enemy by fire of all 
weapons and supports the forward movement, deployment and 
assault of 6th MRC. When 6th MRC launches a counterattack, 1st 
MRP assaults the enemy together with it and restores the defense 
along the FEBA. 
  Signals: 

  -  warning: warning of immediate threat and 
beginning of enemy use of mass destruction weapons--"Uragan 
[Hurricane]"; radioactive contamination--"Radiatsionnaya 
opasnost [Radiation Danger]"; chemical and biological 
(bacteriological) contamination--"Khimicheskaya trevoga 
[Chemical Alert]," chemical attack alarm flare; air 
enemy--"Vozdukh [Air]"; 
  -  control and coordination: 
take cover--"Grom [Thunder]," series of red flares; occupy 
positions--"K boyu [To battle]"; request artillery fire-- 
"Perekat [Leapfrog]-333"; armored group change of positions 
(line)--"Shtorm [Gale]-555"; commence concentrated fire--"Udar 
[Strike]- 111," green flare. 

  [Begin side line] Subsequently the company (battalion) 
commander gives instructions on main questions of comprehensive 
support. [End side line] 
  Reconnaissance instructions 
  Conduct reconnaissance by observation, having lookouts for 
the ground and air enemy in each platoon. 1st MRP commander is 
to assign two persons by 1040 hours for organizing observation 
at the company COP. I will assign the mission personally. 
  Concentrate main reconnaissance efforts in the direction of 
Stepanovo, Berezovyy Forest for performing the following 
missions: promptly establish the enemy's forward movement and 
deployment, the makeup of his subunits ahead of the company 
defense frontage and on flanks, artillery and mortar firing 
positions, and forward movement of reserves in direction of 
Berezovyy Forest, Stepanovo. Organize observation after 
receiving the mission. Report reconnaissance results to me at 
the COP. 
  Instructions on protection against mass 
destruction weapons 
  In determining locations of covered slit trenches and 
preparing dugouts, platoon commanders are to use protective 
properties of the terrain (reverse hillslopes, hollows). 
  Warning signals: warning of immediate threat and 
beginning of enemy use of mass destruction weapons--"Grom 
[Thunder]," radioactive contamination-- "Radiatsionnaya opasnost 
[Radiation Danger]," chemical, biological (bacteriological) 
contamination--"Khimicheskaya trevoga [Chemical Alert]," air 
attack--"Vozdukh [Air]." 
  Give warning signals by radio and voice and duplicate by 
chemical attack alarm flare and rapid honking of vehicle horns. 
  When the enemy employs mass destruction weapons, personnel 
are to make use of individual and collective protective gear. 
Perform partial decontamination without ceasing to fight and 
perform complete decontamination and radiological 
decontamination of emplacements with my permission. 
  Maskirovka instructions 
  Platoon commanders are to use concealing properties of 
terrain for maskirovka of strongpoints and defensive works. 
Camouflage combat equipment using authorized means of maskirovka 
and local materials. Complete performance of maskirovka measures 
in the course of engineer preparation by 0600 hours 17 June. 
  At night do not permit bonfires to be lit or vehicles to 
move 
with headlights on. 
  All radio equipment operates only on receive before the 
beginning of battle. 
  Engineer support instructions 
  Prepare the following at positions and in strongpoints: by 
2400 hours 16 June- -two-man foxholes for riflemen and 
emplacements for machinegunners, grenade launcher operators and 
snipers, and emplace obstacles ahead of FEBA, in gaps and on 
flanks; by 0600 hours 17 September [sic]--squad emplacements and 
emplacements for tanks, BMP's and other weapons; by day's 
end--covered slit trenches for squads and a platoon dugout. 
  Prepare timbers for protective emplacements and covered slit 
trenches in groves in the depth of platoon strongpoints. 
  Mixed minefields will be laid ahead of the company defense 
frontage by forces of the combat engineer platoon from 1200 to 
2300 hours 16 June. Emplace concealed obstacles on company 
flanks by 2nd and 3rd MRP personnel. 
  Chemical support instructions 
  Conduct radiological, chemical and nonspecific biological 
(bacteriological) reconnaissance in platoon strongpoints by 
observers and by the crews of BMP's (BTR's), and at the company 
COP by the chemical observer. 
  Platoon commanders are to take readings from dose rate 
meters 
by day's end. 
  Perform partial decontamination in strongpoints by your own 
forces at my command. Perform decontamination immediately when 
contaminated by chemical agents. 
  From 2100 to 2200 hours platoon commanders are to check 
availability and serviceability of individual protective gear 
and the technical condition of protective masks. 
  Technical and logistic support instructions 
  Platoon commanders are to perform daily routine servicing 
and 
maintenance of weapons and military vehicles and complete it by 
0930 hours 16 June. Check operation of night vision devices. 
Perform routine servicing and maintenance on each vehicle in 
turn. 
  Company first sergeant is to deploy ammunition supply point 
on south slopes of Dlinnaya Hill by 1400 hours. Finish refueling 
combat equipment by 0900 hours 16 June. 
  Ammunition expenditure: small arms 0.4 unit of fire; BMP and 
tank guns 0.7 unit of fire; fuel 0.1 fueling. In the course of 
battle evacuate wounded to company aid station in vicinity of 
Dlinnaya Hill by riflemen- medics. 
  [Begin side line] Based on work done to organize for battle, 
the company (battalion) commander works out a diagram of the 
company strongpoint (battalion defense area). It is recommended 
doing this on a sheet of Whatman paper, which should be marked 
out in advance as a formatted document and have a [legend] 
border, commander's signature, and date to save time in 
preparing the diagram. 
  The company strongpoint diagram shows the 
following (Diagram 5): reference points, their numbers, names 
and distances to them; enemy situation; company zone of fire; 
platoon strongpoints, their zones of fire and secondary sectors 
of fire; primary and alternate firing positions of BMP's 
(BTR's), tanks, and AT, flamethrower and air defense weapons; 
firing positions and sectors of fire of weapons supporting 
company flanks and gaps between platoon strongpoints, and on the 
MRC strongpoint diagram also those of attached tanks; fire 
concentration sectors of the company and of each platoon; 
commence-fire lines for tanks, BMP's, ATGM systems and other 
weapons; concentration area and lines of firing positions of 
armored group; positions and maneuver routes of roving weapons; 
locations of fire ambushes; engineer obstacles and 
fortifications; passages in obstacles for roving weapons and 
weapons operating in fire ambushes; places of deployment of 
technical observation post, ammunition supply point and company 
aid station; COP locations of company and platoons and 
disposition of MRC motor vehicles. In addition, the TC 
strongpoint diagram indicates positions of the attached 
motorized rifle subunit and the system of fire of its weapons. 
  The strongpoint diagram and defense area diagram are plans 
for conducting defensive battle; copies of them are submitted to 
the battalion commander and regimental commander respectively. 
  The battalion defense area diagram usually shows 
the following: reference points; enemy situation; combat 
security outpost position; company and platoon strongpoints, 
their zones of fire and fire concentration sectors, and 
commence-fire lines against the enemy for tanks, BMP's, ATGM 
systems, grenade launchers and other weapons; situation of 
adjacent subunits and boundaries with them; firing positions and 
sectors of fire of weapons supporting battalion flanks and gaps 
between company strongpoints; concentration areas and lines of 
firing positions of armored groups; positions and maneuver 
routes of roving weapons; firing positions and fire missions of 
artillery subunits, air defense subunit, grenade launcher 
subunit and other weapons directly subordinate to the battalion 
commander; locations of fire ambushes; axes of counterattacks 
and deployment lines of second echelon company (reserve), and 
for the TC and BMP-equipped MRC in addition, the lines of firing 
positions. The following should be plotted on the diagram: main 
fortifications and engineer obstacles; passages in obstacles for 
armored groups, subunits (weapons) operating in fire ambushes, 
and roving weapons; locations of technical support and logistic 
subunits, motor vehicles of motorized rifle subunits, and COP's 
of the battalion and companies. Lines of deployment (minelaying) 
of the regimental AT reserve (mobile obstacle detachment) and 
fire missions of organic and attached artillery may be indicated 
within the battalion defense area, ahead of its frontage and on 
the flanks. 
  Firing positions and sectors of fire of tanks, BMP's, and 
AT, 
air defense and other weapons are indicated on the diagram in 
addition with advance preparation of the defense. [End side line] 
  Work of preparing subunits for battle 
  Preparing subunits to perform a combat mission is a very 
important measure taken by the commander in preparing the 
defense. It includes the following: bringing it up to strength 
in personnel and creating prescribed reserves of missiles, 
ammunition, fuel and other supplies; immediate preparation of 
commanders and personnel for performing the combat mission, and 
of weapons and vehicles for combat employment; conduct of 
political work with personnel and tactical exercises (drills) 
with subunits as applied to the nature of the upcoming battle. 
  A defense can be occupied and the battle formation and 
system 
of fire can be created under various situation conditions. The 
defense is occupied covertly in a short time out of direct 
contact with the enemy. Subunits occupy their indicated 
strongpoints, prepare the system of fire and carry out engineer 
preparation of strongpoints (defense areas). 
  When shifting to the defense in direct contact with the 
enemy, special attention is given to creating a battle formation 
and a system of fire and engineer obstacles in a short time 
above all on the probable axis of attack of the enemy main body 
in accordance with the company (battalion) commander's decision, 
and it is also given to maskirovka and fortification of the 
strongpoint (defense area) being occupied. 
  In all cases when shifting to the defense, a company 
(battalion) constantly must be ready to repel an enemy surprise 
attack and strikes by his aircraft, helicopters and 
reconnaissance-strike complexes, and to destroy airborne assault 
forces and airmobile and raiding and reconnaissance parties. 
  Engineer preparation of the strongpoint (defense 
area) is a set of measures taken to adapt the terrain for 
fighting and to create conditions contributing to successful 
performance of missions by defending subunits which hamper the 
enemy attack and reduce the effectiveness of his weapons. 
  Engineer preparation of a strongpoint (defense area) 
includes 
the following: creation of an obstacle plan; construction of 
fortifications (emplacements, trenches, communication trenches, 
slit trenches, dugouts, ditches, escarpments, counterscarps, 
dragons' teeth and so on); preparation of weapon positions; 
preparation of COP's and locations (disposition areas) of rear 
subunits; preparation of maneuver; preparation of water supply 
points (water diversion [vodozabornyy] points) and other 
measures. 
  Two trenches, MRP strongpoints, positions of organic and 
attached weapons of the company, the company COP, ammunition 
supply point and aid station are prepared in the MRC strongpoint. 
  Three or four trenches, company strongpoints, firing 
positions of the mortar battery, grenade launcher subunit and 
air defense subunit, battalion COP, battalion aid station, 
disposition area of the support platoon, and also firing 
positions for tank subunits assigned for reinforcement, lines of 
firing positions of a TC (BMP-equipped MRC) in the second 
echelon (reserve), and lines of firing positions and 
concentration areas of armored groups are prepared in the MRB 
defense area. 
  Trenches and strongpoints of platoons (companies) are 
interconnected by a system of communication trenches to the full 
depth of the defense area (strongpoint). 
  Engineer preparation of the strongpoint (defense area) 
begins 
immediately after positions are specified for subunits and 
weapons and the system of fire is organized. In some cases it 
begins even before occupation of the defense, is done to the 
full extent when subunits occupy strongpoints, and continues 
without let-up in the course of the entire defensive battle. It 
is accomplished simultaneously to the full depth of the defense 
in a sequence ensuring constant readiness of subunits to repel 
an enemy attack and protect them against all weapons, and it is 
done covertly, with full exertion of efforts and maximum use of 
prefabricated fortification structures, constructions and local 
building materials. 
  Engineer preparation of a strongpoint (defense area) is done 
with wide use of heavy equipment out of direct contact with the 
enemy. 
  In first order engineer obstacles are arranged 
ahead of the combat security outpost position and FEBA, and 
fields of view and fire are cleared; emplacements are dug for 
MRS's and for tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and other weapons; structures 
are built for the COP and aid station; covered slit trenches are 
made for each squad, crew or team; sectors of continuous 
trenches are created in platoon and company strongpoints; and 
weapons and vehicles are camouflaged against reconnaissance and 
for protection against enemy precision weapons. In addition, 
obstacles are emplaced in gaps between subunits, on flanks and 
in the depth of the defense; lines of firing positions are 
prepared for the TC (TB) and BMP-equipped MRC (MRB) in the 
second echelon (reserve), and forward movement routes to these 
lines of deployment for counterattacks are prepared; and water 
supply points (water diversion points) are prepared. 
  In second order company and platoon strongpoints 
are additionally equipped, emplacements are dug for tanks, BMP's 
(BTR's) and other weapons at alternate (temporary) firing 
positions, lines of firing positions and in armored group 
concentration areas; a system of trenches and communication 
trenches is created and upgraded from a combat and housekeeping 
standpoint in the battalion defense area; COP's and aid stations 
are additionally equipped; dugouts are made for each squad, crew 
or team, bunkers are made for each company (battery) and at the 
battalion (company) COP, and shelters are made for weapons, 
equipment, missiles, ammunition and other supplies; the main 
dummy objects are prepared in the company strongpoint (battalion 
defense area); obstacles are additionally emplaced ahead of the 
FEBA, in gaps between strongpoints and on flanks, and maneuver 
routes are prepared. 
  Subsequently a system of trenches and 
communication trenches is developed in the strongpoint (defense 
area), the system of engineer obstacles is built up, a network 
of routes for subunit maneuver, supply and evacuation is 
developed additionally, and dummy strongpoints, trenches, firing 
positions and other objects are prepared. 
  Trenches are prepared for creating a system of 
continuous flanking fire and fire ahead of the FEBA and in the 
depth of the defense, protecting personnel against enemy 
enfilade fire, improving protection against the effect of 
nuclear weapons and artillery shellbursts, and for best 
adaptation to terrain relief. Trenches are dug with a 
curvilinear, broken or staggered trace. Straight sectors (faces) 
are made 40-50 m long with mechanized digging of trenches and 
20-30 m long with manual digging. The angle between trench faces 
should be 90-120ë. Trenches (communication trenches) are dug 
with a varying depth depending on soil condition and time 
available: with a ditch 60 cm deep for firing from a kneeling 
position and moving at a crawl; 110 cm deep for firing from a 
standing position on the bottom of the ditch and for moving bent 
over; and standard depth with a ditch 150 cm deep for firing 
standing from a fire step and for moving upright. 
  The size of trenches (communication trenches) is 90-110 cm 
on 
top depending on soil density and trench depth. The width of the 
bottom of the ditch in standard trenches as a rule does not 
exceed 40-50 cm. 
  Communication trenches are intended for sheltered movement 
of 
personnel between trenches, positions and strongpoints and 
concealed communication with the rear. In contrast to trenches, 
which usually are dug along the front, communication trenches 
for the most part are made at an angle to the front. To protect 
personnel moving along communication trenches against enemy 
enfilade fire, the trenches are carefully adapted to terrain, 
giving them a curvilinear, staggered or broken trace from an 
overhead view. They are dug to the very same depths as trenches. 
  Primary (main) communication trenches, intended for most 
intensive movement of personnel, delivery of ammunition and food 
and evacuation of wounded, are dug 70 cm or more wide at the 
bottom and at least 150 cm deep. Other communication trenches 
are dug 40-50 cm wide at the bottom. 
  Communication trenches in the tactically most important 
sector are adapted for defense, and firing positions, weapon 
(machinegun) platforms and other structures are made in them. 
  In choosing the direction for communication trenches, try to 
conceal them from enemy observation, for which ravines, reverse 
hillslopes, hollows, bushes and so on should be used. 
  If communication trenches are made on forward hillslopes, 
they should be dug in a staggered manner, directing short 
sectors toward the enemy and long ones along the front. 
Communication trenches should not be disposed along the bottom 
of a hollow, since they will be flooded in rainy weather and 
during the snow melt. 
  Trenches and communication trenches are prepared from a 
combat, housekeeping, and sanitary standpoint to improve subunit 
fighting and resting conditions. 
  Combat preparation includes making firing positions, 
machinegun platforms, firing ports, exits, crossings, revetment, 
observation structures, very basic shelters for personnel and 
equipment, ammunition niches, widened areas, cul- de-sacs and so 
on. 
  Housekeeping and sanitary preparation of trenches and 
communication trenches includes making niches for storing food, 
water and property and making latrines, sumps, soakage pits and 
drainage ditches. 
  A company COP usually is prepared in the depth of the 
strongpoint up to 800 m from the FEBA in a place providing 
observation of terrain ahead of the front and on flanks of the 
company defense, a view of one's own strongpoint where possible, 
and convenience in controlling subunits. 
  A battalion COP is prepared where possible in an area 
difficult of access for enemy tanks immediately behind first 
echelon companies or in the vicinity of the battalion second 
echelon (reserve) strongpoint up to 2 km from the FEBA. 
  The COP location should have good protective and concealing 
properties without prominent local reference points near 
structures. 
  An open structure for observation and a bunker are made and 
two BTR (BMP, tank) emplacements are dug at the company COP 
(Fig. 5). 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-58A>      Fig. 5. Company commander's COP </FIG>


  Covered and open structures for observation, a bunker, BTR 
(tank) emplacements, a BTR (BMP) emplacement and two 
emplacements for signal platoon vehicles also are made at the 
battalion COP. 
  All structures and emplacements at COP's are interconnected 
by trench sectors and with trenches by communication trenches. 
Integral assault rifle firing positions are prepared for 
fighting in trenches and communication trenches. 
  In order for the company (battalion) commander to be able to 
direct engineer preparation and monitor work progress, the 
commander (staff) should work out a calculation for engineer 
preparation of the strongpoint (defense area). 
  Subunit commanders check the promptness and correctness of 
subunit occupation of defense areas, strongpoints and positions; 
readiness of the system of fire and readiness of weapons for 
conducting fire, especially at night and under other conditions 
of limited visibility; the personnel's knowledge of their 
missions and the procedure for maintaining coordination in the 
course of battle; status and degree of readiness of engineer 
obstacles and fortification of strongpoints and subunit 
positions; readiness of the second echelon (reserve, armored 
group) for a maneuver to lines of firing positions and to 
indicated axes; fulfillment of measures for comprehensive 
support to battle and C[.sup]2[/]; and occupation of 
positions by the combat security outpost and its readiness to 
perform the combat mission. 
<H5>  5. Conduct of Defensive Battle </H5>
  Before the beginning of an enemy attack the mission of a 
first echelon company (battalion) is to destroy his individual 
groups attempting to perform reconnaissance, breach obstacles or 
penetrate into the depth of the defense, and to destroy 
low-flying enemy aircraft and helicopters. 
  This mission is performed from alternate or temporary firing 
positions by assigned duty tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and other 
weapons. When in direct contact, duty weapons in addition must 
hamper enemy movement into his disposition area and prohibit him 
from performing engineer work. For their part, snipers kill 
officers, snipers, observers, weapon teams and other enemy 
targets. The other subunits upgrade engineer preparation of 
positions, conduct combat and political training classes and 
service and maintain weapons and vehicles while maintaining 
constant readiness to repel enemy assaults. 
  The company commander gives company personnel a rest 
depending on the situation and the battalion commander's 
instructions. For this they use shelters (dugouts) near trenches 
and weapons, ready to take their places when alerted. Observers 
are posted near the shelters who warn all those resting by a 
prearranged signal, summoning them to the positions. 
  Based on personal observation and reconnaissance data, the 
company (battalion) commander must promptly establish enemy 
preparation for an attack and the beginning of his forward 
movement and deployment, report this to the senior commander, 
update missions for subordinate subunits and attached artillery, 
and place them in full readiness to repel the enemy. 
  Small enemy parties and reconnaissance subunits are 
destroyed 
by fire of the combat security outpost. The battalion commander 
directs the battle of the combat security outpost and supports 
it by fire of the battalion mortar (artillery) battery and of 
attached and supporting artillery from temporary firing 
positions. During fighting to hold the combat security outpost 
position the battalion commander moves his COP forward and 
positions it in one of the first echelon company strongpoints. 
  When major enemy forces approach the combat security outpost 
position, they are engaged not only by fire of the assigned 
platoon, but also by assigned weapons from MRC's (TC's) 
operating on the FEBA. In coordination with assigned weapons, 
the combat security outpost destroys chiefly enemy tanks and 
other armored vehicles ahead of its frontage. Assigned tanks, AT 
weapons, mortars and supporting artillery of the battalion as 
well as the senior commander's duty weapons destroy enemy tanks 
and infantry attempting to go around the combat security outpost 
and move to its flank and rear. When the enemy deploys his main 
forces and assets ahead of the defense frontage of battalions, 
by authorization of the regimental commander the battalion 
commander issues an order to the combat security outpost 
commander to disengage and withdraw, after which he moves his 
COP. The platoon's withdrawal is covered by the fire of 
artillery and assigned weapons of first echelon companies and is 
accomplished by leapfrogging, taking advantage of terrain folds, 
obstacles and aerosols (smoke). A combat security outpost 
platoon which has withdrawn takes up a position in the company 
strongpoint or is moved into the battalion reserve. 
  Reconnaissance in force and an assault by enemy forward 
subunits are repelled by fire of assigned assets and by subunits 
defending these axes. Observation of the enemy is beefed up. 
After the combat security outpost withdraws and the assault is 
repelled, weapons which have revealed themselves change 
positions covertly by direction of the company (battalion) 
commander. Passages which the enemy has made in our obstacles 
are immediately closed or, if this is impossible, the fire of 
artillery and other weapons is prepared against them. 
  If the enemy managed to penetrate the strongpoint (defense 
area) as a result of reconnaissance in force, the company 
(battalion) commander takes all steps to destroy him. 
  Fire preparation usually precedes the launching of an attack 
by the enemy main body. This period of battle is the most 
important for the company (battalion), since the most powerful 
fire strike is delivered at this time. 
  With the beginning of fire preparation or delivery of 
nuclear 
strikes by the enemy, personnel of the MRC or TC (MRB or TB) and 
of attached subunits take cover at the commanders' order or 
independently in slit trenches, dugouts, bunkers and fighting 
vehicles (tanks) and on the bottom of emplacements and trenches 
in readiness to take their places quickly at positions to repel 
an assault. In this period the commander conducts continuous 
observation and updates missions for subunits, artillery and 
other weapons for engaging detected enemy precision weapon 
assets, artillery, tanks, other armored vehicles and infantry 
moving forward or readying for an assault. At the same time he 
estimates the situation in areas of nuclear strikes and takes 
steps to close breaches in the battle formation, restore 
C[.sup]2[/] and the system of fire and coordination, and mop 
up in the aftermath of enemy use of mass destruction weapons. 
  Enemy attempts to breach engineer obstacles ahead of our 
FEBA 
in the period of fire preparation are stopped by fire of duty 
weapons. 
  After enemy fire preparation ends, main efforts of all 
forces 
and assets are concentrated on engaging tanks and mechanized 
infantry. At commanders' signals, company (battalion) subunits 
make ready to repel the enemy assault. The transfer of enemy 
artillery and mortar fire from the FEBA into the depth may serve 
as the beginning of the enemy assault. In this situation it is 
always necessary to be attentive, since the enemy may execute a 
dummy transfer of fire to force company (battalion) subunits to 
emerge from shelters and then inflict additional losses on them 
by a repeat strike of artillery, mortars and aircraft. 
Consequently, preservation of company (battalion) combat 
effectiveness and attainment of success in battle largely will 
depend on correctly determining the moment for personnel and 
combat vehicles to emerge from shelters and prepare to repel 
enemy assaults. Therefore foresight, precise operation of the 
observation and reconnaissance system, a good knowledge of enemy 
operating tactics, faultless communications and continuous 
information about enemy actions are necessary. 
  When the enemy launches an assault the company (battalion) 
commander concentrates fire of all weapons against the enemy 
main body. Organic and attached artillery inflicts damage on 
precision weapon assets, tanks and other armored vehicles by 
concentrated fire, fire against single targets, and rolling and 
standing barrier fire and, placing [battle] formations of enemy 
subunits in disarray, creates favorable conditions for their 
destruction by fire of tanks, BMP's, ATGM's and grenade 
launchers from maximum fire or launch ranges. 
  In the period of friendly air operations against an 
attacking 
enemy, artillery engages his air defense weapons, and 
recognition and identification posts and points mark friendly 
troops at the commands (signals) of subunit commanders. 
  Fire of all company (battalion) weapons is brought to 
highest 
intensity as the enemy approaches the FEBA. Defending subunits 
destroy tanks and other armored combat vehicles by the fire of 
tanks and other AT weapons. If enemy infantry assaults in 
dismounted formation, defending subunits use machinegun and 
assault rifle fire to cut infantry off from tanks and destroy it 
by fire. When enemy infantry comes to within 30-40 m of the 
FEBA, personnel of motorized rifle subunits attack it with 
grenades and destroy infantry which has penetrated the forward 
edge of subunit strongpoints by point-blank fire, grenades, and 
in hand-to-hand combat. 
  An enemy assault should be repelled ahead of the FEBA. The 
primary obligation of commanders in this period above all is 
skilled fire control. A battle is fought for each trench 
according to the principle of "not a step backward." 
  To keep the enemy from fanning out through trenches and 
communication trenches, the personnel quickly set up previously 
prepared hedgehogs, knife rests and other portable obstacles in 
them. If necessary, tanks and BMP's (BTR's) which are part of 
the armored group may move forward and take up positions in 
their own strongpoints under cover of aerosols (smoke) or using 
concealed routes. 
  The air defense subunit as well as motorized rifle (tank) 
subunits not engaged in fighting the ground enemy repel raids by 
low-flying enemy aircraft and helicopters. 
  In case the enemy penetrates the strongpoint (defense area), 
the company (battalion) commander uses the fire of all assets to 
stop him from fanning out laterally and into the depth, and 
consolidates his flanks in the penetration sector. 
  Tanks and BMP's (BTR's) which have penetrated into the depth 
of the defense are destroyed by fire of artillery, all AT 
weapons, tanks and BMP's of the company (battalion) from 
occupied positions or lines of firing positions. In addition, 
the battalion commander may move second echelon (reserve) tanks 
(BMP's) up to a line of firing positions at the spot of the 
penetration, and the AT subunit to a deployment line prepared on 
this axis. 
  When an enemy who has penetrated approaches fire ambushes, 
they commence fire suddenly at the company (battalion) 
commander's command or independently, destroying enemy tanks and 
other armored vehicles above all, and force surviving enemy 
tanks and infantry to advance in a direction unfavorable to them 
or onto previously prepared minefields. 
  Under favorable situation conditions an enemy who has 
penetrated is destroyed by a counterattack conducted until he is 
totally annihilated and the defense restored. 
  A counterattack by the second echelon (reserve) is organized 
by the battalion commander personally and usually is carried out 
(as a rule, together with the regimental second echelon) when 
insignificant enemy forces penetrate. 
  In this situation first echelon subunits use fire of all 
weapons to inflict damage on an enemy who has penetrated and, 
firmly holding favorable terrain sectors in the depth of the 
defense, prohibit an enemy advance toward the flank, thereby 
supporting forward movement and deployment of the second echelon 
for a counterattack. Battalion first echelon subunits use fire 
of all weapons to support the second echelon's counterattack or, 
by order of the commander, some of the forces counterattack 
together with it and destroy an enemy who has penetrated the 
defense. As a rule, a counterattack is conducted until the enemy 
is totally annihilated and the defense restored. The regiment 
(battalion) does not conduct a counterattack on an axis of 
attack of superior enemy forces, but defends according to the 
principle of "not a step backward." 
  An enemy who has penetrated at the boundary with an adjacent 
company (battalion) is destroyed in coordination with the 
adjacent unit by fire of all weapons and, under favorable 
situation conditions, also by a decisive counterattack. 
  If the enemy has gone around the strongpoint (defense area), 
a company (battalion) shifts to a perimeter defense and 
continues to hold occupied positions (the most important terrain 
sectors). Some weapons are moved to a threatened axis. 
  The nature of operations of a second echelon company 
(battalion) will be somewhat different. With the beginning of an 
enemy attack the company (battalion) commander must constantly 
know the situation ahead of the defense frontage and on the 
flanks and have communications with commanders of first echelon 
platoons (companies) and supporting artillery. 
  In case the enemy breaks through into the depth of the 
defense, a battalion (regimental) second echelon company 
(battalion) uses fire of all weapons from the occupied position 
to inflict decisive damage on him and stop his further advance. 
A TC (TB) and BMP-equipped MRC (MRB) move forward to a prepared 
line of firing positions if necessary. 
  On receiving an order to take part in a counterattack, the 
company (battalion) commander sends out reconnaissance and 
updates missions for subunits and weapons. Under cover of 
artillery fire and observing measures for protection against 
precision weapons, subunits quickly move forward onto the 
indicated axis, inflict damage on the enemy by fire of tanks, 
BMP's and other weapons, place his battle formations in disarray 
and, in coordination with adjacent subunits, decisively 
counterattack the enemy primarily against his flank or rear. 
  Motorized rifle subunits counterattack the enemy in BMP's or 
dismounted following tanks. 
  Great Patriotic War experience indicates that rifle subunits 
successfully destroy an enemy who has penetrated only through a 
maneuver of fire and counterattacks. 
  A battalion counterattack usually is not carried out when 
there have been heavy losses from enemy nuclear and fire strikes 
and when considerable forces of enemy tanks and mechanized 
infantry penetrate the defense. In that situation the battalion 
commander concentrates main efforts above all on destroying 
subunits attempting to take terrain sectors on whose holding 
stability of the defense depends. To this end he inflicts damage 
on the enemy by concentrated and barrier fire of artillery and 
mortars and by the fire of tanks, BMP's, BTR's, ATGM launchers 
and all assets of motorized rifle (tank) subunits and halts his 
further spread into the depth and toward the flanks. To 
consolidate flanks and reinforce the defense in the enemy 
penetration sector, he uses subunits defending on this axis, the 
battalion second echelon (reserve), AT weapons directly 
subordinate to him, the combat engineer subunit attached to the 
battalion, and forces and assets from sectors not under attack. 
  Motorized rifle (tank) subunits disposed ahead of the front, 
on flanks of the enemy penetration and in the depth destroy 
enemy tanks and mechanized infantry by fire and by stubbornly 
holding occupied positions in coordination with artillery and AT 
weapons of the battalion and with combat helicopters, and 
prohibit them from fanning out into the depth and toward the 
flanks. A battalion second echelon TC (BMP-equipped MRC) may be 
moved up to a prepared line of firing positions by order of the 
commander. 
  After repelling the assault and destroying the enemy who has 
penetrated, the company (battalion) commander takes steps for 
rapid restoration of the system of fire, replenishment of 
reserves of missiles and ammunition, and restoration of 
demolished fortifications and engineer obstacles; and organizes 
restoration of weapons and vehicles which have been disabled and 
preparation for evacuation of wounded and sick. He reports 
battle results to the senior commander. 
  A battalion (regimental) first echelon company (battalion) 
supports the counterattack by fire or, by order of the battalion 
(regimental) commander, participates in the counterattack with a 
portion of its forces, destroys the enemy who has penetrated and 
restores the position. 
  Having established the beginning of the landing of an enemy 
airborne assault force or having received a mission to destroy 
such a force, the commander of a company (battalion) which makes 
up the regiment (division) antilanding reserve sends out 
additional reconnaissance and updates (assigns) missions to 
subunits and attached weapons. The company (battalion) quickly 
moves out to the airborne assault force landing zone, deploys 
into battle formation on the move, inflicts damage on the enemy 
by fire of all weapons and completes destruction of the assault 
force by a decisive assault. 
  If the enemy airborne assault force has succeeded in 
landing, 
assembling and beginning movement toward the attack objective, 
the company (battalion) quickly moves up to the enemy, 
immobilizes him and inflicts damage by actions of fire ambushes 
and march security, and completes destruction of the assault 
force by the main body in a meeting battle. In case it fails to 
destroy the enemy airborne assault force from the move, the 
company (battalion) immobilizes him by active operations, 
inflicts damage by fire of all weapons and, after brief 
preparation, assaults the enemy again and destroys him. 
  After destroying the enemy airborne assault force the 
company 
(battalion) moves out to a designated area in readiness to 
destroy new assault forces or perform other missions. 
<H5>  6. Features of Battalion Operations in a Regimental Mobile </H5>
Defense 
  The MRB (TB) participates in a regimental mobile defense. 
The 
battalion also may conduct it independently when assigned to a 
forward detachment for defense in the security zone. 
In all cases the battalion as a rule fights at several lines, 
withdrawing successively from one to another, making wide use of 
fire ambushes, emplacing obstacles and performing demolition. To 
perform this mission a battalion may be reinforced by a TC 
(MRC), an artillery battalion, air defense subunits (a platoon), 
combat engineer subunits with obstacle assets, and flamethrower 
subunits. In the course of battle a battalion is supported by 
artillery fire and aircraft under the senior commander's plan. 
  The number of lines for conducting battle and their mutual 
distance are determined in each specific case based on the 
senior commander's concept, mission received and nature of 
terrain. Selection of lines for conducting battle must be given 
careful attention. Where possible, they should run behind 
natural barriers, be covered by engineer obstacles and have 
concealed withdrawal routes. 
  At each line the battalion occupies a defense area in which 
individual company and platoon strongpoints are created 
intercepting the most likely axes of enemy attack and supporting 
the holding of favorable terrain sectors. 
  In connection with this, the frontage of the company 
strongpoint (battalion defense area) will be somewhat larger 
than in a defense under ordinary conditions and may reach 1.5-3 
and 5-10 km respectively. The increased defense frontage will be 
achieved through increased gaps between platoon (company) 
strongpoints. 
  Based on this, the battalion battle formation may be aligned 
in one or two echelons with assignment of a reserve or an 
armored group. The bulk of organic weapons and weapons attached 
to the battalion is attached to companies. It is advisable to 
dispose weapons so there is an opportunity for the majority of 
weapons to conduct fire ahead of the front beginning from 
maximum ranges, cover gaps with adjacent strongpoints by fire, 
and cover the withdrawal of first echelon companies by the fire 
of covering-force subunits and of forward subunits moved back 
into the depth in advance. 
  In accordance with the commander's decision, a combat 
security outpost is put out in front of the battalion FEBA, a 
reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrol is sent out, and 
engineer obstacles are emplaced and fire ambushes arranged on 
probable axes of enemy forward movement. 
  A battalion maneuver to a new line is made with permission 
of 
the regimental commander or of the commander who sent out the 
forward detachment. 
  Engineer obstacles will find wide use during defense in a 
security zone, with preference usually given to minefields. The 
latter are emplaced above all on likely avenues of tank 
approach, ahead of platoon and company strongpoints, in areas of 
probable deployment of enemy nuclear weapons and C[.sup]2[/] 
facilities, and on roads not covered by forward detachments but 
along which the movement of enemy troops is not precluded. 
Highway and railroad bridges across water obstacles as well as 
other structures of important economic and military significance 
are prepared for demolition. 
  The necessary number of artillery subunits is assigned for 
support of the battalion by order of the senior commander. They 
may take up temporary positions both in the security zone as 
well as within the main defensive zone depending on the distance 
of defensive lines. 
  In organizing defense at a line (in the security zone), the 
battalion commander determines the following in addition to the 
usual questions: procedure for fire engagement of the enemy from 
maximum ranges and for prohibiting a swift launching of an 
assault by his main body; possible axes of maneuver of subunits 
and fire to prevent envelopment of the battalion defense area 
(company strongpoints); procedure for disengaging (makeup of 
covering- force subunits, assembly area, and sequence for 
subunits to move to it); procedure for executing a maneuver to 
another line; locations of fire ambushes and for arranging 
obstacles and demolitions. 
  Ground reconnaissance conducted to update a decision is an 
important measure in organizing a defense which permits making a 
substantiated decision on defending a security zone. 
  A forward detachment commander usually conducts ground 
reconnaissance from one or two points. 
  In addition to the usual questions in conducting a mobile 
defense (defense in a security zone), in the course of ground 
reconnaissance the company (battalion) commander studies and 
clarifies accessible axes for operations of enemy tank and 
mechanized infantry subunits in front of each line; clarifies 
the axis for concentration of the forward detachment's main 
efforts at each line, terrain areas on whose holding stability 
of the defense at each line depends, and where platoon (company) 
strongpoints should be prepared, and also clarifies tank and BMP 
fire ambush sites; determines alignment of the forward 
detachment's battle formation at each line and locations of 
forward detachment subunits and their missions at each line; 
establishes the procedure and time periods for engineer 
preparation of lines, creation of obstacles ahead of them and in 
gaps between strongpoints, and also the axes and procedure for 
withdrawal of subunits from line to line and into the main 
defensive zone. In addition, he determines COP locations of the 
forward detachment and of commanders of platoons (companies) and 
of attached and supporting subunits in the battle to hold each 
line, as well as locations of technical and logistic support in 
organizing and conducting defensive battle at each line in the 
security zone, and other questions. 
  In assigning missions, in addition to what is set forth in 
organizing a defense under ordinary conditions, the company 
(battalion) commander indicates to subordinates in the operation 
order the procedure for disengaging, the company (battalion) 
assembly area and procedure for withdrawal to the next line. 
  In organizing the system of fire the battalion commander 
determines the following: most likely axes of enemy forward 
movement to each line, possibility of engaging him from maximum 
ranges by fire of his own, attached and supporting weapons as 
the enemy approaches subunit strongpoints (deploys), and also 
ahead of their frontage, in gaps between strongpoints and on 
exposed flanks; procedure for artillery fire cover of the 
removal of subunits out from under an attack by superior enemy 
forces for their occupation of a defense at the next line or 
during withdrawal into the main defensive zone. (A battalion's 
battle in the security zone is shown in Diagram 6.) As the enemy 
approaches, the battalion determines his makeup and direction of 
forward movement by patrol actions and inflicts losses on him in 
personnel and military vehicles (especially tanks) by fire 
ambushes and the combat security outpost. When the enemy moves 
into the impact zone of battalion weapons and begins deploying 
for an assault of the occupied line, the battalion uses fire of 
organic, attached and supporting weapons to inflict maximum 
losses on the attackers. The battalion's primary mission is to 
prevent a breakthrough of the defense from the move and force 
the enemy to deploy the main body and advance in a direction 
unfavorable to him. Skillfully maneuvering fire and subunits and 
taking advantage of obstacles and demolitions, the company 
(battalion) commander prevents the enemy from capturing 
strongpoints of first echelon companies from the move. 
  Individual enemy attempts to envelop strongpoints (defense 
areas) are prohibited by a maneuver of the reserve (armored 
group) to these axes for taking up a line of firing positions or 
executing a sudden, brief counterattack, and also by a maneuver 
of the fire of artillery remaining directly subordinate to the 
battalion commander. 
  The battalion disengages on receiving a withdrawal order. 
Before or in the course of the withdrawal, the battalion may 
counterattack the enemy with the reserve and with subunits, 
above all tank subunits removed from positions not under attack, 
to halt the enemy advance on the most threatened axes. 
  During execution of a maneuver to the next line, a rear 
security element and if necessary also flank security elements 
are assigned from the battalion to oppose close and deep 
envelopments and attacks of an enemy who has penetrated. Taking 
advantage of obstacles previously created on maneuver routes, 
security elements hold up the enemy's advance by fire from in 
place and from the move and by use of fire ambushes until the 
time indicated by the battalion commander. An enemy airborne 
assault force which has landed on a maneuver route is destroyed 
or bypassed after being sealed off. 
  In the course of a maneuver the battalion may cross a line 
defended by other regimental subunits. In this case the 
defending subunits use the fire of their weapons to destroy the 
enemy, supporting the withdrawing subunit's disengagement and 
not permitting an enemy assault on the occupied line from the 
move. Passage of withdrawing subunits is along established axes 
agreed upon in organizing coordination. 
  With its move to the next line the battalion immediately 
occupies a defense and takes measures to restore combat 
effectiveness. The battle at the new line is conducted just as 
at the previous line. 
  A line of combat security outpost positions ahead of the 
FEBA 
can serve as the final mobile defense line of a battalion 
defending in the security zone. Strongpoints are prepared in 
advance if it is planned for the battalion to shift to a defense 
on it. After occupying them the battalion fights in coordination 
with the combat security outpost. 
  The battle to hold each position and strongpoint should be 
distinguished by tenacity, with the goal of holding up the 
attacking enemy for the longest possible time, exhausting his 
forces and inflicting greatest possible losses on him. 
  In the absence of a security zone, a forward position may be 
established in accordance with the senior commander's decision. 
It has the purpose of concealing the trace of the first position 
and alignment of the battle formation from the enemy, inflicting 
damage on the enemy and forcing him to deploy the main body 
prematurely. The distance of the forward position is determined 
in each specific case by the nature of terrain, expected enemy 
operations and other situation conditions and may be 4-6 km. An 
MRB and sometimes also a reinforced MRC (TC), usually from the 
regimental first echelon, is assigned to fight at the forward 
position. 
  Defense at a forward position is built as separate 
platoon and company strongpoints (Diagram 7) prepared for a 
perimeter defense. It is recommended disposing them so they 
intercept axes most likely and accessible for enemy attack. 
  A forward position usually is selected behind natural 
barriers (streams, rivers and so on) or in the tactically most 
important terrain sectors (hills, road junctions and so on). 
  Minefields and nonexplosive obstacles are emplaced and 
strikes of combat helicopters and aircraft and the fire of 
artillery, tanks, BMP's and other weapons are prepared ahead of 
the position, in gaps between strongpoints and on flanks. Fire 
ambushes may be arranged in addition. 
  The system of fire is organized so the enemy is engaged from 
maximum ranges on primary avenues of likely tank approach by 
fire of all weapons, and so gaps between platoon and company 
strongpoints are covered. Special attention is given to 
organizing AT fire. 
  During battle, small enemy groups are destroyed by fire or 
taken prisoner and significant enemy forces are destroyed by 
fire of all weapons in the very same manner as during battle in 
the security zone. 
  The company (battalion) withdraws from a forward position by 
order of the regimental commander in the very same sequence as 
during operations in the security zone. Subunits which have 
withdrawn usually take up a defense at the second position. 
<H5>  7. Defense of a Water Obstacle </H5>
  Water obstacles, which include rivers, canals, reservoirs 
and 
lakes, are characterized by width; depth; current velocity; 
nature of bed, banks and adjoining terrain; and presence of 
fords and hydraulic engineering works. Water obstacles in 
themselves are a serious barrier for an attacking enemy and a 
favorable natural line for a defender. 
  Special attention should be given to selecting the forward 
edge in organizing the defense. Depending on the condition of 
terrain adjoining the river, it may be designated as close to 
the water's edge as possible or be moved back from the bank to a 
more favorable line. In this case it is necessary to put out a 
combat security outpost and emplace obstacles on the bank. 
  In organizing defense of a water obstacle, in addition to 
usual questions of organizing for battle, the company 
(battalion) commander studies the condition of banks and 
determines the water obstacle's width, depth, current velocity, 
nature of bed and the presence of fords and sectors where its 
forcing by the enemy is possible. 
  The system of fire is organized so approaches to the water 
obstacle and the water's surface, especially fords and sectors 
convenient for forcing, are covered by flanking and cross fire. 
Some of the tanks, BMP's, and AT and other weapons may be moved 
up closer to the bank. 
  The greatest AT fire density is created, obstacles are 
emplaced and fire ambushes are arranged in sectors where enemy 
forcing of the water obstacle is possible, especially by tanks 
fording or crossing fully submerged. In addition, fire is 
prepared against the bank itself for repulsing an enemy who has 
crossed. 
  To reconnoiter the enemy the company (battalion) organizes 
continuous observation, especially of sectors convenient for 
forcing and of approaches to them. Out of direct contact with 
the enemy, a reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrol and 
reinforced combat security outpost usually are sent to the 
opposite bank of the water obstacle. All local crossing 
equipment (boats, rafts, ferries) is assembled on the friendly 
bank and placed under guard; if impossible to assemble, it is 
destroyed. 
  Weapons should not reveal themselves before the beginning of 
an attack. Weapons are specially assigned to destroy enemy 
reconnaissance subunits, and they perform missions from 
temporary positions. Enemy groups which have crossed are taken 
prisoner or killed. 
  With the beginning of an enemy forcing of a water obstacle, 
subunits use fire of all weapons to destroy above all his 
crossing equipment, personnel, weapons and vehicles without 
permitting them to come ashore. In case the enemy comes ashore 
he is immediately destroyed by concentrated fire of all weapons, 
and under favorable conditions also by a decisive counterattack. 
The counterattack must be executed earlier than under ordinary 
conditions to keep the enemy from consolidating on the captured 
bank. Executing a counterattack along the bank is not precluded. 
  Independently or in coordination with other subunits, a 
company (battalion) also may defend on the opposite bank to hold 
bridges, crossings and sectors convenient for forcing which have 
been captured on the water obstacle. In this case a forward 
(bridgehead) position is established. In preparing its defense, 
special attention is given to organizing AT fire and air defense 
and securing flanks. To increase stability of the defense, an 
exposed flank or flanks must abut the water obstacle and be 
covered by obstacles. In this case it is advisable to set up 
additional reserves of missiles, ammunition, food and medical 
supplies in subunits. The actions of a company (battalion) in a 
defense on the opposite bank should be distinguished by special 
staunchness and tenacity. 
<H5>  8. Night Defense </H5>
  Night conditions substantially affect defensive battle. On 
the one hand, they give the defender advantages, use of which 
facilitates performance of defense missions, and on the other 
hand these conditions create a number of difficulties in 
preparing and conducting defensive battle. Orientation on 
terrain, engineer preparation of the strongpoint and emplacement 
of obstacles are hampered at night. The enemy receives a greater 
opportunity to approach the defense covertly, attack suddenly, 
and infiltrate through gaps into the depth of the defense. In 
addition, C[.sup]2[/] of subunits, maintenance of continuous 
coordination, and conduct of aimed fire from all kinds of 
weapons are more complicated and expenditure of ammunition and 
illumination assets increases. 
  Based on this, the primary mission of subunits in a night 
defense is to repel a surprise enemy assault. To perform this 
mission the company (battalion) commander must reinforce the 
combat security outpost; beef up observation of the enemy and of 
friendly obstacles ahead of the FEBA; organize listening; post 
local security in all subunits (observers, two-man patrols and 
so on); keep the bulk of subunits and weapons which are 
occupying strongpoints at the first position in constant 
readiness to commence fire and repel enemy assaults; prepare all 
weapons, the reserve and the armored group for night operations 
while it is light; specify the procedure for using night vision 
devices and for weapons situated in the depth of strongpoints to 
occupy temporary firing positions on the forward edge; indicate 
terrain sectors ahead of the FEBA, in gaps between units 
(subunits) and on flanks against which to prepare additional 
fire and provide for other measures to secure gaps between 
strongpoints and to secure boundaries and flanks; establish the 
procedure for illuminating terrain ahead of the forward edge of 
friendly defense and also the enemy in the course of battle; 
determine reference points easily visible at night, the 
identifying markings of friendly troops and methods of 
orientation; assign missions to subunits for destroying and 
blinding enemy night vision equipment; supply defending subunits 
with tracer rounds, cartridges with tracer bullets, and terrain 
illumination assets. If engineer work is being performed in the 
strongpoint (defense area), the company (battalion) commander 
organizes security for the subunits at work and establishes 
assembly points for them in case an enemy surprise attack has to 
be repulsed. 
  In a defense at night special attention is given to 
illuminating terrain with authorized illumination assets. With 
an illumination norm of 0.6 lux, the range of fire of 30-mm or 
40-mm pyrotechnic flares up to 450- 600 m and a radius of 
illumination of 400-500 m, one illumination post is capable of 
providing terrain illumination ahead of the company defense 
frontage in a sector of up to 2 km. Three illumination posts 
will be required with a battalion defense frontage up to 5 km. 
  Using day sights to ranges up to 1,500 m, it is necessary to 
have an illumination of 1.5-2 lux to ensure observation of 
targets and conduct of direct fire against them. To create that 
illumination it is advisable to use 120-mm illuminating mortar 
rounds and 122-mm illuminating artillery rounds with the flare 
ignition setting at a distance no closer than 1,200-2,300 m from 
the friendly troop disposition. With closer flare ignition, 
friendly subunits may be illuminated and revealed. 
  On detecting the launching of an enemy assault, subunits 
defending the combat security outpost position as well as 
artillery, mortars and duty weapons commence fire against him. 
Tanks, BMP's and artillery conduct direct fire against single 
targets and concentrated fire against the assaulting enemy. 
  It is advisable to repel an enemy assault from distances 
ensuring effective conduct of fire, using night vision devices 
or with the enemy battle formation illuminated by all available 
illumination support assets. When he comes to within 300-400 m 
of the FEBA, illumination is accomplished by first echelon 
company illumination posts and blinding is accomplished using 
illuminating and smoke projectiles (mortar rounds and rockets). 
  Enemy artillery and mortars firing illuminating rounds and 
his searchlight installations are destroyed first by fire of 
artillery subunits, tanks and BMP's (BTR's). 
  The air defense subunit as well as motorized rifle subunit 
and tank subunit not engaged in fighting the ground enemy repel 
raids by his aircraft and helicopters and destroy air-dropped 
illumination flares and illuminating artillery and mortar rounds. 
  In case the enemy penetrates the company (battalion) 
defense, 
steps are taken to prohibit his advance toward flanks and into 
the depth. In this period the company (battalion) inflicts 
damage on the enemy who has penetrated, halts his advance by 
concentrated artillery and mortar fire and by flanking fire of 
tanks, BMP's and the AT subunit, and subunits firmly hold 
important terrain sectors. A counterattack by the second echelon 
(reserve) is conducted at night against the enemy flank and rear 
along previously checked axes. Special attention is given to 
ensuring timely arrival of counterattacking subunits at the line 
of deployment for the counterattack. Guides may be assigned to 
each route for this purpose in addition to the marking of 
forward movement routes. 
  When shifting from night to day operations, subunits and 
weapons which were moved to temporary firing positions for the 
night covertly occupy their own primary positions before dawn by 
order of the company (battalion) commander. 
<H5>  9. Defense in a City and Other Built-Up Areas </H5>
  Cities and built-up areas with a large number of sturdy 
buildings can be turned into powerful centers of resistance by 
defenders in a short time. The presence of sturdy stone and 
reinforced concrete buildings, a far-flung system of underground 
utilities and structures and a significant number of obstacles 
and difficult-to-negotiate sectors help create an insurmountable 
defense that is more stable than under ordinary conditions. 
  In a city (built-up area) a battalion usually defends one or 
more blocks, a company defends a block or several buildings, and 
a platoon defends one or two buildings. 
  Using its own forces, a company (battalion) must turn each 
built-up area and lone structure into an insurmountable fortress 
with a perimeter defense ensuring its lengthy holding even in 
total enemy encirclement. 
  In organizing defense in a city (built-up area), the 
battalion (company) commander determines the following in 
addition to the usual questions: what buildings to include in 
strongpoints and prepare for defense; procedure for maneuver of 
forces and assets; in what rooms to prepare bunkers; and the 
procedure and time periods for preparing buildings for defense. 
  Company strongpoints (battalion defense areas) are created 
so 
they overlap main streets, boulevards, squares and bridges over 
rivers and canals. The FEBA usually is prepared along the 
outskirts of a city (built-up area) or is moved ahead if 
commanding heights adjoin the city. Strongpoints are prepared 
for a perimeter defense and must have fire coordination with 
each other. Additional reserves of missiles, ammunition, food, 
potable water and medical and other supplies are established in 
them. Strongpoints are interconnected by communication trenches. 
  Especially sturdy corner buildings with semibasement and 
basement rooms providing an opportunity for firing on streets 
and squares are used above all to create strongpoints. 
  Buildings must be adapted for defense: block up windows and 
doors with bricks (sandbags) and other materials, make firing 
ports and embrasures for assault riflemen and machinegunners, 
and prepare basement rooms to accommodate personnel. 
  It is advisable to cover wooden floors with sand and clear 
all buildings of highly flammable materials. Barricades, 
obstacles, destructive damage and roadblocks are arranged in 
gaps between strongpoints and on streets, and approaches to them 
are mined and covered by flanking and cross fire. Light 
structures hampering observation and conduct of fire are 
demolished. 
  Passages are made for subunits to maneuver within blocks, 
and 
underground structures and sewers also are used. Obstacles are 
arranged in underground structures not used for maneuver and 
fire is prepared against exits from them. 
  The company (battalion) system of fire is built on a 
combination of flanking and cross fire of small arms, guns 
assigned for direct fire, tanks, BMP's, and also the fire of 
ATGM launchers, grenade launchers, flamethrowers and artillery 
at indirect firing positions. 
  Subunits occupying a defense in multistory buildings 
organize 
fire in several tiers so all approaches to strongpoints 
(buildings) are covered by fire. A large portion of weapons, 
including individual guns, are located in lower stories of 
buildings and in semibasements. 
  Tanks attached to an MRB are used for operations from fire 
ambushes or in MRP strongpoints. Firing positions of tanks, 
BMP's (BTR's) and guns assigned for direct fire usually are 
prepared behind stone fences and walls in which embrasures are 
made and carefully camouflaged. 
  Firing positions of ATGM and grenade launchers are chosen in 
those places from which there is an opportunity to conduct fire 
along streets and squares. 
  Flamethrowers are attached to motorized rifle subunits in 
pairs or groups. Positions are prepared for them in buildings 
and behind obstacles and fences, above all at street 
intersections. 
  The bulk of artillery is attached to battalions and 
companies 
and used primarily for direct fire. The remaining artillery 
subunits take up indirect firing positions in parks, squares, 
stadiums and other places from which there is an opportunity to 
conduct fire. 
  Air defense weapons are situated on roofs of buildings, 
where 
platforms are prepared for them. Observation posts (observers) 
also are placed on roofs of buildings which provide all-around 
observation. 
  Combat engineer subunits with listening devices are assigned 
to detect siegecraft mine warfare work being done by the enemy. 
  A defensive battle on approaches to a city is conducted just 
as under ordinary conditions, but in the city (built-up area) it 
usually is nodal in nature and is conducted for holding each 
strongpoint and building. Subunits defending them must be 
capable of fighting independently even in encirclement. 
Therefore they are reinforced by tanks, artillery, and engineer 
and chemical subunits. 
  Subunits repel an enemy assault by fire of all weapons. In 
this period enemy infantry and tanks should be cut off and the 
infantry destroyed above all, since individual tanks or groups 
of them which have penetrated into the depth of the defense 
without infantry can be destroyed quickly. 
  If an enemy has succeeded in penetrating a defended 
building, 
he must be destroyed by point-blank fire, with grenades, and in 
hand-to- hand fighting. Tanks, BMP's, guns, flamethrowers and 
other weapons outside the building keep enemy reserves from 
approaching it. 
  Counterattacks are conducted by small forces to get back 
individual buildings and strongpoints captured by the enemy. 
<H5>  10. Defense Under Special Conditions </H5>
  Defense in the mountains. Mountainous terrain with 
rugged sectors and a large number of natural barriers permits 
subunits to create an insurmountable, stable defense on a 
broader frontage by intercepting the most accessible axes of 
enemy operations. 
  At the same time, the relief of mountainous terrain hampers 
preparation and conduct of defensive battle. 
  The limited number of roads and presence of scattered axes 
constrain subunit maneuver from one axis to another. Based on 
this, the defense is built at separate strongpoints to hold 
important terrain sectors (commanding heights, passes, road 
junctions and so on). On a plateau and in a wide valley the 
defense is built the very same as under ordinary conditions. 
  Based on this, main efforts are concentrated on the defense 
of commanding heights, passes, road junctions and other 
important terrain sectors. Strongpoints are prepared for a 
perimeter defense. Reconnaissance and patrolling is 
accomplished, fire ambushes are organized and obstacles are 
emplaced in gaps between them. 
  The FEBA must be chosen along slopes of mountain ridges and 
hills and along mountain spurs so as to provide a good field of 
view and fire on approaches to them, and also on reverse 
hillslopes. 
  A limited number of forces and assets are assigned to defend 
axes difficult of access. 
  The system of strongpoints, firing positions and trenches in 
the area (strongpoint) can be quite varied. Motorized rifle 
subunits usually defend in the first echelon. 
  If tanks, AT guns and ATGM launchers are attached to an MRC 
(MRB), they are used in strongpoints of platoons (companies) 
defending on the most important axes. Firing positions for them 
are prepared in those places which provide for conduct of fire 
to maximum range. Roads; exits from gorges, mountain valleys, 
tunnels and narrows; convenient crossings over rivers and 
passages across canyons; as well as axes which may be used by 
the enemy for envelopment must be covered most densely by all 
kinds of fire in combination with obstacles. Subunits defending 
passes, commanding heights, passages and road junctions are 
reinforced by flamethrower operators. 
  The air defense subunit as well as motorized rifle subunits 
assigned to combat the air enemy take up positions on hills 
providing an all- around field of view and fire against 
aircraft, helicopters and other airborne targets. 
  The system of fire must be built with consideration of 
terrain relief features and so there is no dead ground and 
concealed approaches ahead of the FEBA, on flanks and in gaps 
between strongpoints. To this end it is advisable to dispose 
weapons in tiers both on hillslopes facing the enemy as well as 
on reverse slopes, supporting the creation of multitiered 
flanking fire, cross fire and surprise, close-range concentrated 
fire with consideration of the possibility of executing a 
maneuver. 
  In organizing a defense in the mountains, in addition to the 
usual questions the company (battalion) commander determines 
what subunits (weapons) must be ready to destroy an enveloping 
enemy, and he takes into account the possibility of sudden 
changes in weather conditions, rockfalls, snowslides, 
avalanches, mud flows, and flooding of dried-up river channels 
during heavy rains and snow melt. 
  In a defense of a narrow mountain valley (gorge), weapons 
should be disposed on adjoining mountain slopes to ensure that 
the valley (gorge) is covered by cross fire. Hills forming the 
entrance to the valley (gorge) are strengthened most heavily. 
Approaches to commanding heights are covered by the fire of 
artillery; mortar and grenade launcher subunits; AT subunits; 
and AT weapons. Artillery is used widely for direct fire. 
  In organizing defense of a pass, main efforts are 
concentrated on holding hills located on approaches to it. A 
portion of company (battalion) forces must be situated directly 
in the pass. Obstacles are emplaced on roads leading to the pass 
from both sides and approaches to the obstacles should be 
covered by cross fire from adjoining hills. 
  Passes, roads, mountain trails and gorges are not assigned 
as 
company strongpoint boundaries. 
  Main reconnaissance efforts are concentrated on axes 
accessible for enemy attack and on axes where envelopment of 
defending subunits is possible. The number of observation posts 
(observers) is increased. 
  Terrain folds, mines and caves are used widely for 
protection 
against mass destruction and precision weapons. 
  In addition to the usual measures, the clearing of slides 
and 
tree blow-downs blocking the exit of people and vehicles from 
structures is organized immediately in restoring combat 
effectiveness of subunits. 
  Great importance is attached to engineer preparation of 
strongpoints (defense areas) because of terrain relief features. 
Thus, in rocky soils structures primarily of a semiburied and 
fill type are built using rocks covered by a layer of soil as 
well as bags of dirt. In these cases engineer preparation is 
conducted with wide use of demolition charges. Emplacements, 
shelters and other structures are prepared so as to preclude the 
possibility of an incendiary mixture or water flowing into them. 
  Rock roadblocks may be created in a strongpoint (battalion 
defense area) as well as abatis on mountainous woodland; sectors 
of roads (trails) and manmade structures are prepared for 
demolition and minefields are laid on roads. 
  Maskirovka of subunits is achieved above all by skillful use 
of the terrain's concealing properties. 
  An enemy assault is repelled by all weapons with wide use of 
grenades. It is most advisable to destroy enemy tanks when they 
are negotiating upgrades, and especially on serpentines. 
  When the enemy penetrates the defense it is necessary to 
inflict damage on him and hold occupied positions, especially 
commanding heights. Under favorable conditions, an enemy who has 
penetrated is destroyed by a determined counterattack. As a 
rule, it is conducted down from above, along a ridge, or along a 
valley. Before a counterattack it is necessary to deploy 
subunits involved in performing this mission on a previously 
prepared line in advance. This is explained by the complexity of 
the maneuver, especially in conducting a counterattack at night. 
  If the enemy attempts to envelop the strongpoint (defense 
area), he is destroyed by fire of artillery and other weapons 
and by decisive actions of second echelon (reserve) subunits or 
the company (battalion) armored group. 
  In a defense on taiga-covered mountainous terrain, special 
attention is given to preparing strongpoints for a perimeter 
defense, clearing zones (sectors) of view and fire, covering 
gaps and flanks with obstacles, and arranging fire ambushes on 
axes where enemy envelopment of defending subunits is possible. 
  In a defense in the mountains or on taiga-covered 
mountainous 
terrain, battalion technical support and rear subunits are 
located at road and trail junctions in immediate proximity to 
the first echelon. Additional reserves of missiles, ammunition, 
food, water and fuel are established in company strongpoints and 
at artillery and air defense weapon firing positions. In 
high-mountain areas the personnel are provided with special 
gear, warm clothing and sunglasses, and measures for warming 
personnel and promptly evacuating the wounded and sick are 
provided for. 
  Defense in the forest. The forest is a significant 
obstacle to an enemy attack and is not passable everywhere even 
in modern combat vehicles. There are not enough roads in the 
forest, which forces the enemy to operate along accessible axes. 
On the other hand, the forest facilitates maskirovka of 
strongpoints (defense areas) and surprise of subunit operations. 
  Considering relief features, defense in the forest must be 
built as separate platoon (company) strongpoints prepared for a 
perimeter defense. They should be so disposed that they 
intercept roads and openings as well as defiles between lakes 
and marshes. In gaps between strongpoints it is constantly 
necessary to conduct reconnaissance, arrange obstacles and fire 
ambushes and perform patrolling. 
  Preparing a defense in the forest includes the very same 
measures as under ordinary conditions. In addition, the company 
(battalion) commander must provide for disposing BMP's (BTR's) 
and tanks at firing positions so as to bring fire above all on 
roads, openings, treelines and glades and for preparing 
concealed armored group maneuver routes, and he must specify 
measures for fighting forest fires. 
  It is advisable to select the FEBA up to 100 m ahead of the 
treeline or move it into the depth by the very same distance. In 
the latter case a combat security outpost is placed at the 
treeline and subunits clear the woods to improve conditions for 
observing and conducting fire in such a way as not to reveal 
their positions in so doing. The company (battalion) aligns the 
battle formation in two echelons. The second echelon (reserve) 
must be disposed in a strongpoint near roads and openings in 
readiness to execute counterattacks or maneuver to a threatened 
axis. 
  In organizing the system of fire it is advisable to dispose 
all weapons so that axes, roads, passages in marshy sectors, 
glades and felled areas accessible for enemy operations and 
along which an enemy approach and attack are possible are under 
flanking and cross fire of defending subunits. In addition, 
concentrated and barrier fire of artillery and mortars should be 
prepared on these axes. Forest salients are used in the defense 
system for arranging ambushes and organizing flanking fire, 
cross fire and surprise, close-range concentrated fire. 
  Visibility is considerably restricted and C[.sup]2[/] 
deteriorates in the forest. Therefore the bulk of weapons is 
attached to platoons and companies. Tanks, guns, grenade 
launchers and ATGM launchers should be disposed in places 
providing an opportunity to conduct fire along roads and 
openings and against glades and sectors of sparse forest. Their 
firing positions must be covered by motorized rifle subunits and 
obstacles. Some riflemen, snipers and machinegunners are 
assigned to conduct fire from trees. 
  In a defense in the forest, air defense and other weapons 
assigned to combat the air enemy as a rule are disposed in 
glades, on treelines and in felled areas of the forest. This 
permits promptly detecting and bringing fire on enemy aircraft 
and helicopters. Air defense gunners also may be disposed on 
platforms prepared in trees. 
  Reconnaissance in the forest is conducted by observation, 
reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrols and 
reconnaissance ambushes. The system of observation must be 
organized so as to provide for viewing approaches to the FEBA, 
for which observation posts (observers) may be disposed in trees 
or moved forward. 
  Emplacements, shelters, trenches and communication trenches 
of the semifill or fill type are made on terrain with a high 
water table. In sectors where there is no need to dig 
communication trenches, movement routes to the rear are denoted 
by signs or marks on trees. 
  Minefields, fougasses, mined abatis, AT barriers and various 
wire obstacles are used as engineer obstacles in the forest. 
  Above all the forest is cleared for subunits and their 
weapons to improve the field of view and fire, and maneuver 
routes are prepared. Firefighting measures also are provided for. 
  Operations of small subunits in fire ambushes and the fire 
of 
all weapons from short range are widely used during battle in 
the forest. 
  Counterattacks usually are executed by small subunits along 
previously studied and prepared axes, as a rule along roads and 
openings. 
  Defense in the desert. On desert terrain a defense 
is occupied on the most likely axis of enemy operations and is 
based on a well organized system of fire and broad maneuver of 
the second echelon (reserve). The presence of terrain sectors 
with sandhills, dunes and moist solonchaks permits a company 
(battalion) to build a defense in a wider frontage in a single 
echelon with assignment of a reserve and to have larger gaps 
between strongpoints than under ordinary conditions. 
  The battalion defense area and company strongpoints are 
prepared for a perimeter defense and carefully camouflaged. 
Artillery fire is prepared and fire ambushes and obstacles 
arranged in gaps between them. 
  In a defense in the desert, fortification of a position with 
consideration of protection against precision weapons, 
disruptive painting of vehicles, installation of light overhead 
cover (screens) over objects, and other camouflage measures 
receive special attention. 
  In addition to the usual questions of organizing for battle, 
the company (battalion) commander provides for conducting 
reconnaissance to a greater depth than under ordinary conditions 
and engages the enemy by direct fire to long ranges. Reliable 
security of flanks and measures for protecting fortifications 
and water supply points from drifting sand and for preparing 
weapons and vehicles for use during sandstorms acquires special 
importance. Considering the possibility of a change in weather 
conditions, he must take steps to establish water and fuel 
reserves and monitor their consumption and the observance of 
water discipline. 
  In engineer preparation of a strongpoint (defense area) 
special importance is attached to reinforcing the sides of 
emplacements and shelters, for which brushwood, sandbags and 
available local materials are used. Sandbags, curvilinear 
reinforced shells, corrugated steel elements, and fabric-over- 
frame and other factory-made constructions are used for making 
covered fortification structures. 
  Subunit commanders at all levels must keep an eye on the 
condition of maneuver routes. For this it is advisable to mark 
them with easily visible, stable markers and to check minefields 
periodically. If they are drifted over with a thick layer of 
sand or their presence is revealed, new minefields are emplaced 
or existing ones relaid. 
  Company (battalion) technical support and rear subunits 
usually are located with the second echelon (reserve) near water 
distribution points. Special attention is given to strict 
fulfillment of sanitary- hygienic measures in personnel 
locations and at water supply points. Water sources are defended 
by assigned subunits. The condition of weapons and vehicles must 
be checked regularly and additional measures are taken to 
protect them from dust. 
  A defensive battle in the desert is fought just as under 
ordinary conditions. 
  Defense in northern areas and in winter. The 
presence of vast areas of tundra, marshy forested tundra and 
forested terrain, a large number of lakes, mountainous terrain 
with boulders and rock streams, a limited number of roads and 
difficulties of engineer preparation of strongpoints (defense 
areas) substantially affect organization of defense and combat 
employment of subunits. 
  In addition, the severe climate with lengthy winter, deep 
snow cover, low temperature, increased persistence of chemical 
agents and the arctic night and day have a negative effect on 
personnel. 
  At the same time, terrain with a large number of marshes, 
lakes, rivers, hills and other sectors difficult to negotiate, 
and in the winter period the deep snow cover, contribute to 
establishment of a defense with fewer forces than under ordinary 
conditions. 
  As a result, the defense in northern areas (Diagram 8) is 
organized across a broad front on axes accessible for enemy 
attack and usually is built as separate platoon (company) 
strongpoints prepared for a perimeter defense. Defending 
subunits concentrate main efforts on holding roads and adjoining 
hills, built-up areas, defiles between lakes, crossings over 
water obstacles and other important objectives. 
  Based on this, gaps between company and platoon strongpoints 
may be greater than under ordinary conditions. Various obstacles 
are emplaced in them and fire ambushes and patrolling are 
organized. 
  In organizing the defense in northern areas and in winter, 
in 
addition to the usual questions of organizing for battle the 
company (battalion) commander determines the following: axes 
most accessible for enemy operations, especially his enveloping 
subunits, amphibious (lake) assault forces, and raiding and 
reconnaissance parties, and methods of their destruction; 
measures for holding road junctions, built-up areas, hills and 
other important objectives, for securing flanks and gaps, for 
preparing weapons, vehicles and protective gear for operation 
under low-temperature conditions, for preparing shelters to warm 
personnel, and for protecting them against hypothermia and 
frostbite; and the procedure for clearing fortification 
structures and restoring obstacles after heavy snowfalls and for 
making sumps in trenches, shelters and at firing positions under 
thaw conditions. 
  To maintain high combat readiness of subunits the company 
(battalion) commander provides for measures for checking the 
personnel's performance of duty in a blizzard and snowfall. 
  In engineer preparation of a strongpoint (defense area), the 
company (battalion) commander must take account of the depth of 
snow cover, freezing of soil, and thickness and condition of ice 
on water obstacles. In permafrost areas, on rocky soil and on 
marshy terrain fortification structures of the fill type usually 
are built. Rocks, bags of dirt, sod, and in winter snow and ice 
in addition are used for this. Making trenches and communication 
trenches out of snow is widely employed with a deep snow cover. 
If time is available it is advisable to ice up slopes facing the 
enemy. 
  Road sectors in defiles, in places difficult to negotiate 
and 
on approaches to the defense, and cover ahead of the FEBA are 
demolished or mined. Minefields, abatis and boulder obstacles 
are emplaced ahead of the FEBA and in the depth of the defense. 
Ice on rivers, lakes and in bays is prepared for detonation in 
some sectors. 
  In organizing technical and logistic support, the company 
(battalion) commander provides for establishing additional 
reserves of missiles, ammunition, food and fuel and keeping 
weapons and vehicles in constant readiness for use under 
low-temperature conditions. Steps are taken in winter to prevent 
frostbite of personnel. In summer personnel are provided with 
means of protection against midges, mosquitoes and other insects. 
  The battalion aid station usually is located in heated 
spaces 
or shelters and supplied with a reserve of fuel as well as warm 
clothing for the wounded and sick. 
<H5>  11. Relief of Subunits </H5>
  Relief of subunits is understood to mean the organized 
receipt and transfer of strongpoints (defense areas) in a combat 
situation. 
  Relief of a company (battalion) in the defense as a rule is 
done at night and under other conditions of limited visibility. 
It must be organized carefully and conducted swiftly, covertly 
and so that subunits being relieved manage to arrive in the 
designated area before dawn and those which have arrived for 
relief manage to occupy strongpoints (defense areas) and 
organize a system of fire. 
  The procedure and time of relief are determined by the 
senior 
commander. Having received a relief order, the company 
(battalion) commander together with the commander of the subunit 
being relieved performs ground reconnaissance, during which he 
studies the enemy; becomes familiar with the disposition of 
subunits turning over the defense, the regime of behavior, 
organization of the system of fire and air defense, engineer 
preparation of the strongpoint (defense area), obstacles, and 
the NBC situation; and determines concealed movement routes to 
the relief area, locations of traffic control posts, places for 
meeting arriving subunits, and the relief procedure. It is of 
great importance to conceal the time of a relief and operations 
of subunits from the enemy in this period. 
  The subunit commander turning over a strongpoint (defense 
area) is obligated to present the relieving subunit commander 
with a diagram of the company strongpoint (battalion defense) 
area, and in addition he must give him all available 
intelligence on the enemy, with an indication of the precise 
location of weapons and minefields. The following must be 
pointed out to subordinate commanders: procedure for turning 
over a strongpoint (defense area), assembly area after the 
relief, measures for covering the relief and for maskirovka, 
where to send guides for rendezvousing with and accompanying the 
relieving subunits, where to place command posts, time for 
beginning and end of relief, and the procedure for actions in 
case of enemy use of mass destruction weapons or if he launches 
an attack during the relief. 
  Subunits taking over the defense are in assembly areas 
[iskhodnyy rayon] before the beginning of relief. Subunits move 
out along designated routes to the relief area at the prescribed 
time at a signal (command) from the company (battalion) 
commander. 
  Observation and a system of fire are organized immediately 
on 
arrival at the strongpoint (defense area), missions are updated 
for subunits to repel possible enemy actions and the company 
(battalion) begins the relief. Personnel of subunits turning 
over the defense are at their places in readiness to hand over 
their positions and repel possible enemy actions. 
  Motorized rifle subunits are replaced first, then tank, 
artillery and air defense subunits. Subunits defending a forward 
position or in a combat security outpost are relieved last. 
  During the relief the company (battalion) commander 
receiving 
the defense as a rule is at the COP of the commander turning 
over the strongpoint (defense area) and directs the relief. 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits is exercised over operating wire 
communications lines. 
  During the relief the company (battalion) must maintain the 
very same regime of behavior as was the case before the relief. 
  The company (battalion) commander who has turned over the 
defense covertly moves subunits to the designated assembly area 
and then acts in accordance with the mission received. 
  If the enemy launches an attack in the course of the relief, 
the relief stops and all subunits repel the assault. They are 
controlled at this time by the commander of the subunit being 
relieved. Relieving subunits which have arrived also are 
subordinated to him in this period. Relief of the company 
(battalion) continues after the enemy attack is repelled. 
  Relief of a battalion is formalized by a document. The 
report 
of the company (battalion) commander who has accepted the 
strongpoint (defense area) to his immediate commander about 
completion of the relief is considered to be the moment the 
relief ends. 
<H5>  12. Disengagement and Withdrawal </H5>
  As a kind of maneuver of subunits, withdrawal under present 
conditions is their leaving of occupied strongpoints (defense 
areas) and withdrawing to new lines disposed in the depth. It is 
accomplished to move subunits out from under attacks by superior 
enemy forces and have them occupy a more favorable position for 
subsequent operations. A withdrawal must be made only by order 
or authorization of the senior commander in an organized manner, 
covertly and swiftly, so as to have subunits arrive promptly in 
a prescribed area in a combat-effective status or occupy a 
designated strongpoint (defense area). 
  A withdrawal may be made in a forced or deliberate manner 
depending on the situation. 
  A forced withdrawal will be made when it is impossible to 
repel an enemy assault and hold the occupied strongpoint 
(defense area) with available forces and assets and when the 
situation on flanks creates a real threat of encirclement and 
destruction of a defending subunit. 
  A deliberate withdrawal is accomplished when there is an 
unfavorable ratio of forces and assets with the attacker and an 
unfavorable position of friendly subunits relative to the enemy. 
It can be accomplished to move subunits out from under an attack 
by superior enemy forces and occupy a more favorable position 
with respect to the attacker, transfer efforts to another axis 
or draw the enemy into fire sacks prepared in advance. 
  In all instances the withdrawal should be temporary in 
nature 
and be executed in an organized, planned manner so as not to 
turn into flight and not expose the flanks of adjacent subunits 
being moved out from under enemy attacks. 
  The need for a withdrawal may arise in the course of 
defensive or offensive battle, and also with an unsuccessful 
outcome of a meeting battle and when breaking out of 
encirclement. 
  The disengagement and withdrawal may occur under various 
situation conditions in which the commander's work and subunit 
operations are carried out. The position of subunits relative to 
the enemy is of decisive importance for determining the 
conditions. Based on this it follows that the withdrawal of 
subunits may be made in direct contact with the enemy or out of 
contact with him. 
  As shown by Great Patriotic War experience, our troops most 
often had to withdraw from a position of defense while in direct 
contact with the enemy. The withdrawal is the most frequent and 
complicated phenomenon under these conditions. This is connected 
with the fact that in this period subunits are performing 
several missions simultaneously: defending against an actively 
operating enemy while repelling his assaults from the front and 
flanks; withdrawing subunits from battle and exercising 
C[.sup]2[/] of them; accomplishing a withdrawal as part of 
the regimental (battalion) main body; or operating in the 
advance guard (rear or flank security element or as covering- 
force subunits). 
  More favorable conditions for a withdrawal are created when 
this mission is accomplished out of contact with the enemy. In 
this case disengagement is excluded and subunits begin the 
withdrawal immediately. 
  Disengagement when fighting a defensive battle is a common 
phenomenon and is considered the initial stage of withdrawal. It 
is the removal of subunits from direct contact with the enemy to 
a distance precluding the active effect of his fire and 
providing freedom for subsequent maneuver. 
  A disengagement may occur both in the course of a defensive 
battle as well as in the attack. In the defense it is done to 
withdraw, transfer efforts from one axis to another, execute a 
maneuver, reinforce especially dangerous axes, close breaches 
which formed as a result of enemy use of nuclear weapons, and 
cover exposed flanks; in the attack it is done to transfer 
efforts from one axis to another. 
  A battalion (company) as a rule executes a withdrawal as 
part 
of the regiment immediately to the final line (to the designated 
area) in march formation. 
  Covering-force subunits usually are assigned to cover the 
main body's withdrawal. In terms of their [situation], 
covering-force subunits should be in direct contact with the 
enemy and maintain the previous regime of fire, prevent (stop) 
attempts of enemy reconnaissance to penetrate into the depth of 
the defense (to the main body), repel assaults by his forward 
subunits and not allow an organized transition to the pursuit. 
  One reinforced platoon each from a company defending in 
direct contact with the enemy usually is assigned to be part of 
covering-force subunits. In some cases a company may be assigned 
from a first echelon battalion to perform this mission. 
  Covering-force subunits are supplied with an additional 
reserve of missiles and ammunition and with medical transport. 
  A battalion may be assigned to a rear guard with the mission 
of delaying the attacking enemy for the time necessary for 
withdrawal of the main body. 
  For organized disengagement and withdrawal (Diagram 9), 
subunits operating as part of the main body are assigned 
assembly areas, withdrawal axes or routes, phase lines [rubezh 
regulirovaniya] and a final withdrawal line [konechnyy rubezh 
otkhoda]. 
  The procedure and content of the company (battalion) 
commander's work in organizing disengagement and withdrawal 
depend on situation conditions, the mission received and time 
available. On the whole, it takes place in the very same order 
as in organizing the defense, but has its features. 
  Thus, in the concept for disengagement and withdrawal the 
company (battalion) commander additionally specifies the 
following: final withdrawal line (area) and time of occupying 
it, makeup of covering-force subunits supporting the 
disengagement, and makeup of security elements; procedure for 
disengagement of the main body, assembly areas, and withdrawal 
axis or route; and procedure for evacuating wounded, sick, as 
well as damaged (unserviceable) weapons and vehicles. 
  In the operation order the company (battalion) 
commander indicates the following in assigning combat missions: 
  --For main body subunits--objective of the 
withdrawal, missions, procedure for disengaging, withdrawal axis 
or route, assembly area and time of arrival in it, lines (start 
point and phase lines) and time for crossing them, the final 
withdrawal line (designated area) and for what operations to be 
ready; 
  --For covering-force subunits supporting the 
disengagement--makeup, missions, time up to which they must hold 
occupied positions, and procedure for their further operations; 
  --For artillery subunits, air defense subunit, grenade 
launcher subunit and other weapons remaining directly 
subordinate to the commander--missions and withdrawal procedure; 
  --For security subunits--makeup and missions. 
  In organizing coordination the company (battalion) commander 
must indicate the procedure for disengagement and withdrawal of 
subunits, for transporting or carrying out wounded and sick, and 
for evacuating unserviceable weapons and other vehicles; and 
coordinate actions of covering-force subunits and the procedure 
for their withdrawal, for demolition of important installations, 
for emplacement of obstacles, and for support of the covering- 
force subunits by artillery fire. 
  The time and procedure for disengagement depend on the 
nature 
of enemy operations, mission received and other situation 
conditions. In all cases the withdrawal as a rule must be 
carried out at night or under other conditions of limited 
visibility, but it also may be done during the day. Special 
attention here must be given to combating the air enemy and 
enemy tanks. 
  With the beginning of company (battalion) disengagement, 
covering-force subunits remain at occupied positions until the 
time given them or until the order (signal) for withdrawal, and 
they conduct the very same operations as preceded the 
disengagement. C[.sup]2[/] of these subunits is exercised by 
one of the platoon (company) commanders, who is directly 
subordinate to the company (battalion) commander and maintains 
communications with them. Taking advantage of favorable terrain 
conditions and using fire from occupied positions, the subunits 
repel enemy assaults and his attempts to penetrate into the 
depth of the defense. Artillery subunits assigned for their 
support conduct fire in the previous regime. 
  Taking advantage of concealing properties of terrain, 
subunits of the company (battalion) main body move to platoon 
assembly areas and then to the company and the battalion 
assembly area, assume the necessary march formation, and 
continue movement. 
  Covering-force subunits begin withdrawal at the commander's 
order (signal) after the company (battalion) crosses the line 
occupied by the rear guard. They withdraw suddenly, usually all 
of them simultaneously. If the enemy detects their withdrawal 
and begins pursuit, the covering- force subunits withdraw from 
line to line by bounds, delaying his advance, destroying bridges 
(crossings) and roads sections, and they also emplace minefields 
and other obstacles on enemy movement axes. 
  In a disengagement under conditions of active enemy 
operations, the company (battalion) inflicts damage on him by 
fire of all weapons and if necessary may suddenly counterattack 
with some of the forces or at full strength in order to halt the 
enemy and then quickly disengage under cover of assigned 
subunits, artillery and grenade launcher fire, obstacles, smoke 
and aerosols. 
  In the assembly area the company (battalion) commander 
updates missions for the withdrawal for platoons (companies) and 
means of reinforcement and organizes reconnaissance and 
security. On arrival in the assembly area the company 
(battalion) takes its place in the march formation and continues 
the withdrawal. 
  Company (battalion) security during a withdrawal is 
accomplished by the rear security element and if necessary also 
by flank security elements, which delay the enemy's advance by 
fire from the move and from in place and by operations of fire 
ambushes until the time indicated by the battalion commander. By 
order of the battalion commander, security elements also may 
demolish bridges (crossings) and road sections and emplace 
minefields and other obstacles. 
  A battalion assigned for operations in the rear guard takes 
up a defense at the indicated line in advance and holds it until 
the prescribed time or until the order to withdraw. Under all 
situation conditions it must support the regimental main body in 
breaking contact with the enemy and making an organized 
withdrawal. 
  A rear guard withdraws by authorization of the regimental 
commander successively from line to line or by leapfrogging, 
where some subunits withdraw to the next line, occupy positions 
on it across a broad front and support withdrawal of the other 
battalion subunits. In a withdrawal, wide use is made of fire 
ambushes, obstacles and demolitions. After accomplishing the 
mission the rear guard acts by direction of the regimental 
commander. 
  Battalion technical support and rear subunits not used for 
immediate support of the disengagement are withdrawn to the 
designated area in advance. The wounded and sick as well as 
unserviceable weapons and vehicles are evacuated ahead of time. 
Footnotes 
  1. See "Taktika v boyevykh primerakh: Polk" [Tactics in 
Combat Examples: The Regiment], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1974, p 194. 
  2. See "Taktika v boyevykh primerakh: Polk," pp 196-197. 
  3. See "Taktika v boyevykh primerakh: Polk," p 198. 
  4. See "Taktika v boyevykh primerakh: Polk," p 200. 
  5. See "Razvitiye taktiki strelkovykh podrazdeleniy 
Sovetskoy 
Armii v gody Velikoy Otechestvennoy voyny" [Development of 
Soviet Army Rifle Subunit Tactics in the Great Patriotic War], 
Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1988, p 214. 
  6. See "Razvitiye taktiki strelkovykh podrazdeleniy 
Sovetskoy 
Armii v gody Velikoy Otechestvennoy voyny," pp 214-215. 
  7. See "Taktika v boyevykh primerakh: Rota," [Tactics in 
Combat Examples: The Company], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1974, pp 
67-68. 
<H5>  Chapter V - The Offense </H5>
<H5>  1. Essence and Characteristic Features of Offensive Battle. </H5>
Conditions and Methods for a Company (Battalion) To Launch an 
Attack 
  The history of wars convincingly attests that only the 
offense leads to decisive victory over the enemy. It is the sole 
kind of battle by whose conduct total rout (destruction) of the 
enemy and capture of important lines (areas) and objectives is 
achieved. Herein specifically lies the objective of the offense. 
  Engagement of the enemy with all available weapons, a 
decisive assault, a swift advance of subunits into the depth of 
his battle formation, the killing and capture of personnel, 
capture of weapons and military vehicles, and the taking of 
planned lines (areas) are the essence of modern offensive 
battle. A rout of the enemy is achieved by skillful use of all 
weapons, decisive exploitation of results of artillery fire and 
air strikes, a timely buildup of efforts into the depth, wide 
use of maneuver of forces and assets, and delivery of assaults 
against his flank and rear. 
  The offense must be conducted with full exertion of efforts, 
at a high tempo, nonstop, day and night in coordination with 
subunits of all combat arms and special troops. 
  As one of the basic kinds of battle, the offense has a 
number 
of advantages over the defense. Above all, the initiative in 
operations, in choosing the axis, time and methods of delivering 
an attack against the enemy, in executing a maneuver to the 
flank and rear, and in imposing one's will on him belongs to the 
attacker. A successful offense lifts the morale of attacking 
subunits and at the same time sharply degrades the morale and 
mental state of the defending enemy. 
  The offense may be conducted against an attacking, 
withdrawing or defending enemy. While the attack against an 
attacking enemy is accomplished by a meeting battle and against 
a withdrawing enemy by the pursuit, against a defending enemy it 
usually begins with a penetration of his defense. 
  Penetrating the defense consists of breaking it by strikes 
of 
all kinds of weapons and by a determined assault of tank and 
motorized rifle subunits in a narrow sector, creating a breach 
in the defense and subsequently expanding it into the depth and 
toward the flanks. 
  Sometimes there may be considerable gaps, breaches and 
exposed flanks in the enemy defense. In this case the attack 
begins with fire damage of the enemy and an assault by a portion 
of forces of subunits from the front and by the other forces 
from flanks and rear through the weakest places in the defense. 
The attack usually will be conducted on a broader front than in 
a penetration of the defense. 
  A company and battalion do not penetrate the enemy defense 
independently, but take an active part in its penetration and 
development of the attack. 
  A company (battalion) may attack in the first echelon, make 
up a second echelon or combined arms reserve of the battalion 
(regiment), or operate in an enveloping detachment or a special 
detachment. A company may be assigned to a forward security 
element (when the regiment is attacking with forward movement 
out of the depth and in pursuit of the enemy), and a battalion 
may be assigned to act as an advance guard (above all in pursuit 
of the enemy), forward detachment, raiding detachment or 
amphibious assault force. An MRC (MRB) in addition may be 
employed in a tactical airborne assault force or be the basis of 
an assault team (assault detachment). 
  Means of warfare, especially nuclear and precision weapons, 
have seen further development in recent years, the proportion of 
armored vehicles in units and subunits has grown, the 
effectiveness of artillery and aviation has increased, and 
engineer vehicles and means of combat, technical and logistic 
support have been upgraded. Because of this, decisiveness of 
objectives, high fluidity, intensity and dynamic nature are 
characteristic features of the modern offense. It acquired a 
ground-air nature, the essence of which is accomplishment of 
simultaneous fire damage to the full depth of the enemy troop 
alignment with use of more diverse methods of performing combat 
missions in a difficult electronic environment. 
  The ground-air nature of the offense presumes the delivery 
of 
a combination strike against the enemy and accomplishment of 
more decisive methods of routing him. A simultaneous strike by 
attacking subunits (units) from the front and by tactical 
airborne assault forces from the rear in coordination with 
aviation, especially helicopters, is achieved. Fire superiority 
of the sides beginning from distant approaches is strengthened 
in a modern offense, and the role of maneuver grows. 
  The attack by a company (battalion) may be carried out under 
varying situation conditions. Situation conditions are 
understood to mean factors exerting an influence individually or 
in the aggregate on the procedure and content of commanders' 
work of preparing for battle, especially work of organizing it, 
and also on methods of launching and conducting the attack. 
Those factors basically are the following: employment of 
conventional or nuclear weapons and other weapons; makeup, 
status and nature of the enemy defense; situation, status and 
combat capabilities of friendly subunits by the beginning of the 
attack, and also time available for preparing the attack; nature 
of terrain, condition of weather, time of day and year, and the 
NBC situation. 
  When an attack is conducted using only conventional weapons, 
the enemy is routed by reliable fire damage of his immediately 
opposing forces and assets, with a simultaneous effect on 
reserves and important objectives in the depth of the defense, 
and also by a decisive buildup of efforts to exploit success. 
Under these conditions a successive rout of the defending enemy 
is the basic method of conducting the attack. Subunits usually 
will assault him on a relatively lesser frontage (in a 
penetration sector). In addition, they must be in constant 
readiness to conduct an attack employing nuclear weapons. 
  In attacking an enemy who has shifted to the defense in 
advance, a company (battalion) often will have to cross his 
security zone, in which the enemy will establish nuclear 
minefields. 
  Under conditions of the use of nuclear weapons, the basic 
method of the attack is simultaneous engagement of the enemy and 
important objectives by nuclear strikes to the full depth of the 
defense with subsequent completion of his rout by decisive 
operations of tank and motorized rifle units and subunits. Also 
of great importance are effective steps to disrupt and weaken 
enemy nuclear strikes, subunits' decisive exploitation of 
nuclear and fire damage in order to complete the enemy's rout, 
and beating him to the punch in restoring combat effectiveness 
of friendly subunits and organizing their subsequent operations. 
Under these conditions subunits decisively assault the enemy on 
a broader frontage and usually operate along axes. As a rule, 
with the need to negotiate zones of radioactive contamination 
and sectors of destructive damage, their advance will be uneven 
along the front and into the depth of his defense. 
  Before launching an attack on a defending enemy a company 
(battalion) may take up an attack position [iskhodnaya 
pozitsiya] (assembly area [iskhodnyy rayon]) in direct contact 
with the enemy or be in an assembly area in the rear of friendly 
troops. 
  A company (battalion) may launch an attack against a 
defending enemy from a position of direct contact with him or 
from the move. 
  Based on defensive doctrine, in the initial period of war 
the 
basic method is to launch an attack from a position of 
direct contact with the enemy after regrouping. The essence 
of this method is that the company (battalion) commander's work 
in organizing the attack is done on the terrain and its 
preparation is completed on the whole in direct contact with the 
enemy. A company (battalion) launches an attack in the 
previously established battle formation. It is formed after the 
necessary regrouping from a position of defense and sometimes, 
under favorable conditions, simultaneously with the relief of 
defending subunits while moving forward out of the depth. In 
that method of launching an attack, subunits have an opportunity 
to study the enemy and terrain in advance, but the company 
(battalion) will be in the effect zone not only of enemy 
tactical nuclear attack weapons, but also of his artillery for a 
relatively long time. It is easier for a defending enemy to 
discover the forces and assets of attacking subunits. All this 
hampers preservation of their combat effectiveness and requires 
careful fortification of the attack position (assembly area) and 
conduct of measures for ensuring concealment and achieving a 
surprise assault. 
  In this method of launching an attack, an MRC is assigned an 
attack position equal in size to the company attack frontage and 
consisting of a trench or trenches, the adjoining communication 
trenches, and firing positions of BMP's (BTR's) and attached 
weapons. If it is impossible for BMP's (BTR's) to occupy firing 
positions covertly with their company near the FEBA, they may be 
placed at an attack position or assembly position 
[vyzhidatelnaya pozitsiya] together with tank subunits. The 
attack position of a first echelon MRC is specified in the first 
trench, and that of a second echelon company in the second and 
third trenches. 
  In order to occupy an attack position, the battalion is 
assigned an assembly area (Diagram 10). It should provide for 
concealed disposition of subunits and their least vulnerability 
to all enemy weapons and must be on the axis of attack. 
  An assembly area is specified for a first echelon battalion 
within the first defense position. It is limited from the front 
by the first trench, from the rear by the depth of disposition 
of battalion forces and assets and from the flanks by its 
boundaries. The following are basic elements of the area: attack 
positions of motorized rifle subunits (three trenches with 
communication trenches) and sometimes of tank subunits; firing 
positions of organic and attached artillery and other weapons, 
including those assigned to conduct direct fire, and launch 
(firing) positions of air defense subunits; sites of 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities; routes providing concealed approach, 
disposition and rapid forward movement of the battalion for 
launching an assault; and lines of deployment and departure of 
the tanks. Attack positions of tank subunits are designated 2-4 
km from the enemy FEBA in the case where there is concealment 
against enemy observation and listening. 
  An assembly area as a rule is chosen for the regiment's 
second echelon battalion at the second defense position. An 
assembly position usually is designated for a TB 5-7 km from the 
enemy FEBA. Terrain at the position must provide concealed 
disposition of tanks, their least vulnerability to all kinds of 
enemy weapons and convenience of moving up to the line of 
departure. 
  The essence of a hasty attack is that preparation 
for battle is accomplished in a period when subunits are out of 
contact with the enemy and their forward movement, deployment 
and transition to the assault are conducted nonstop, from the 
move. This method of attack has not only a number of advantages, 
but drawbacks as well: the personnel's physical exertion and 
consumption of fuel and other supplies increase in connection 
with forward movement to the enemy FEBA. The possibility exists 
that during forward movement it will be necessary to cross (or 
bypass) areas of destructive damage, minefields laid by remote 
minelaying equipment, and zones of radioactive and chemical 
contamination, centers of fire and areas of flooding. The enemy 
may deliver nuclear and fire strikes against subunits in the 
period of forward movement, especially with precision combat 
systems. Reliable fire support is accomplished by the senior 
commander's forces and assets to weaken these enemy strikes. 
  An attack usually is launched from an assembly area, which 
is 
assigned to the battalion with an area of up to 10 
km[.sup]2[/]. The battalion usually is disposed in it by 
company with means of reinforcement. A company is disposed in 
the area under cover along the route of forward movement, taking 
advantage of the terrain's protective and concealing properties. 
  The distance of the assembly area from the enemy FEBA should 
preclude engagement of the subunits in the area by artillery 
fire and provide concealment against radar reconnaissance 
assets. The least time possible should be spent moving up to the 
enemy FEBA. Shelters are made for personnel, weapons and 
military vehicles and the area is prepared for defense if 
necessary. Security, air defense, maskirovka, and protection 
against mass destruction and precision weapons are organized in 
it. The ATP and GLP are disposed together with or behind first 
echelon MRC's. The air defense subunit is disposed at firing 
positions in readiness to fire on airborne targets. 
  For organized forward movement, deployment, and assurance of 
simultaneous transition to an assault, the company (battalion) 
usually is assigned a forward movement route, start point 
(line), point (line) of deployment into platoon (company) 
columns, line of departure and safety limit (Diagram 11). In 
addition, a dismount line also is specified for the dismounted 
assault of an MRC (MRB). 
  Places for personnel to board tanks as a mounted force are 
designated for motorized rifle subunits in motor vehicles if 
necessary. 
  A start point (line) is intended for a prompt beginning of 
company (battalion) forward movement from the assembly area. Its 
distance from the assembly area should allow the battalion 
column with means of reinforcement to extend and begin movement 
at a given speed. This distance may be 5-10 km. 
  A route is designated for movement of subunit columns up to 
the first deployment line. Subsequently forward movement will be 
accomplished along cross-country routes. 
  The point (line) of deployment into company columns is 
intended for beginning the battalion deployment into company 
columns. Its distance from the enemy FEBA should ensure that 
tanks and BMP's (BTR's) cannot be engaged by fire of enemy 
ATGM's, tanks and guns assigned for direct fire and may be 
within 4-6 km. 
  The point (line) of deployment into platoon columns is 
designated where possible behind terrain folds 2-3 km from the 
enemy FEBA. Engagement of tanks and BMP's by short-range ATGM 
fire and the fire of IFV guns and other infantry weapons should 
be precluded with their arrival at this line. 
  A line of departure is chosen so that forward movement of 
first echelon companies to it is covert. The distance of the 
line should ensure effective fire from the main kinds of weapons 
of assaulting subunits and permit them to reach the enemy FEBA 
at the designated H hour nonstop at maximum speed. The line of 
departure may be up to 600 m from the enemy FEBA and sometimes 
even more depending on the nature of the enemy defense, degree 
of fire damage, terrain conditions and methods of assault. 
  The motorized rifle subunit dismount line is designated as 
close to the enemy FEBA as possible, usually in places providing 
cover from the fire of his machineguns and short-range AT 
weapons. Based on exercise experience, the dismount line was 
300-400 m from the enemy FEBA. This permits preserving the 
motorized riflemen's energy for the assault dash and at the same 
time ensures their safe distance from friendly artillery 
shellbursts at the moment they dismount. 
  The safety limit is specified so as to preclude damage of 
forward moving subunits from casualty-producing factors of a 
nuclear strike (strikes) delivered by friendly troops against 
enemy strongpoints on the forward edge. 
  Under favorable situation conditions, especially in the 
course of developing an attack, a company (battalion) may 
assault the enemy by deploying into battle formation from march 
columns, i.e., directly from the march. This makes it 
considerably more difficult for the enemy to execute a maneuver 
and at the same time helps achieve surprise. In this situation 
organization for battle usually is accomplished in movement or 
during short halts. Subunits launch the assault as they approach 
the FEBA. 
<H5>  2. Company (Battalion) Attack Frontage, Combat Missions, </H5>
Means of Reinforcement and Battle Formations 
  A company (battalion) attacks in a certain frontage 
determined by its place in the battle formation, its role in 
performing the battalion (regimental) mission, the subunit's 
status and combat capabilities, weapons employed, the defender's 
forces and nature of terrain. 
  Thus, the company (battalion) attack frontage will be 
relatively less when attacking using conventional weapons in the 
regimental penetration sector, i.e., on its main axis of attack. 
At the same time, the company (battalion) attack frontage as a 
rule is wider in operations using nuclear weapons or on another 
axis of regimental attack (not the main one). 
  When attacking in the regimental penetration sector, a 
company (battalion) should attack in that frontage which would 
ensure necessary superiority over the enemy in tanks, BMP's, 
ATGM's and small arms. In the Great Patriotic War a successful 
attack on a deliberate enemy defense required subunits of the 
attacking echelon to create a ratio of 6:1 in tanks and SP 
artillery to enemy tanks and 4:1 in rifle companies in the 
penetration sector. That superiority also is needed under 
present conditions, since subunit combat capabilities are 
growing approximately the very same both for us as well as for 
the probable enemy. 
  Consequently, to determine the company (battalion) attack 
frontage in the regimental penetration sector using only 
conventional weapons, it is necessary to create the indicated 
superiority in forces and assets. Damage done to the enemy in 
tanks and IFV's in appropriate periods of fire engagement, which 
should be at least 60 percent, is taken into account. In this 
case losses of our tanks, BMP's and small arms from enemy fire 
may reach 10- 20 percent. In addition, tank (motorized rifle) 
subunits interworking with (attached to) an MRC or TC (MRB or 
TB) are taken into account in calculations. Thus, the company 
(battalion) attack frontage is determined based on combat 
capabilities of ATGM-equipped BMP's, tanks and small arms. 
  Based on the initial data set forth above, the methodology 
of 
calculating company attack frontage can be as follows, and the 
following are determined in so doing: 

  -  number of ATGM-equipped IFV's and Dragon and TOW ATGM 
systems of the defending enemy mechanized infantry task force 
(made up of three mechanized infantry companies and one TC) with 
consideration of losses from our fire damage; 
  -  density of AT weapons and tanks per kilometer in the first 
echelon of the enemy battle group defending in a frontage of 5 
km (it is considered that up to 70 percent of AT weapons and 
tanks are disposed in the group's first echelon); 
  -  number of 
ATGM-equipped BMP's and tanks necessary for creating a 
superiority of 5-6 times over the enemy per kilometer of attack 
frontage; 
  -  number of BMP's and tanks used in the company attack with 
consideration of permissible losses from enemy fire; 
  -  company attack frontage on condition of establishing 
requisite 
superiority in ATGM-equipped BMP's and tanks over the 
enemy. 


    Let us determine the attack frontage of a BMP-equipped MRC 
interworking with 5-6 tanks (or of an MRB reinforced by a TC). 
  The enemy battalion task force may have 80 ATGM-equipped 
IFV's, Dragon and TOW ATGM systems and tanks, or 32 counting 
losses from our fire damage (up to 60 percent). Around 23 of 
this number of AT weapons and tanks are used in the task force 
first echelon, which will comprise a density of around 5 per 
kilometer with its defense frontage of 5 km. To establish a 
superiority of 5- 6 times over the enemy it is necessary for the 
attacking company to have 25-30 tanks and BMP's per kilometer. 
In the course of the attack, counting permissible losses (up to 
20 percent), an MRC will have 12 BMP's and tanks: (10 BMP's + 5 
tanks) x 0.8. By establishing the necessary superiority, a 
company is capable of attacking in a frontage of 400-600 m, 
i.e., up to 500 m with that number. 
  Let us examine the frontage in which an MRC is capable of 
attacking based on combat capabilities of small arms. The 
following are determined: 

  -  cumulative effective rate of small arms fire of the enemy 
task force first echelon subunits with consideration of losses 
(at least 50 percent) from our fire damage; 
  -  density of enemy fire (number of bullets) per meter per 
minute; 
  -  necessary bullet density per meter of frontage per minute 
with 
consideration of a superiority of 3-4 times over the enemy; 
  -  cumulative effective rate of fire of the company in one 
minute 
with consideration of permissible losses from enemy fire (10-20 
percent); 
  -  company attack frontage. 


    In accordance with the above methodology, let us determine 
an 
MRC's attack frontage based on requirements of achieving the 
necessary small arms ratio. 
  The cumulative effective rate of fire of first echelon 
mechanized infantry subunits of a battalion task force (there 
are two mechanized infantry companies) counting losses (50 
percent) is 24,375 bullets in one minute (rifles--111x175)+(M60 
machineguns--9x250)+(MG3 machineguns- -18x150). With a task 
force defending a frontage of 5,000 m, enemy fire density will 
be 4-5 bullets per meter per minute. To establish a superiority 
of 3-4 times, a company must ensure a density averaging 15-16 
bullets per meter per minute. The cumulative effective rate of 
fire of an MRC is 9,750 bullets (AK [Kalashnikov assault 
rifle]--39x100)+(RPK [Kalashnikov light machinegun]-- 9x150)+(PK 
[Kalashnikov machinegun] and PKT [Kalashnikov tank machinegun]-- 
18x250). Counting permissible losses (20 percent), the rate of 
company small arms fire will be 7,800 bullets in one minute. 
Consequently, to create requisite bullet density per meter of 
frontage, the company must attack in a frontage up to 500 m 
(7,80015=520 m; 7,80016=480 m; (520+480)2=500 m). 
  In what frontage is an MRB (TB) capable of conducting a 
successful attack? The methodology of this calculation is the 
very same as for determining company attack frontage. The 
difference lies only in the fact that it is necessary to take 
into account the density of all forces and assets of the enemy 
battalion task force in its defense frontage, not just of its 
first echelon. 
  Let us calculate the attack frontage of an MRB reinforced by 
a TC based on the need for creating a superiority over the enemy 
in ATGM- equipped BMP's and tanks. 
  There may be ATGM-equipped IFV's, Dragon and TOW ATGM 
systems 
and tanks numbering 80 in a battalion task force defense, or 32 
counting losses from our fire damage (80x0.4). That number of AT 
weapons and tanks permits creating a density of approximately 6 
of them per kilometer (with the force defending in a 5 km 
frontage). To establish a superiority of 5-6 times over the 
enemy, an attacking battalion must have 30-36 ATGM-equipped 
BMP's and tanks per kilometer of frontage. In an MRB reinforced 
by a TC, counting losses there may be 32-34 ATGM-equipped BMP's 
and tanks: (30 BMP's+10 tanks)x0.8=32. Consequently, a battalion 
is capable of conducting a successful attack in a frontage up to 
1,000 m (based on creating the necessary superiority in ATGM- 
equipped BMP's, ATGM systems and tanks). 
  The attack frontage of an MRB based on the presence of its 
small arms should be determined according to the methodology of 
calculating a company frontage, but it is necessary to take into 
account small arms existing in the enemy task force. 
  When nuclear weapons are used, in connection with 
destruction 
of the defending enemy's main forces and assets, a company 
(battalion) attack frontage will be wider than when conventional 
weapons are used. This frontage should ensure interworking among 
subunits and their operations in approach march formation and 
along axes, bypass of destructive damage, and convenience of 
observation and C[.sup]2[/]. Based on this, combat training 
experience has shown that under the conditions in question a 
company is capable of conducting an attack against a defending 
enemy in a frontage up to 1,000 m and a battalion in a frontage 
up to 2,000 m. 
  In conducting an attack on another axis (outside the 
penetration sector), a company and battalion will require 
approximately half the forces and assets to achieve necessary 
superiority per kilometer of frontage. This is explained 
basically by the fact that on such an axis the enemy usually 
will defend on a wider front (for example, a battalion will 
defend up to 8 km) and in addition, the company (battalion) will 
have a more limited mission to perform than in the regimental 
penetration sector. 
  Intervals between attacking tanks and BMP's may reach 100 m, 
and this makes it convenient for observation and C[.sup]2[/]. 
In addition, these intervals permit BMP's to conduct fire 
between attacking tanks, which may execute the assault in a 
zigzag (S-weave) without interfering with each other in the 
course of the assault. Continuous engagement of enemy infantry 
in the attack frontage is provided by single-layer gun fire when 
fire is conducted by tanks attacking with intervals up to 100 m, 
and with double-layer gun fire with intervals of 50 m. 
  It is necessary to specify combat missions for subunits 
correctly in organizing an attack. The procedure of their 
operations also depends on the combat missions. The combat 
mission is the basis for organizing battle, including 
coordination and comprehensive support. 
  It is apparent from the calculations cited above for 
determining attack frontage against a defending enemy that a 
reinforced company is capable (with the necessary superiority) 
of inflicting damage on his personnel and weapons in the platoon 
strongpoint and continuing to advance into the depth. A 
reinforced battalion in turn has an opportunity to crush the 
enemy to the full depth of the battalion defense in the attack 
frontage and preserve forces and assets for continuing it. The 
capability of the company and battalion to inflict such damage 
on the enemy is their common mission. As shown by the experience 
of wars and exercises, based on effective range of fire by 
tanks, BMP's and small arms and also on the need for maximum 
involvement of weapons to engage the enemy in assault 
objectives, a reinforced company is capable of realizing its 
combat capabilities in the initial alignment of the battle 
formation, which also is retained for subsequent operations, 
i.e., when the company attacks, all its forces and assets must 
take part in the assault simultaneously. A reinforced battalion 
is forced to change the initial alignment of forces and assets 
for full utilization of its combat capabilities and for 
performing the common mission (routing the enemy to the depth of 
defense of his battalion) in order to retain necessary 
superiority in forces and assets. 
  In this connection, in an attack on a defending enemy the 
overall combat mission of a first echelon battalion is divided 
into two intermediate missions--immediate and subsequent 
(Diagram 12). The company mission is not divided--it is assigned 
only an immediate mission. The company and battalion commander 
are given a direction for continuing the attack to orient them 
for subsequent operations after performing common missions. 
  As a rule, the combat mission is characterized by 
tactical content and depth. The content of the combat mission is 
destruction of a specific enemy at a specific point (in a 
specific area) and taking of a line on the terrain by a 
designated time. Mission depth is determined by the distance of 
the line to be taken from the enemy FEBA or from the line of the 
previous mission. 
  The enemy unquestionably is the primary objective of the 
attack. Only with destruction (capture) of personnel and damage 
(seizure) of weapons is its goal achieved. Routing the enemy and 
taking a line is a unified process. The line which should be 
taken must be a tactical line favoring the attackers (seizure of 
a hill, water obstacle (bridgehead), pass, opposite edge of the 
forest and so on). 
  Thus, the immediate mission of a first echelon 
company (also including a TC attached to an MRB) is to 
destroy the enemy in the first echelon platoon strongpoint and 
take the strongpoint. Mission depth may be up to 0.5 km. The 
direction for continuing the attack is indicated in such a way 
that it supports performance of the battalion's immediate 
mission. 
  The immediate mission of a second echelon company 
when committed may be to complete destruction of the enemy in 
strongpoints in the depth of the defense together with first 
echelon companies and take the first position. The direction for 
continuing the company attack is assigned so as to ensure 
performance of the battalion's subsequent mission. Mission depth 
may be 3 km or more. 
  The immediate mission of a first echelon battalion 
as a rule is to destroy the enemy in strongpoints of first 
echelon companies in its own attack frontage and take them. The 
subsequent mission is to develop the attack, rout the enemy in 
the depth of the defense area in coordination with adjacent 
battalions and take the first position. The direction for 
continuing the attack is determined so as to ensure performance 
of the regiment's subsequent mission. The depth of missions may 
reach up to 2 km for the immediate and 3 km or more for the 
subsequent mission. 
  The immediate mission of a second echelon battalion 
when committed may consist of completing the destruction 
of enemy brigade (regimental) reserves together with first 
echelon battalions and taking their line. The depth of the 
immediate mission may be 5-7 km and sometimes even more. 
  New missions are assigned to a first echelon company and 
battalion after performance of combat missions. As with second 
echelon subunits, they usually are assigned one mission and a 
new direction for continuing the attack. The mission content may 
differ and is determined by the existing situation. Under some 
conditions the mission may be to develop the attack into the 
depth and take an important line and, under others, to repel an 
enemy counterattack. 
  To perform combat missions during an attack, a company 
(battalion) is reinforced by subunits of other combat arms and 
special troops. Depending on the assigned mission, a mortar 
(artillery) battery and an AT, grenade launcher, flamethrower 
and combat engineer squad may be attached to the MRC and an 
artillery battery, MRP and combat engineer squad may be attached 
to the TC. In addition, the MRC (TC) may be supported by fire of 
an artillery (mortar) battery and interwork with a tank 
(motorized rifle) company (platoon). 
  An MRB (TB) usually is reinforced by one or two TC's 
(MRC's), 
an artillery battalion or battery, combat engineer platoon, 
subunits of AT and air defense weapons, subunits of chemical 
troops, mineclearing equipment, bridgelayer, obstacle-clearing 
engineer vehicle (or BAT route clearance dozer) and other 
equipment. In addition, the battalion is supported by fire of an 
artillery battalion, sometimes by combat helicopters, and is 
covered by air defense weapons in the regimental system. 
  An MRC attached to a TB as a rule is resubordinated to TC's 
by platoon. A TC attached to an MRB usually operates at full 
strength and is directly subordinate to the battalion commander. 
A TC may be attached to MRC's by platoon when attacking in a 
city, in the mountains, in the forest and against a fortified 
area. 
  The mortar (artillery) battery and GLP operate at full 
strength in direct subordination to the battalion commander. 
Sometimes the battery is attached by platoon and the GLP by 
squads to first echelon MRC's. The AT squad (platoon) as a rule 
remains at the disposal of the company (battalion) commander and 
operates at full strength. 
  To perform the assigned mission in an attack against a 
defending enemy, company (battalion) forces and assets are 
aligned in a battle formation which should conform to the 
mission, concept of upcoming battle and situation conditions at 
hand. 
  The following requirements are placed on the battle 
formation 
in the attack. It is aligned so as to ensure the following: 
successful conduct of the attack with employment both of 
conventional as well as nuclear weapons; timely concentration of 
efforts on the selected axis; maximum involvement of weapons in 
the battle and full use of subunits' combat capabilities; 
decisive damage to the greatest possible depth; swift 
exploitation of results of nuclear and fire damage of the enemy 
and of favorable terrain conditions. The need for building up 
efforts in the course of battle and executing a maneuver, least 
vulnerability of subunits to strikes of all kinds of weapons, 
maintenance of continuous coordination, and convenience of 
C[.sup]2[/] also are very important requirements placed on 
the battle formation alignment. 
  A typical feature of the modern company (battalion) battle 
formation is their greater tactical and fire independence than 
in the Great Patriotic War. This is explained by the fact that 
at the present time the company and battalion possess higher 
striking power, firepower and mobility. In addition, subunits of 
other combat arms and special troops are attached to or support 
them. In connection with this the number of elements of the 
battle formation has increased and its alignment is becoming 
more varied than before. 
  As a rule, the battle formation of a company in the attack 
is 
aligned in a single echelon and consists of platoons and 
reinforcing weapons and subunits which remain directly 
subordinate to the company commander. The battalion battle 
formation may be formed in one or two echelons. It consists of 
first echelon companies with means of reinforcement, a second 
echelon or reserve, and also reinforcing weapons and subunits 
remaining directly subordinate to the battalion commander. 
  The first echelon is intended for performing the immediate 
mission and in addition must develop the attack into the depth. 
Therefore it must be stronger. Thus, as a rule all MRP's are 
used in the first echelon of the MRC and interworking tank 
subunits attack with them in addition. Usually two and sometimes 
even three reinforced MRC's (less a platoon) and tank subunits 
attached to the MRB are used in the MRB first echelon. 
  The battalion second echelon, usually up to a company, 
performs the mission of exploiting success of the first echelon 
in the depth of the enemy defense, widening the penetration of 
the defense toward the flank. In addition, it may be used to 
repel a counterattack, replace subunits which have lost combat 
effectiveness, and destroy the enemy remaining on the flanks and 
in the rear of the first echelon. A specific combat mission is 
assigned to the second echelon simultaneously with the first 
echelon. 
  A reserve is assigned when there is a single-echelon 
alignment of the battalion battle formation. It is intended for 
performing missions arising in the course of the attack. From a 
platoon to a company is assigned to the reserve. A combat 
mission is assigned to it during commitment. 
  The attached artillery battalion (battery) is used to 
destroy 
and neutralize enemy means of nuclear and chemical attack, 
tanks, AT weapons, C[.sup]2[/] facilities and electronic 
equipment, demolish fortifications and provide illumination 
support. 
  Supporting artillery subunits perform fire missions in 
support of the company (battalion) under the battalion 
(regimental) commander's plan. 
  Air defense subunits are used for combating low-flying 
aircraft, helicopters and drones and destroying enemy airborne 
assault forces at low and medium altitudes. Being in the battle 
formation, air defense subunits conduct fire against airborne 
targets in movement or from short halts. 
  The AT squad of the MRC (MRB) and AT grenade launcher 
subunits are intended for destroying enemy tanks, IFV's and 
other armored targets. They also may be employed for destroying 
weapons, including those in fortification structures, and for 
combating helicopters. 
  The MRB's GLP is intended for engaging enemy personnel and 
weapons outside of shelters, in open emplacements (trenches) and 
behind terrain folds. 
  The attached subunit of engineer troops basically is used in 
the course of an attack for performing engineer reconnaissance 
of terrain, destroying enemy nuclear mines, breaching obstacles 
and destructive damage, making crossings over barriers and 
preparing and maintaining crossings. 
<H5>  3. Fire Engagement and Methods of Assault </H5>
  The goals of fire engagement are as follows: destroying 
(neutralizing) means of nuclear and chemical attack and the main 
enemy grouping; winning and maintaining fire superiority over 
the enemy; disorganizing C[.sup]2[/] and fire control; 
disrupting his air defense system and operation of the rear; and 
creating favorable conditions for units and subunits to perform 
combat missions successfully. These goals are achieved by 
comprehensive fire effect on the enemy by forces and assets of 
subunits of the Armed Forces, combat arms and special troops 
using missiles and ammunition filled with conventional means. 
  Fire engagement is organized, planned and carried out by the 
senior commander and his staff and is conducted to a 
considerable depth of the enemy defense. 
  Missile subunits, artillery, aviation (including army 
aviation), weapons of defending units (subunits), as well as 
tanks, ATGM launchers and guns for direct fire, ordinarily 
assigned from second echelons of units, usually are used for 
fire engagement in support of attacking troops. 
  Fire engagement of the enemy in an attack usually 
is planned for three periods: fire preparation of the assault, 
fire support of the assault, and fire accompaniment of attacking 
subunits in the depth. Sometimes it may be conducted for the 
last two periods in a meeting battle and when the battalion 
(regimental) second echelon is committed. 
  Fire engagement of the enemy includes artillery and air 
engagement. In taking part in it, artillery uses the following 
types of fire: against a single target, concentrated, massed, 
standing barrier, rolling barrier, successive fire concentration 
(it may be single, double or triple), rolling barrage (single, 
double) and so on. 
  Battalion artillery and artillery attached to the company 
(battalion) may employ fire independently against a single 
target, concentrated fire and standing barrier fire and also be 
used to conduct massed fire, rolling barrier fire and a rolling 
barrage as part of or together with the regimental artillery 
group. 
  Fire preparation of the assault is accomplished 
before subunits launch the assault and is conducted to a 
considerable depth of the enemy defense. Thus, back in the Great 
Patriotic War a trend appeared toward increasing the depth of 
simultaneous fire engagement of the enemy, which at the end of 
the third period often reached 15 km and more. 
  The goal of fire preparation of the assault is to inflict 
damage on means of nuclear and chemical attack, artillery, AT 
weapons, tanks, personnel and weapons in defense strongpoints, 
the C[.sup]2[/] system, precision weapons, air defense 
weapons, electronic equipment and so on. 
  When launching an assault against a defending enemy from a 
position of direct contact with him, fire preparation of the 
assault begins when subunits are ready for the assault and ends 
with the arrival of tank subunits at the line of departure from 
assembly areas (attack positions). 
  In an attack launched from the move, fire preparation of the 
assault begins when first echelon subunits approach the line 
reached by enemy artillery fire, but not later than when they 
reach the line of deployment into battalion columns, and ends 
with the subunits' arrival at the line of departure. 
  Duration of fire preparation of the assault basically 
depends 
on preparedness of the defense and its necessary degree of 
damage, extent of fire missions to be performed, artillery's 
technical capabilities and ammunition available and may be 
around one hour. 
  Fire preparation of the assault is conducted by several 
artillery fire assaults and usually by one air raid of front 
aviation. In the first fire assault artillery usually engages AT 
weapons, tanks and personnel in platoon strongpoints of 
companies of the first line, as well as artillery, mortars, and 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities of first echelon battalions. In the 
middle of artillery preparation, fire assaults are conducted 
against targets both in the depth of the enemy defense (in 
second echelon battalions) as well as on the forward edge (in 
the first position), especially against AT weapons and tanks. 
Fire preparation of the assault ends with a powerful artillery 
fire assault against strongpoints of the first line and against 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities. 
  Tanks, ATGM's, guns and other weapons assigned for direct 
fire destroy and neutralize above all enemy AT and armored 
weapons on the FEBA and in its immediate depth in the period of 
fire preparation of the assault. 
  Air preparation of the assault is accomplished by front and 
army aviation, which most often performs its missions in the 
middle and at the end of fire preparation, when artillery is 
neutralizing the enemy at the first position. 
  Fire support of the assault is conducted to keep 
the enemy from restoring the disrupted system of fire and 
C[.sup]2[/] and to create conditions for assaulting subunits 
to complete the enemy's rout. This is achieved by engaging means 
of nuclear attack, elements of the automated artillery fire 
control system, AT weapons, tanks and other targets which have 
been newly detected or have come alive. 
  Fire support of the assault begins with arrival of first 
echelon subunits at the line of departure and is conducted 
continuously to the depth of defense of the enemy first echelon 
brigade (regiment) (8-10 km and sometimes even more), with main 
efforts concentrated on damaging him at the first position. 
  Artillery support of the assault may be conducted by a 
rolling barrage, successive fire concentration, concentrated 
fire against single targets or a combination of these methods. 
Basic methods of artillery support of the assault to the depth 
of the enemy first echelon battalion may be a successive fire 
concentration or rolling barrage, since these methods conduct 
fire against several lines simultaneously and thus provide for 
engaging AT weapons at a considerable depth. 
  Front aviation destroys newly detected targets in the depth 
of the enemy defense, and combat helicopters in pairs and 
flights deliver strikes against tanks, other armored targets, AT 
weapons and counterattacking enemy subunits. 
  Fire accompaniment of attacking subunits in the 
depth begins following the end of fire support of the 
assault and, depending on the nature of the defending enemy, is 
accomplished to the depth of new missions assigned to subunits 
in developing the attack in the enemy defense. 
  The basic method of artillery accompaniment of subunits' 
attack in the depth is concentrated, massed and barrier fire and 
fire against single targets. Air accompaniment of the attack is 
accomplished by delivering strikes against newly detected means 
of nuclear attack, approaching reserves, airfields, 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities and other targets. Army aviation 
delivers simultaneous or successive strikes against a 
withdrawing enemy, above all against tanks and AT weapons. 
  Nuclear strikes may be delivered against the enemy before 
troops launch an attack and in its course. 
  The company (battalion) commander's skillful use of 
principles of fire engagement of the enemy is of great 
importance in achieving success in the attack. The most 
important principles are the following: massing of weapons on 
the axis of concentration of main efforts; swift maneuver of 
fire; close, continuous coordination of attacking subunits and 
weapons; assurance of survivability of weapons from enemy fire 
strikes; surprise delivery of fire strikes against the enemy; 
continuous fire pressure on the enemy; and flexible control of 
subunits and weapons. 
  Fire engagement is organized in the company (battalion) in 
accordance with the situation and mission received. It is an 
important component in organizing the attack as a whole and 
usually includes the following: making the decision for fire 
engagement; assigning missions to weapons, including those 
assigned for direct fire; organizing coordination among weapons 
and assaulting subunits; organizing fire control; establishing 
safety measures for subunits in conducting fire; and monitoring 
readiness of weapons to perform missions. 
  Under conditions where the company (battalion) attacks as 
part of a battalion (regiment), the bulk of fire engagement 
matters are decided by the senior commander, including with the 
involvement of battalion weapons. In this case the commander 
usually determines the following based on a mission analysis and 
situation estimate: secondary missions for organic, attached and 
supporting artillery (if fire capabilities exceed the scope of 
missions assigned it by the senior commander) by periods of fire 
engagement; missions for weapons assigned for direct fire; 
missions for weapons in the capture of strongpoints, repulse of 
counterattacks, commitment of follow-on forces, consolidation of 
the captured line and so on; and procedure for interworking of 
weapons. In the course of estimating the situation the company 
(battalion) commander may listen to commanders of organic, 
attached and supporting artillery subunits about missions they 
have received and fire capabilities. 
  Fire engagement of the enemy is organized by the company 
(battalion) commander to the full extent when a company 
(battalion) is performing a mission independently in isolation 
from the main body (such as during operations in a special or 
enveloping detachment, and for the battalion in addition in a 
forward or raiding detachment). 
  In the decision for fire engagement he usually specifies the 
following: missions for organic and attached artillery by 
periods of fire engagement; procedure for engaging the enemy by 
fire of tanks, BMP's (BTR's), grenade launchers and other 
weapons when destroying the enemy in the course of performing 
the mission; weapon readiness times to perform the mission. Fire 
engagement missions are assigned to subunits in the operation 
order. 
  In organizing coordination the procedure and time of forward 
movement of artillery and weapons assigned for direct fire and 
of their occupation and preparation of firing positions are 
updated; the procedure for fire engagement by periods is 
coordinated; distribution of enemy objectives (targets) for 
engagement by fire of artillery and other weapons is clarified; 
the procedure for shifting from fire preparation to fire support 
of the assault as well as the beginning and end of fire by 
weapons assigned for direct fire and the procedure for their 
further actions is indicated; the procedure for requesting, 
transferring and ceasing fire in the course of battle is 
established; artillery fire and air strikes are coordinated with 
subunit actions in penetrating the defense and developing the 
attack, in repelling counterattacks, during commitment of 
follow-on forces and in performing other missions; and methods 
of marking the front line and the procedure for target 
designation for aviation are clarified. 
  Depending on the degree of fire damage of the enemy, the 
nature of his defense and terrain and the outfitting of 
motorized rifle subunits with combat vehicles, the assault is 
accomplished by two methods: dismounted following tanks, or in 
BMP's (BTR's) without dismounting the personnel. Tank subunits 
assault the enemy in an extended line under any situation 
conditions. 
  An assault is a swift, nonstop movement of tank 
and motorized rifle subunits in battle formation in combination 
with intensive fire from tanks and BMP's (BTR's) and, as they 
close with the enemy, also from other kinds of weapons for 
purposes of destroying him. It is the most decisive moment of 
the attack and is conducted at a fast tempo with full exertion 
of attackers' efforts. 
  Success of the assault largely is ensured by its 
forcefulness, the daring of attackers' actions, surprise of the 
strike, swiftness of the maneuver and a continuous combination 
of fire and movement. 
  In terms of time of operations it is a day or night assault 
and in terms of directions of conduct it is frontal, flanking 
and from the rear. The assault begins from attack positions or 
from a line of departure depending on methods of launching the 
attack. 
  A dismounted assault by motorized rifle subunits is 
conducted 
in penetrating a deliberate enemy defense and fortified areas, 
and also on very rugged or difficult terrain for tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's). Dismounted personnel attack in an extended line 200-250 
m behind the extended line of tanks, which ensures their mutual 
support. 
  After personnel dismount, gunner-operators (machinegunners), 
drivers and deputy platoon commanders remain in the BMP's 
(BTR's). BMP's (BTR's) displace by bounds from cover to cover 
(from line to line) behind assaulting subunits at a distance 
which would ensure their reliable fire support. BMP's with 
stabilized weapons usually attack directly in the extended line 
of their own subunits. 
  Motorized rifle subunits in motor vehicles as a 
rule assault the enemy in dismounted formation. In some cases 
they may operate as a mounted force on tanks (especially in the 
season of bad roads, in the presence of a deep snow cover and so 
on). After the personnel dismount, motor vehicles proceed to 
designated assembly sites and are disposed by company or by 
battalion 2-4 km from the enemy FEBA. The battalion commander, 
or the company commander with his permission, summons motor 
vehicles to the subunits. 
  A dismounted assault permits motorized rifle 
subunits to accomplish it to the full depth of the combat 
mission only at a relatively slow tempo, on the order of 1-1.5 
km/hr, which is confirmed by Great Patriotic War experience. It 
is natural that the tempo of the direct assault on the enemy 
FEBA should be higher by approximately 2-3 times or more. During 
development of the battle in the depth, when subunits execute a 
maneuver in approach march formations and in columns, the tempo 
of the attack naturally will be higher than when destroying the 
enemy at positions. 
  The assault by motorized rifle subunits is 
accomplished in BMP's (BTR's) under situation conditions where 
the enemy defense has been reliably neutralized by fire and a 
large portion of his AT weapons have been destroyed, in an 
attack on a hastily occupied defense that has had insufficient 
engineer development, and on favorable terrain. 
  In this case the tanks assault right after friendly 
shellbursts, and motorized rifle subunits in BMP's (BTR's), in 
an extended line 100-200 m behind the tanks, destroy AT weapons 
and other targets by their fire. 
  Tanks and BMP's (BTR's) should move up to the line of 
departure and directly into the assault at a speed of 15-20 
km/hr or more. Remember that the higher the speed of tanks and 
BMP's (BTR's) when closing with the enemy, the faster his zone 
of continuous, multilayered fire is crossed and consequently 
also the greater the degree to which their survivability 
increases. 
  With this method of assault, motorized rifle subunits are 
provided with high tempos of advance as a whole to the full 
depth of combat missions. The high assault tempos permit 
subunits to exploit results of fire and nuclear damage of the 
enemy in shorter time periods and hamper him in closing breaches 
in the defense and executing counterattacks. War and exercise 
experience shows that with an increase in assault tempos by one 
and one-half times, losses of assaulting subunits to enemy fire 
are reduced by 2-3 times. 
  Close interworking of tank, artillery and motorized rifle 
subunits and subunits of other combat arms and special troops 
must be achieved with any methods of assault. 
<H5>  4. Preparation of an Attack Against a Defending Enemy </H5>
  Preparation of the attack begins in the company (battalion) 
on receiving a combat mission. It envisages conduct of a set of 
measures, the most important being the following: organization 
for battle; preparation of the company (battalion) to perform 
the combat mission; preparation of the attack position (assembly 
area); organization and conduct of political work; practical 
work of the company commander (battalion commander, his deputies 
and staff) in the subunits; and other measures. 
  It should be noted that under present conditions in 
connection with qualitative change in means of warfare, the 
scope of work to prepare the attack has grown sharply on the one 
hand and the time for performing it has been shortened on the 
other. Thus, while 2-3 days usually were spent at the 
battalion-company level to prepare the attack in the past war, 
now the time has decreased considerably. 
  Organization for battle includes the following: 
decisionmaking by the company (battalion) commander for the 
attack; ground reconnaissance; assignment of combat missions to 
subunits; and organization of coordination; fire damage of the 
enemy, comprehensive support and C[.sup]2[/]. 
  The procedure and content of the company (battalion) 
commander's work of organizing for battle are determined by 
situation conditions and above all by methods of launching the 
attack, the combat mission and time available. Thus, in 
launching an attack from a position of direct contact with the 
enemy, the company (battalion) commander has an opportunity to 
perform all work of organizing for battle directly on the 
terrain. 
  It should be noted that when launching an attack from a 
position of direct contact with the enemy, simultaneously with 
questions of organizing for battle, the company (battalion) 
commander also decides questions of regrouping or relieving 
defending subunits. When launching an attack after regrouping 
from a position of defense, organization for battle on the 
terrain (in the direction of attack) is accomplished in the 
period when the company (battalion) is in the strongpoint 
(defense area) under enemy fire pressure. But when launching an 
attack with simultaneous relief of defending subunits or from 
the move, battle is organized on the terrain in the 
concentration area and in the assembly area respectively out of 
contact with the enemy. 
  Sometimes when attacking from the move there will be no 
opportunity to travel out on the terrain with subordinate 
commanders. In this case organizing for battle is done in the 
assembly area from a map or on a terrain model, but during 
subunits' forward movement to the line of departure and with the 
beginning of the assault the commander updates the mission and 
coordination procedure for them. 
  In a situation where it is necessary to participate in 
penetrating a defense (as a rule, hastily occupied) in the 
course of developing the attack, the company (battalion) 
commander is forced to make a decision from the map and assign 
missions to subordinates during their forward movement toward 
the enemy defense. Missions and the coordination procedure are 
updated for the subunits in the period of deployment into 
approach march and battle formations and with the beginning of 
the assault. 
<H5>  5. Company Commander's Work of Organizing the Attack From a </H5>
Position of Direct Contact With the Enemy 
<H5>  (Variant) </H5>
  Tactical situation (Fig. 6) 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-010L-83A>      Fig. 6. 2nd MRC commander's decision for the attack </FIG>

  As a result of losses, the enemy has been forced to cease 
the 
attack and by the end of 5 July shifted to a defense at the line 
reached. 
  Our subunits withdrew to a prepared defensive line along the 
east bank of Chernyy Brook, halted the enemy advance, and 
simultaneously are preparing for an attack. 
  At 1200 hours 6 July 1st MRB commander assigned missions to 
subunit commanders in the vicinity of the farmstead and 
organized coordination, from which the 2nd MRC commander learned 
the following: 
  1. 1st MRB with 2nd TC is launching an attack after 
regrouping from a position of defense. The battalion destroys 
the enemy in the company strongpoint barn, Bibirevo, Hill 108.0 
and takes the line Kvadratnaya Grove, Sinkovo. The battalion 
concentrates main efforts in the direction of sand pit, 
windmill. 1st Artillery Battalion is supporting. 
  2. 2nd MRC with grenade launcher squad in coordination with 
2nd TC (less TP) destroys the enemy in the platoon strongpoint 
barn, rocks (excluded), Hill 105.0 by an assault from the attack 
position barn (excluded), farmstead and takes the line Hill 
110.0 (excluded), sheepfold. Direction for continuing the 
attack--lone house, Hill 108.0. 1st Battery, 1st Artillery 
Battalion is supporting. Report decision at 1320 hours. 
  Begin regrouping at 2230 and complete it by 2400 6 July; 3rd 
MRP relieves 1st MRC and 2nd MRP relieves subunits of 3rd MRC. 
  3. 4th MRC on right destroys enemy in vicinity of spruce, 
barn, Hill 102.0 and takes the line lone house, Hill 110.0; 
direction for continuing attack-- north slopes of Hill 110.0, 
barrow. 
  Boundary with it is lone tree (excluded), bushes, 
Kvadratnaya 
Grove. 
  1st MRC on left destroys enemy in vicinity of rocks, 
Bibirevo, Ovalnaya Grove and takes the line sheepfold 
(excluded), Belaya Grove; direction for continuing 
attack--Ovalnaya Grove, north outskirts of Sinkovo. 
  4. In period of fire preparation of assault artillery 
neutralizes enemy artillery and mortars and destroys tanks, 
IFV's and ATGM's on FEBA and in depth of enemy battalion defense 
area; artillery support of assault is by double successive fire 
concentration to depth of defense of enemy battalion. 
  5. Readiness for attack 0400 7 July. 
  2nd MRC defends strongpoint barn, Hill 104.3, Veselovo 
(excluded). 
  Company is 85 percent strength in personnel, weapons and 
military vehicles. Two BMP's require routine maintenance. 
Strength level of opposing enemy is 60-65 percent. 
  Mission analysis 
  The company attacks to destroy the enemy in platoon 
strongpoint barn, rocks (excluded), west slopes of Hill 105.0 
and takes the line Hill 110.0 (excluded), sheepfold. Direction 
for continuing attack is lone house, Hill 108.0. Support 
battalion performance of immediate mission in this manner. 
  In his commander's concept, 1st MRB commander envisages the 
following: by concentrating main efforts in direction of sand 
pit, windmill, destroy enemy in company strongpoint barn, 
Bibirevo, windmill with an assault by two MRC's from attack 
positions in coordination with the TC and take the line 
Kvadratnaya Grove, Sinkovo. Subsequently develop the attach by 
committing the second echelon, complete the rout of enemy 
battalion's personnel and weapons in coordination with 2nd MRB 
and take the first position. In the period of fire preparation 
of the assault the mortar platoon, four ATGM's, a tank and an 
IFV are destroyed (neutralized) in support of the company. 
Artillery support of the assault is by a double successive fire 
concentration to the depth of defense of the enemy battalion. 
  2nd MRC with grenade launcher squad has the mission of 
destroying the enemy in platoon strongpoint barn, rocks 
(excluded), west slopes of Hill 105.0 in coordination with 2nd 
TC (less TP) by an assault from the attack position barn 
(excluded), farmstead and taking the line Hill 110.0 (excluded), 
sheepfold; direction for continuing attack is lone house, Hill 
108.0. 
  The company attacks in a frontage of 450 m in the first 
echelon on the battalion right flank, with its left flank 
adjoining the axis of concentration of battalion main efforts. 
Company main efforts also should be concentrated on this flank. 
  4th MRC, 2nd MRB attacks on right, destroys enemy personnel 
and weapons in vicinity of spruce, barn (excluded), Hill 102.0 
and takes the line lone house, Hill 110.0; direction for 
continuing the attack--north slopes of Hill 110.0, barrow. 
  Boundary with it is lone tree (excluded), bushes, 
Kvadratnaya 
Grove. 
  On left our battalion's 1st MRC destroys enemy in vicinity 
of 
rocks, Bibirevo, Ovalnaya Grove and takes the line sheepfold 
(excluded), Belaya Grove; direction for continuing the attack is 
Ovalnaya Grove, north outskirts of Sinkovo. 
  In organizing coordination it is advisable to update with 
4th 
MRC commander the procedure for destroying the enemy on south 
slopes of Hill 110.0, and with 1st MRC commander the procedure 
for engaging the enemy in the vicinity of Ovalnaya Grove. It is 
desirable above all to update with TP commanders the procedure 
for the joint assault, negotiation of obstacles and barriers, 
fire coordination and target designation. 
  Readiness for attack 0400 7 July; a total of 16 hours are 
available for preparing for battle and 12 hours for preparing 
and executing a regrouping. 
  [Begin side line] After analyzing the mission the company 
commander determines measures which must be carried out for 
fastest preparation of subunits to perform the combat mission, 
performs a time calculation, issues instructions to platoon 
commanders and the grenade launcher squad commander on preparing 
to perform the combat mission and on the time and procedure of 
work on the terrain, and estimates the situation. [End side line] 
  Time calculation 
  Mission received 1200 hours 6 July. 
  Readiness for attack 0400 7 July. 
  There are 16 hours for preparing the attack, of which around 
9 hours are daylight, and there are 12 hours for preparing and 
executing a regrouping. 
  Distribute time as follows: 

  -  analyzing mission and determining measures which must be 
taken immediately--1200-1210 6 July; 
  -  calculating the time--1210-1220; 
  -  issuing instructions to commanders on preparing to perform 
the 
combat mission and on the time and procedure of work on the 
terrain--1220- 1230; 
  -  preparing subunits to perform the combat mission--1230 6 
July-0330 7 July; 
  -  estimating the situation--1230-1300; 
  -  making the decision--1300-1320; 
  -  briefing decision to battalion commander--1320-1340; 
  -  conducting ground reconnaissance with commanders of platoons 
and of attached and supporting subunits--1340-1600; 
  -  assigning missions to commanders of platoons and attached 
subunits and organizing regrouping, coordination and fire 
engagement-- 1600-1700; 
  -  issuing instructions on organizing comprehensive support of 
attack, C[.sup]2[/], and political work--1700-1715; 
  -  work of platoon commanders with squad commanders for 
organizing 
battle on the terrain--1715-1915; 
  -  return of commanders and practical work in their own 
subunits--1915-2130; 
  -  practical work in subunits for preparing 
them for battle-- from 1930; 
  -  conducting regrouping with 
simultaneous turnover of strongpoints of 2nd and 3rd MRP's to 
subunits of 1st and 3rd MRC's--2230-2400; 
  -  report of subunit commanders on readiness for attack--0330 7 
July; 
  -  report to battalion commander on company readiness for 
attack--0400 7 July. 


    Situation estimate (conclusions) 
  The enemy shifted to a defense along west bank of Chernyy 
Brook. 
  A mechanized infantry platoon with tank is defending ahead 
of 
the company attack frontage. A company second echelon platoon is 
defending in the depth of the company strongpoint in vicinity of 
Kvadratnaya Grove (excluded), windmill (excluded), Hill 108.0. 
Enemy is concentrating main efforts on axis Hill 104.7, north 
slopes of Hill 108.0. Weakest defense is in direction of sand 
pit, windmill. Emplacements for mechanized infantry squads, 
emplacements for tanks and IFV's, covered slit trenches, 
sections of continuous trenches in the platoon strongpoint, 
obstacles ahead of the FEBA and in the depth of the defense, 
lines of firing positions and other engineer structures may be 
prepared in his defense by the beginning of the company attack. 
  Destruction of enemy personnel and weapons in the 
strongpoint 
barn, rocks (excluded), Hill 105.0 will sharply reduce stability 
of his defense and support performance of immediate mission. 
Company is at 85 percent strength and, with consideration of 
fire damage by senior commander's weapons, is capable of 
performing the assigned mission by fire of organic and attached 
weapons in coordination with 2nd TC (less platoon). 
  4th MRC, 2nd MRB and 1st MRC, 1st MRB are attacking on right 
and left respectively, and conditions for coordination with them 
facilitate joint destruction of the enemy on contiguous flanks. 
  The nature of terrain is favorable and permits achieving 
relatively high assault tempos; Chernyy Brook is not a barrier. 
  It is advisable to concentrate main efforts in direction of 
sand pit, tower. 
  Execute dismounted assault, with 2nd MRP on right flank, 1st 
MRP in center and 3rd MRP on left flank, and with grenade 
launcher squad behind 1st MRP. 
  It is advisable to assign combat missions to subunits as 
follows: 

  -  2nd MRP in coordination with Tank No 101 is to assault and 
destroy emplaced tank, ATGM, AT rocket launcher and enemy 
personnel from attack position of barn (excluded), rocks; 
direction for continuing the attack-- barrow, north edge of 
Ogurets Grove; 
  -  1st MRP in coordination with tanks Nos 102 and 103 is to 
assault and destroy enemy ATGM, machinegun and personnel from 
attack position of rocks (excluded), rock pillar; direction for 
continuing attack--Hill 100.2, lone tree; 
  -  3rd MRP in coordination with 2nd TP is to assault and destroy 
enemy ATGM, IFV, AT rocket launcher and personnel from attack 
position of rock pillar (excluded), farmstead; direction for 
continuing attack--Romb Grove, tower; 
  -  1st Grenade Launcher Squad is to neutralize personnel at 
company COP in trench on north edge of Romb Grove. Firing 
position--300 m northeast of rock pillar. In the course of 
assault the grenade launcher squad is to neutralize enemy 
personnel and weapons ahead of frontage of 1st and 3rd MRP's and 
is to displace behind left flank of 1st MRP; 
  -  company COP is behind 1st MRP, displace it in direction of 
rock 
pillar, north slopes of Hill 105.0, Hill 108.0. 

  [Begin side line] After the situation estimate and 
performance of necessary tactical calculations the company 
(battalion) commander makes the decision. 
  The basis of the decision is the commander's concept, in 
which the company (battalion) commander specifies: direction for 
concentrating main efforts; methods of routing enemy (which 
enemy, where, in what sequence and how to rout, with an 
indication of the procedure for his engagement by fire of tanks, 
BMP's and other organic and attached weapons, measures for his 
deception, and procedure of subunit operations); company 
(battalion) battle formation. After reporting the decision to 
the senior commander, the company (battalion) commander performs 
ground reconnaissance. 
  Ground reconnaissance is performed to study terrain and the 
enemy and update the decision made from the map. It is done by 
commanders under cover of subunits defending ahead or of 
specially assigned subunits. The company (battalion) commander 
involves commanders of subordinate, attached and supporting 
subunits in the ground reconnaissance. If it is impossible for 
company commanders to travel out on the terrain with their 
subordinates, the battalion commander also involves commanders 
of platoons of first echelon companies in ground reconnaissance. 
  With the ground reconnaissance party's arrival in the 
vicinity of the subunit defending in the direction of the 
company (battalion) attack, communications are established with 
its commander, who usually subsequently gives help in studying 
the enemy himself. 
  Then the company (battalion) commander performs orientation, 
designates reference points and updates the trace of the enemy 
FEBA, disposition of enemy strongpoints and weapons, especially 
AT weapons, and targets to be engaged by senior commanders' 
weapons. Enemy weapons, observation posts and other targets for 
engagement by fire of guns and tanks assigned for direct fire, 
by ATGM's and by the fire of grenade launchers are determined. 
Possible axes of operations of enemy combat helicopters and 
their lines of attack are updated. Approaches to the enemy FEBA 
and the presence and nature of obstacles and barriers are 
studied, and passages in them, time of preparation and procedure 
for marking these passages are outlined. The commander updates 
and determines the attack frontage, direction for concentrating 
main efforts, combat missions for subunits, enemy objectives 
(targets) subject to fire engagement, firing positions of 
weapons and time periods of their engineer preparation. Points 
for equipping tanks with roller-type mineclearing devices, 
forward movement routes, and points (lines) of deployment, 
departure and the safety limit are designated and updated. Sites 
and directions of displacement of C[.sup]2[/] facilities and 
places for deployment of technical support and rear subunits are 
determined. 
  In an attack from a position of direct contact with the 
enemy, the company (battalion) commander additionally updates 
the attack positions (assembly area) of the company and platoons 
and places for passing tanks through positions of the motorized 
rifle subunits. If the attack is launched from the move, then in 
moving along the route the ground reconnaissance party 
additionally studies its features, the start point (line), and 
deployment points (lines); updates bypass routes and crossing 
(fording) sites; and updates lines of departure for platoons 
(companies). In a dismounted assault the MRC (MRB) commander 
specifies the platoon (company) dismount line. [End side line] 
  Operation order 
  1. The enemy shifted to a defense along west bank of 
Chernyy Brook. Platoon strongpoints have been 
prepared ahead of the company attack frontage in areas: barn, 
rocks (excluded), west slopes of Hill 100.2; 
Kvadratnaya Grove (excluded), windmill (excluded), 
Hill 108.0. 
  Weapons detected as follows: mortar platoon--50 m west of 
Ogurets Grove; tank--50 m southeast of barrow; 
IFV--south edge of Romb Grove; three ATGM's: 
first--120 m left of barn, 2nd--right of lone tree, third--50 m 
northeast of edge of Romb; two AT rocket launchers: 
first--barn, left 15; second--rocks, right 20. 
  Antitank and antipersonnel minefields emplaced ahead of 
FEBA. 
  2. On 2nd MRC axis of attack personnel and weapons in 
platoon 
strongpoints on FEBA and on Hill 108.0 are neutralized by senior 
commanders' assets in period of fire preparation of assault. 
Emplaced tank and IFV and three ATGM's are destroyed by weapons 
assigned for direct fire. Artillery support of assault is by 
double successive fire concentration. 
  4th MRC, 2nd MRB attacks on right, destroys enemy in area of 
lone tree, barn (excluded), Hill 102.0 and takes line of lone 
house, Hill 110.0; direction for continuing attack--north slopes 
of Hill 110.0, barrow. 
  1st MRC attacks on left, destroys enemy in area of rocks, 
Bibirevo, Ovalnaya Grove and takes line of sheepfold 
(excluded), Belaya Grove; direction for continuing 
attack--Ovalnaya Grove, north edge of 
Sinkovo. 
  3. 2nd MRC with grenade launcher squad in coordination with 
2nd TC (less TP) destroys enemy in platoon strongpoint of barn, 
rocks (excluded), west slopes of Hill 105.0 by an assault from 
attack positions of barn (excluded), farmstead and takes line of 
Hill 110.0 (excluded), sheepfold; direction for continuing 
attack--lone house, Hill 108.0. 
  I DECIDED: Concentrate main efforts in direction 
of forest, tower. Exploiting results of artillery fire and air 
strikes, destroy personnel and weapons in platoon strongpoint in 
area of barn, rocks (excluded), north slopes of Hill 105.0 by an 
assault from attack position of barn (excluded), farmstead by 
BMP and small arms fire and by H plus 20 minutes take line of 
Hill 110.0 (excluded), sheepfold. Direction for continuing 
attack-- lone house, Hill 108.0. Destroy enemy in strongpoint in 
depth by assault of 1st and 2nd MRP's from front and of 3rd MRP 
against flank in direction of windmill, Hill 108.0. 
  Repel counterattack of battalion reserve from the move by 
fire of all weapons in coordination with 2nd TC and adjacent 
subunit on left. 
  Battle formation in one echelon; execute dismounted assault. 
  Ensure surprise of attack by observing previous regime of 
fire and by covertness in conducting regrouping and occupying 
attack position. 
  4. I order: 

  -  2nd MRP in coordination with Tank No 101 is to destroy 
emplaced enemy tank, ATGM, AT rocket launcher and personnel from 
attack position of barn (excluded), rocks; direction for 
continuing attack--barrow, north edge of Ogurets Grove; 
  -  1st MRP in coordination with tanks Nos 102 and 103 is to 
destroy enemy ATGM, machinegun and personnel from attack 
position of rocks (excluded), rock pillar; direction for 
continuing attack--Hill 100.2, lone tree; 
  -  3rd MRP in coordination with 2nd TP is to destroy enemy ATGM, 
IFV, grenade launcher and personnel from attack position of rock 
pillar (excluded), farmstead; direction for continuing 
attack--Romb Grove, tower; 
  -  1st Grenade Launcher Squad is to neutralize personnel at 
platoon COP on north edge of Romb Grove in period of 
fire preparation. Occupy firing position 100 m east of bushes. 
Direction of fire--north edge of Romb Grove, Hill 
105.0. Readiness for commencing fire--H minus 1 hour 20 minutes. 
During attack support 1st and 3rd MRP's, displace behind left 
flank of 1st MRP. 


    5. Ammunition consumption for performing mission: 0.3 unit 
of 
fire for small arms, 0.2 unit of fire for BMP weapons. Fuel 
consumption 0.08 fueling. 
  6. Readiness for attack 0400 hours 7 July. 
  7. Company COP is 150 m east of rock pillars as of 0400 
hours 
7 July, displaces behind 1st MRP during battle. Deputy is 1st 
MRP commander. 
  The company (battalion) commander further organizes 
coordination on the terrain and updates it with supporting and 
adjacent subunits. Coordination is organized to the full depth 
of the company (battalion) combat mission by missions, lines, 
time and methods of performing missions. In organizing 
coordination the commander must precisely specify the goal of 
the company (battalion) attack and be sure that subunit 
commanders have correctly understood the assigned missions and 
methods of their execution. 
  Coordination instructions 
  1st MRP occupies attack position of rocks (excluded), rock 
pillars by 2250 hours 6 July. After handing over its strongpoint 
to 3rd MRC, 2nd MRP moves out along communication trench toward 
1st MRP strongpoint and occupies attack position of barn, rocks 
by 2320. 3rd MRP hands over strongpoint to 1st MRC and, moving 
along the trench, occupies attack position of rock pillars 
(excluded), farmstead by 2330 hours. 
  BMP's of MRP's are to take up firing positions 100-150 m 
behind their subunits by H minus 20 minutes in readiness for 
assault in the period of fire preparation of the attack. 
  Grenade launcher squad is to occupy firing position 100 m 
east of bushes behind 1st MRP by 2330. 
  In the period of regrouping be ready to repel possible 
actions of enemy reconnaissance and enemy assaults. 
  Friendly minefields ahead of company frontage are removed by 
engineer subunits on the night of 6/7 July. 
  Cross minefield ahead of enemy FEBA through passages as 
follows: 2nd MRP No 4, 1st MRP No 5, 3rd MRP No 6 under cover of 
fire of BMP's and grenade launcher squad. 
  At H minus 5 minutes tanks move out to the line of departure 
of northwest slopes of Hill 104.7, north slopes of Hill 104.3 
(excluded) and continue moving in extended line, firing from the 
move. By this moment motorized riflemen use sapper shovels to 
mark passages for them through their attack positions. After 
passing tanks through themselves along passages, motorized 
riflemen launch the assault following the tanks and burst onto 
the enemy FEBA at H hour. BMP's support the assault of their 
subunits by fire from occupied firing positions. They are to 
displace after MRP's negotiate enemy minefields. The grenade 
launcher squad destroys personnel in the company COP; it is to 
begin changing its firing position when assaulting subunits take 
the enemy FEBA. 
  2nd MRP completes destruction of ATGM's, AT rocket launcher 
and personnel north of Hill 100.2. 1st MRP destroys ATGM, 
machinegun and personnel west of Hill 100.2. 3rd MRP completes 
destruction of IFV, ATGM, AT rocket launcher and personnel at 
squad position. Complete destruction of enemy in assault 
objectives by H plus 15 minutes, after which continue the attack 
nonstop in indicated directions. Forces of 1st and 2nd MRP's are 
to complete destruction of mortar platoon on west edge of 
Ogurets Grove. Company performs immediate mission and takes line 
of Hill 110.0 (excluded), sheepfold by H plus 20 minutes. 
  2nd and 1st MRP's are to assault the enemy defending on Hill 
108.0 from the front in coordination with 2nd TC. 2nd MRP 
destroys the machinegun, and 1st MRP the ATGM and personnel. 1st 
Grenade Launcher Squad displaces to new firing positions and 
neutralizes the ATGM--lone house, up 100. 
  3rd MRP moves forward swiftly in direction of tower, 
windmill 
and completes destruction of enemy by an assault against the 
flank. 
  With the company's arrival at the line of Kvadratnaya Grove, 
southwest slopes of Hill 108.0, be ready together with 2nd TC 
and adjacent subunit on left to repel counterattack of battalion 
reserve by fire of all weapons from the move. 
  In repelling the counterattack of superior forces, tanks and 
BMP's take up firing positions behind the nearest cover and 
destroy enemy by fire from in place. 
  Signals: 

  -  warning: immediate threat of enemy use of mass 
destruction weapons--"Grom [Thunder]," radioactive 
contamination-- "Radiatsionnaya opasnost [Radiation Danger]," 
chemical and biological (bacteriological) contamination-- 
"Khimicheskaya trevoga [Chemical Alert]," air enemy-- "Vozdukh 
[Air]"; 
  -  control and coordination: assault--"Groza 
[Thunderstorm]-222," transfer artillery fire--"Perekat 
[Leapfrog]-444," request artillery fire-- "Uragan 
[Hurricane]-777"; target designations--tracer bullets and rounds 
in direction of target, for aviation "Friendly troops here"-- 
series of red-smoke signal flares. 


    [Begin side line] After organizing coordination the company 
(battalion) commander issues instructions for comprehensive 
support to battle, for C[.sup]2[/] and for political work. 
[End side line] 
  Reconnaissance instructions 
  With occupation of attack positions organize observation of 
(listening for) the ground and air enemy, having observers in 
each platoon and also at the company COP. 
  During preparation and conduct of the attack: uncover the 
location of tanks, ATGM's, machineguns, mortars and artillery, 
the system of fire and obstacles, and C[.sup]2[/] facilities; 
determine the makeup and direction of forward movement of the 
reserve for a counterattack. 
  Concentrate main reconnaissance efforts in direction of rock 
pillars, lone house. 
  With company arrival at line Kvadratnaya Grove, Hill 108.0, 
1st MRP is to be ready to act as a combat reconnaissance patrol 
in direction of west slopes of Hill 108.0, Zelenaya Grove. 
  Report information on enemy to me by radio in the course of 
battle. 
  Security instructions 
  After occupying attack position, concentrate special 
attention in direction: 2nd MRP--rocks, barrow; 1st MRP--rocks, 
Hill 100.2; 3rd MRP- -rock pillar, Romb Grove. 
  Organize observation in platoons and have duty weapons for 
preventing penetration of enemy reconnaissance to occupied 
positions. Be ready to repel enemy assaults. 
  Password "Karabin," reply "Kursk." 
  Instructions on protection against mass 
destruction weapons 
  With occupation of attack position, to protect against mass 
destruction weapons make use of available fortifications: open 
and covered slit trenches, emplacements, trench, communication 
trench, personnel dugout, and emplacements and shelters for 
BMP's. 
  Signals: 

  -  warning of immediate threat of enemy use of mass 
destruction weapons-- "Grom [Thunder]"; 
  -  warning: radioactive 
contamination--"Radiatsionnaya opasnost [Radiation Danger]"; 
chemical and biological (bacteriological) contamination-- 
"Khimicheskaya trevoga [Chemical Alert]." 

  On receiving a signal of immediate threat of enemy use of 
mass destruction weapons, continue performing missions and take 
measures for protection and for shifting to operations under 
conditions of the use of mass destruction weapons. 
  By 2330 check that personnel have preventive means and their 
readiness for use of antiradiation drugs, antidotes and 
antibiotics. 
  Check readiness of system for protection of BMP crews and 
the 
presence and serviceability of decontamination equipment. 
  Perform radiological and chemical reconnaissance by a 
trained 
chemical observer, who is to be located at the COP. 
  Maskirovka instructions 
  Carry out movement of personnel covertly along trench and 
communication trench during regrouping. Personnel movements are 
prohibited on occupying attack positions. 
  Strictly observe sound and light discipline and operate 
radios only in "listening watch" mode. 
  Platoon commanders are to constantly monitor compliance with 
camouflage discipline. 
  Engineer support instructions 
  At attack position each platoon is to make maximum use of 
previously prepared emplacements and other fortification and 
structures for personnel, machineguns, grenade launchers and 
other weapons. If necessary prepare new emplacements for them, 
strictly observing maskirovka and making maximum use of 
protective properties of the terrain. 
  Obstacles ahead of our positions are removed from 0200 to 
0400. Passages are made in enemy obstacles from H minus 22 to H 
minus 10 minutes by forces of engineer subunits of the senior 
chief by the explosive method ahead of the following frontage: 
2nd MRP--150 m southwest of bushes; 1st MRP--100 m east of lone 
tree; 3rd MRP--100 m southwest of sand pit. Passages are marked 
by signs Nos 4, 5 and 6 respectively. 
  1st MRP commander is to prepare 3rd MRS for breaching and 
crossing minefields laid by the enemy by remote assets in the 
course of our attack. 
  Chemical support instructions 
  BMP crews are to be ready to perform radiological and 
chemical reconnaissance. Have radiological and chemical 
reconnaissance devices constantly turned on in the course of the 
attack. 
  Check whether or not personnel have dose rate meters by 
2330. 
Platoon commanders are to take their readings by day's end and, 
in crossing zones of contamination, after exiting from them. 
  Perform partial decontamination with your own forces at my 
command. Perform decontamination immediately on contamination by 
chemical agents. 
  By 2330 6 July check serviceability and fit of individual 
protective gear. 
  Instructions on organizing C[.sup]3[/] 
  Carry out C[.sup]3[/] via couriers on arrival at attack 
positions. Have radios in platoon commanders' BMP's on receive. 
Location of company COP--200 m west of rock pillar; it deploys 
by 2250. 
  C[.sup]2[/] in the course of battle is accomplished over a 
radio net, through couriers and by signals. COP displaces behind 
1st MRP in the course of battle. 
  Work of preparing subunits for battle 
  Preparation of subunits for performing combat 
missions usually begins after the company (battalion) 
commander's order is issued to subordinates based on the mission 
analysis and time calculation. In accordance with the order, 
personnel first of all prepare weapons and military vehicles for 
combat employment and replenish ammunition, missiles, fuel and 
other supplies to established norms. 
  The appropriate kind of routine servicing and maintenance is 
performed depending on the expenditure of service life of 
weapons and vehicles. As a rule, daily routine servicing and 
maintenance with elements of TO [periodic servicing and 
maintenance inspection] No 1 will be carried out. The important 
thing here is to ensure their reliable operation in the course 
of the attack. Repair of vehicles and their return to formation 
also is completed by the beginning of the battle. 
  Reserves of supplies in subunits and in the battalion rear 
usually are replenished to unit-level supply norms, but as a 
rule additional reserves of ammunition are established for the 
mortar battery, attached artillery and guns used for direct 
fire. The amount of these reserves must ensure performance of 
fire missions of engaging the enemy without a change of 
positions in the period of fire preparation and support of the 
assault. Additional reserves are established at the expense of 
the senior commander and usually are laid out at firing 
positions (on the ground) before the beginning of battle. 
  The battalion aid station is cleared of sick and wounded and 
augmented with necessary medical equipment and supplies. All 
personnel must be supplied with everything necessary along the 
line of medical support. 
  Preparation of personnel to perform combat missions is 
carried out under the subunit commander's plan. There are 
provisions for the personnel to study (become clearer on) enemy 
weapons and engineer obstacles and his defense as a whole as 
well as the terrain. A check is made of the personnel's 
knowledge of missions, readiness of weapons, availability of 
ammunition and other means. War experience shows that holding 
classes with subunits together with attached forces and assets 
in a near-real situation considerably improves their preparation 
and confidence in performing combat missions. 
  Preparation of subunits for the attack ends with a check 
made 
by the commander. 
  Preparation of the position (assembly area) for attack from 
a 
situation of direct contact with the enemy usually begins after 
regrouping from a position of defense or after relief of 
defending subunits. During preparation of the attack position 
(assembly area), existing fortification structures for weapons, 
vehicles, COP's and accommodation of technical and logistic 
support subunits are used and additionally prepared, and new 
ones also are created if necessary. Forward movement routes of 
tanks are prepared from assembly positions to the line of 
departure. All work of preparing the attack position (assembly 
area) is done under the guise of improving the defense and 
conducting other deceptive actions. Elements of the position's 
fortification are carefully camouflaged. 
  In a hasty attack preparation of the assembly area 
consists of engineer preparation of platoon locations and areas 
of companies and the battalion as a whole, and accomplishment of 
maskirovka. Slit trenches, shelters and bunkers for personnel 
and emplacements and shelters (dug-in) for weapons and military 
vehicles and also firing positions for air defense weapons are 
dug and prepared in the area. All work of preparing the attack 
position (assembly area) usually is done at night and under 
other conditions of poor visibility. 
  Practical work of the company commander (battalion 
commander, his deputies, chief of staff) is performed in 
the subunits to give assistance and check their readiness to 
perform the combat mission. 
  The work of assisting subordinates essentially is performed 
with the beginning of preparation for the attack. By listening 
to decisions and suggestions in the course of the work, the 
company commander (battalion commander, his deputies) convince 
themselves of subordinates' knowledge of their missions, methods 
of performing them, and procedure for coordination within 
subunits and between elements of the battle formation, and of 
their knowledge of warning, control and coordination signals, 
and so on. 
  After occupation of an attack position (assembly area), at a 
certain time the company commander (battalion commander, chief 
of staff) checks the correctness of its occupation by subunits 
and of the work of additional preparation of the position (area) 
with fortification structures. Personal gear and equipment of 
motorized riflemen (teams, crews) and the presence and 
serviceability of weapons and necessary gear, ammunition, food 
and protective gear are carefully checked in subunits. 
  In addition, the chief of staff checks preparedness for 
operation of communications equipment and the communications 
layout diagram with the chief of communications. 
  The company senior technician (deputy battalion commander 
for 
weapons) checks readiness of weapons and military vehicles for 
combat employment. Main attention is given to serviceability of 
running gear, weapons and communications equipment. Forces and 
assets assigned to the battalion technical maintenance echelon 
as it moves from the assembly area in launching a hasty attack 
are checked. There is monitoring and a check of technical 
support forces and assets for operation as the battalion repair 
and recovery team, and of preparedness of the technical 
observation post for operation,. 
  The deputy battalion commander for rear checks the presence 
of necessary supplies in subunits and in the support platoon, 
disposition of battalion rear C[.sup]2[/] facilities in the 
assembly area and their shelter and maskirovka, and promptness 
of food preparation and its issue to personnel. 
  Deficiencies discovered are remedied by personnel on the 
spot. At the designated time the company (battalion) commander 
announces the time of fire preparation of the assault and of H 
hour to subordinate subunit commanders. 
<H5>  6. Regrouping and Relief of Defending Subunits </H5>
  Organization of regrouping is a component part of organizing 
the attack. All necessary questions of regrouping are decided by 
the commander during ground reconnaissance, and the procedure 
for accomplishing it is indicated to subordinates when 
coordination is being organized. 
  Regrouping is accomplished in accordance with the 
commander's decision for the attack, and only the most 
necessary, simple subunit movements concealed from the enemy 
should be envisaged in organizing it. 
  Under situation conditions in question, a regrouping is 
conducted by direction of the senior commander usually at night 
before an attack, with fulfillment of measures for deceiving the 
enemy regarding intentions. 
  The company commander's COP is located up to 200 m behind 
the 
company attack position, and that of the battalion commander up 
to 300 m behind first echelon companies. 
  Occupation of the attack position (assembly area) in 
trenches, communication trenches and shelters ensures subunits' 
concealment against enemy observation and protection against his 
possible fire strikes. 
  It is advisable to leave subunits in place which have taken 
up a defense in the battalion (regimental) second echelon within 
a designated zone of advance, since they can move forward for 
the assault directly from occupied areas. 
  Tanks, BMP's and other weapons which are in forward platoon 
strongpoints in the zone of upcoming attack also should be left 
in place and used for conducting direct fire. Tanks, guns and 
BMP's disposed in the defense somewhat aside from the zone of 
advance or in strongpoints of first echelon companies being 
relieved also may be used for conducting such fire. Where 
possible, during regrouping of subunits the BMP's should be left 
at previous firing positions and advanced to new ones for 
destroying assigned targets with the beginning of fire 
preparation of the assault. Sometimes it is advisable to use 
these weapons to conduct direct fire also without changing 
firing positions. 
  To achieve concealment of a regrouping of first echelon 
motorized rifle subunits in insignificant frontage, it is 
desirable to leave their BMP's in the previous strongpoint and 
have them move out to their subunits during fire preparation of 
the assault. 
  If one of the battalion's companies is being relieved by a 
newly arriving subunit, the company should be moved to the 
assembly area [rayon sbora] covertly using trenches and 
communication trenches. It is advisable to designate the 
assembly area within the first position of the defense. 
Subsequently the company displaces to its battalion's assembly 
area [iskhodnyy rayon] and occupies the second and third 
trenches. As a rule, the company is moved out of the strongpoint 
simultaneously with its relief. 
  Tanks in the zone of advance may launch the assault from the 
strongpoints they occupy. 
  If the mortar battery is to one side of the battalion 
assembly area, it displaces to new firing positions and occupies 
them up to 500 m behind first echelon companies. Air defense 
subunits are disposed at launch (firing) positions in the 
companies' battle formations. 
  The grenade launcher subunit and AT subunit occupy firing 
positions up to 300 and 100 m respectively behind first echelon 
companies. The AT squad usually is disposed in [the company] 
trench. 
  A TC (TB less company) attached to an MRB usually occupies 
assembly positions 5-7 km from the enemy FEBA. Under favorable 
situation conditions these positions may be designated to one 
side of the axis of advance, which will ensure surprise to a 
certain extent. 
  Subunits must be ready to repel enemy reconnaissance and 
assaults during regrouping. 
  A relief of defending subunits is the organized 
receipt and transfer by subunits of positions and strongpoints 
(defense areas) in a combat situation. The procedure and 
sequence of the relief are determined by the senior commander. 
  On receiving a relief order, a company (battalion) commander 
performs ground reconnaissance together with the commander of 
the subunit being relieved. During ground reconnaissance the 
nature of terrain, the enemy FEBA, and his weapons and engineer 
obstacles in the attack frontage and on flanks are studied. Then 
the company (battalion) commander familiarizes himself with the 
disposition of the subunit turning over the position, with its 
regime of behavior, system of fire, organization of air defense, 
fortification of the strongpoint (strongpoints) and obstacles 
emplaced ahead of the FEBA and in the depth of the defense. 
Familiarization with the NBC situation also is important. 
  In addition, he updates (determines) concealed forward 
movement routes to the relief area, locations of traffic control 
posts, places for arriving subunits to be met by guides, and the 
relief procedure. The procedure for joint repulse of a possible 
enemy attack launched during the relief also is established. 
  The company (battalion) commander receives a diagram and all 
available data on the enemy from the commander turning over the 
strongpoint (defense area). 
  Defending subunits are relieved in accordance with the 
senior 
commander's relief plan. Usually on the night before an attack 
the MRC (MRB) moves up from the depth in BMP's (BTR's) and motor 
vehicles and dismounts on arriving at the line which can be 
viewed by enemy ground reconnaissance equipment. Subsequently it 
proceeds along a designated concealed route or routes in 
dismounted formation to the point (place) of rendezvous with 
guides of the subunit being relieved. The company (battalion) 
moves further along communication trenches and [fighting] 
trenches to its attack positions (to the assembly area) with the 
help of the guides and occupies them in readiness to repel 
possible enemy assaults. BMP's (BTR's) remain under cover at 
dismount locations on the axes of their subunits' operations. As 
a rule, they move up to the subunits in the period of fire 
preparation of the assault. Motor vehicles remain at the 
designated assembly point and are disposed by company or by 
battalion in readiness for movement. 
  A TC (TB) attached to an MRB occupies its assigned assembly 
positions 5-7 km from the enemy FEBA. The BMP's (BTR's) of MRC's 
also may be together with it. 
  If the enemy launches an attack during the relief, the 
relief 
stops and all subunits repel his assault. Their battle is 
controlled by the commander of the subunit being relieved, since 
he knows the situation well. 
  The relief of subunits continues after repulse of the enemy 
attack. It is considered completed after the company (battalion) 
commander reports to his senior commander. 
  It should be noted that a regrouping of subunits from a 
position of defense and a relief of defending subunits for 
occupying an attack position are accomplished covertly with 
observation of sound, light and radar discipline. 
  An MRC (MRB) which has relieved defending subunits must 
strictly follow their regime of conduct before the relief. 
<H5>  7. Conduct of Attack by MRC (TC) </H5>
  As a result of regrouping and relief of defending subunits, 
a 
first echelon MRC occupies the attack position in the first 
trench and adjoining communication trench, and a TC occupies an 
assembly position and sometimes also an attack position, where 
they complete preparation for the assault. 
  In case the enemy conducts a counterpreparation, company 
personnel except for observers and duty weapons take cover in 
bunkers, dugouts, slit trenches as well as combat vehicles. 
  Fire preparation of the assault begins at the prescribed 
time 
at a signal (command) from the senior commander. During this 
time tanks, ATGM launchers, guns and other weapons assigned to 
conduct direct fire destroy and neutralize enemy weapons in 
strongpoints at his first position. 
  From the COP the company commander observes results of fire 
preparation of the assault, detects enemy targets that were not 
engaged or which have newly appeared, and updates combat 
missions to platoons for their destruction. In addition, he 
monitors the timely making and marking of passages by combat 
engineer subunits ahead of the enemy FEBA and conducts 
observation of the forward movement of his own BMP's (BTR's) and 
of tank subunits interworking with the company. He reports 
readiness for the assault to the battalion commander. 
  A TC begins forward movement from the assembly (attack) 
position to the line of departure during fire preparation of the 
assault at the command (signal) of the senior commander. The 
command (signal) is given so as to ensure the arrival of tanks 
at the enemy FEBA at the prescribed H hour simultaneously with 
assaulting motorized rifle subunits. This requires taking into 
account the distance of tanks from the FEBA and their possible 
rate of movement. BMP's (BTR's) of the MRC which were located 
with the tank subunits also move forward behind them. 
  As it moves forward, the TC deploys into platoon columns 
and, 
on arriving at the line of departure, also into an extended 
line. Moving at maximum permissible speed, it destroys the enemy 
by gun fire and subsequently also by machinegun fire from the 
move. BMP's (BTR's) move up to their subunits following the 
tanks. 
  In a dismounted assault by an MRC, when tanks working 
together with it arrive at its attack position, the company 
commander gives the command "Get ready for assault," and after 
the tanks pass the position--"Charge--forward!" At this command 
the personnel leap from emplacements (the trench) and rush into 
the assault following the tanks. 
  BMP's (BTR's) displace behind their subunits by bounds from 
cover to cover (from line to line) and provide reliable support 
of assaulting tanks and motorized riflemen by fire of their 
weapons. BMP's equipped with stabilized weapons proceed in the 
extended line of motorized rifle subunits during the assault. 
  When the attack position is a considerable distance from the 
enemy FEBA, MRC subunits may board BMP's (BTR's), launch the 
assault following the tanks, and then dismount at the dismount 
line. 
  In a situation where the MRC is to assault the enemy in 
BMP's 
(BTR's), its personnel board during fire preparation of the 
assault. For this, at a command (signal) of the company 
commander, the BMP's (BTR's) approach their subunit covertly and 
stop. Subsequently the company launches the assault following 
the interworking tanks. 
  Artillery shifts to artillery support of the assault with 
the 
beginning of the tank assault. Firing into gaps between 
assaulting subunits and from behind their flanks, tanks, guns, 
ATGM launchers and other weapons assigned for direct fire 
destroy enemy targets which have survived and have newly 
appeared. Subsequently these weapons operate in accordance with 
assigned missions. 
  In a dismounted assault, company personnel usually cross 
minefields by squads following tanks in their tracks and through 
breached passages. BMP's equipped with mineclearing devices 
cross independently. Passages are made (by the explosive method) 
for BMP's (BTR's) and other combat vehicles not having 
mineclearing devices figuring one passage per assaulting 
platoon. After crossing a minefield BMP's (BTR's) catch up with 
the subunits and support their assault by fire of their weapons. 
  If an MRC is assaulting in BMP's equipped with mineclearing 
devices, it crosses the enemy minefield independently following 
tanks without closing up the battle formation, and the other 
vehicles without mineclearing devices do so through passages. In 
this case passages are made for passing the vehicles through 
figuring one or two per assaulting company. 
  The company's MRP's should move as close as possible to the 
tanks during an assault. This achieves reliable coordination 
among them and precludes the danger of motorized riflemen being 
cut off from tanks by enemy fire. 
  When assaulting subunits approach the safety limit of 
friendly shell and mortar (grenade) bursts, artillery (grenade 
launchers) shifts fire into the depth at the senior commander's 
command (signal). 
  The safe distance from friendly shellbursts is considered to 
be 400 m (200 m from grenade bursts) for motorized riflemen in a 
dismounted assault. The safe distance for tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's) is 200 and 300 m respectively. 
  Motorized rifle and tank subunits burst onto the enemy FEBA 
at precisely the prescribed H hour. After destroying his 
personnel, weapons and vehicles, the company continues the 
assault nonstop into the depth right after friendly artillery 
shellbursts. 
  The grenade launcher subunit attached to an MRC may operate 
up to 300 m behind its battle formation and also in gaps between 
platoons or on one of the company flanks. If necessary, it may 
move up directly into battle formations of motorized rifle 
subunits. A subunit with grenade launchers mounted on BMP's 
(BTR's) usually operates in battle formations of motorized rifle 
subunits. 
  The company's AT squad usually attacks in the battle 
formation of MRP's, in gaps between them or on one of the 
company flanks. Occupying firing positions in succession, it 
destroys tanks, IFV's and other armored targets hampering the 
company's advance. 
  The flamethrower subunit attached to the MRC attacks in the 
company battle formation, conducting fire at the company 
commander's command or independently. 
  The air defense subunit covering the company usually 
advances 
behind it, conducts continuous reconnaissance of the air enemy, 
especially helicopters, and destroys him by fire from the move 
or from short halts. 
  A company may not deploy into battle formation and may 
operate in approach march formation in an attack on an axis 
where the enemy has been reliably neutralized and is not 
offering organized resistance. 
  In the period of fire support of the assault, artillery 
subunits continuously and successively neutralize personnel and 
weapons, above all AT weapons, and neutralize and destroy 
precision weapon system elements, C[.sup]2[/] facilities and 
newly detected targets. Artillery displaces to new firing 
positions after the company takes the platoon strongpoint. 
  During fire support of the subunits' assault, combat 
helicopters destroy enemy tanks, ATGM's, IFV's and other targets 
2-3 km or more ahead of the assaulting tanks. Fighter-bombers 
engage enemy objectives at a greater depth. 
  If it is impossible to bypass minefields suddenly laid by 
the 
enemy by remote minelaying equipment ahead of an attacking 
company, it negotiates them through passages made by the 
battalion obstacle clearing party and the company non-T/O 
mineclearing team. In the course of the attack the mineclearing 
team (a squad of motorized riflemen equipped with mine 
detectors, sappers' grappling hooks and a set of markers) moves 
behind the company battle formation close to the company 
commander's COP. 
  During the assault the company commander at the COP moves 
200 
m behind the extended line of armored vehicles or riflemen. As a 
rule he dismounts in a dismounted assault by the company. The 
company commander must carefully observe development of the 
battle, control the fire of all weapons, promptly support 
platoons which have achieved greatest success, and take skillful 
advantage of fire to support their maneuver and surprise assault 
against the flank and rear of the enemy strongpoint. Having 
completed destruction of the enemy in platoon strongpoints of 
the first position, the company develops the attack into the 
depth. The battle in the depth of the enemy defense is 
characterized by uneven advance of the company's platoons and 
develops in a complex, swiftly changing situation. The enemy 
will attempt to move ATGM's and tanks up to previously prepared 
firing positions for delivering a fire strike against the 
assaulting company's flank. In this situation it is advisable to 
use some of the forces, artillery fire and blinding smoke 
screens to isolate the enemy from the threatened sector and use 
the company main body to execute a maneuver and complete the 
enemy's destruction by an assault against the flank and rear of 
the strongpoint. 
  After destroying the enemy in the depth of the first 
position, the company may send out a combat reconnaissance 
patrol with the primary mission of reconnoitering enemy tanks, 
precision weapon systems, artillery, AT weapons and obstacles. 
  During battle in the depth of the first position the company 
must be ready to repel enemy counterattacks. Methods of 
combating him basically depend on the force ratio between the 
sides and directions of his counterattacks (Diagram 13). 
  In the case where a company has superiority over the enemy 
or 
equal forces with him, as a rule it destroys him by fire and a 
decisive assault on the move, i.e., in a meeting battle. If the 
enemy has superiority in forces and assets, it is more 
advantageous for the company to inflict damage on him by fire 
from in place and subsequently complete his rout by a determined 
assault in coordination with an adjacent subunit. Tanks and 
BMP's (BTR's) take up firing positions behind the nearest cover 
and MRP personnel dismount and take up positions providing 
favorable conditions for destroying the enemy and for 
coordination with the tanks. The AT squad is disposed at firing 
positions on a likely avenue of tank approach, usually in gaps 
or on the company (platoon) flank. The attached grenade launcher 
subunit as a rule takes up firing positions in the company 
battle formation on the axis with the greatest amount of enemy 
infantry. Initially the company repels a counterattack by 
concentrated fire of subunits from all weapons at maximum range. 
When the enemy approaches, the force and intensity of fire are 
brought to highest intensity. 
  One of the deciding conditions of successful combat against 
a 
counterattacking enemy is to inflict maximum damage on him by 
fire of artillery, mortars, tanks, AT weapons and BMP's and by 
strikes of combat helicopters, and make skilled use of smoke 
assets. A concealed move of company subunits to the flank and 
rear of a counterattacking enemy and surprise of the assault are 
achieved by laying down blinding and concealing smoke screens. 
  If the enemy offers no organized resistance, platoon 
personnel board vehicles at their commanders' commands and 
continue a swift attack into the depth, taking advantage of 
artillery fire, strikes by aircraft and their own weapons. 
  In terrain sectors difficult of access for tanks, dismounted 
MRP's may overtake the tanks and attack under cover of their 
fire and the fire of BMP's (BTR's). As these sectors are 
crossed, the tanks again move in front and continue the attack. 
  The company goes around obstacles and barriers encountered 
in 
the course of battle or crosses them through passages made by 
combat engineer subunits and tanks equipped with bulldozer 
attachments. Contaminated terrain sectors usually are bypassed, 
but if this is impossible they are crossed along axes ensuring 
the least degree of exposure (contamination) and wearing 
protective gear. 
  The position of platoons in the battle formation may be in a 
line, wedge (inverted wedge), or echelon right or left during 
the attack, especially in the depth of the enemy defense and 
based on the nature of his actions. 
  In case of an enemy withdrawal the company commander 
immediately organizes a pursuit, reports this to the battalion 
commander and informs adjacent subunits. In organizing the 
pursuit, the company commander first and foremost sends out a 
combat reconnaissance patrol and assigns missions to subunits. 
  The high mobility of tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and artillery 
permits a company to employ the more advisable method of 
pursuing the enemy along parallel routes. For this the company 
reforms into a column, swiftly overtakes the enemy along 
parallel routes, moves to his withdrawal routes and destroys him 
in detail by a determined assault against the flank and rear in 
coordination with subunits operating from other directions. 
  If pursuit of the enemy along parallel routes is impossible 
because of situation conditions, it is done from the front. In 
this case the company resolutely destroys enemy covering-force 
subunits, penetrates to his main body and swiftly assaults the 
enemy from the move in coordination with subunits conducting the 
pursuit along parallel routes. 
  In the pursuit a company may operate in battle, approach 
march or march formation. Personnel in motor vehicles may pursue 
the enemy as a mounted force on tanks or in the motor vehicles 
under cover of tanks. 
  With successful development of the attack a company may 
receive a mission for operations in a special detachment. Its 
mission may be to destroy means of nuclear and chemical attack, 
precision weapon systems, C[.sup]2[/] facilities and so on. 
  On receiving the mission, the company commander sends out a 
combat reconnaissance patrol, makes the decision and assigns 
missions to subunits. Taking advantage of gaps in the enemy 
battle formation and his exposed flanks, the company moves 
quickly and covertly to the designated area. Then it decisively 
assaults from the move from different directions, usually 
without dismounting the motorized riflemen, destroys the 
covering force, makes the capture and performs the assigned 
mission. Subsequently the company either receives a new mission 
or moves out to the operating area of its battalion (or of 
friendly troops). 
  In an attack on a fortified area an MRC may make up an 
assault team, which usually is part of an assault detachment. In 
this case tanks, guns (primarily self-propelled), mortars, ATGM 
launchers, flamethrowers, grenade launchers and a combat 
engineer subunit may be attached to the company. As a rule, an 
assault team consists of fire, obstacle clearing (demolition) 
and capture elements. 
  The assault team is given an immediate mission and direction 
for continuing the attack. The mission content is to capture or 
destroy a permanent emplacement or other important structure on 
the axis of attack. The direction for continuing the attack is 
assigned so as to ensure capture and destruction of the next 
enemy weapon emplacement or other emplacement. 
  An assault team begins the assault on its objective 
simultaneously with the assault of first echelon tank and 
motorized rifle subunits. The team blocks and destroys a 
surviving emplacement after fire preparation of the assault. 
Subsequently the team destroys another permanent emplacement. 
  Tanks and motorized rifle subunits of the assaulting echelon 
boldly penetrate into gaps between permanent emplacements and 
advance into the depth, and some of the forces destroy an enemy 
relief subunit together with the assault team. 
  A company also may attack with a crossing of nuclear 
minefields. In organizing an attack under these conditions, 
along with other questions the company commander decides 
questions of the capture and destruction of a nuclear mine 
located on the company axis of operations. In particular, he 
organizes reconnaissance of the nuclear mine cover and security 
outpost positions, specifies the procedure for routing the enemy 
at these positions, and also the procedure for capture and 
destruction of the mine. In addition, the commander determines 
his subunit's makeup, reinforcement, outfitting and place in the 
battle formation for immediate capture and destruction of a 
nuclear mine and the procedure of its operations. 
  An MRP, tanks with mineclearing devices and bulldozer 
equipment, combat engineers with special technical assets and 
chemical warfare scouts may be assigned to the makeup of a 
nuclear mine capture and destruction subunit. To perform the 
mission, the capture and destruction subunit is divided into a 
capture team (main body of the subunit and tanks with 
mineclearing devices and bulldozer equipment) and a destruction 
team (combat engineer subunit). 
  In an assault on nuclear mine cover and security outpost 
positions, a subunit assigned for its capture and destruction 
advances behind the company battle formation in the course of an 
attack or assaults together with it. After destruction of the 
nuclear mine cover and security outpost subunit, the capture 
team breaches obstacles, takes the nuclear mine disposition 
area, moves to a safe distance from where it is emplaced and 
cordons off this area. The destruction team reconnoiters the 
nuclear mine's location and destroys it. 
  As noted above, the company may launch a hasty 
attack. Before launching the attack it usually is in the 
battalion assembly area, disposed along a route ensuring its 
movement onto the battalion forward movement route to the start 
point. Personnel and military vehicles are in carefully 
camouflaged shelters. Observation and local security are 
organized in the company. 
  The company moves up from the occupied area at the battalion 
commander's command (signal). After the column forms up the 
company takes its prescribed place in the battalion march 
formation, which is determined by the company's place in the 
battalion battle formation alignment when it launches the 
assault. The company moves up with means of reinforcement, which 
helps it to deploy into approach march and battle formations 
from the move without a halt. As a rule the company crosses the 
start point at a given rate of movement. 
  Fire preparation of the assault begins with the company's 
arrival at a line which can be reached by enemy artillery fire 
(or from a line designated by the senior commander). On reaching 
the point of deployment into company columns, the company moves 
onto its axis of attack along a cross-country route. 
  An MRC in motor vehicles moving forward behind tank subunits 
stops on arriving at the point for boarding tanks as a mounted 
force (2-4 km from the enemy FEBA) and boards, after which it 
continues moving toward the dismount line. 
  Motor vehicles freed of motorized riflemen move to the 
assembly area and remain there in readiness to move up to their 
company at the commander's signal. 
  Company tanks assigned to be outfitted with roller-type 
mineclearing devices are moved to the designated place at the 
designated time by direction of the battalion commander. 
  In the course of fire preparation the company continues 
moving forward at maximum speed, deploying into platoon columns 
from the indicated line, and arrives at the line of departure in 
battle formation. 
  During forward movement to the line of departure the company 
must observe measures of protection against precision weapons 
and must observe radar, sound and light discipline. 
  If it is impossible to bypass minefields laid by enemy 
remote 
minelaying equipment in the course of forward movement to the 
line of departure, the company crosses through passages made by 
the senior commander's movement support detachment, the 
battalion obstacle clearing party or the company nonT/O 
mineclearing team. 
  An MRC may execute an assault in BMP's (BTR's) or in 
dismounted formation. In a dismounted assault, motorized rifle 
subunit personnel dismount from BMP's (BTR's) on arriving at the 
dismount line, deploy into an extended line on the move and 
assault the enemy following the tanks. BMP's (BTR's) displace 
behind their own subunits and support them by fire. 
  On approaching the dismount line BMP's (BTR's) must speed up 
and catch up with the assaulting tanks to ensure close 
interworking of motorized riflemen with tanks when they reach 
the enemy FEBA. 
  As in a dismounted assault, in an assault in BMP's (BTR's) 
motorized rifle subunits of the company also must move as close 
to the tanks as possible (not over 200 m). This will ensure 
continuous fire coordination between motorized rifle and tank 
subunits in the interests of successful mission performance. 
  The company's negotiation of obstacles in the course of an 
assault and its operations to destroy the enemy are similar to 
company operations when launching an attack from a position of 
direct contact with the enemy. 
<H5>  8. Conduct of Attack by MRB (TB) </H5>
  The attack of an MRB from a position of direct contact with 
the enemy is made from an assembly area occupied after 
regrouping from a position of defense or simultaneously with 
relief of defending subunits. 
  In the battalion assembly area for the attack, first echelon 
companies occupy attack positions in the first trench and 
adjoining communication trenches, and the second echelon company 
does so in the second and third trenches. 
  Depending on the situation, BMP's may be in the previous 
places or together with attached tank subunits at attack or 
assembly positions. 
  Air defense subunits are in battle formations of companies, 
and the mortar (artillery) battery is up to 500 m from first 
echelon companies. 
  The AT subunit and grenade launcher subunit are disposed up 
to 100 and 300 m respectively behind first echelon companies. 
  Tank subunits attached to the battalion and which were in 
the 
defense may occupy an assembly or attack position after 
necessary regrouping. When an attack is launched as motorized 
rifle subunits are relieving defending subunits, the TB (tank 
subunit attached to an MRB) as a rule occupies an assembly 
position. In it the battalion usually is disposed by company 
with consideration of conducting a defense in case the enemy 
launches an attack after a counterpreparation. Measures of 
protection against precision weapons and of radar, sound and 
light discipline are followed. 
  When the enemy conducts counterpreparation fire, personnel 
and military vehicles are in shelters, except for observers and 
duty weapons. 
  Fire preparation of the assault begins at the prescribed 
time 
at a signal (command) from the senior commander. In its course 
the AT subunit, grenade launcher subunit and artillery attached 
to the battalion and assigned to conduct direct fire destroy and 
neutralize enemy weapons and personnel in his forward 
strongpoints. 
  The battalion commander observes results of fire preparation 
of the assault from his COP, assigns supplementary missions to 
weapons for destroying surviving and newly detected targets if 
necessary, and monitors forward movement of the attached tank 
subunit from its occupied position. He reports readiness for the 
assault to the regimental commander. 
  A TB intended for attacking in the first echelon (or a tank 
subunit attached to an MRB) moves forward from the assembly 
position to the line of departure during fire preparation of the 
assault. 
  As they approach the enemy FEBA, TC's deploy into platoon 
columns and arrive at the line of departure in battle formation. 
Without stopping at this line, the TB (tank subunit attached to 
an MRB) launches the assault at the maximum permissible rate of 
movement. Tanks destroy enemy personnel and weapons by fire from 
the move. BMP's (BTR's) move up to their subunits. 
  When tanks approach the attack positions of first echelon 
MRC's, in a dismounted assault the motorized riflemen assault 
following the tanks. BMP's (BTR's) operate behind their subunits 
by bounds from line to line at a distance ensuring their 
effective fire support. When assaulting in BMP's (BTR's), 
motorized rifle subunits board personnel during fire preparation 
of the assault. 
  When tanks begin launching the assault, artillery begins 
artillery support of the assault at the senior commander's 
command (signal). Battalion weapons assigned for direct fire 
continue to destroy enemy targets, firing into gaps between 
friendly subunits and from behind their flanks. 
  In a dismounted assault by MRC's, motorized riflemen cross 
minefields following in the tracks of tanks and along passages 
which have been breached. BMP's equipped with mineclearing 
devices cross minefields independently, and those without 
mineclearing devices (including also BTR's) do so along passages 
breached by combat engineer subunits, usually by the explosive 
method. If motorized rifle subunits assault in BMP's equipped 
with mineclearing devices, they cross minefields without closing 
up the battle formation, and military vehicles without 
mineclearing devices do so along passages which have been made. 
  Artillery (grenade launcher) fire is transferred into the 
depth when assaulting MRC's and tank subunits approach the 
safety limit from bursts of friendly artillery and mortar rounds 
(grenades). At precisely the established H hour, 
motorized rifle and tank subunits of the battalion first echelon 
burst onto the enemy FEBA, destroy his personnel and weapons and 
develop the assault into the depth. 
  The battalion assault is accomplished with support of 
artillery fire and air strikes, including also combat helicopter 
strikes. Fire support of the assault is conducted continuously 
to the full depth of defense of the enemy first echelon brigade 
(regiment). Combat helicopters destroy tanks, AT weapons and 
other armored targets located 2-3 km or more ahead of the 
attacking subunits, and fighter-bombers engage enemy objectives 
at a greater depth. 
  Battalion organic and attached artillery continuously and 
successively neutralizes personnel and weapons, especially AT 
weapons, ahead of the front and on flanks of the battalion 
attack in coordination with the senior commander's weapons. This 
artillery displaces to new firing positions by order of the 
battalion commander, usually after the attackers take forward 
enemy platoon strongpoints. A transfer of or request for fire in 
conducting artillery support of the assault by a successive fire 
concentration, concentrated fire, and fire against single 
targets also may be accomplished at a command (signal) from the 
battalion commander. 
  The battalion GLP attacks behind first echelon companies, in 
their gaps or on one of the battalion flanks. If necessary the 
platoon may move up into battle formations of MRC's. 
  The ATP displaces behind one of the first echelon companies 
on a likely avenue of tank approach in readiness to repel enemy 
tank counterattacks. 
  Moving behind first echelon companies, the air defense 
subunit reconnoiters the air enemy and covers subunits from the 
air. 
  Exploiting results of fire damage, assaulting tank and 
motorized rifle subunits of the battalion destroy personnel and 
weapons in strongpoints from the move and create conditions for 
routing the enemy in the depth of the defense. The battalion may 
conduct the attack in approach march formation on an axis where 
the enemy has been reliably neutralized and offers no organized 
resistance. 
  The enemy may counterattack the battalion with brigade 
reserves. In this case, when the battalion's assaulting subunits 
have superiority over the counterattacker or equal forces and 
assets with him, as a rule he is destroyed by fire and a 
determined assault from the move. If the counterattacking enemy 
has superiority in forces and assets, it is more advantageous 
for the battalion to inflict damage on him by fire from in place 
and subsequently complete the rout by a determined assault in 
coordination with adjacent subunits, artillery and combat 
helicopters. 
  When first echelon companies have performed the immediate 
mission the battalion commander assigns them a new mission and 
takes steps to build up efforts by committing the second 
echelon (reserve). 
  Depending on the situation, it may be committed as or after 
the battalion completes performance of the immediate mission. 
The second echelon (reserve) displaces covertly from line to 
line 1- 2 km behind first echelon subunits, as a rule in 
approach march formation, taking advantage of concealing and 
protective properties of the terrain. It is committed in gaps 
between companies, from behind the flank of one of the 
companies, and sometimes also by leapfrogging over their battle 
formations (Diagram 14). 
  With commitment of the second echelon (reserve), the 
battalion commander usually updates by radio (points out to the 
reserve) the following: latest data on the enemy; situation of 
first echelon subunits; commitment line and time of moving to 
it; immediate mission and direction for continuing the attack; 
means of reinforcement and places and time of their arrival; 
missions for organic and attached artillery; procedure for fire 
support and coordination with first echelon subunits and 
adjacent subunits. 
  On receiving a mission for commitment, the commander of a 
second echelon (reserve) company of the battalion updates 
(assigns) combat missions to platoons (squads, tanks) on the 
move by radio. On arriving at the commitment line, he indicates 
on the terrain the position of the enemy and his weapons, 
commitment line, assault objectives and direction for continuing 
the attack, and he organizes coordination. 
  In coordination instructions the commander of a second 
echelon (reserve) company communicates the procedure for joint 
actions of motorized rifle and tank subunits, for their 
deployment into battle formation, and for conducting fire and 
movement and negotiating minefields and barriers; coordinates 
actions of motorized riflemen with tanks, with attached weapons, 
with each other and with adjacent subunits for destroying the 
enemy; indicates the procedure for dismounting motorized 
riflemen (if necessary) and using BMP's; and announces warning, 
control and coordination signals. 
  The battalion second echelon (reserve) moves up to the 
commitment line at maximum speed and deploys quickly into battle 
formation on approaching the line. Before its commitment, 
artillery, grenade launchers and other weapons conduct a fire 
assault. The second echelon's forward movement and deployment is 
covered by air defense subunits and supported by first echelon 
companies. Firing from the move, a second echelon company 
swiftly assaults the enemy and performs the assigned mission 
together with the battalion's first echelon companies and 
supported by artillery. With commitment of the second echelon, 
the battalion commander establishes a reserve from subunits 
operating off the axis of concentration of the battalion's main 
efforts. The battalion commander moves up a reconnaissance 
(combat reconnaissance) patrol for conducting reconnaissance on 
the axis of attack. 
  In a dismounted assault by motorized rifle subunits, after 
the enemy is destroyed in his first position personnel usually 
mount BMP's (BTR's, or as a mounted force on tanks). The 
battalion continues a determined attack into the depth, 
exploiting artillery fire, fire of its own weapons and air 
strikes. 
  Minefields laid ahead of assaulting companies by enemy 
remote 
minelaying assets are crossed through passages if it is 
impossible to go around them. Passages are breached by the 
battalion obstacle clearing party, by mineclearing teams of 
companies and by other mineclearing methods. Subunits move along 
passages in approach march formations under cover of fire of 
artillery, tanks, BMP's (BTR's), and the battalion AT subunit 
and grenade launcher subunit. To ensure timely forward movement 
of the obstacle clearing party for breaching obstacles, it is 
advisable to have it displace behind first echelon companies 
near the battalion commander's COP. 
  During the attack the battalion COP displaces behind first 
echelon companies at a distance giving the commander an 
opportunity for continuous observation of the battlefield and 
stable communications with the senior commander and with 
attached and supporting subunits. The battalion commander must 
constantly reconnoiter the enemy and terrain and observe the 
battlefield; promptly give artillery fire support to subunits 
which have achieved greatest success; and skillfully exploit the 
success for developing the attack. 
  When attacking on an axis where the enemy is reliably 
neutralized and not offering organized resistance, a battalion 
may not deploy into battle formation, but assault in approach 
march formation. Assigned subunits may deploy into battle 
formation to destroy the remaining enemy. 
  If the battalion launches an attack outside of the 
regimental 
penetration sector, then it must use aggressive actions, above 
all the fire of all weapons, to keep the enemy from removing a 
portion of his forces from the occupied position and 
transferring them to the penetration sector. When there has been 
reliable fire damage of the enemy or upon discovery of removal 
of a portion of forces or their withdrawal from the occupied 
position, the battalion should assault the enemy decisively with 
artillery fire support. It is advisable to conduct the assault 
with the main body along an axis adjoining the penetration 
sector. Making wide use of a maneuver of fire and subunits, one 
should destroy the enemy in strongpoints and develop the attack 
into the depth. A situation may take shape where the enemy 
offers stubborn resistance on the FEBA. In this case it is 
advisable to commit the battalion second echelon in the 
penetration sector with the mission of routing the enemy by 
striking the flank and rear of his strongpoints, expand the 
penetration sector and develop the attack into the depth. 
  When the regiment attacks in the entire zone without a 
penetration sector being designated, the battalion, taking 
advantage of gaps in the enemy battle formation and exploiting 
results of fire damage, penetrates the defense with the main 
body from the move and advances nonstop into the depth, covering 
its flanks with a portion of the forces. An enemy who continues 
to offer resistance is sealed off with minimal forces and 
destroyed by the second echelon (reserve) or by assigned 
subunits. 
  The battalion goes around strongpoints in the depth of the 
enemy defense which are delaying the advance, using smoke in so 
doing, and decisively destroys him by strikes against the flank 
and rear with support from the front. War experience indicates 
that only a skilled maneuver of subunits and fire and the 
delivery of strikes against the flank and rear in coordination 
with subunits of all combat arms can achieve decisive 
destruction of the enemy in strongpoints. 
  Based on the nature of enemy operations and the position 
occupied, companies in the battalion battle formation may be in 
a line, wedge (inverted wedge), or echelon right or left. 
  Lines and objectives captured in the depth of the enemy 
defense and which are of great importance are consolidated by 
subunits assigned for this. On arriving at the line the subunit 
digs in and prepares fire to repel a possible enemy 
counterattack. 
  Success attained in fighting in the depth of the enemy 
defense must be exploited immediately to achieve his total rout. 
  With an enemy withdrawal the battalion commander updates the 
mission for the reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrol, 
sends out new patrols if necessary and assigns missions to 
subunits for the pursuit. The commander reports to the senior 
chief and informs adjacent subunits about shifting to the 
pursuit. 
  Depending on situation conditions a battalion usually 
conducts the pursuit by two methods: along parallel routes or 
from the front. Pursuit along parallel routes is the most 
advisable method. 
  In the course of pursuit a battalion operates in battle, 
approach march or march formation depending on the situation. 
Personnel in motor vehicles may pursue a retreating enemy as a 
mounted force on tanks or in motor vehicles covered by tanks. 
  With successful development of the attack, an MRB (TB) may 
operate in a forward or raiding detachment. 
  The mission of a forward detachment is to capture 
an important line (objective) in the depth of the enemy defense 
and hold it until the main body arrives. A raiding 
detachment may be assigned a mission to destroy or capture 
one or two important objectives: tactical missile batteries, 
individual elements of a reconnaissance-strike complex, an 
artillery battalion, fire support helicopter basing site, a 
base, a depot, bridge crossing and other objectives. After 
performing a mission the raiding detachment as a rule joins 
(moves up to) the main body, avoiding a fight with the enemy. 
  Conditions under which detachments have to operate are 
determined and characterized by the following basic factors: 
considerable separation from the main body and presence of 
exposed flanks; possibility of an enemy ground and air attack on 
the detachments from different directions; frequent changes in 
directions of detachment operations. In the course of performing 
missions, detachments often will interwork with an airborne 
(amphibious) assault force, aviation, and reconnaissance, 
forward and raiding detachments operating from adjacent units 
and formations. 
  To increase independence of operations an MRB (TB) may be 
reinforced by a TC (MRC), SP artillery battalion, air defense 
battery, and also a combat engineer platoon. 
  The alignment of a detachment's forces and assets must 
conform to the commander's decision and ensure the following: 
swift commitment and advance into the depth of the enemy 
defense; deployment of forces and assets from the move into 
approach march and battle formations from a column; independence 
of operations by companies; buildup of efforts in conducting 
battle and when it is necessary to disengage; and convenience of 
C[.sup]2[/]. 
  It is desirable to have the following alignment of a 
detachment march formation when moving up to the objective: 
march security (forward, flank and rear security elements), 
movement support detachment, main body, and necessary number of 
technical support and rear vehicles. MRC's (TC's) usually are 
reinforced by tank (motorized rifle) subunits. The combat 
reconnaissance patrol will perform reconnaissance missions in 
support of the battalion. 
  To rout the enemy a forward detachment and raiding 
detachment 
as a rule deploy into a battle formation which consists of first 
echelon subunits (two reinforced MRC's or TC's), a reserve (up 
to a company), artillery, and air defense subunits. In addition, 
there may be destruction (demolition) and capture teams in the 
raiding detachment battle formation if necessary. 
  On receiving a mission the battalion commander sends out 
reconnaissance and makes his decision based on a mission 
analysis and situation estimate. The following usually are 
specified in the commander's concept: direction of operations 
(if not indicated by the senior commander); sequence and methods 
for destruction, capture or disabling of enemy objectives during 
commitment and operations in the depth; detachment alignment 
during commitment and operations in the enemy rear; procedure 
for forward movement, methods of commitment, and nature of 
maneuver in the enemy rear; and methods of achieving surprise of 
operations. The commander's concept is determined for the full 
depth of detachment operations, while combat missions are 
assigned to subunits only for capture of a line (for the forward 
detachment) or for smashing (destroying) a priority objective 
(for the raiding detachment). 
  In accordance with the decision, the battalion commander 
assigns missions to subordinates, organizes coordination and 
issues necessary instructions for comprehensive support of 
operations. Combat missions for subunits and the procedure for 
coordination as a rule are updated on initial engagement of the 
enemy. 
  Taking advantage of gaps in the enemy battle formation, the 
detachment decisively penetrates into the depth of his defense. 
Without becoming engaged with him, the detachment moves swiftly 
up to the indicated line or objective and captures it. If 
necessary, the detachment's commitment may be supported by 
artillery fire, helicopter strikes and operations of first 
echelon subunits. After taking the designated line, the forward 
detachment shifts to a defense and holds it until the main body 
arrives. It must be a perimeter defense and ensure repulse of 
enemy assaults from different directions. If the situation 
permits, the forward detachment advances by authorization of the 
commander who sent it out in order to preempt the enemy in 
seizing a new line. 
  The past war's experience shows that the forward 
detachment's 
successful performance of the mission is achieved by its 
decisive, highly mobile operations. 
  On arrival at the planned objective and with initial 
engagement of security, the raiding detachment commander as a 
rule updates the decision and missions for subordinates. The 
detachment destroys the enemy by a surprise assault of the main 
body from the move, usually from two or three directions, puts 
his objective out of commission and moves to the assembly area. 
If necessary, the destruction team blows up structures and 
destroys vehicles and the capture team seizes documents, weapons 
and prisoners. 
  In the course of disabling or destroying the first 
objective, 
the detachment commander sends out reconnaissance to the next 
enemy objective. The detachment maneuvers onto the new axis 
covertly and quickly in columns. Measures for deceiving the 
enemy, especially regarding the true axis of operations, should 
be provided for here. 
  Nighttime and other conditions of limited visibility should 
be used fully to execute a maneuver in the depth of the enemy 
defense and deliver surprise attacks. 
  After executing a mission the raiding detachment moves up to 
the main body covertly and joins it. If necessary, it may hold 
the objective until the main body arrives. 
  An MRB (TB) also may operate in a special detachment during 
development of the attack. The detachment mission is to destroy 
means of nuclear and chemical attack and precision weapon 
systems. Operations of a special detachment essentially are 
similar to those of a raiding detachment. 
  On receiving the combat mission, the battalion commander 
immediately sends out a reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) 
patrol. Taking advantage of intervals, breaches and gaps in the 
enemy battle formation and his exposed flanks, the detachment 
moves covertly and quickly to the designated area. Then it 
decisively assaults the enemy, usually from different 
directions, destroys covering-force subunits, and captures and 
destroys his launchers (guns) and missiles (ammunition). After 
performing the assigned mission the special detachment may 
receive a new combat mission or it moves to the operating area 
of its own units. 
  When attacking a fortified area, an MRB may operate as an 
assault detachment. Assault teams are formed in the assault 
detachment to destroy the enemy or seal him off in permanent 
weapon emplacements and other important structures. Each team 
includes up to a reinforced MRC. 
  The assault detachment is reinforced by tanks, artillery, 
flamethrowers, ATGM and air defense subunits and a combat 
engineer subunit. The detachment is given an immediate mission 
and direction for continuing the attack. 
  An assault detachment's immediate mission is to seize and 
destroy permanent weapon emplacements and other important 
structures in strongpoints of enemy first echelon companies. The 
direction for continuing the attack is determined so as to 
ensure capture and destruction of enemy weapon emplacements and 
other structures in the depth of his first position. To perform 
the combat mission the assault detachment takes up an attack 
position in immediate proximity to the assault objectives. 
  An assault on the enemy by the assault detachment begins 
simultaneously with first echelon tank and motorized rifle 
subunits. In coordination with a portion of forces of tank and 
motorized rifle subunits advancing into the depth of the enemy 
defense, the detachment seals off and destroys sturdy structures 
which survived fire preparation of the assault. 
  An MRB (TB) may launch a hasty attack on a defending enemy 
with forward movement from an assembly area. In this case the 
battalion column alignment should support its swift deployment 
into approach march and battle formations and transition into 
the assault. Therefore MRC's (TC's) move forward with means of 
reinforcement, and the tank subunit attached to the MRB moves at 
the head of the MRB column. Air defense subunits are dispersed 
through the column. Heading up the COP, the battalion commander 
moves forward at the head of the column. An ATP and GLP not 
involved in fire preparation of the assault proceed in front of 
the second echelon (reserve). 
  The mortar battery and attached artillery battery which are 
used for fire preparation of the assault, and also regimental 
weapons, including those assigned for direct fire, move forward 
and take up firing positions in advance under the senior 
commander's plan. Tanks to be equipped with roller-type 
mineclearing devices also are moved up by his direction (usually 
to the vicinity of the line of deployment into company columns). 
  Minefields which the enemy may lay by remote minelaying 
assets in the period of forward movement are negotiated through 
passages breached by the senior commander's movement support 
detachment, by the battalion obstacle clearing party and by 
mineclearing teams of companies. 
  The battalion moves forward, observing measures of 
protection 
against enemy precision weapons and radar and optical 
reconnaissance. 
  If the enemy delivers nuclear and chemical strikes or massed 
precision weapon strikes, subunits which have retained combat 
effectiveness continue moving up to the line of departure. A 
first echelon company which has lost combat effectiveness is 
replaced by the second echelon (reserve). In case the enemy 
employs incendiary munitions, subunits are moved out of the area 
of the fire, extinguish centers of fire on vehicles and continue 
performing the assigned mission. 
  Fire preparation of the assault begins with the battalion's 
arrival at the line reached by fire of the bulk of enemy 
artillery (or from a line designated by the senior commander). 
In the course of fire preparation, guns, tanks and other weapons 
assigned for direct fire destroy enemy armored targets in and 
between strongpoints on the FEBA and in the depth. 
  In the period of fire preparation of the assault the 
battalion deploys successively into company and platoon columns 
at appropriate lines or points. On approaching the line of 
departure, they deploy into battle formation and launch an 
assault without stopping, conducting fire from tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's). 
  Artillery and aviation shift to fire support of the assault 
when the battalion's first echelon companies begin arriving at 
the line of departure. 
  The assault on the enemy defense is made with close 
interworking of TC's and MRC's. TC's assault in an extended line 
and MRC's in dismounted formation following the tanks or in 
BMP's (BTR's) without the personnel dismounting, depending on 
the situation. In the course of the assault and development of 
the attack in the depth of the enemy defense, battalion 
operations subsequently are similar to those of a battalion 
which launches an attack from a position of direct contact with 
the enemy. 
<H5>  9. Night Attack </H5>
  One of the principles of conducting an attack is its 
continuity. Nonstop conduct of the battle both day as well as 
night is of the greatest importance in achieving this principle. 
This permits maintaining the initiative, imposing one's will on 
the enemy, disrupting his plans and, as a result, achieving 
decisive victory sometimes with lesser forces. Based on this, a 
night attack may begin with penetration of the enemy defense or 
may be a continuation of daytime combat operations. The night 
contributes to achieving covert maneuver and surprise. 
  Orientation, recognition of targets (objectives), 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits, their support by artillery fire and 
air strikes, as well as coordination among them is complicated 
at night. Driving combat and transport vehicles, executing a 
maneuver, and detecting barriers and obstacles is hampered and 
personnel fatigue increases. At night the danger arises of 
subunits losing the axis of attack, and effectiveness of all 
kinds of fire drops perceptibly. Subunits may end up in a vague 
situation and be subjected to various surprises more often than 
during the day. Performing fire missions may require 1.3-1.5 
times more time and a greater expenditure of rounds by all 
weapons even when using illumination assets and night vision 
devices. At night the casualty effect of thermal radiation from 
a nuclear burst increases sharply. 
  Therefore successful conduct of a night attack requires 
subunit personnel to have high morale, proficiency, conditioning 
and comprehensive training and requires preparation of weapons 
and vehicles, which is confirmed by war and exercise experience. 
  Poor visibility or its total absence is the chief factor 
negatively influencing conduct of a night attack. Artificial 
illumination assets and night vision devices are used to create 
favorable conditions for such a battle. 
  Illumination assets (air-dropped illumination flares, 
illuminating artillery and mortar rounds, pyrotechnic flares and 
searchlights) and light signaling assets (signal flares and trip 
flares with colored lights; tracer bullets and rounds; colored 
air-dropped parachute signal flares (colored marker-signal 
shells), sets of signal lights, route signal lights and lighted 
markers (indicators)) are used for artificial illumination. 
  Illuminating artillery and mortar rounds are used to 
illuminate the terrain and objectives, blind observation posts 
and weapon crews, adjust artillery fire and place lines of 
marker lights (light markers). Parachute flares serve to 
illuminate large terrain sectors and large enemy objectives. 
Searchlights are used to illuminate terrain and objectives, 
blind the enemy, orient friendly troops, and combat enemy 
searchlights and night vision devices. 
  Illuminating flare cartridges (pyrotechnic flares) are 
intended for illuminating terrain and enemy targets directly 
ahead of friendly subunit battle formations. Light signaling 
assets are used for orientation on the terrain; accomplishing 
target designation; calling in, transferring and ceasing fire; 
giving (or duplicating) signals (commands); identifying and 
marking friendly subunits and so on. C[.sup]2[/] of subunits 
and maintenance of continuous coordination among them are 
considerably facilitated with their help. 
  Orientation may be accomplished by placing light markers 
(lines of marker lights), illuminating boundaries between 
battalions, and marking movement routes (cross-country routes), 
lines, passages, crossings, landing sites and so on. Night 
vision devices are used to conduct observation, reconnoiter the 
enemy, and control the heading and rate of movement of tanks and 
BMP's (BTR's), and they also are used for conducting small arms 
fire and the fire of artillery systems. 
  An attack on a defending enemy at night may be launched both 
from a position of direct contact with him as well as from the 
move. The attack may begin at the beginning or in the middle of 
the night or just before dawn. Launching an attack at the 
beginning of the night permits taking advantage of more hours of 
darkness for routing the enemy, while the second half of the 
night or the time before dawn is advantageous in that enemy 
vigilance as a rule is reduced in this period. 
  When a night attack is a continuation of daytime operations, 
enemy positions and lines usually are assaulted from the move. 
This keeps him from upgrading the defense, drawing up reserves 
or disengaging and breaking off from attacking subunits to 
occupy a defense at a new line. 
  Open terrain without significant natural barriers, but with 
reference points visible in the darkness used for directing the 
operations of subunits (highways, field roads, treelines, 
streams, openings and so on), is most favorable for a night 
attack. 
  The width of attack frontage and content of company 
(battalion) combat missions are the very same as for a daytime 
attack, but in assigning missions it is advisable that the 
battalion immediate or subsequent mission be accomplished by 
dawn. If this is impossible to do, a battalion may be given a 
supplementary line which it must take by dawn. Designation of 
such a line is caused basically by the need to create favorable 
conditions for committing the second echelon and for repelling 
possible enemy counterattacks at dawn. The determination of this 
line depends basically on length of the night, time the attack 
is launched, preparedness of subunits for night battle and the 
availability of illumination support assets to them. When the 
attack occurs in the depth of the enemy defense, a battalion 
most often will receive a combat mission for the entire night in 
the course of the attack's development. 
  The battalion battle formation usually is aligned in two 
echelons. Commitment of the second echelon under nighttime 
conditions presents some difficulty. Therefore it is advisable 
to assign that number of forces and assets to the first echelon 
which would ensure its performance of the mission assigned for 
the night without committing the second echelon. 
  Illumination support is organized by the senior commander 
and 
accomplished under a unified plan. A battalion receives a 
certain amount of illumination and light signaling assets to 
perform missions envisaged by the plan and those which arise 
suddenly. A mortar (artillery) platoon may be assigned in the 
battalion for employing those assets, and two or three 
illumination posts (one per platoon) controlled by the company 
commander may be established in companies. Air defense subunits 
also should be assigned missions of destroying enemy 
illumination support assets (illuminating mortar and artillery 
rounds and parachute flares) in the air. 
  Preparation for a night attack occurs most often in hours of 
daylight and has a number of features. Thus, in addition to 
general questions, in organizing for battle the company 
(battalion) commander indicates to subordinate commanders the 
reference points visible at night and azimuth of the direction 
of attack; he may designate a guide platoon (company) and 
missions for destroying enemy night vision devices and 
illumination support assets; and he determines the procedure for 
marking friendly subunits and using night vision devices and 
short-range reconnaissance radars. In addition, the procedure is 
clarified for illumination of terrain and assault objectives and 
placement of light markers (lines of marker lights) by artillery 
fire and other means to mark the direction of the attack, and 
the procedure is established for marking lines reached 
(occupied) by subunits, their flanks, and movement routes. 
  Measures for protection against thermal radiation of nuclear 
bursts also are envisaged without fail, and support of subunits 
with illumination assets, tracer rounds, cartridges with tracer 
bullets, and signaling devices is organized. 
  The use of illumination devices should not reveal friendly 
subunits, hamper use of night vision devices or create favorable 
conditions for the enemy to conduct fire against attacking 
subunits. 
  Special attention in preparing the subunits should be given 
to checking the technical condition of night vision devices and 
external and internal illumination of vehicles, applying 
identifying markings to them and replenishing reserves of light 
signaling assets. Illumination posts are prepared. 
  The company (battalion) launches an attack as a rule after 
fire preparation of the assault. Sometimes the attack also may 
be launched without conducting such a preparation in order to 
achieve surprise. 
  Motorized rifle subunits usually assault the enemy in 
dismounted formation in close coordination with tanks and 
artillery. As a rule the tanks and BMP's (BTR's) operate in the 
motorized riflemen's extended line. 
  During an attack subunits precisely maintain their indicated 
directions, skillfully use illumination assets and mark their 
position. Special attention is given to covering flanks and 
conducting reconnaissance. Under nighttime conditions surprise 
counterattacks even by small forces may have a significant 
psychological effect on personnel. 
  The battalion second echelon (reserve) may be committed even 
before daybreak, but without executing a complicated maneuver. 
During commitment, in addition to the usual questions the second 
echelon (reserve) also is given an azimuth for the direction of 
the attack during the mission update (assignment). For 
successful operations of the second echelon (reserve), artillery 
neutralizes and illuminates the enemy and places a light marker 
in the direction of the attack. 
  When shifting from night to daytime operations, 
reconnaissance is organized, missions are updated for (assigned 
to) subunits, artillery and weapons move closer to them, air 
defense is reinforced, flanks are secured, and subunits' 
ammunition and other supplies are replenished. 
<H5>  10. Forcing Water Obstacles </H5>
  The attack of an MRC or TC (MRB or TB) often will be 
accomplished with the forcing of a water obstacle. The 
surmounting of a water obstacle by attacking subunits when its 
opposite bank is defended by the enemy is called forcing. Water 
obstacles above all are rivers, which are narrow (up to 100 m), 
medium (from 100 to 250 m), wide (250-600 m) and major (over 600 
m). 
  A forcing is made by a company (battalion) as a rule from 
the 
march with preparation back before approaching the water 
obstacle. If a forcing from the march did not succeed, it is 
done with deployment of the main body at the water obstacle 
after additional preparation in a short time or after thorough 
preparation. In this case the forcing may be done from a 
position of direct contact with the enemy or from the march with 
forward movement from a staging area [iskhodnyy rayon]. 
  Airborne assault forces may be landed prior to forcing of a 
water obstacle from the march to seize crossings and prohibit 
the approach of reserves. 
  A company (battalion) usually forces a water obstacle as 
part 
of the battalion (regimental) main body, and independently when 
operating in a forward security element (or a battalion in a 
forward or raiding detachment or the advance guard). In all 
cases the forcing of water obstacles requires careful 
preparation of personnel, weapons and military vehicles, conduct 
of measures to keep them from accumulating at crossings, and 
strict compliance with safety measures. 
  Primary and secondary crossings are assigned to a company 
when forcing a water obstacle as part of the main body, and a 
crossing sector [uchastok] is assigned to a battalion. When the 
regimental main body deploys at a water obstacle, a battalion 
additionally is assigned a staging area for the forcing directly 
at the water obstacle. A company usually occupies a staging 
position [iskhodnoye polozheniye] in the battalion area. When 
the regiment occupies a staging area at certain distance from a 
water obstacle, a company (battalion) is assigned a staging area 
for the forcing. 
  Amphibious vehicle crossings, ferry crossings, a fording 
site 
or a fully submerged crossing site may be organized in the 
battalion forcing sector. Amphibious vehicle crossings are 
organized on tracked amphibian carriers and ferry crossings on 
amphibious river-crossing equipment or tracked selfpropelled 
ferries. Motorized rifle subunits usually cross water obstacles 
in BMP's (BTR's); tanks cross on ferries (amphibious river- 
crossing equipment, tracked self-propelled ferries), by fording, 
or fully submerged; and nonamphibious artillery and wheeled 
vehicles cross on tracked amphibian carriers. The number and 
kinds of crossings are determined by availability of crossing 
equipment, nature of the water obstacle and established 
procedure for the crossing of subunits. 
  For an organized forcing from the march, a line of 
departure for the forcing [iskhodnyy rubezh dlya forsirovaniya] 
is designated 1-2 km from the water's edge, and an area for 
boarding (loading) on assault crossing equipment and an armor 
inspection and deepfording preparation area 5-6 km from the 
water's edge. When a staging area for the forcing is occupied 
right at the water obstacle, the line of departure for the 
forcing is designated 100300 m from the water's edge and the 
boarding (loading) area and armor inspection and deepfording 
preparation area are designated in sheltered places near the 
water obstacle. 
  Commandants are appointed from among commanders of engineer 
troop subunits to ensure firm order in the forcing sector and at 
crossings, and the TB commander (chief of staff) or tanker 
officer is assigned for this at a fully submerged tank crossing 
(or fording). 
  The width of attack frontage and content of combat missions 
of the company (battalion) with forcing of a water obstacle as 
part of the main body basically are the very same as in an 
attack on a defending enemy without a forcing. 
  The mission of a company operating in a forward security 
element usually is to destroy the enemy on approaches to the 
water obstacle, force it from the march, destroy the enemy in 
the platoon strongpoint on the opposite bank and take a line 
supporting the forcing of the water obstacle from the march by 
the main body of a forward (raiding) detachment or advance guard. 
  As a rule, a battalion assigned to a forward detachment is 
assigned the mission to seize from the march crossings (bridges) 
and sectors favorable for forcing and hold them until the main 
body approaches. The depth of the captured bridgehead must not 
permit enemy AT weapons and tanks to conduct direct fire against 
the crossing. 
  The mission of a battalion operating in the advance guard 
may 
be to destroy the enemy on approaches to the water obstacle, 
support the main body in moving to it, force it from the march 
and rout the enemy on the opposite bank. 
  To support the forcing of a water obstacle from the march, 
in 
addition to usual means of reinforcement, an MRB operating in a 
forward (raiding) detachment or the advance guard may receive 
the attachment of an amphibious river-crossing equipment platoon 
or tracked self-propelled ferry platoon and a tracked amphibian 
carrier platoon, and a TB may receive the attachment of one or 
two amphibious river-crossing equipment or tracked self- 
propelled ferry platoons and a tracked amphibian carrier 
platoon. Crossings are prepared under the senior commander's 
plan during company (battalion) operations as part of the main 
body. 
  The commander must organize reconnaissance of the water 
obstacle, make the decision for the forcing, assign missions to 
subordinates and organize coordination in advance. 
  A combat reconnaissance patrol and patrol squads (tanks) are 
assigned for reconnoitering the enemy, the water obstacle and 
planned crossing sites. On arriving at the water obstacle, 
reconnaissance must determine enemy forces and assets on the 
opposite bank; the presence and condition of crossings and fords 
and the most convenient places for preparing amphibious vehicle 
crossings, ferry crossings and tank crossings by fording or 
fully submerged. Reconnaissance entities cross independently in 
the absence of an enemy on the opposite bank. 
  Based on reconnaissance data the commander updates the 
decision made from the map, the crossing sites and the procedure 
for using attached crossing equipment. In addition to the usual 
questions the commander determines the following in the decision 
for the forcing: procedure for destroying the enemy on 
approaches to the water obstacle and on the opposite bank; sites 
and kinds of primary and alternate crossings and the 
distribution of crossing equipment; routes and procedure for 
moving up to the water obstacle; sequence of the crossing of 
subunits. In organizing the forcing, the commander also 
determines the procedure for preparing weapons and military 
vehicles. 
  In forcing a water obstacle from the march, combat missions 
are communicated to (updated for) subordinates by operational 
instructions, usually by radio. First of all missions are 
assigned to those subunits which must perform them (act against 
the enemy) earlier than others and which need more time to 
prepare. Coordination instructions also are issued 
simultaneously in the operational instructions. If the forcing 
is being done with deployment of the regimental main body at the 
water obstacle, missions as a rule are assigned to subordinates 
by a verbal operation order. 
  In assigning the mission to subunits for the forcing of a 
water obstacle, the company (battalion) commander additionally 
indicates the following in the operation order: 

  -  for platoons (companies)--missions on the 
approach to the water obstacle, during the forcing and on the 
opposite bank, primary and alternate crossing sites, armor 
inspection and deepfording preparation area, locations for 
boarding personnel and loading weapons and vehicles on self 
propelled assault crossing equipment, line of departure for the 
forcing and the time of crossing the line; 
  -  for artillery subunits, grenade launcher subunit and AT 
subunit-missions for supporting subunits in forcing the 
water obstacle and in the battle on the opposite bank, and also 
firing positions, readiness time for commencing fire and the 
crossing procedure; 
  -  for the air defense subunit--missions for covering 
subunits against enemy air strikes during forward movement to 
the water obstacle, during the forcing, and in the battle on the 
opposite bank, and also launch (firing) positions, readiness 
time for commencing fire and the crossing procedure; 
  -  for attached subunits of engineer troops--missions 
for engineer reconnaissance of crossing sites, preparing and 
maintaining crossings, and preparing forward movement routes to 
them, and also locations of assault crossing equipment during 
forward movement to the water obstacle. 


    Amphibious combat vehicles are prepared before they arrive 
at 
the water obstacle. Special attention must be given to tight 
closure of hatches, firing ports and doors and to serviceability 
of bilge pumps and the presence and tight closure of drain 
plugs. Personnel in vehicles put on life vests. Tanks are 
prepared for a fully submerged crossing on the approach, and 
this is completed in the armor inspection and deepfording 
preparation area. 
  Subunits move up to the water obstacle at maximum rate of 
speed in readiness for forcing it from the march. 
  Fire preparation of forcing and the assault usually is 
conducted before forcing, and fire support of forcing and the 
assault is carried out on completion of fire preparation (during 
forcing). The moment first echelon subunits shove off from the 
near bank is considered to be the beginning of forcing (H), and 
the arrival of all company (battalion) forces and assets at the 
opposite bank is the end of forcing. 
  A company operating in a forward security element decisively 
destroys the enemy on approaches to the water obstacle, seizes 
crossings (bridges, fords) and moves to the opposite bank. In 
the absence of crossings or if they have been blown up by the 
enemy, the company forces the water obstacle from the march. 
Exploiting results of artillery and tank fire, MRP's cross the 
water obstacle in BMP's (BTR's) and destroy the enemy on the 
opposite bank by fire of all weapons from afloat. The enemy 
firing against company flanks is destroyed by the fire of tanks 
and guns and blinded by aerosols (smoke). On arriving at the 
opposite bank the company captures the indicated line, 
supporting the main body's crossing and commitment. SP 
amphibious artillery crosses independently and tanks cross on 
ferries or by fording depending on the situation. The company 
commander crosses to the opposite bank right after the platoons. 
  If a water obstacle has failed to be forced from the march, 
the company consolidates on the captured bank. It neutralizes 
and destroys the enemy on the opposite bank by fire of all 
weapons and thereby creates favorable conditions for main body 
commitment. 
  A battalion assigned to a forward detachment moves up to a 
water obstacle swiftly without engaging the enemy on approaches 
to it. Exploiting success of the forward security element and 
results of air strikes and artillery fire, it crosses the water 
obstacle at crossings and in amphibious BMP's (BTR's) and 
assault crossing equipment. It destroys the enemy on the 
opposite bank by decisive actions, captures a bridgehead with 
favorable sectors for forcing, and holds it until the main body 
arrives. The battalion often performs its mission in 
coordination with a tactical airborne assault force. 
  If the battalion is operating in a raiding detachment, it 
usually crosses the water obstacle in the course of forward 
movement to its indicated objective over a bridge or ford 
captured by the forward security element, in amphibious fighting 
vehicles and assault crossing equipment. 
  A battalion operating in an advance guard decisively 
destroys 
the enemy covering approaches to the water obstacle and moves up 
to it. Exploiting success of the forward security element, it 
crosses the water obstacle from the march over captured 
crossings or in assault crossing equipment. Subsequently the 
battalion continues the attack into the depth of the enemy 
defense, supporting the main body's forcing and crossing. 
  Actions of a reinforced TB, the advance guard of 61st Guards 
Tank Brigade, on 20 January 1945 were an example of such 
actions. Decisively destroying the enemy on approaches to the 
Warta River as a forward security element, it took a bridge from 
the march (combat engineers disarmed explosives emplaced in it). 
The entire battalion rushed in on the heels of the forward 
security element, took the terrain sector ahead of the bridge 
and supported the crossing of the brigade main body and 
development of success into the depth.[.sup]1[/] 
  Organic and attached artillery and the grenade launchers 
take 
up firing positions from the march and use their fire to support 
battle of the forward security element and the main body's 
crossing and battle on the opposite bank. Tanks and guns moved 
up to conduct direct fire and ATGM systems destroy enemy AT 
weapons, tanks and personnel and cover flanks. Aircraft deliver 
strikes against the enemy in the depth, especially against the 
nearest reserves. 
  Exploiting results of fire and under cover of aerosols 
(smoke), motorized rifle subunits in amphibious BMP's (BTR's) 
and assault crossing equipment force the water obstacle, destroy 
the enemy by their fire from afloat and develop the attack into 
the depth after taking the opposite bank. 
  The forcing begins and is conducted on selected axes 
simultaneously by all first echelon forces. 
  Subunits assigned to cross on self-propelled crossing 
equipment on the first trip load weapons and vehicles and board 
personnel in sheltered places. They move swiftly out from these 
places toward the water obstacle and cross to the opposite bank 
from the move. On succeeding trips weapons and vehicles are 
loaded and personnel board the crossing equipment directly at 
the water obstacle. 
  As a rule, the crossing of tanks fully submerged is 
accomplished after motorized riflemen take the opposite bank. On 
emerging onto the bank, tank subunits swiftly move out to their 
own axes and perform assigned missions. 
  Attached and organic artillery, the air defense subunit, AT 
subunit and grenade launcher subunit usually cross in amphibious 
vehicles and assault crossing equipment to ensure continuity of 
support and cover of subunits on the opposite bank. AT weapons 
and self-propelled artillery should cross first of all to assist 
motorized rifle subunits in repelling possible enemy 
counterattacks. 
  Engineer subunits conduct engineer reconnaissance of the 
water obstacle; prepare, camouflage and maintain crossings and 
approach routes to them; breach obstacles; and organize and 
perform commandant's service at the crossing. 
  Battalion technical support and rear subunits cross in 
assault crossing equipment following the artillery and air 
defense subunits. The aid station and ammunition vehicles should 
be sent across first of all. Wounded and sick usually are sent 
across to the near shore by assault crossing equipment returning 
after landing subunits, and if necessary also by specially 
assigned crossing equipment. 
  If the advance guard failed to force the water obstacle from 
the march, it consolidates on the line reached, inflicts damage 
on the enemy by fire of all weapons and supports the main body's 
forcing of the water obstacle. 
  Exploiting success of the forward detachment (advance guard) 
and a tactical airborne assault force, a company (battalion) 
operating as part of the main body forces the obstacle over 
crossings captured by them, or motorized rifle subunits do so in 
BMP's (BTR's), tank subunits do so under water, and others do so 
in assault crossing equipment nonstop as they approach the water 
obstacle. Subsequently the company (battalion) assaults the 
enemy from the move, widens the bridgehead in coordination with 
the forward detachment (advance guard) and other subunits, and 
develops the attack into the depth. 
  If the company (battalion) is performing a mission where a 
forward detachment (advance guard) is not operating, the forcing 
of a water obstacle from the move usually begins after fire 
preparation of the forcing and the assault, supported by the 
fire of artillery, aircraft, tanks and guns assigned for direct 
fire. 
  In forcing with deployment of the main body at the 
water obstacle, an MRC (MRB) operating as part of the 
battalion (regimental) first echelon boards BMP's (BTR's) and 
self- propelled assault crossing equipment in sheltered places. 
It moves up to the water obstacle in the course of fire 
preparation of the forcing and the assault. For the crossing of 
a TC (TB), assault crossing equipment and tanks move up to 
crossing sites, where tanks are loaded. 
  The battalion commander gives the signal to move forward 
based on the beginning time of the forcing and the time needed 
to cover the distance from the boarding site to the water's edge. 
  Subunits of the first trip move forward swiftly to the water 
obstacle and shove off from the near bank exactly at H hour. On 
arriving on the opposite bank, the subunits assault the enemy 
and develop the attack into the depth. Fire support of their 
assault, especially at first, also is provided by fire of guns 
and tanks assigned for direct fire, by ATGM systems and by 
grenade launchers. 
  Second echelon subunits cross the water obstacle right after 
the battalion first echelon in readiness for commitment. 
  With the arrival of the company (battalion) on the opposite 
bank the enemy will attempt to throw it back from the captured 
bridgehead. A counterattack of his superior forces usually is 
repelled by fire of all weapons from in place supported by fire 
of artillery and combat helicopters. Having inflicted damage, 
the company (battalion) completes the enemy's rout in 
coordination with adjacent subunits and continues the attack 
into the depth. 
  C[.sup]2[/] of the company (battalion) is exercised from 
the COP, which displaces in the direction of concentration of 
main efforts. The company COP usually is located at the water's 
edge and moves to the opposite bank behind the first trip of 
subunits. The battalion COP is disposed 100-200 m from the river 
bank, and COP's of the attached TC (MRC) and artillery battalion 
(battery) are located near it. The battalion commander crosses 
to the opposite bank behind first echelon subunits. 
  In winter a company (battalion) may force water obstacles 
over ice crossings. Thickness of 30 cm or more of the 
transparent part of the ice stands up to movement of BMP's 
(BTR's), and 60 cm or more stands up to movement of tanks. If 
ice thickness does not permit combat vehicles to move over it, 
the water obstacle initially is crossed by motorized rifle 
subunits in dismounted formation. Vehicles cross after the ice 
is reinforced or over ferry assault crossings prepared in gaps 
in the ice, and also over bridges. Under favorable conditions 
tanks may cross a water obstacle at fords or fully submerged. 
With intensive ice movement, water obstacles as a rule are 
crossed over captured bridges and motorized rifle subunits are 
airlifted across. 
  Actions by a forward detachment of a brigade of 6th Guards 
Tank Corps in 1945 were an example of such actions. On 13 
January the detachment approached the Nida River. Assault 
riflemen forced the river over the thin ice, and tanks and SP 
artillery forded. The ice was broken up by fire from tank guns 
so it did not hamper tank movement. Combat engineers reinforced 
the ice with wooden decking for the crossing of artillery and 
motor vehicles.[.sup]2[/] 
<H5>  11. MRC (MRB) in Tactical Airborne Assault Force </H5>
  An MRC (MRB) may be assigned to a tactical airborne assault 
force in the course of conducting the attack and the defense. It 
is landed in the enemy rear to capture and hold important lines 
(objectives) until the approach of friendly troops, to deliver 
strikes against the flank and rear of approaching enemy reserves 
and his withdrawing units and subunits, and to destroy (disable) 
means of nuclear and chemical attack, ground elements of 
reconnaissance-strike complexes and launchers. The assault 
force[.sup]3[/] also is employed to capture airfields, road 
junctions, hydraulic engineering works, bridges, crossing 
equipment, sectors convenient for forcing or crossing of units, 
passes, mountain gaps, gorges and road junctions and for 
performing other missions. 
  For example, on 19 August 1945 a group of 200 persons was 
formed from 30th Guards Mechanized Brigade for the landing of an 
assault force in Manchuria's capital of Changchun. Initially an 
advance party [peredovaya gruppa] with scouts took off in the 
aircraft, captured an airfield and supported the main body's 
landing. Subsequently the assault force took the city railroad 
station, post office and telegraph office.[.sup]4[/] 
  The conditions under which an assault force has to perform 
missions in isolation from the main body are characterized 
basically by constant, abrupt changes of the situation and also 
by the high likelihood of the enemy delivering strikes against 
it from different directions on the ground and from the air. 
  Combat operations of an assault force are distinguished by 
high mobility, swiftness, and maximum intensity of personnel's 
physical and moral efforts. To support such operations the 
assault force should not have heavy weapons and vehicles, it is 
reinforced by subunits of other combat arms and special troops, 
and it is also supported by forces and assets of the commander 
by whose decision it is being employed. 
  The landing of a company (battalion) is accomplished by one 
sortie of a subunit (unit) of transport, transport-attack and 
combat helicopters. Thus, a company less BMP's (BTR's) and 
reinforced by a mortar platoon may require 4 Mi-8 and 3 Mi-26 
helicopters, and a reinforced battalion may require up to 20 Mi- 
8 and 17-18 Mi-6 or Mi-26 helicopters. The helicopters form into 
a combat formation during airlift of the assault force. It 
usually includes an assault element (columns of helicopters of 
the main body and the advance party) and a support element, 
which may consist of reconnaissance helicopters, escort 
gunships, helicopters for neutralizing air defense weapons, and 
jamming helicopters. 
  For preparing and airlifting the assault force by 
helicopters 
to the area for performing the combat mission, it is assigned an 
assault airlift staging area [iskhodnyy rayon dlya 
desantirovaniya], an en route corridor, and primary and 
alternate landing areas [rayon desantirovaniya] (Diagram 15). 
  The assault airlift staging area is intended for 
completing preparation of the assault force and helicopters for 
the landing and operations. It may be 20-30 km from the front 
line. The assault airlift staging area usually includes a 
marshaling area [rayon sosredotocheniya] for the company 
(battalion) assigned to the assault force and primary and 
alternate helicopter landing sites [posadochnaya ploshchadka]. 
The size of this area for a company may be up to 3 
km[.sup]2[/] and for a battalion up to 10 km[.sup]2[/]. It 
should provide convenience in preparing the company (battalion) 
for the landing and performance of the mission, protection 
against mass destruction and precision weapons and a rapid move 
of the assault force for boarding (loading) the helicopters. The 
battalion is disposed in it by company with means of 
reinforcement. 
  Landing sites are intended for completing 
preparation of the helicopter subunit (unit) for the air 
assault, loading weapons, military vehicles and supplies in 
them, boarding the personnel and taking off for the air assault. 
It is advisable to select and prepare them in or near the 
assault force marshaling area. One landing site is prepared for 
no more than one helicopter squadron. In case the primary 
landing site is put out of commission, an alternate one is 
prepared, usually figuring one [alternate] site for two primary 
ones. 
  The en route corridor is intended for the combat 
flight of the helicopter subunit (unit) from the assault airlift 
staging area to the landing area. It is selected along a flight 
route where the enemy has the least amount of air defense 
weapons or where they have been reliably neutralized and the 
nature of terrain permits flying at low (to 300 m) and extremely 
low (1015 m) altitudes. The en route corridor may be 2-4 km wide. 
  The primary and alternate landing area (the 
alternate area is designated away from the primary one) is 
selected on terrain suitable for landing helicopters and giving 
the assault force favorable conditions for engagement. The 
landing area may be up to 10 km from the front line for the 
company and up to 20 km for the battalion. The landing area size 
is determined basically based on the combat mission and the 
commander's concept and may reach 2 km for the company and 5 km 
for the battalion laterally and in depth. One landing site 
[ploshchadka prizemleniya] in each landing area is designated 
for a company and 2-3 for a battalion for the landing. If it is 
impossible to use designated landing sites, the assault landing 
is made from a helicopter hover mode or "like an assault," i.e., 
on the move at minimum helicopter flight speed. 
  For an organized, timely flight of the helicopter subunit 
(unit) and beginning of operations with arrival in the landing 
area, it also is assigned a line of departure and a combat 
separation line. 
  A company (battalion) assigned to an assault force is given 
a 
combat mission for the entire period of its 
operations in the enemy rear. This mission usually is divided 
into immediate and subsequent missions. If necessary, a company 
(battalion) also may be given an assembly point (area). 
  The company (battalion) immediate mission usually 
consists of completing the enemy's destruction in the landing 
area and destroying (disabling) the indicated objective or 
capturing a certain line (area). The mission depth is the depth 
of the objective (objectives), including positions of its 
defending subunits, or the depth of the line (area) which the 
assault force is taking. 
  The subsequent mission may be to hold the captured 
line (area) until the approach of friendly units or to capture 
and destroy (disable) an objective in a new area and perform 
other missions. 
  An assembly point (area) is designated for a company 
(battalion) after performance of the combat mission for checking 
its status and preparing for further operations. Sometimes it 
also may be designated directly after landing (unloading) for 
assembling the subunits and updating missions for them. The 
presence of subunits at the assembly point (area) must be covert 
and brief. 
  Depending on the nature of the assigned mission, an assault 
force may perform it by an attack, by a defense and by raiding 
operations, during which conduct of a meeting battle also is not 
precluded. Destruction of the enemy and capture of a line (area) 
or objective usually is accomplished by an attack, and holding 
them until the approach of the main body usually is accomplished 
by the defense. A raid (raiding operations) usually will be 
conducted by the battalion as a raiding detachment. 
  The following usually are indicated in assigning missions to 
an assault force: brief information on the enemy in the en route 
corridor and in the landing zone [rayon vysadki] and the 
possible nature of his operations; makeup, means of 
reinforcement, primary and alternate landing areas and combat 
mission; assault airlift staging area; en route corridor and 
readiness time for the landing. In addition, means of fire 
support during airlift of the assault force, during the landing 
and during the battle under the senior commander's plan are 
announced. 
  To increase independence in performing the combat mission, a 
company (battalion) is reinforced by artillery, ATGM's, air 
defense and reconnaissance subunits and also subunits of 
engineer and chemical troops. An artillery officer and forward 
air controller with communications equipment are included in the 
assault force for requesting and adjusting fire of the main 
body's artillery and vectoring aircraft to targets respectively. 
  All subunits are provided with ammunition (often exceeding 
unit- level supply norms), food, individual protective gear and 
means to assist the wounded and sick. An assault force also 
should be reinforced by medical personnel. 
  The company (battalion) is aligned in a battle 
formation for fighting in the enemy rear. It usually 
consists of an advance party, first echelon subunits, a reserve 
(second echelon), subunits of artillery and other weapons, and 
air defense subunits. 
  The advance party is intended for completing 
destruction of the enemy at the landing site (sites), its 
capture, and support of the landing of the assault force main 
body. If an assault force consisting of an MRC is assigned, then 
up to a platoon is assigned to its advance party (up to two 
MRP's if the assault force is at battalion strength). The 
platoons are reinforced by air defense gunners, combat engineers 
and chemical scouts. A patrol squad (reconnaissance patrol, 
combat reconnaissance patrol) as well as artillery scouts of 
supporting (attached) artillery are landed together with the 
advance party. 
  Preparation for the landing and for assault force operations 
in the enemy rear includes the following: organization of the 
landing and the battle, and preparation of personnel, weapons, 
vehicles and supplies of subunits for the landing and 
performance of the combat mission; move of subunits to the 
assault airlift staging area and to the landing sites, loading 
of weapons and military vehicles and boarding personnel in the 
helicopters; and monitoring readiness of subunits for performing 
the combat mission. 
  On receiving the mission, the company (battalion) commander 
analyzes it, estimates the situation, makes the decision, 
performs a calculation for boarding (loading) the helicopters, 
issues the operation order and organizes coordination and 
preparation of subunits. 
  In analyzing the mission, in addition to general 
questions, the company (battalion) commander must understand the 
following: goal of employing the assault force and senior 
commander's concept, and the assault force mission and role in 
the upcoming battle; procedure for delivering strikes against 
the enemy in the landing area by the senior commander's assets; 
the landing procedure; conditions and procedure for coordinating 
with helicopters, artillery and units attacking from the front 
in the direction of assault force operations; duration of its 
operations in the enemy rear; from which landing sites and by 
what makeup of helicopters the landing is accomplished; and 
readiness time for the landing. 
  As a result of mission analysis, measures are outlined which 
are advisable to conduct immediately for preparing subunits to 
perform the mission. Then the commander performs a time 
calculation, issues instructions to subordinates for preparing 
subunits, weapons and military vehicles for operations as an 
assault force, and estimates the situation. 
  The following are determined in studying and estimating the 
enemy: presence of his air defense weapons in the en 
route corridor, presence of reserves and of tactical aviation 
near the landing area; possible nature of enemy actions in the 
en route corridor and in the combat operations area; strong and 
weak points of the enemy in and near the objective; nature of 
defense and security of the line (objective) to be captured 
(destroyed); direction for concentrating main company 
(battalion) efforts in taking and holding the line (destroying 
the objective); procedure for fire engagement of the enemy; 
advisable method of his destruction and alignment of the assault 
force battle formation. 
  The following are determined in estimating the 
situation and makeup of the company (battalion) and of 
attached and supporting subunits: their capabilities for 
fire engagement of the enemy during and after the landing; 
capabilities of the helicopter subunit (unit) assigned for the 
landing; makeup of elements of the battle formation and missions 
for subunits; which subunits are to board helicopters in what 
order and at what sites and land from them in the landing area; 
combat formation in flight and so on. 
  As a result of an estimate of the situation, makeup and 
nature of operations of units (subunits) attacking in the 
direction of the company (battalion) landing, the following are 
outlined: procedure for maintaining communications, time of 
their movement to the assault force and capability for 
supporting battle; linkup points, cessation of fire and 
procedure for joint operations; coordination and recognition 
signals. 
  As a result of an estimate of the nature of 
terrain in the landing area and in the area of assault 
force operations, the following are determined: presence and 
status of helicopter landing sites; direction for concentrating 
company (battalion) main efforts in capturing the objective; 
terrain sectors on whose holding stability depends in case of 
their defense; lines desirable for subunits to take in an 
assault on the objective and the trace of strongpoints in its 
defense, and also maskirovka conditions. 
  In estimating the NBC situation, the commander 
outlines measures ensuring successful subunit operations with 
use of mass destruction weapons. 
  The effect of weather, time of year and time of day on 
assault force operations also are taken into account in the 
course of estimating the situation. 
  The decision is made as a result of the mission analysis and 
situation estimate, and after the calculation is made for 
boarding (loading) helicopters, missions are assigned to 
subunits and then coordination is organized. Then the company 
commander (battalion staff) draws up the plan for loading 
weapons and vehicles and boarding personnel, and a list of 
weapons and supplies for each helicopter. In planning the 
landing, the time calculation is made from the established time 
(H)--beginning of the landing of the assault force advance party. 
  In his decision the company (battalion) commander 
usually specifies the following: commander's concept (on what to 
concentrate main efforts of the assault force; what enemy to 
capture or destroy where, in what sequence and how, with an 
indication of the procedure for fire engagement and measures for 
his deception); battle formation and landing procedure; what 
subunits board (load) helicopters at what sites, and at what 
landing sites they disembark (unload) in the landing area; 
combat missions for subunits; basic coordination questions; and 
organization of C[.sup]2[/]. 
  In assigning the mission for the landing to subunits the 
company (battalion) commander indicates the following in 
the operation order: 

  -  for first echelon subunits--means of 
reinforcement, combat mission, who is supporting, and numbers 
(quantity) of helicopters and landing sites; 
  -  for second echelon subunit--makeup, combat mission, 
who is attached and who is supporting, numbers of helicopters 
and landing sites; 
  -  for the reserve--makeup, concentration area, nature 
of possible missions after landing, numbers of helicopters and 
landing sites; 
  -  for the advance party--makeup, combat mission, who 
is supporting, numbers of helicopters, time of landing; 
  -  for artillery subunit and other weapons--missions 
for supporting battle of the assault force, numbers of 
helicopters and of landing sites; 
  -  for air defense 
subunit--procedure for conducting fire in repelling enemy 
air raids, numbers of helicopters and of landing sites. 


    If the landing area is a considerable distance from the line 
(objective) for capture (destruction), the commander may give 
subunits a route (direction) of forward movement and lines of 
deployment and departure at which they must arrive by the 
established time. 
  In organizing coordination, initially the 
procedure for forward movement of subunits to the marshaling 
area and their boarding of helicopters is worked out, then the 
landing procedure. Here special attention should be given to 
questions of joint operations of assault force subunits and 
aviation for fire engagement of the enemy during the airlift. 
Coordination is organized in greater detail for the assault 
force's performance of the immediate mission. 
  The assault landing is the airlift of the assault force into 
the enemy rear for performing the combat mission. It includes 
takeoff of the helicopter subunit (unit), the combat flight and 
landing of helicopters with subsequent disembarking of personnel 
and unloading of equipment at landing sites. 
  Before the assault landing, the company (battalion) moves 
into the marshaling area at the established time. It is disposed 
in it using natural cover and carefully camouflages itself. 
Commanders check subunit readiness for boarding (loading) of 
helicopters in accordance with the calculation. 
  With the helicopters' arrival at the landing sites the 
commander of the assault force and commander of the helicopter 
subunit (unit) update the calculation for the assault landing; 
procedure for loading weapons, military vehicles and supplies 
and boarding of helicopters by personnel; landing sites in 
primary and alternate landing areas; combat formation in flight; 
and procedure for coordination of motorized rifle and helicopter 
subunits in flight and when disembarking. All these questions 
also can be resolved with the helicopter subunit (unit) 
commander before the helicopters arrive in order to reduce the 
time they are at the landing site. 
  Preparation, loading and securing of weapons, vehicles and 
supplies are done by subunit personnel under the direction of 
helicopter crews. Personnel board helicopters immediately before 
takeoff and finish boarding before helicopter engines are 
started. 
  Fire and nuclear damage and EW suppression of enemy air 
defense and of his troops in the en route corridor and in and 
near the landing area are carried out before the beginning of 
the landing and in its course. 
  The assault landing begins at a signal of the commander 
employing the assault force, and responsibility for its 
disembarking at the prescribed time and in the designated area 
is borne by the helicopter subunit (unit) commander. 
  The combat flight to the landing area usually is made as one 
formation in trail. Helicopters with the advance party fly ahead 
of the main body at a 1020 minute interval. As a rule, 
helicopters with motorized rifle subunits fly at the head of the 
assault force main body, and helicopters with artillery subunits 
behind them. The company (battalion) commander is with the 
helicopter subunit (unit) commander in flight. 
  Escort gunships, and sometimes also escort transport-gunship 
helicopters are used to neutralize the enemy and his air defense 
weapons in the en route corridor. Proceeding in front of and on 
flanks of the formation in trail with the assault force, they 
conduct fire against the enemy from on-board weapons, and 
assault force subunits do so with small arms. On approaching a 
zone of contamination, small windows, hatches and doors in 
helicopters are closed, cabin heating and ventilation systems 
are turned off and the personnel put on breathing masks 
(protective masks). 
  When the advance party approaches the landing site, the 
enemy 
there is neutralized and destroyed by fire of helicopter weapons 
and the party's small arms, and motorized riflemen are landed. 
After this the helicopters support the party's battle by fire 
from the air and together with it support the landing of the 
assault force main body. 
  Air defense subunits of the advance party take up launch 
(firing) positions in readiness to combat the air enemy, and at 
this time combat engineers reconnoiter landing sites and remove 
or mark obstacles and local objects hindering the landing of 
helicopters. 
  The patrol squad (reconnaissance, combat reconnaissance 
patrol) conducts reconnaissance in the direction of company 
(battalion) operations and updates the enemy makeup and 
position. Chemical warfare personnel conduct radiological and 
chemical reconnaissance. 
  Based on data received from the advance party, from 
reconnaissance and from other sources, the company (battalion) 
commander may update the procedure for unloading (disembarking) 
if necessary with the main body's landing approach to the 
landing area. The main body disembarks under cover of air and 
combat helicopter strikes and the fire of artillery and the 
advance party. Artillery subunits take up firing positions and 
conduct fire against observed targets, then perform missions of 
support to the subunits. After disembarking the company 
(battalion) commander updates missions for subunits on the 
terrain or assigns new ones, issues coordination instructions 
and controls their battle. 
  The assault force must be disembarked in a short time; this 
is done directly on or near the objective or on approaches to it 
depending on the situation. 
  When disembarking on approaches, the assault force's forward 
movement to the objective to be captured (destroyed) must be 
covert and quick, usually in approach march formation under 
cover of security elements. With its arrival at the designated 
objective, the assault force deploys into battle formation from 
the move, decisively assaults the enemy flank and rear, destroys 
(disables) his installation and moves to a new objective or to 
an assembly point (area). 
  With the capture of an important line (area), the 
assault force shifts to a defense and holds it until the 
approach of friendly troops. It must be a perimeter defense and 
ensure repulse of an enemy attack delivered from several 
directions simultaneously. The dimensions of the company 
strongpoint (battalion defense area) are the very same as and 
sometimes even larger than for defense under ordinary conditions. 
  If a mission of delivering strikes against a forward 
moving reserve of the enemy is being executed, the assault 
force should move to its likely routes of forward movement, 
occupy a favorable line and from there deliver a surprise fire 
strike against the flank, making wide use of fire ambushes. This 
mission should be performed in coordination with combat 
helicopters and friendly subunits (units) attacking from the 
front or conducting a defense. 
  In performing the mission of destroying (disabling) 
ground elements of a reconnaissance-strike complex and means of 
nuclear and chemical attack, the assault force covertly 
moves forward to their disposition, destroys covering-force 
subunits by a determined assault from the move and puts the 
installations out of commission. 
  If it is to capture nuclear mines emplaced in 
wells, the assault force destroys the enemy near them, occupies 
a favorable line and supports actions of combat engineer 
subunits to disarm the nuclear mines. 
  With the capture of hydraulic engineering works, 
bridges, crossings, crossing equipment or sectors 
convenient for forcing, the assault force moves up to the 
designated objective after disembarking, captures it by an 
assault on the enemy on one or both banks and holds it until the 
approach of friendly units. 
  To capture a pass the assault force lands near it 
and takes the adjoining commanding heights. Then it moves to the 
enemy's flank and rear and seizes the pass after destroying him. 
To take a gap the assault force lands at its entrance, takes 
commanding heights, and seals off and destroys the enemy. 
  In performing combat missions, the assault force's actions 
must be daring, determined and distinguished by high mobility, 
activeness and boldness. The enemy must be destroyed before he 
manages to organize resistance, with weapons used skillfully in 
the process. 
<H5>  12. Battalion in Amphibious Assault Force </H5>
  An assault force[.sup]5[/], in which an MRB (TB) may 
operate as a forward detachment or as part of the assault force 
main body, is landed to capture an island or the opposite shore 
of a strait. The purpose of detachment operations is to support 
the landing of the assault force main body on the coast, and 
that of a battalion in the main body is to destroy the enemy and 
seize a beachhead. 
  The battalion may operate independently as an assault force 
when our troops attack along the coast. The capture and holding 
of important coastal objectives (sectors), assistance to units 
and formations in penetrating a defense, disruption of enemy 
lines of communication, and prohibition of the approach of his 
reserves and withdrawal of units along the coast are the goals 
in employing such an assault force. The Azov and Danube naval 
flotillas made 38 assault landings to fulfill these objectives 
in just the second and third period of the Great Patriotic War. 
  The assault force usually is sealifted at night or under 
other conditions of limited visibility. 
  During the Great Patriotic War all assault forces were 
sealifted and landed at night or at dawn. The landing of an 
assault force during the day as a rule was forced. 
  A battalion is assigned a waiting area [rayon ozhidaniya] 
and 
a primary and alternate embarkation (loading) point for boarding 
and a primary and alternate landing beach (offloading point) up 
to 2 km wide for landing. 
  A waiting area is designated for preparing subunits for 
operations. A battalion is disposed in this area by company with 
means of reinforcement, with measures taken for protection 
against mass destruction and precision weapons and with 
consideration for moving out to embark (load). Depending on the 
situation, an assault force may arrive at the embarkation 
(loading) point several minutes before assault transport 
vehicles depart without entering a waiting area. 
  A battalion is given a combat mission, which usually is 
divided into the immediate and subsequent mission. Thus, the 
immediate mission of a battalion operating in a forward 
detachment is to capture a landing beach and the subsequent 
mission is to hold it and support the main body's landing. When 
operating as part of the main body, the content of missions 
basically is the very same as when attacking a defending enemy. 
When a battalion operates independently in an assault force, the 
content of the immediate mission may be to destroy the enemy at 
the landing beach and take a coastal objective (line), and the 
subsequent mission may be to hold it until the approach of units 
attacking along the seacoast. 
  To ensure greater independence in performing the mission, a 
battalion is reinforced by subunits of other combat arms and 
special troops as when attacking a defending enemy. Increased 
reserves of supplies, especially ammunition, are established in 
subunits and it is desirable to reinforce the battalion aid 
station with medical personnel and means for giving medical aid 
to wounded and sick. 
  The amphibious task force, which includes assault transport 
vehicles, fire support ships and covering forces, is designated 
for landing the assault force. 
  After receiving the mission, the battalion commander 
analyzes 
it. In so doing he analyzes missions of the assault force and of 
his battalion and the senior commander's concept, especially 
targets (objectives) to be destroyed (engaged) by the senior 
commander's assets during the landing and battle in the 
beachhead, forces and assets assigned for the landing, the 
mission of an airborne assault force if it is landed, the 
procedure for coordinating with it, with aviation and with the 
amphibious task force, and readiness time for the landing. 
  In the course of the situation estimate the battalion 
commander determines and clarifies the following: nature of the 
antilanding defense, presence of obstacles in the water and on 
shore and methods of negotiating them; objectives to be 
destroyed (neutralized) in the period of fire preparation and 
support of the landing; combat capabilities of the assault force 
and of allocated assault transport vehicles and the possible 
distribution of subunits to them. The following are outlined and 
updated in addition: place and procedure for boarding (loading) 
the assault force; advisable method of operations in conducting 
battle at the landing beach; nature of terrain, battle formation 
and missions of subunits ashore; meteorological conditions 
during the sealift and at the landing beach (offloading point). 
  If the assault force is being landed in support of troops 
attacking along the coast, then missions of units moving to link 
up with the assault force and conditions of coordination with 
them also are analyzed. 
  A decision is made as a result of the combat mission 
analysis, the situation estimate and the calculations performed. 
In addition to the usual questions covered in organizing an 
attack, it spells out subunit missions for destroying the enemy 
at the landing beach (offloading point) and in the onshore area, 
distribution of organic subunits and means of reinforcement to 
the assault transport vehicles and the sequence of their 
boarding (loading) and disembarking (unloading). 
  In assigning missions to subunits the battalion commander 
usually indicates the following in the operation 
order: 

  -  for companies--means of reinforcement, missions 
for destroying the enemy at the landing beach and during 
subsequent operations, landing places, assault transport 
vehicles for the sealift, and boarding (loading) and 
disembarking (unloading) sequence; 
  -  for artillery subunits and other weapons--missions 
for supporting the battle ashore, places in assault transport 
vehicles, and boarding (loading) and disembarking (unloading) 
sequence; 
  -  for the air defense subunit--missions for covering 
the battalion against enemy air strikes during the sealift and 
after the landing, places in assault transport vehicles and 
boarding (loading) and disembarking (unloading) sequence. 


    Coordination is organized by the battalion 
commander from a map and on a terrain model. The procedure for 
moving out and boarding (loading) assault transport vehicles may 
be worked out directly on the terrain. 
  In organizing coordination the commander gives primary 
attention to coordinating subunit actions in negotiating 
antilanding obstacles, seizing the landing beach (offloading 
point), and in the battle ashore, and to coordinating their 
actions with ship gun fire, air strikes and operations of an 
airborne assault force if one is landed. 
  Preparing the battalion for the landing usually includes 
drilling its subunits for embarking (loading) and disembarking 
(unloading) and drilling obstacle clearing parties of the 
amphibious task force and assault force in breaching antilanding 
obstacles. Based on war experience, it is also necessary to 
drill subunits in fighting to capture a beach with consideration 
of the antilanding defense and nature of terrain at the landing 
beach and preparation of weapons, vehicles and supplies for 
loading and unloading as well as preparation of tanks, 
amphibious vehicles and assault transport vehicles for crossing 
a water obstacle under their own power. 
  The battalion usually moves out to the embarkation (loading) 
point from the waiting area in company columns with means of 
reinforcement. Rear subunits proceed in front, then reserve 
(second echelon) subunits, the staff, and first echelon 
subunits. The sequence of loading weapons and military vehicles 
on assault transport vehicles must be in reverse of the order of 
their unloading with consideration of fighting ashore. Personnel 
board after equipment and supplies have been loaded. 
  The battalion commander is resubordinated to the commander 
of 
the ship on which the battalion is being sealifted from the 
moment the order is received for boarding (loading) until the 
end of disembarking (unloading). 
  The battalion commander's COP during boarding (loading) is 
near the amphibious task force C[.sup]2[/] facility if it is 
located ashore. During the sealift, C[.sup]2[/] of the 
battalion is exercised through the commander of the amphibious 
task force. The battalion commander and chief of staff usually 
are on different ships with the commander and chief of staff of 
the amphibious task force. The battalion commander controls his 
own forces and assets on arriving ashore. An embarkation point 
commander is appointed for directing the boarding (loading) and 
for maintaining order. 
  During the sealift the battalion is covered from the air and 
from enemy strikes from the sea by covering (escort) and support 
ships. 
  During battalion operations in a forward detachment or as an 
independent assault force (when our troops are attacking along 
the coast), as the assault transport vehicles approach the 
landing beach (offloading point) the battalion commander updates 
for subunits the places and procedure for landing and missions 
ashore. Missions for neutralizing the antilanding defense also 
are updated for weapons. After making ready to land, assault 
force personnel release vehicles from fastenings and place 
weapons in readiness. 
  As a rule, a battalion lands as one echelon, and amphibious 
tanks and BMP's (BTR's) with motorized rifle subunits proceed in 
the first waves. Reforming of assault transport vehicles from 
cruising to battle formation ends when the first wave approaches 
the starting line. This line is designated at a distance from 
shore precluding conduct of fire against assault transport 
vehicles by enemy weapons moved up for direct fire. 
  Battalion subunits move up to the landing beach under cover 
of air strikes and the fire of ship guns and battalion weapons 
and taking advantage of passages breached in obstacles. 
Amphibious tanks and BMP's (BTR's) usually are launched before 
the landing ships approach the landing beach, and proceed to 
shore under their own power. Landing ships (fast assault landing 
craft) move behind the amphibious tanks and BMP's (BTR's) and 
land subunits on shore (or in the water when it is no more than 
one meter deep). Nonamphibious vehicles may be unloaded at 
places where the depth and bottom permit them to proceed under 
their own power. 
  An assault landing party consisting of up to a reinforced 
MRC 
may be assigned from the battalion. Taking advantage of air 
strikes and ship gun fire, it comes ashore, assaults the enemy 
at the landing beach and takes a line in supporting the 
battalion's landing, deployment and battle. 
  Under cover of air strikes and the fire of ship guns and its 
own weapons as well as of the assault landing party, the 
battalion main body proceeds in BMP's (BTR's) and assault 
landing craft and comes ashore. It deploys into battle formation 
from the move, launches an assault and seizes the landing beach 
to a depth supporting the landing of the assault force main 
body. Subsequently the battalion continues to fight to widen the 
beachhead in coordination with first echelon subunits of the 
assault force. 
  A battalion operating in support of troops attacking along 
the seacoast seizes a designated line (objective) and holds it 
until they approach, or it performs other missions. 
  If a battalion lands as part of the assault force main body, 
it comes ashore, exploiting success of the forward detachment. 
Under conditions where the sealift is accomplished in 
transportation assets, the battalion usually is transferred to 
landing craft with the approach to shore. After unloading, 
battalion subunits deploy into battle formation from the move 
and develop the attack into the depth in coordination with first 
echelon subunits of the assault force. A battalion attacking in 
the direction of operations of an airborne assault force 
continues performing the mission in coordination with it after 
linkup. 
  When a terrain sector ashore has been taken, some landing 
support forces may be used for fire support of the assault and 
fire accompaniment of the battalion attack in the depth, for 
covering it against enemy strikes from the sea, for evacuating 
wounded and for delivering supplies. 
<H5>  13. Attack in a City </H5>
  Conditions of an attack in the city basically are 
characterized by the density of construction of various sizes 
and types of buildings, presence of parks and squares, layout 
and width of streets, and the underground utility network. 
Cities usually are built up with large brick, stone and concrete 
buildings. Destructive damage and centers of fire will arise in 
a city as a result of use of aircraft, artillery and other 
weapons. Under these conditions the attack of a company 
(battalion) as a rule breaks down into isolated battles of 
platoons and squads for individual houses and other structures. 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits is complicated and the field of view 
and fire and the maneuver of forces and assets is restricted. 
The battle of subunits is characterized by ferocity which often 
develops into hand-to-hand fighting. 
  A successful attack is achieved only with close coordination 
of motorized rifle (tank) platoons (companies) maintained with 
subunits of other combat arms and special troops. For this, tank 
subunits and the bulk of artillery subunits are attached to 
motorized rifle squads, platoons and companies. 
  Helicopters and flame weapons will find wide use in street 
fighting. Direct fire, including of large caliber guns, is the 
most effective fire. Mortars can destroy the enemy successfully 
in courtyards, behind various cover, and within blocks, and 
artillery can engage his artillery and reserves from indirect 
positions. A company (battalion) attack in the city is 
characterized by a successive fight to take individual 
strongpoints, buildings and blocks. 
  The company (battalion) attack frontage will be less than 
under ordinary conditions, since a battle in the city is 
conducted along streets and in buildings, and in the latter case 
on all floors and in basements successively or simultaneously. 
It is advisable for a company to advance along one street with 
the adjoining houses or within a block, and for a battalion to 
advance along one or two parallel streets with adjoining blocks; 
frontage may reach 1,000 m in this case. A combat mission is 
assigned to the company (battalion) based on objectives and 
blocks, and to a lesser depth than on open terrain. 
  As shown by war experience, cities usually were captured 
from 
the move in the course of developing an attack, but when a city 
failed to be taken from the move, an assault on it was organized. 
  In attacking a city from the move the content of the 
company's immediate mission and of the battalion's immediate and 
subsequent missions may be the very same as under ordinary 
conditions. But as a result of the execution of missions the 
battalion must take important objectives on approaches to the 
city and within the city itself. In an assault on a city the 
company's immediate mission is to take a building (or part of a 
large building or several small buildings) in the enemy 
strongpoint. The battalion immediate mission may consist of 
capturing a strongpoint or one and sometimes two or three 
blocks. The content of its subsequent mission is to take 
important objectives (blocks) in the depth of the enemy defense. 
  Assault teams and detachments are formed to capture large 
city structures prepared for defense. An MRC usually is the 
basis of a team and a battalion the basis of an assault 
detachment. There may be 2-3 assault teams and a reserve in a 
detachment. 
  Teams and detachments include artillery, tanks, mortars, 
ATGM's, flamethrowers and grenade launchers and they also are 
supplied with demolition charges, with incendiary, smoke and 
signaling devices, and with devices for assaulting buildings and 
negotiating obstacles. 
  For example, in the assault on the city of Gdynia (March 
1945), assault detachments were formed with a strength of up to 
an MRB reinforced by a tank company, SP artillery battery, 76-mm 
gun battalion, 155-mm howitzer battery, M-13 rocket artillery 
platoon and from a platoon to a company of combat 
engineers.[.sup]6[/] 
  In organizing the attack, the company (battalion) commander 
estimates the nature of the defense and enemy system of fire on 
approaches to and within the city and studies the direction and 
width of streets and disposition of structures whose capture 
will disrupt stability of the defense. As a result of this the 
commander specifies methods for fire engagement of the enemy and 
capture of objectives and the number, makeup, combat missions 
and battle formation of assault teams. 
  In organizing coordination the company (battalion) commander 
works out the procedure of the assault on the enemy and the 
assault on buildings and determines the place of tanks, guns, 
ATGM's and other weapons in the battle formation of subunits and 
the procedure for coordination among them and for communications 
and recognition. All commanders usually are supplied with large- 
scale maps or aerial photos (street maps). 
  In capturing a city from the move, artillery and aircraft 
inflict fire damage on the enemy in strongpoints on city 
approaches and outskirts. When subunits arrive at the outskirts, 
artillery transfers fire against buildings and shelters in enemy 
strongpoints and neutralizes artillery and reserves. Subunits 
burst into the city from the move, exploiting results of fire 
damage and weakly defended places and gaps in the defense. The 
attack is conducted along streets and through courtyards, and 
subunits take buildings and blocks. Buildings or parts of 
buildings which have not been captured are sealed off, blinding 
smoke screens are laid down and flanks and rear are covered. 
  Some platoons may advance through courtyards and gardens and 
along both sides of the street in an envelopment of buildings, 
while one platoon with tanks, ATGM's, artillery and BMP's 
(BTR's) advances along the street. Advancing along sidewalks, 
tanks and BMP's (BTR's) fire on the enemy in buildings on the 
opposite side of the street. Motorized riflemen advancing to the 
right and left of the tanks and BMP's (BTR's) fire against lower 
floors, and motorized riflemen advancing directly behind the 
fighting vehicles fire against upper floors of buildings. 
  Actions of an assault team (detachment) may be as follows: 
in 
the period of fire preparation of the assault its tanks, guns 
and flamethrowers destroy the enemy in the building being 
assaulted and in adjacent buildings. Taking advantage of 
breaches in walls, underground utilities, communication tunnels, 
pedestrian subways and other concealed approaches, motorized 
riflemen move up to the objective and burst into the building 
under cover of fire from all weapons. Stairwells, entrances, 
exits, and passages within the building should be taken first of 
all, which will permit splitting the enemy and destroying him in 
detail. 
  Operations in a building must be bold, daring and 
determined; 
the enemy must be destroyed with grenades and point-blank fire 
and floors cleared simultaneously or successively. Combat 
engineer subunits clear mines, breach obstacles and if necessary 
demolish structures. 
  The actions of Stalingrad's fighters teach us: "Burst into a 
building together--you and a grenade; both be dressed light--you 
without a combat field pack and the grenade without a jacket; 
burst in with the grenade in front and you behind; go through 
the entire building, again with a grenade--grenade in front and 
you right after."[.sup]7[/] 
  A company (battalion) commander should keep a watchful eye 
on 
the situation and development of battle and be ready to support 
platoons (companies) by fire. Radio and signaling devices are 
the basic means of communication. 
<H5>  14. Attack Under Special Conditions </H5>
  Attack in the mountains. The following exert 
considerable influence on conduct of an attack by a company 
(battalion) in the mountains: ruggedness of relief and abundance 
of dead ground and concealed approaches, which hamper 
orientation, observation and use of weapons; predominance of 
rocky soils and possible landslides and roadblocks; difficulty 
of using engineer vehicles, including mineclearing devices; poor 
road network and difficulty of off-road movement; shielding 
effect of mountains on operation of radios, radars and sound 
ranging equipment; and abrupt weather changes in the course of a 
24 hour period. When tanks and BMP's (BTR's) are on upgrades, 
downgrades and slopes, their capabilities of conducting fire are 
reduced considerably, especially against targets located higher. 
  Fuel consumption and wear and tear on vehicles increase in 
the mountains and vehicle power drops at high altitudes. Rivers 
exert a substantial influence with their narrow valleys, steep, 
precipitous banks and rocky beds, which hampers crossing them. 
  Based on that nature of terrain, an attack in the mountains 
usually is conducted along hillslopes, roads, valleys, ridges 
and other possible axes, with wide use of close and deep 
envelopments for concealed movement to enemy flanks and rear in 
order to capture commanding heights, passes and other important 
objectives. Taking these objectives creates favorable conditions 
for developing the attack. The features of mountainous terrain 
also facilitate infiltration of small subunits into the enemy 
rear in places where he least expects them. Deep envelopment, 
infiltration and movement to the enemy rear even by small forces 
produce a significant result. 
  A company (battalion) may attack as part of the main body, 
it 
may attack independently in isolation from it on a separate 
axis, or it may operate in an enveloping detachment. 
  When attacking as part of the main body, a company is given 
an immediate mission and the battalion is given an immediate and 
subsequent mission. In addition, they are assigned a direction 
for continuing the attack. The content of missions is affected 
above all by the nature of the enemy defense and of the terrain 
objective he occupies. On armor terrain, the content of company 
(battalion) missions basically is the very same as when 
attacking a defending enemy under ordinary conditions. When 
attacking on rugged terrain against a defense with engineer 
development, the content of the battalion's immediate mission 
may be to destroy the enemy in platoon strongpoints and the 
subsequent mission to destroy him in coordination with adjacent 
subunits in a company strongpoint and take the strongpoint. In 
addition to destroying the enemy, the content of missions 
usually also includes taking a particular objective (hill, pass, 
gorge and so on). 
  When a company (battalion) attacks on an independent axis, 
it 
usually is given an immediate mission and direction for 
continuing the attack. The content of the mission is to defeat 
the enemy in a platoon (company) strongpoint covering this axis. 
The direction for continuing the attack must ensure the 
company's (battalion's) move to enemy flanks and rear to deliver 
a strike against him in coordination with the main body 
attacking from the front. 
  If a company (battalion) has been assigned to an enveloping 
detachment, it is assigned the mission of capturing a tactically 
important line (objective), the taking of which creates 
favorable conditions for the main body's successful attack. 
Sometimes the detachment will perform its mission in 
coordination with a tactical airborne assault force (air assault 
subunits). 
  The attack frontage of subunits may change considerably 
depending on the nature of terrain. In connection with this, the 
battle formation is formed deeper in operations along narrow 
valleys: as a rule, the company in two echelons and the 
battalion sometimes even in three echelons. 
  A company (battalion) attacking on an individual axis or in 
an enveloping detachment usually is reinforced by artillery, AT 
weapons, and combat engineer and other subunits and supported by 
the main body's artillery and by helicopter strikes. Subunits 
are supplied with mountain gear for operations in high mountain 
areas. 
  In organizing an attack in the mountains, the company 
(battalion) commander additionally studies the system of fire in 
all tiers and terrain accessibility and determines favorable 
directions for operations of combat arms subunits and for making 
deep and close envelopments. He also outlines measures for 
covering flanks and rear and for orientation, and also possible 
enemy ambush sites. 
  The following are specified in the decision in addition to 
the usual questions: procedure for capturing passes, tunnels, 
gorges and other important objectives; missions of subunits 
making a deep (close) envelopment and the procedure for their 
coordination with subunits attacking from the front or with a 
tactical airborne assault force; and measures for covering 
flanks and destroying enemy ambushes. Measures for orientation, 
maintaining direction, marking the position of attacking 
subunits and protecting against landslides, avalanches and 
mudflows, and the procedure for providing subunits with 
necessary mountain gear also are outlined. 
  In organizing coordination the company (battalion) commander 
pays special attention to coordinating the operations of 
subunits making a deep (close) envelopment with those attacking 
from the front. Operations of artillery and assaulting subunits 
are coordinated for taking important objectives in the course of 
the attack. 
  As a rule, an attack is made from a position of direct 
contact with the enemy. Artillery destroys and neutralizes the 
enemy in all tiers in the periods of fire preparation and fire 
support of the assault. The enemy is engaged in the lower tier 
basically by direct fire of artillery, tanks and ATGM's; in the 
second tier by artillery and mortar fire; and in subsequent 
tiers by helicopter strikes. Strongpoints adjoining axes of 
attack by subunits are neutralized with greatest fire density. 
Mortars, howitzer artillery and helicopters are used to engage 
the enemy on reverse slopes. 
  Motorized rifle subunits assault in dismounted formation on 
rugged terrain. Tanks may operate in or behind the extended line 
of motorized riflemen, with BMP's (BTR's) behind the tanks, and 
by their fire destroy the enemy hampering the advance of 
attacking subunits. Air defense subunits displace behind the 
attackers in readiness to repel enemy helicopter strikes, 
especially from low altitudes. On encountering obstacles, 
motorized riflemen negotiate them together with combat engineer 
subunits under cover of artillery and tank fire, supporting the 
tanks' advance. 
  In attacking along a narrow mountain valley, it is necessary 
above all to take adjoining hills, which will ensure that the 
valley is covered by fire. Successful destruction of the enemy 
is achieved by coordinated operations of combat arms subunits 
attacking along the hills and along the valley. In assaulting 
the enemy defending a hill with a tiered system of fire, when 
subunits approach the hill artillery transfers fire against 
enemy weapons in upper tiers and on the flanks. It is advisable 
to assault the enemy from different directions, i.e., from the 
front, the flanks and the rear. 
  A company (battalion) attacking from the front may take a 
mountain pass or gorge either independently or in coordination 
with an enveloping detachment, tactical airborne assault force 
and combat helicopters. Initially the hills and slopes facing 
the pass and gorge are captured. Subsequently the enemy in the 
pass or gorge is pinned down by some of the forces from the 
captured line and destroyed by a strike of the main body against 
the flank and rear. Pass approaches, gorge entrances and exits 
and other important objectives are carefully guarded. 
  Canyons usually are negotiated by subunits from the move 
along captured passages. If the passage fails to be taken from 
the move, dismounted motorized riflemen seize it by an assault 
against the flank and rear supported by artillery and tank fire 
after a deep envelopment of the enemy. When an enemy defending a 
passage has failed to be enveloped, capture of the passage is 
organized by an assault from the front in close interworking of 
subunits of all combat arms and special troops. 
  A company (battalion) assigned to an enveloping detachment 
as 
a rule attacks in dismounted formation. Taking advantage of 
concealed approaches and gaps in the defense, the detachment 
decisively penetrates into its depth and seizes hills adjoining 
the objective (pass, mountain gap, and so on). Subsequently it 
takes the objective by assaulting the enemy in the flank and 
rear independently, in coordination with subunits attacking from 
the front, or in coordination with a tactical airborne assault 
force. 
  In an attack in the mountains the company (battalion) 
commander pays special attention to reconnoitering the enemy and 
securing the flanks. Reconnaissance is conducted by a larger 
number of observation posts, observers, patrol squads and 
reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrols than under 
ordinary conditions. Exposed flanks of the company (battalion) 
are secured by forming an echelon battle formation of platoons 
(companies), by conducting reconnaissance and observation, and 
by readiness of the second echelon (reserve) for a maneuver 
toward the flanks. 
  The company (battalion) COP and technical support and rear 
subunits come up closer to first echelon subunits. 
  An attack in the forest is one of the most 
difficult. The following affect conduct of the attack: terrain 
affording concealment with the presence of marshy sectors; 
limited number of roads; possibility of the enemy creating 
abatis in combination with mines, of the outbreak of fires and 
of the lengthy persistence of chemical agents. All this hampers 
observation, target designation, maneuver of combat vehicles, 
fire adjustment, coordination among subunits and their 
C[.sup]2[/]. 
  The limited nature of sectors of fire and difficulty of 
subunit operations on a continuous front increase the importance 
of independent squad, platoon and company operations. In a 
forest battle the role of commanders' initiative at all levels, 
surprise, and decisive actions of subunits and even of 
individual motorized riflemen grows, since the battle is fought 
basically at close ranges. 
  To achieve close coordination among combat arms subunits it 
is advisable to attach a TC and mortar (artillery) battery by 
platoon and a grenade launcher and AT subunits by squad to MRC's 
(MRP's). This also ensures their conduct of independent combat 
operations. Smoke assets are successfully employed in the forest. 
  An attack in the forest is conducted along axes, primarily 
along roads and openings, in combination with close and deep 
envelopments. A move even of small subunits to the flank and 
rear may disorganize the enemy defense. 
  A company (battalion) may attack as part of the main body or 
independently in an enveloping detachment. It is assigned a 
combat mission to a lesser depth and the mission content usually 
includes taking objectives (openings, forest crossroads, 
drainage canals, defiles and so on). The position of subunits in 
the battle formation changes more often in the course of an 
attack than under ordinary conditions. This is [caused] by the 
need to secure exposed flanks and the rear. 
  In organizing an attack, in addition to the usual questions 
the company (battalion) commander determines the following: 
azimuth of attack for subunits and measures for orientation and 
mutual recognition; procedure for negotiating abatis, other 
obstacles and sectors difficult to negotiate; procedure for 
putting out fires and directions for bypassing them; procedure 
for destroying the enemy left in the rear and for conducting 
fire from trees. The second echelon (reserve) may be used to 
destroy the enemy left in the rear, and snipers and assault 
riflemen should be assigned in platoons to destroy the enemy 
firing from trees. 
  As a rule the commander makes the decision and assigns 
missions from a map. In organizing coordination the company 
(battalion) commander coordinates in detail the actions of 
subunits attacking from the front and making a close (deep) 
envelopment to capture road junctions, openings, defiles between 
lakes and other important objectives. Attention also is given to 
rehearsing questions of ensuring reliable orientation, 
maintaining the direction of attack, target designation, and 
marking of the lines reached. 
  When the enemy FEBA runs along the treeline, the company 
(battalion) begins the assault by capturing forest salients. 
Subsequently a strike is delivered against the flank and rear to 
destroy the enemy in strongpoints and advance swiftly into the 
depth. 
  In the depth of the forest the enemy is assaulted on a 
narrower front and from closer range after his fire damage. 
Felled areas and glades are bypassed, since the enemy usually 
arranges fire ambushes in them. Necessary forces and assets are 
assigned for making a deep (close) envelopment and an assault 
against the flank and rear of enemy strongpoints. Motorized 
rifle subunits usually assault the enemy in dismounted 
formation, and tanks proceed in or immediately behind the 
riflemen's extended line. BMP's (BTR's) operate behind the tanks 
and support the advance of attacking subunits by their fire. 
Under cover of weapons, combat engineer subunits breach abatis 
and other obstacles and support their negotiation by motorized 
riflemen and tanks. Sometimes tanks and BMP's (BTR's) are used 
to reduce an abatis. Motor vehicles of motorized rifle subunits 
displace behind the battalion second echelon in a battalion 
column. 
  Enemy strongpoints covering crossroads, glades and other 
objectives are captured by an assault against the flank and rear 
in coordination with subunits attacking from the front. 
  During a battle in the depth of the forest one should not 
allow vehicles and subunits to concentrate on roads, in glades 
and in open terrain sectors, since these objectives usually are 
registered by artillery and may be engaged by enemy aircraft. In 
conducting an attack in the forest subunits constantly must be 
ready to conduct fire, they must advance swiftly, conduct 
observation continuously, employ grenades skillfully, beef up 
security from flanks and rear, send out foot patrols and conduct 
reconnaissance. 
  It is advisable for the second echelon (reserve) to displace 
in approach march formation and be closer to the assaulting 
subunits. COP's are brought closer to first echelon subunits; 
technical support and rear subunits are brought closer to battle 
formations of the companies and as a rule are disposed near 
roads and openings. 
  On emerging from the forest, subunits draw up to its edge 
and 
assume battle formation as under ordinary conditions. Guns and 
platoons operating separately join their batteries, 
C[.sup]2[/] of artillery and tanks may be centralized, and 
thorough reconnaissance is conducted. 
  In an attack in the desert (Diagram 17) it is 
necessary to take the effect of its diverse natural conditions 
into account. Open relief, an almost total absence of built-up 
areas and of clear-cut reference points, and poor road networks 
hamper orientation, target designation and maskirovka. The 
presence of rocky terrain sectors difficult of access and with 
inland sand dunes, moist solonchaks, the shortage or total 
absence of water, and the extremely sparse vegetation noticeably 
reduce the cross-country capability of vehicles and maneuver of 
subunits on a number of axes and complicate the supply of water 
and fuel. Sharp temperature fluctuations during a 24 hour period 
have a negative effect on personnel, and sand, sandstorms and 
sandy dust hamper observation and conduct of fire to long ranges 
and degrade C[.sup]2[/] of subunits. Sandy dust also has a 
negative effect on operation of weapons, engines and vehicle 
running gear. Mirages appear after sunrise on sultry days, 
distorting the appearance and nature of reference points, 
hampering a determination of distance and leading to a sharp 
deterioration in orientation. Certain desert areas may be 
unfavorable from a sanitation-epidemic standpoint. This will 
require taking preventive measures against possible sickness of 
personnel. 
  In the desert an attack usually is launched from the move 
and 
conducted across a broad front, off the roads, and along 
scattered axes basically to capture and hold vital areas, oases 
and water sources. The absence of a continuous front in the 
enemy defense and the possibility of accomplishing a wide 
maneuver create favorable conditions for delivering strikes 
against his flank and rear. It is advisable to concentrate basic 
company (battalion) efforts on an axis leading to important 
areas and objectives. The effect of high temperature is reduced, 
maskirovka is ensured and surprise of operations is achieved 
when night falls. The night also can be used for executing a 
maneuver with subsequent delivery of a strike against the enemy 
at dawn. 
  A company (battalion) performs missions as part of the main 
body, independently, or operating in an enveloping detachment; 
and the battalion in addition does so on a separate axis or in a 
raiding detachment. The company (battalion) attack frontage and 
combat missions during operations as part of the main body are 
the very same as under ordinary conditions. If a battalion is to 
operate on an independent axis, then its attack frontage as a 
rule will be wider and the combat mission is assigned to a 
greater depth than when it is employed as part of the main body. 
  Enveloping (raiding) detachment missions are to destroy 
means 
of nuclear and chemical attack, ground elements of 
reconnaissance- strike complexes, and C[.sup]2[/] facilities; 
to disorganize the enemy rear, capture oases, road junctions, 
water sources and other important objectives; and to assist 
subunits attacking from the front in encircling and destroying 
the enemy. 
  As under ordinary conditions, the company (battalion) is 
reinforced by subunits of other combat arms and special troops 
to increase independence in performing missions. The battle 
formation also is formed with consideration for covering exposed 
flanks. This is achieved by conducting intensified 
reconnaissance, by forming the battle formation in an echelon 
right or left or assigning weapons to cover the flanks, and by 
displacing the second echelon (reserve) behind the exposed flank. 
  In organizing an attack, in addition to usual questions the 
company (battalion) commander specifies the following: azimuth 
of the direction of attack; routes for subunits to move to the 
line of departure and procedure for marking them; measures for 
maskirovka, security of flanks and rear, preparation of weapons 
and military vehicles for use during sandstorms, protection of 
personnel with abrupt changes in meteorological conditions, and 
prevention of heat strokes; procedure for supplying subunits 
with water and fuel; and measures for increasing off-road 
capability of wheeled vehicles as well as for maintaining a 
sanitary and hygienic condition at personnel locations and at 
water supply points. In organizing coordination, special 
attention should be given to coordinating actions of subunits 
for capturing key positions, oases and other important 
objectives, also including on the flanks, and to the procedure 
for securing flanks. 
  A company (battalion) launches an assault after fire 
preparation of the assault, during which strongpoints, 
individual centers of defense and C[.sup]2[/] facilities 
basically are neutralized. Guns and tanks assigned for direct 
fire as well as ATGM launchers and AT grenade launchers are 
widely used for destroying and neutralizing enemy weapons during 
fire preparation of the assault. 
  The basic methods of subunit operations in fighting in the 
depth of the enemy defense are to make a deep and close 
envelopment, deliver strikes against him from the flank and rear 
and with a portion of the forces from the front, break up the 
enemy and destroy him in detail, and make a determined advance 
into the depth to capture important objectives. 
  The aid station is brought closer to first echelon subunits, 
and other logistic support points are brought closer to the 
battalion battle formation, especially when it operates on a 
separate axis. 
  Attack in northern areas and in winter. In 
organizing and conducting an attack in northern areas, one must 
take into account the effect of abundant boulders and talus and 
of vast areas of tundra terrain, marshy forest-tundra, wooded 
terrain, and on some axes also mountainous terrain with a large 
number of lakes. Northern areas also are characterized by an 
extremely limited network of roads and axes accessible for 
subunit operations, a severe climate with lengthy winter and 
presence of a deep snow cover, the arctic night and day, adverse 
meteorological conditions, ionospheric and geomagnetic 
perturbations disrupting normal operation of radio equipment and 
compasses (errors may be up to 15ë, difficulty of using 
engineer vehicles and mineclearing devices, and difficulty of 
orientation and maskirovka. 
  Good conditions are created for use of tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's) with the onset of winter as a result of the bitter cold, 
which firmly binds lakes, marshes, rivers and bays. It should be 
borne in mind, however, that some lakes and marshes do not 
freeze but are merely covered with unconsolidated ice and a 
layer of snow. 
  Blizzards, fog and night help execute a covert maneuver and 
close with the enemy, but with greater expenditure of time than 
in the summer. In some places the snow cover may reach more than 
50 cm, which limits and sometimes even precludes the movement of 
subunits in the absence of a hard snow crust. Frequent blizzards 
drift up the roads and various obstacles and structures, which 
forces organization of snow-clearing in some sectors and removal 
of drifts and hummocks. At the same time, formation of a hard 
crust (upper layer) of snow in spring permits making wide 
off-road use of military vehicles. The snow cover changes the 
external appearance of terrain, hampers orientation, and hides 
lakes, ravines and marshes. 
  Low air temperature forces the issue of special thermal 
clothing to personnel, which to a certain extent constrains 
their actions, especially those of tank crews. In addition, time 
periods for preparing vehicles for operations are increased and 
their maintenance becomes more complicated. Steps must be taken 
against frostbite of personnel. They are equipped with white 
camouflage robes and helmets, and combat vehicles and other 
weapons are painted white. 
  As a rule an attack is launched from a position of direct 
contact with the enemy, and also from the march on terrain 
accessible for forward movement and deployment of subunits. The 
attack is conducted basically along a road, a river or other 
accessible axes. 
  A company (battalion) performs missions while operating as 
part of the main body or independently, and also as an 
enveloping detachment. 
  The company (battalion) attack frontage may change in the 
course of battle, and the battalion sometimes is forced to 
operate as companies with considerable gaps between them. In 
aligning the battle formation one should take into account the 
difficulty of changing it in the course of battle and the need 
for securing exposed flanks. This requires conducting 
reconnaissance on flanks and it requires security, especially in 
the fog and the arctic night. 
  As a rule, the content of subunit combat missions is the 
very 
same, but rates of advance on some axes will be lower than under 
ordinary conditions. 
  In an attack along roads or individual axes on terrain 
difficult of access, an MRC may be reinforced by a TP, mortar 
(artillery) platoon, grenade launcher subunit and combat 
engineer subunit and may be supported by fire of an artillery 
battery. The battalion is reinforced and supported by subunits 
of other combat arms and services, as under ordinary conditions. 
  A company (battalion) assigned to an enveloping detachment 
is 
given an objective in the depth of the enemy defense which it 
must take independently or in coordination with a tactical 
airborne assault force. Such objectives may be road junctions, 
bridges and so on. The detachment also is assigned a mission of 
destroying means of nuclear and chemical attack and 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities, disrupting work of the rear, and 
assisting subunits attacking from the front. 
  In preparing for an attack, in addition to the usual matters 
the company (battalion) commander specifies the presence of 
flanks and unoccupied gaps in the enemy defense, axes favorable 
for subunit operations, the azimuth of the direction of attack 
and the procedure for orientation and for crossing sectors 
difficult of access. He organizes warming posts and takes steps 
to prevent hypothermia and frostbite of personnel and also for 
preparing weapons, vehicles and individual protective gear for 
use under low temperature conditions. Measures are taken for 
painting vehicles to resemble the terrain background, to supply 
subunits with camouflage robes, to improve off-road capability 
of vehicles, especially wheeled vehicles, and to establish 
additional reserves of fuel, food and means of illumination. 
Measures also are envisaged for receiving supplies from 
helicopters and aircraft. In addition, the company (battalion) 
commander carries out advance preparation of the attack position 
(assembly area) under conditions of an attack launched from a 
position of direct contact with the enemy. Special attention is 
given to making emplacements out of snow and shelters for 
warming the personnel. 
  An assault of motorized rifle subunits when there is a deep 
snow cover and under other difficult conditions usually is made 
in dismounted formation, including on skis. Tanks attack in or 
behind the extended line of motorized riflemen. BMP's (BTR's) 
operate behind tanks and by their fire destroy the enemy 
hindering the advance of tanks and motorized rifle subunits. 
When attacking over a snow crust or expanse of ice, the assault 
of motorized rifle subunits may be conducted in BMP's (BTR's). 
  Taking advantage of gaps and exposed flanks in enemy battle 
formations, the enveloping detachment covertly penetrates his 
defense with the beginning of or before the attack of the main 
body, and by attacking from the rear and flanks helps subunits 
attacking from the front to destroy the enemy, or it performs 
other missions. 
  During battle in the depth, main efforts of attacking 
subunits are concentrated on destroying the enemy defending 
defiles, built-up areas, commanding heights and other objectives 
covering roads and axes accessible for attack. To capture these 
objectives, wide use should be made of deep and close 
envelopments with a move into the enemy rear, and an assault 
should be made from different directions supported by fire of 
artillery and other weapons from the front. 
  More attention is given to consolidating captured lines and 
organizing the warming of personnel with the beginning of a 
snowstorm and in snow flurries. Personnel are notified 
immediately about possible snow flurries and a snowstorm. 
  The wounded and sick must be swiftly located and carried 
(transported) from the battlefield in the course of an attack, 
especially in winter. Vehicles with good off-road capability and 
helicopters as well as deer teams, dog teams, ski mountings and 
sledges are used for their evacuation. 
Footnotes 
  1. See A. I. Radziyevskiy, "Tankovyy udar" [Tank Attack], 
Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1977, p 158. 
  2. See Radziyevskiy, p 161. 
  3. Here and further in the section, assault force is 
understood to mean a tactical airborne assault force. 
  4. See G. T. Zavizion and P. A. Kornyugin, "I na Tikhom 
okeane..." [And in the Pacific...], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1967, p 
230. 
  5. Here and further in the section, assault force is 
understood to mean amphibious assault force. 
  6. See M. Ye. Katukov, "Na ostriye glavnogo udara" [At the 
Point of the Main Attack], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1976, p 336. 
  7. See V. I. Chuykov, "Nachalo puti" [Beginning of the 
Path], 
Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1959, p 332. 
<H5>  Chapter VI - The Meeting Battle </H5>
<H5>  1. Principles of the Meeting Battle </H5>
  The meeting battle is a variety of offensive battle. It is 
an 
attack on an enemy who also is attempting to accomplish his 
missions by an attack. 
  The goal of a meeting battle is to rout the attacking enemy 
in a short time, seize the initiative and create favorable 
conditions for further operations. It may arise during a march 
in an encounter with an enemy who is moving up; in an attack on 
a defending enemy while repelling counterattacks or in a clash 
with his subunits moving up to close breaches; in the defense 
when conducting counterattacks, and in a number of other cases. 
  A meeting battle usually begins with engagement by march 
security and with delivery of preemptive fire strikes against an 
enemy who is moving up (attacking), and it ends as soon as one 
side gives up the attack and begins shifting to a defense or 
withdrawing. 
  A meeting battle is characterized by the sides' rapid 
closing 
and their engagement from the move; by an intensive struggle to 
gain time, seize and hold the initiative and create fire 
superiority over the enemy; by an abrupt, frequent change in the 
situation; by conduct of operations on a broad front and to a 
great depth and by their fast-moving nature; and by the presence 
of significant gaps between subunits and of exposed flanks 
allowing freedom of maneuver for moving to the enemy flank and 
rear. 
  The sides' rapid closing, the complicated and constantly 
changing situation, and the highly dynamic nature of operations 
demand that the company (battalion) commander organize for 
battle in a short time and promptly update the decision and 
combat missions for subunits. 
  The struggle to win time and seize and hold the initiative 
will begin back on the approach to the line of the sides' 
probable encounter with the delivery of fire strikes and with 
operations of other forces and assets to hold up the enemy's 
forward movement and inflict considerable losses on him. With 
initiation of a meeting battle by security elements, first 
echelon subunits will unfold an intensive struggle for 
preemption in seizing a favorable line, in moving to a line of 
departure and in delivering swift assaults against the flank and 
rear of the enemy main body in order to split and swiftly 
destroy him in detail. 
  A maneuver of forces and assets executed for delivering 
strikes against the flank leads to abrupt situation changes and 
an expansion in the frontage of battle. The frontage of subunit 
operations also increases because the subunit immobilizing the 
enemy is deployed on a wider line and there are gaps between it 
and the subunit operating as part of the company (battalion) 
main body. 
  The following are conditions for achieving success in a 
meeting battle: continuous reconnaissance on a broad front and 
to a great depth for prompt collection of reliable data on the 
advancing enemy; prompt decisionmaking and rapid communication 
of missions to subordinates; advance establishment of the 
necessary grouping of forces and assets based on the concept of 
upcoming battle; preempting the enemy in commencing artillery 
fire; rapid execution of a maneuver to seize a favorable line 
and for forces and assets to move onto the axis of concentration 
of main efforts; preempting the enemy in deploying the main body 
and delivering a strong surprise attack against the flank and 
rear, breaking up his grouping and destroying it in detail; wide 
use of engineer obstacles on the enemy main body axis of 
operations; constant securing of flanks and rear; seizing the 
initiative and holding it throughout the battle, and determined, 
bold actions by subunits; reliable air defense and 
accomplishment of measures for comprehensive support of battle; 
firm, continuous C[.sup]2[/] and maintenance of close 
coordination among subunits in battle. 
  An important feature of the meeting battle is that it 
usually 
is conducted with relative equality of the sides' forces and 
assets. In fact, if forces of one side considerably surpass 
forces of the other, the commander of the latter, having 
intelligence on this, most likely will prefer to repel the enemy 
attack by defensive operations and not by a surprise 
counterstrike. 
  At the same time, preemption in commencing fire, deploying 
and launching an assault permits achieving victory over a 
stronger enemy. 
  A company (battalion) may conduct a meeting battle 
independently, operating in isolation from the battalion 
(regimental) main body (as a rule, in a forward security 
element, forward detachment, or advance guard), or as part of 
the main body. 
  Based on missions assigned to it in the course of the march 
and in the attack, a forward detachment conducts a meeting 
battle before seizure of a designated line only if it is 
impossible or inadvisable to go around the enemy. 
  The combat mission of the subunit in a meeting 
battle and its content and indicators (depth, frontage) depend 
on the place of the company (battalion) in the battalion 
(regimental) battle formation. 
  In a meeting battle a company (battalion) is assigned an 
immediate mission and is given a direction for continuing the 
attack (Diagram 18). 
  Assignment only of an immediate mission is a result of 
abrupt, frequent situation changes. In addition, by the time the 
battalion is given a combat mission for a meeting battle, there 
usually not only is no clear-cut enemy battle formation in the 
area where engagement may occur, but not even that grouping with 
which it is to do battle, since the latter still will be moving 
into this area. In connection with this, it is impossible to 
assign a battalion in advance a number of missions to be 
performed successively. 
  The immediate mission of a company operating in a 
forward security element is to destroy enemy 
reconnaissance and security subunits, seize a favorable line and 
support deployment of the battalion main body. The depth of the 
company's immediate mission depends on the makeup of enemy 
reconnaissance and security subunits, their distance from the 
main body and the time needed to consolidate at the indicated 
line; it usually is 1-2 km. 
  The immediate mission of a battalion operating in a 
forward detachment is to seize and hold the indicated 
line (designated earlier or with initiation of the meeting 
battle), inflict damage on the enemy's lead subunits by fire of 
all weapons and support forward movement and deployment of the 
regimental main body. 
  The size of the line which must be taken by a company as a 
forward security element (or by a battalion as a forward 
detachment) is directly connected with its combat capabilities. 
Counting means of reinforcement, a company is capable of 
repelling an assault by one and one-half enemy companies 
(company task forces) by fire from an unprepared line, and a 
battalion is capable of repelling an assault by up to one and 
one-half enemy battalions (battalion task forces). A line must 
be assigned for a company (battalion) to capture and hold 
against which the forces indicated above will attack. According 
to enemy views, a company attacks in a frontage of up to 1.2-1.5 
km and a battalion in a frontage of 3-5 km or more. Consequently 
a company/forward security element can seize and hold a line on 
a frontage up to 2 km and a battalion on a frontage of 4-6 km or 
more. 
  When the main body launches an assault the company 
(battalion) operates in the previously indicated direction for 
continuing the attack. 
  The immediate mission of a battalion operating in an 
advance guard is to destroy enemy security subunits, 
immobilize his main body by active operations and support 
deployment and commitment of the regimental main body. 
  The immediate mission of a company (battalion) operating 
as part of the main body of a battalion (regiment) is 
to rout the main body of the first echelon company (battalion) 
of the opposing enemy subunit (unit) on its axis, destroy or 
capture his artillery and take a line providing favorable 
conditions for destroying approaching reserves and developing 
the attack. 
  The depth of the battle formation of a reinforced enemy 
company (battalion) in a meeting battle usually is 1-2 (4-6) km 
and sometimes even more. With consideration of this, the 
immediate mission of a company (battalion) operating on the axis 
of concentration of main efforts is designated with a depth of 
1-2 (4-6) km and sometimes even more. 
  The direction in which a company (battalion) which is part 
of 
the main body is to continue an attack must ensure swift 
destruction of enemy reserves and performance of the battalion 
(regimental) immediate mission. 
  The battle formation in a meeting battle must 
ensure delivering a strong initial attack and performing 
missions that arise suddenly in the course of battle. A 
single-echelon alignment with assignment of a reserve in the 
battalion meets these requirements to the greatest extent. 
  Usually 2-3 MRC's and the organic (attached) TC are assigned 
to an MRB first echelon. First echelon companies may be 
reinforced by tanks, AT subunits and grenade launcher subunits. 
As a rule, a TC is attached to MRC's by platoon, but also may be 
employed at full strength. 
  In the TB the first echelon usually consists of 2-3 TC's and 
an attached MRC, which is attached to the TC's, but sometimes 
also is used at full strength. 
  The battalion reserve is established with the strength of 
from a platoon to a company. 
  Subunits usually enter a meeting battle with those means of 
reinforcement which they had in the course of preceding 
operations. In some cases a redistribution of forces and assets 
is accomplished if required by situation conditions and there 
are opportunities, depending on the place of subunits in the 
battle formation and the missions they are performing. 
  In a meeting battle an attack is conducted on a broader 
front 
in the presence of considerable gaps between subunits. Thus, a 
battalion operating as part of the main body usually attacks in 
a frontage of 2-3 km and sometimes even more. Companies may have 
an attack frontage of from 500 to 1,000 m. A battalion operating 
in a forward detachment (advance guard), having two MRC's and a 
TC in the main body and an MRC in the forward security element, 
will deploy and conduct a meeting battle in a frontage of 3-5 km. 
<H5>  2. Organization of the Meeting Battle </H5>
  Organization of the meeting battle usually includes 
decisionmaking; assignment of combat missions to subunits; 
ground reconnaissance; and organization of fire engagement of 
the enemy, coordination, comprehensive support to battle and 
C[.sup]2[/]. Depending on situation conditions, it may begin 
with receipt of the combat mission or intelligence about enemy 
forward movement, or it may begin with engagement by march 
security when there is a surprise encounter with him. 
  The commander of a company (battalion) operating as part of 
the main body as a rule organizes the meeting battle based on 
the combat mission received. 
  On receiving the combat mission, the commander analyzes it, 
estimates the situation, makes the decision, communicates combat 
missions to subunits, and issues instructions on organizing 
coordination and on the most important questions of 
comprehensive support to battle. This work usually is done in 
movement from a map. 
  If possible, the situation and decision must be reported to 
the senior commander before assigning combat missions. 
  Subsequently the decision made from the map is updated on 
the 
terrain as one moves up to the line of departure, and the 
updated combat missions and coordination procedure are 
communicated to subunits. 
  The commander of a company operating in a forward security 
element (or the commander of a battalion operating in a forward 
detachment or advance guard) begins organizing for a meeting 
battle on receipt of the combat mission or when march security 
encounters the enemy. 
  The content of the company (battalion) commander's work of 
organizing for a meeting battle when it begins both with 
initiation by security elements as well as on receipt of a 
combat mission essentially is identical, but in the first case 
organizing for battle begins with a situation estimate and in 
the second case with analysis of the combat mission received. 
  In analyzing the mission, the commander must 
understand the objective of upcoming operations; the senior 
commander's concept (especially the sequence of routing the 
enemy); the company (battalion) mission, place in the battle 
formation and role in the battle; missions of adjacent subunits 
and procedure for coordinating with them and with subunits of 
other combat arms; and readiness times for performing the 
mission. 
  The commander draws conclusions from analyzing the mission 
in 
which he outlines the direction for concentrating main efforts, 
the kind of maneuver, the procedure of company (battalion) 
operations for swift, effective exploitation of results of fire 
strikes, and the battle formation. 
  After analyzing the mission, he estimates the situation. In 
estimating the enemy he must study the makeup, 
status, position, degree of protection, possible forward 
movement routes, possible nature of his operations, the most 
important objectives for engagement by artillery fire, and that 
part of the grouping whose destruction will lead to disruption 
of the attack or a breakup of the enemy battle formation and 
creation of conditions for his defeat in detail. 
  Because of incompleteness of information, the enemy estimate 
is made chiefly based on his table of organization structure and 
operating tactics. 
  In the estimate of friendly troops account is 
taken of their makeup, situation and nature of operations 
preceding the meeting battle. Estimated above all are 
capabilities for inflicting fire damage on the enemy by organic 
and attached artillery and for preempting him in deploying the 
main body into battle formation. 
  As a rule, in organizing for a meeting battle the enemy and 
friendly troop estimate is made together. For example, it is 
possible to assign combat missions to subunits only based on an 
estimate of the situation, nature of operations and capabilities 
of enemy and friendly subunits. The integrated situation 
estimate lies in the fact that the company commander does not 
study its elements to the full extent, but makes an estimate of 
the enemy, friendly troops and terrain, for example, only in 
order to determine the direction for concentrating main efforts, 
then to resolve other questions, the concept, and the decision 
as a whole. That method of determining the decision permits 
significantly reducing time of organizing for battle, but 
requires commanders to have high training. 
  Based on the estimate of the enemy and friendly troops, the 
company (battalion) commander determines the ratio of forces and 
assets and the time for execution of a maneuver by subunits, and 
he performs other necessary calculations. 
  In estimating the terrain the following are 
established: most advantageous maneuver routes providing egress 
to enemy flanks and rear, lines of deployment and departure and 
the direction of attack of friendly subunits. 
  The company (battalion) commander draws conclusions from the 
situation estimate in which he notes the following: measures for 
prohibiting organized enemy deployment and for preempting him in 
seizing an advantageous line; procedure for fire engagement of 
the main enemy grouping during its deployment into battle 
formation and in the course of battle; missions of the point 
(forward security element); alignment of the battle formation; 
firing position area of organic and attached artillery and 
readiness time for commencing fire; form of maneuver of subunits 
and place of the company (battalion) COP. 
  As a result of comparing conclusions from an analysis of the 
assigned mission and from the situation estimate, the company 
(battalion) commander determines the commander's 
concept, in which he reflects the following: direction for 
concentrating main efforts and form of maneuver; methods for 
routing an enemy who is moving forward (attacking) (what enemy 
to rout where, in what sequence and how, with an indication of 
the fire engagement procedure and measures for his deception); 
and the battle formation. 
  The constant threat of use of nuclear and precision weapons, 
the growth in combat capabilities of forces and assets, changes 
in the organization of units and subunits, and the rapidly 
changing situation demand that in determining elements of the 
concept the company (battalion) commander have creativeness and 
initiative and constantly improve methods of employing forces 
and assets in battle. 
  The direction for concentrating main efforts, the form 
of maneuver, and methods and sequence of defeating the 
enemy must be determined in such a way that the company 
(battalion) main body has superiority over the enemy on its axis 
of operations. The axis for concentrating main efforts should be 
selected on terrain providing most effective employment of 
motorized rifle and tank subunits. It should lead to the flank 
of the opposing enemy's main body, support a move to the combat 
mission line [rubezh boyevoy zadachi] over the shortest distance 
and provide for defeating the enemy in detail. It is advisable 
to select the axis so as to preclude superfluous changes of 
formation and movement of subunits, to achieve superiority over 
the enemy in forces and assets by at least one and one-half 
times, and to ensure the most favorable conditions for his 
defeat. 
  In an actual situation it is hardly possible to select an 
axis of possible concentration of main efforts satisfying all 
the requirements advanced here. Therefore correct determination 
as to which of them should be deemed most important depends only 
on the commander. It may happen that main efforts will be 
concentrated on what is not the most convenient terrain sector 
if this achieves surprise and provides superiority over the 
enemy and delivery of an attack against his flank. 
  In an encounter with an equal or stronger enemy grouping, 
superiority can be achieved by preempting him in commencing 
artillery fire; by immobilizing the main body with fire of 
subunits from advantageous lines and delivering an attack with 
one's main body against the weakest place in the enemy battle 
formation; by using the bulk of forces and assets and the most 
combat effective subunits on the selected axis; and by 
displaying initiative and creativeness and employing 
nonstereotyped operations. 
  Maneuver in a meeting battle must be simple in concept and 
ensure preemption of the enemy in deploying and in inflicting 
maximum damage by fire, a breakup of his march (battle) 
formation, and his destruction in detail. Such forms of maneuver 
as close and deep envelopment are used most often in a meeting 
battle. Wide opportunities appear for their use in connection 
with the presence of exposed flanks and gaps. 
  The main method for defeating the enemy in a 
meeting battle is to engage his advancing subunits by preemptive 
fire of all weapons during deployment into battle formation and 
complete their defeat by a determined assault against the flank 
and rear with his simultaneous immobilization by part of the 
forces from the front. 
  An assault from the front is possible in those cases where 
the enemy is reliably engaged by fire (including by the senior 
commander's weapons) and where it is difficult or impossible for 
subunits to maneuver to the enemy flank and rear due to the 
shortage of time. It permits splitting the enemy apart over the 
shortest axis and simultaneously developing the attack toward 
flanks. Success of a frontal assault can be achieved if it is a 
surprise and the enemy is reliably neutralized by fire of 
artillery and other weapons, otherwise a frontal assault may 
lead to a protracted battle and loss of the initiative. 
  In determining the concept, the procedure for fire 
engagement 
is envisaged to be such that the following occurs: artillery 
fire support of subunits immobilizing the enemy and supporting 
the forward movement and deployment of the main body; 
neutralization of his artillery and mortar subunits and AT 
weapons; engagement of approaching columns and disruption of 
their organized deployment and engagement; support of the 
forward movement and deployment of friendly first echelon 
subunits for the assault; and their support throughout the 
battle. 
  Fire engagement of the enemy can be divided into three main 
stages (periods): delivery of preemptive fire strikes against 
the enemy; artillery preparation of the assault, which usually 
is conducted as one fire assault; and artillery support of the 
assault to the depth of the battalion's immediate mission. 
  In determining the battle formation, the company 
(battalion) commander should proceed from the assumption that it 
is necessary to ensure superiority over the enemy on the axis of 
concentration of main efforts, delivery of a strong initial 
blow, his breakup and his destruction in detail. 
  It must be borne in mind that in organizing for a meeting 
battle the company (battalion) commander may assign missions to 
subunits, for example artillery, to deliver preemptive fire 
strikes against the advancing enemy long before completion of 
such organization, after the situation estimate, after 
determining the concept and so on. This is dictated by the 
limited time for organizing for battle and by the desire to 
provide as much time to subordinate commanders for work as 
possible and preempt the enemy in operations. 
  Company (forward security element) commander's 
concept for a meeting battle 
  (Variant) 
  I decided: Concentrate main efforts on the axis 
Hill 150.0, Sidorovo (Fig. 7). 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-10L-122A>      Fig. 7. 1st MRC commander's decision for a meeting battle </FIG>

  Point in coordination with ATP is to pin down enemy march 
security on the line lone tree, dam. Neutralize enemy personnel 
and weapons by fire of artillery battery as he moves forward and 
deploys in vicinity of edge of Temnyy Forest, trig point, curve 
in road. Execute a maneuver of two MRP's and a TP along the 
route of pipe on the road, grove and rout the enemy company main 
body in the vicinity of the lone house, barrow, Hill 164.5 by an 
assault in fighting vehicles from the line of the dam, barrow, 
take the line of the well, brook by 1030 and support deployment 
of the battalion main body. When main body launches assault, 
attack in direction of curve in road, Sidorovo. 
  Assign a tank to an ambush on the south edge of Temnyy 
Forest 
to prevent the enemy from enveloping the company right flank. 
  The company battle formation is in one echelon. Use the 
artillery battery and ATP centrally. 
  The company (battalion) commander assigns combat missions to 
subunits based on their place in the battle formation and their 
role in defeating the enemy, in accordance with the commander's 
concept and with consideration of the nature of terrain, enemy 
operations and other situation factors. 
  The company (battalion) commander determines the principal 
questions of coordination for the full depth of the meeting 
battle usually for the following missions: inflicting damage by 
preemptive artillery fire on an enemy moving up (attacking); 
capture of a favorable line by a portion of the forces; the 
battle of these subunits in the interests of supporting a 
maneuver of the company (battalion) main body; fire damage of 
the enemy when subunits move forward and deploy for an assault; 
the assault and execution of the immediate mission by the 
company (battalion); and development of the attack. 
  In each mission the company (battalion) commander singles 
out 
the most important stages of operations in which efforts of the 
subunits involved must be coordinated; determines the makeup of 
forces and assets to be working together and subunits performing 
the primary mission and in whose support all others are 
functioning; and plans the time, lines and signals with which 
coordinated operations of troops begin or end. On the whole, the 
methodology of determining the main questions of coordination in 
making a decision for a meeting battle is the very same as in 
decisionmaking for an attack on a defending enemy. 
  In organizing C[.sup]2[/] in a meeting battle the company 
(forward security element) commander determines the places and 
time of deploying COP's and attached subunits and the procedure 
for their displacement in the course of battle. 
  The company (battalion) commander additionally may specify 
tasks for political work and for kinds of support, above all 
reconnaissance, protection against mass destruction weapons, 
chemical warfare support and maskirovka. 
  After making the decision the company (battalion) commander 
assigns missions to subordinates by radio and simultaneously 
communicates the coordination procedure to them. As a rule, 
missions are communicated in brief operational instructions and 
all points, lines and objectives are indicated using codenames 
of local features and signal tables. 
  In some cases the company (battalion) commander may issue an 
operation order if the situation permits. 
  In assigning missions the battalion commander indicates the 
following in the operation order (operational 
instructions): 

  -  for forward security element--makeup, movement 
route, what line to capture and hold and by what time for 
supporting main body deployment, and the procedure of operations 
with beginning of the main body assault; 
  -  for attached 
artillery subunits, mortar (artillery) battery and grenade 
launcher subunit--missions for supporting battle of the 
forward security element and main body, firing position areas, 
readiness time to commence fire, signals for commencing, 
transferring and ceasing fire, and the procedure for 
displacement in the course of battle; 
  -  for MRC's (TC's)--immediate mission and direction 
for continuing the attack, line of departure, time of assault, 
route of forward movement to line of departure, and who is 
supporting; 
  -  for reserve--makeup, place in battle formation, and 
direction and procedure for displacement in the course of 
battle; 
  -  for AT subunit--missions for covering flanks or 
likely avenues of tank approach, firing positions (deployment 
lines), time to occupy them, procedure for commencing and 
ceasing fire, and procedure for displacement in the course of 
battle; 
  -  for air defense subunit--in what directions to 
conduct reconnaissance of the air enemy; what subunits to cover 
against air strikes during forward movement, deployment and in 
the course of battle; place in battle formation and procedure 
for displacement; 
  -  for other reinforcing subunits--procedure for 
supporting forward movement, deployment and assault of battalion 
subunits, place in battle formation and procedure for 
displacement in the course of battle. 


    In the operation order the company (forward 
security element) commander indicates the following: 

  -  for point--makeup, combat mission, procedure 
for operations on encountering the enemy and for reporting the 
situation; 
  -  for motorized rifle (tank) platoons--combat mission, 
procedure for operations on encountering the enemy; 
  -  for reinforcing subunits--missions which they are to 
be ready to execute and place in company march and battle 
formations. 


    In assigning missions to motorized rifle (tank) platoons the 
commander of a company operating as part of the battalion main 
body indicates the combat mission, line and time of departure, 
and coordination procedure. 
  With initiation of a meeting battle, the commander of a 
company operating in the forward security element indicates the 
very same data in assigning combat missions to subunits as does 
the commander of a company in the main body. 
  Fire engagement of the enemy, coordination, comprehensive 
support and C[.sup]2[/] in a meeting battle are organized 
during decisionmaking by the company (battalion) commander and 
during assignment of combat missions to subunits and are not 
singled out as a separate stage of work. In this connection the 
organization of a meeting battle essentially ends with 
assignment of combat missions to subunits. 
<H5>  3. Conduct of a Meeting Battle </H5>
  When a forward moving enemy is discovered, efforts of all 
reconnaissance forces and assets are directed toward uncovering 
his makeup, direction of column movement, and the time, areas 
and lines of deployment of tanks, mechanized infantry and 
artillery. 
  On encountering enemy reconnaissance and march security, the 
battalion's reconnaissance (combat reconnaissance) patrol 
immediately reports this to the battalion commander; without 
engaging, it covertly penetrates to his main body columns, 
determines their makeup and probable nature of operations, and 
keeps an eye out for the approach and direction of forward 
movement of reserves (second echelons). 
  Fire damage of the enemy to disrupt his forward movement and 
organized commitment and to create conditions for defeating him 
in detail begins by the senior commander's assets back before 
enemy columns enter the impact zone of company and battalion 
weapons. As the sides close, pressure on the enemy is built up 
by forces and assets of subunits. 
  A meeting battle of the forward security element, forward 
detachment and advance guard as a rule begins with battle of the 
march security. 
  On encountering small enemy groups, the point destroys them 
by fire and by a determined assault from the move and continues 
performing the assigned mission. On encountering an enemy 
superior in force, the point inflicts damage on him by fire from 
a favorable line and pins down his main body. The company 
commander immediately moves forward, and makes his decision and 
assigns combat missions to platoons and means of reinforcement 
during forward movement. 
  With the point 3-5 km from the company main body, the 
company 
commander spends approximately 8-12 minutes in moving up to it 
at a speed of 25 km/hr. Consequently, in that time he must 
estimate the situation, make a decision and assign missions to 
subordinates. 
  On arriving at the point, the company commander updates his 
decision based on results of its battle and his personal 
observations and communicates updated combat missions and if 
necessary also the coordination procedure to subunits. In 
addition, missions are updated right there on the terrain for 
the point commander and commanders of attached artillery, since 
they are with the company commander, and missions are updated 
for the others by radio. 
  Assignment of missions in meeting battle to 
subunits by the commander of a company operating 
in a forward security element 
  (Variant) 
  1st MRP, the point, is to complete destruction of the enemy 
and by 0940 hours take the line of the forest edge, road and 
hold it until the main body launches the assault. Subsequently 
continue moving in direction of lone house, well. 
  Artillery battery is to neutralize the enemy mechanized 
infantry company--head of column at Hill 160.0, prohibit his 
forward movement and deployment on the line well, trig point. 
Firing positions near road in vicinity of embankment. Readiness 
to commence fire 0925. 
  "Sosna [Pine]-12 (2nd MRP), this is Dub [Oak]-14 (company 
commander), together with Sosna-14 (TP) destroy enemy personnel 
and weapons on south slopes of Hill 164.5 by assault from line 
of trig point, barrow in direction of Hill 150.0, Sidorovo. 
Direction for continuing attack--bushes, curve in road. Route of 
forward movement--embankment, Hill 150.0, barrow. Assault at 
signal `Strela [Arrow]-444' and red flare, this is Dub-14, over." 
  "Sosna-13 (3rd MRP), this is Dub-14 (mission is assigned in 
a 
similar manner)." 
  "Zorkiy [Vigilant]-17 (ATP), this is Dub-14, destroy enemy 
tanks and IFV's by fire from in place, prevent his penetration 
in direction of Hill 164.5, spring. Take up deployment line of 
lone house, dam (excluded) by 0925. Commence-fire signal is 
`Udar [Strike]-21.' During battle displace behind Sosna-13, this 
is Dub-14, over." 
  After assigning combat missions the company commander 
monitors their execution and controls subunits. 
  The forward security element main body moves up swiftly to 
the line of departure indicated for it and, having deployed into 
battle formation from the move, assaults the enemy decisively. 
  Methods of the forward security element's operations in a 
meeting battle (Diagram 19) can be quite varied. Thus, on 
encountering lesser or equal enemy forces, it is capable of 
inflicting damage on them by fire of all weapons from in place, 
destroying tanks and IFV's (APC's), then completing the enemy's 
rout by a swift assault. 
  To ensure the enemy's defeat in detail, the forward security 
element may leave the route or, after executing a maneuver, let 
the enemy lead column pass by, take up a favorable line and 
prevent the approach of succeeding columns. In this situation 
the commander of a battalion operating in an advance guard 
(forward detachment) accomplishes defeat of the enemy who has 
broken away by swift, decisive actions from the front and by a 
flank attack. 
  On encountering an enemy superior in force, the forward 
security element takes up a favorable (designated) line, 
inflicts damage on enemy personnel, tanks and artillery by 
active operations of subunits and by fire of all weapons, and 
supports forward movement and deployment of the battalion main 
body. 
  When the forward security element engages, the commander of 
a 
battalion operating in a forward detachment (advance guard) 
moves up to it. His work of organizing for the meeting battle is 
accomplished in the very same sequence as the work of the 
forward security element commander after the point engages, 
which already has been examined. 
  Field training exercise experience shows that updating of 
the 
battalion commander's decision on the terrain and its 
communication to companies should be completed before they begin 
deploying into platoon columns. This will enable the company and 
platoon commanders to complete organization for battle in their 
subunits promptly. 
  Under cover of the forward security element and the fire of 
artillery and taking advantage of concealed approaches and if 
possible also maskirovka by aerosols (smoke), the forward 
detachment (advance guard) main body quickly executes a 
maneuver, deploys into battle formation from the move and 
completes destruction of enemy march security by a swift assault 
against the flank and rear. 
  Artillery subunits take up firing positions, open fire 
against approaching enemy columns, neutralize his artillery and 
AT weapons, support battle of the forward security element, and 
support the battalion main body's forward movement, deployment 
and commitment. Fire is commenced by battery as they are ready, 
and subsequently is conducted by the full complement of 
artillery. 
  Artillery commences and conducts fire so as to preempt the 
enemy in commencing fire and to disorganize and put his battle 
formations in disarray back before he engages. 
  Deployment of an SP artillery battery from the march and 
preparation for commencing fire takes 11-14 minutes, and a 
battalion requires 15-20 minutes. Combat missions must be 
updated for artillery above all so that all artillery is ready 
to conduct a fire assault against the enemy 10-15 minutes before 
the company (battalion) main body launches the assault. 
  A fire assault lasts 5-10 minutes and sometimes even more. 
Enemy artillery, tanks, IFV's (APC's), AT weapons and personnel 
are engaged during the fire assault. 
  During a meeting battle air defense weapons are in the 
battle 
formation of motorized rifle (tank) subunits in constant 
readiness to engage airborne targets both from short halts as 
well as in movement. 
  The battalion air defense platoon, usually operating by 
squad, covers the main body, artillery, and forward security 
element against enemy air strikes. If the battalion is 
reinforced by air defense weapons, as a rule they are used 
centrally to cover subunits of the main body and artillery. In 
this case the air defense platoon may be attached to a forward 
security element at full strength. 
  The battalion reserve displaces covertly up to 1.5-2 km 
behind first echelon subunits, as a rule on the most threatened 
flank, in readiness to exploit success or accomplish missions 
which arise suddenly. 
  The reserve as a rule is committed by authorization of the 
regimental commander. 
  On receiving his authorization the battalion commander 
assigns a mission to the reserve commander, where he indicates 
means of reinforcement and the procedure for their 
resubordination during commitment. 
  Commitment of the reserve takes around 10-15 minutes (the 
reserve covers 1.5-2 km at an average rate of forward movement 
and deployment of 15 km/hr in 6-8 minutes; in addition, 4-6 
minutes are needed for assigning the combat mission). 
  In making the decision to commit the reserve, the battalion 
commander must provide for its reestablishment at the very first 
opportunity. This may be a platoon from a company which was 
operating in the forward security element, or the company itself 
after it performs its mission. 
  Subunits of AT weapons deploy on likely avenues of tank 
approach and by their fire cover the battalion main body flanks 
against possible enemy assaults. They often operate together 
with subunits supporting commitment of the main body (with the 
forward security element). 
  With initiation of the meeting battle, the battalion 
reconnaissance platoon continues performing its missions, 
concentrating primary efforts on determining (updating) the 
makeup, possible nature of operations, forward movement routes 
and deployment lines of enemy follow-on forces. 
  Logistic and technical support subunits are used in a 
meeting 
battle as in an attack on a defending enemy. They usually deploy 
behind the battalion battle formation, where possible in an area 
difficult of access for tanks. The battalion (company) aid 
station (post) and technical observation posts displace behind 
assaulting subunits. 
  In the course of the meeting battle, combat engineer 
subunits 
attached to the battalion usually operate as part of the main 
body, supporting the forward movement and execution of a 
maneuver by MRC's and TC's. In those cases where battalion 
subunits will be unable to bypass or negotiate obstacles and 
barriers from the move, the combat engineer subunit breaches the 
obstacles and barriers with its own assets. Reinforcing the 
battalion with combat engineer subunits with wide enemy use of 
remote mining of terrain acquires special importance. The time 
for the battalion to move out of an area that has been mined and 
its losses will be considerably less in this case. 
  After destroying enemy march security, the forward 
detachment 
seizes and holds its designated line until the approach of the 
regimental main body, and the advance guard boldly penetrates to 
the enemy main body and immobilizes it. Subsequently the forward 
detachment and advance guard usually operate as part of the 
regimental first echelon. Their launching of an assault together 
with main body subunits is possible only in the presence of 
favorable conditions: gaps in the enemy battle formation and 
attempts to withdraw or execute a maneuver to another axis. 
  If superior enemy forces have preempted the forward 
detachment in moving to its designated line, have preempted the 
advance guard in deployment and are conducting an attack, the 
battalion inflicts damage on them by the fire of organic and 
attached artillery and all other weapons, immobilizes the enemy 
by active operations at the line reached and on a broad front, 
and provides the most favorable conditions for deployment of the 
regimental main body. 
  During the battle to hold a captured line, personnel of 
motorized rifle subunits dismount and the BMP's (BTR's) and 
tanks take up firing positions behind cover so as to conduct 
fire to maximum ranges. 
  A company (battalion) operating as part of the main body 
moves forward covertly to its axis at maximum possible speed, 
deploys into battle formation and assaults the enemy swiftly. 
The battalion reserve is committed after execution of the 
immediate mission and sometimes even earlier. Any kind of halt 
or delay at the battalion's immediate-mission line is 
impermissible. As a rule, at this time the regimental commander 
communicates a new mission to the battalion, but if one is not 
assigned, the battalion commander takes steps to develop the 
attack in the previously indicated direction. 
  With an enemy attempt to consolidate at a favorable line and 
support commitment of the main body, the company (battalion) 
breaks him apart by fire and a determined assault from the front 
and flanks, destroys personnel and weapons and continues 
performing assigned combat mission. 
  On detecting an enemy withdrawal the battalion immediately 
shifts to the pursuit, destroys covering-force subunits, swiftly 
penetrates to his main body and destroys it in coordination with 
subunits conducting a pursuit along parallel routes. A company 
(battalion) operating on an enveloping flank must move swiftly 
along the shortest routes onto the enemy withdrawal axis and 
assault him decisively. 
  The commander exercises C[.sup]2[/] of company (battalion) 
subunits in a meeting battle by brief commands, instructions and 
signals from the COP, which usually displaces up to 200 (300) m 
behind battle formations of first echelon companies on the axis 
of concentration of main efforts. 
  The company (battalion) commander must keep a watchful eye 
on 
a change in the situation and promptly update the decision and 
combat missions for subunits. On discovering enemy preparation 
to deliver fire strikes and an attempt to execute a maneuver or 
commit the reserve, it is necessary to inflict fire damage on 
the enemy by artillery, move friendly subunits out from under 
the strike and, making wide use of the maneuver of forces and 
assets and ambushes, complete his defeat by an assault of 
motorized rifle and tank subunits. 
  On encountering the enemy, a company operating in a flank 
security element immobilizes him by fire and active operations 
on favorable lines and gives the regimental main body an 
opportunity to maneuver for performing the assigned mission. If 
the regiment (battalion) deploys toward the flank on which the 
flank security element is located, the latter operates in the 
very same manner as the forward security element. 
  If a tactical airborne assault force is landed on the axis 
of 
company (battalion) operations, the commander must take all 
steps to link up with it and perform the assigned mission by 
joint operations. 
<H5>  Chapter VII - Battle in Encirclement and Breakout of </H5>
Encirclement 
<H5>  1. Battle in Encirclement </H5>
  An encirclement does not arise suddenly. It is the result of 
an unsuccessful outcome of battle and a move of enemy subunits 
to the flanks and rear of a company (battalion). 
  A company (battalion) may find itself in encirclement 
(Diagram 19) in an attack when it is operating in isolation from 
the main body as a tactical airborne assault force or a 
reconnaissance, special (forward) or raiding detachment. In 
addition, having halted attacking troops, the enemy may cut off 
a company (battalion) from the main body by counterattacks and 
then encircle it. 
  Encirclement also is possible with an unsuccessful outcome 
of 
a meeting battle and in a withdrawal when the pursuing enemy's 
rate of advance is higher than the rate of withdrawing subunits. 
But encirclement will occur most often in a defensive battle as 
a result of enemy penetration of the defense of adjacent 
subunits and his move to the flanks and rear of a company 
(battalion) with subsequent establishment of a perimeter of 
envelopment. 
  A company (battalion) which has ended up in encirclement or 
in the enemy rear (but not encircled) must pin down as many of 
his forces as possible by active, determined actions, thereby 
contributing to the main body's successful performance of the 
combat mission. 
  As a rule, an encirclement is preceded by battles with an 
enemy of superior force, and so a company (battalion) may have 
considerable losses and in addition may end up in encirclement 
not at full strength. 
  If subunits which are not a part of the company (battalion) 
end up in encirclement together with it, the company (battalion) 
commander is obligated to subordinate them to himself and 
subsequently employ them in accordance with the situation at 
hand. 
  The makeup of forces and assets which end up encircled 
together with the company (battalion) is impossible to determine 
in advance but, as the experience of wars and exercises shows, 
these may be air defense, artillery and technical and logistic 
support subunits which previously were located in or near a 
company strongpoint (battalion defense area) or withdrew from 
previously occupied positions (areas). 
  The company (battalion) mission in battle in 
encirclement is to firmly hold the occupied strongpoint (defense 
area), prevent the enemy from breaking subunits apart and 
inflict significant losses on him. 
  The size of a strongpoint (defense area) depends on the 
makeup of forces and assets of subunits which ended up in 
encirclement. It must ensure repulse of enemy attack and 
preclude dissipation of forces and assets and a reduction in 
fire density. At the same time, the area of the strongpoint 
(defense area) should not be restricted, otherwise it will lead 
to overcompaction of forces and assets, increased losses from 
enemy fire and impedance of maneuver. 
  These basic requirements on size of a company strongpoint 
(battalion defense area) are realized in the case where the 
company holds a strongpoint 1.5-2 km around the perimeter and 
the battalion holds a defense area up to 6-8 km in circumference 
around a circular front. In this case the average depth of a 
company strongpoint will be around 500-700 m and that of the 
battalion defense area 2-3 km, which ensures a dispersed 
disposition of the battle formation. 
  An MRC holding an area with a perimeter up to 1.5-2 km 
during 
battle in encirclement can create small arms fire densities 
(with losses up to 25 percent) of 4-6 bullets per meter of 
frontage per minute and densities of AT weapons, BMP's and tanks 
(counting RPG's and the attached TP) of 8-10, which as a whole 
is considered sufficient for creating a stable defense under 
these conditions. Usually the size of the company strongpoint 
(battalion defense area) is the very same as in the defense or 
somewhat less. 
  The battle formation of the company (battalion) 
for battle in encirclement is created as the threat arises and 
as the situation permits regrouping forces and assets for 
shifting to a perimeter defense. 
  The considerable extent of the circular defense frontage and 
usually the presence of several threatened axes and a shortage 
of forces and assets require an alignment of the company 
(battalion) battle formation which would ensure concentration of 
efforts on each threatened axis. This requirement is met to the 
greatest extent by a single-echelon alignment of the battle 
formation with assignment of a reserve: in the company up to a 
squad in strength and in the battalion up to a platoon and 
sometimes even more. Thus, the company (battalion) battle 
formation includes the following: first echelon subunits; a 
reserve; weapons and reinforcing subunits remaining directly 
subordinate to the company (battalion) commander; and armored 
groups and fire ambushes. 
  A platoon (company) of a first echelon company (battalion) 
prepares strongpoints in such a way that they intercept the most 
likely avenues of enemy assaults in order to split his company 
(battalion) battle formation and destroy him in detail. 
  The company (battalion) reserve will be disposed in the 
center of the strongpoint (defense area) in a place from where 
it is possible to execute a maneuver quickly to threatened axes. 
  As a rule, tank (motorized rifle), artillery, air defense, 
grenade launcher and AT subunits that are organic or attached to 
the battalion and which ended up in encirclement with it are 
attached to companies and disposed in their strongpoints. Part 
of the artillery is moved up to conduct direct fire. Artillery 
remaining directly subordinate to the battalion commander takes 
up firing positions in the center of the battalion defense area 
in readiness for a maneuver to repel enemy assaults from any 
threatened axis. 
  Both in the company as well as in the battalion, it is 
advisable to make wide use of armored groups and fire ambushes 
during battle in encirclement. Their makeup and the procedure 
for their combat employment will be the very same as in an 
"ordinary" defense. 
  Subunits of engineer and chemical troops attached to the 
battalion are disposed near the battalion COP. 
  The company (battalion) COP is prepared in the depth of the 
strongpoint (defense area) in a place difficult for tank access 
and providing visual observation of operations of the enemy and 
friendly subunits on the most dangerous axis. 
  On the whole, during battle in encirclement the company 
(battalion) battle formation has the very same elements as in an 
ordinary defense, but their disposition must permit reacting as 
quickly as possible to enemy attempts to penetrate the defense 
frontage on any axis. 
  The system of company (battalion) strongpoints and firing 
positions is distinguished from an ordinary defense by the 
absence of a combat security outpost position in the battalion, 
by the circular disposition of platoon (company) strongpoints, 
and by establishment of the largest possible number of alternate 
firing positions, which must ensure conduct of fire not only 
toward the front, but also to the rear and toward flanks. One 
does not always succeed in preparing trenches and communication 
trenches in strongpoints or accomplishing engineer preparation 
of the occupied position to the full extent because of the 
shortage of time and also enemy pressure. Therefore it is 
necessary to take skilled advantage of the nature of terrain and 
its protective and concealing properties and prepare fire sacks 
and ambush sites. The company (battalion) commander should take 
all steps and realize all opportunities for engineer preparation 
of the defense. 
  A feature of battle in encirclement is that battalion rear 
and technical support subunits usually are disposed together 
(having the very same entities as in a defense). There is 
engineer preparation of their location and it is included in the 
system of strongpoints and firing positions. 
  The company (battalion) system of fire in battle in 
encirclement should conform to the situation at hand and ensure 
engagement of the enemy ahead of the entire frontage and in the 
depth of the perimeter defense. The system of fire is created 
with consideration of the fire damage being accomplished by the 
senior commander. 
  Companies and platoons are assigned zones of fire and 
weapons 
conducting direct fire are assigned sectors of fire. Zones of 
fire of adjacent subunits (weapons) should overlap. 
  A first echelon company (platoon) usually prepares a firing 
position in a zone of 2-3 km (500-700 m). 
  To mislead the enemy regarding the structure of the company 
(battalion) system of fire, roving guns (BMP's, tanks) are 
assigned and fire ambushes are prepared on possible enemy 
penetration axes. 
  The system of fire is tied in in a most thorough manner with 
the disposition of minefields so that when tanks, IFV's, APC's 
and other fighting vehicles attempt to go around the minefield 
they present their most vulnerable places to fire. 
  The possibility of an enemy penetration on any threatened 
axis requires preparation of a maneuver both of weapons as well 
as of fire. 
  Lines of firing positions are prepared for reserves, armored 
groups and other weapons, and alternate firing positions are 
prepared for the SP artillery battery to destroy individual 
enemy groups that have penetrated. 
  A system of engineer obstacles is established with 
consideration of terrain and the company (battalion) battle 
formation and is tied in closely with systems of strongpoints 
and firing positions and especially with the system of fire. 
  In connection with the fact that company (battalion) 
capabilities for laying minefields are limited in a period of 
organizing and conducting battle in encirclement, it is 
necessary to make wide use of minefields laid in advance, 
coordinating the disposition of strongpoints and positions with 
their location, and sometimes relocate them if time is 
available. It is necessary to make wider use of abatis and 
demolition of various objects, which will hamper enemy maneuver. 
  Thus, alignment of the company (battalion) defense and 
missions of subunits in a battle in encirclement to a 
considerable extent remain the very same as under ordinary 
conditions. At the same time, they are distinguished by a number 
of features already noted which the commander must take into 
account in preparing for battle. 
  Preparing for battle in encirclement includes those same 
measures as preparing a defense under ordinary conditions. A 
number of them are carried out in advance, such as preparing 
subunits to perform the combat mission and organizing and 
conducting political work. Subsequently this work is only 
concretized with consideration of the situation at hand and with 
a change in missions. 
  Organization for battle in encirclement usually is preceded 
by conduct of measures to prevent encirclement. 
  If a threat of encirclement arises the company (battalion) 
commander is obligated to do the following: beef up observation 
and additionally organize reconnaissance and fire ambushes on 
flanks, boundaries and in gaps, reliably supporting them by AT 
fire and obstacles; strive not only to prevent encirclement, but 
also to defeat enveloping enemy subunits; organize the 
concentration of fire of all weapons, and especially AT fire, on 
threatened flanks; regroup forces and assets, above all tanks 
and BMP's, move the second echelon (reserve) up to a threatened 
axis, prevent the company (battalion) battle formation from 
being broken up and prevent the enemy from moving to the flanks 
and rear; and boldly, swiftly and decisively counterattack 
against the flank and rear of enveloping enemy subunits in 
coordination with the senior commander's forces and make wide 
use of artillery fire and the assistance of adjacent subunits. 
  In case measures to prevent encirclement taken by the 
company 
(battalion) commander and senior commander will not lead to 
success and a withdrawal order (instruction) is not received, a 
decision is made for battle in encirclement. It will be made 
under difficult situation conditions, where subunits are 
fighting an intensive battle with an enemy attempting to 
complete encirclement of the company (battalion). In some cases 
the decision for battle in encirclement is made based on the 
senior commander's operational instructions. 
  To make the advisable decision, the company (battalion) 
commander organizes reconnaissance by observation and by other 
methods if possible in order to clarify the situation and makeup 
of the enemy surrounding the company (battalion). 
  In estimating the enemy special attention must be given to 
where he is preparing to launch an attack and with what forces. 
  In estimating friendly troops, in addition to those 
questions 
studied under ordinary conditions the company (battalion) 
commander must study the status, capabilities, degree of 
protection and degree of supply of subunits which are not part 
of the company (battalion) but which have ended up in 
encirclement, and subordinate them to himself. 
  The commander must perform the situation estimate throughout 
the entire period of operations preceding encirclement, and so 
very little time is spent on this stage of the work of 
decisionmaking. 
  Based on the situation estimate the company commander takes 
steps to shift to a perimeter defense, reinforce likely avenues 
of tank approach with tanks, BMP's and AT weapons, close gaps in 
the battle formation by fire and obstacles, prepare a maneuver 
of forces and assets to threatened axes and establish a reserve. 
While subunits are performing these measures he determines the 
decision, which includes the very same questions as a decision 
for a defense. 
  The company commander makes the decision for battle in 
encirclement basically on the terrain and the battalion 
commander does so on the terrain and from a map, then he updates 
it once again on the terrain on those axes not viewed from the 
COP. 
  An operation order is not issued in connection with the fact 
that battle in encirclement is organized in the course of a 
defense or other operations. The company (battalion) commander 
assigns combat missions to subunits as brief operational 
instructions. The coordination procedure, and if necessary also 
some of the most important questions of comprehensive support, 
must be communicated to subordinate commanders. 
  Coordination is organized for those same missions as in 
defensive battle. The efforts of platoons (companies), weapons 
and the reserve are coordinated additionally in case the enemy 
delivers strikes from several directions and splits the battle 
formation into parts. 
  Organization of logistic support is difficult during company 
(battalion) battle in encirclement. Encircled subunits will be 
forced to fight with those reserves of ammunition and supplies 
which they have. In connection with this the company (battalion) 
commander immediately must make a strict accounting of all 
available ammunition, fuel, food and other supplies, establish a 
rigid regime of consumption and if necessary redistribute them 
among subunits in accordance with missions being performed. 
  Reserves of supplies may be replenished by air delivery, and 
use of captured weapons and ammunition is possible. 
  Conduct of battle in encirclement begins from the moment 
superior enemy forces move to the flanks and rear of a company 
(battalion) and intercept all withdrawal routes for linkup with 
friendly troops. 
  Simultaneously with encirclement, the enemy immediately will 
attempt to break up the company (battalion) battle formation and 
destroy it in detail. To keep this from happening, it is 
necessary to conduct reconnaissance constantly, estimate the 
situation at hand thoroughly and comprehensively, and update the 
decision and communicate combat missions to subunits promptly. 
  Subunits must hold occupied strongpoints firmly, maneuver 
forces, assets and fire to a threatened axis quickly and 
covertly, and be ready to destroy an enemy who has penetrated by 
fire and a determined counterattack. 
  An enemy assault is repelled by fire of all company 
(battalion) weapons. When the enemy penetrates, the company 
(battalion) commander takes all steps to stop his advance and 
then destroy him by a swift counterattack. 
  If he has not achieved success on one axis, after regrouping 
forces and assets the enemy will attempt to deliver an attack in 
another sector. In this situation a commander must promptly 
discover the transfer of enemy efforts and quickly organize and 
accomplish a maneuver of the reserve or of subunits from sectors 
not under attack to the threatened axis. 
  In those cases where the enemy has penetrated in several 
sectors, steps must be taken to destroy him on the most 
dangerous axis. A shortage of forces and assets will not allow 
routing a penetrated enemy on other axes as well, and so there 
it is advisable to prevent a further advance of his subunits 
into the depth of the company (battalion) defense. 
  During battle in encirclement the company (battalion) must 
maintain constant coordination with subunits operating outside 
of encirclement, promptly mark the position of subordinate 
subunits for friendly aviation, and participate in 
counterattacks conducted by the senior commander. 
  To receive cargoes a company (battalion) prepares sites for 
helicopters to land in its disposition and organizes the receipt 
and gathering of cargoes dropped from aircraft. 
  It is necessary to conduct political work skillfully and 
purposefully to keep the personnel's morale at a high level and 
to preserve efficiency and constant combat readiness of subunits. 
  In organizing and conducting battle in encirclement the 
company (battalion) commander must strive to inflict maximum 
damage on the enemy and create conditions for breaking out of 
encirclement. 
<H5>  2. Breakout of Encirclement </H5>
  Breaking out of encirclement consists of breaking through 
the 
noose of encirclement in a selected sector (on a selected axis) 
for linkup with friendly troops (Diagram 20). 
  To achieve surprise and concealment of operations it is 
advisable to begin the breakthrough of encirclement at night and 
under conditions of limited visibility, sometimes even without 
conducting fire preparation. 
  A breakout of encirclement is accomplished by permission of 
the senior commander in coordination with subunits conducting 
oncoming combat operations from the outer perimeter, or 
independently. 
  The senior commander indicates the direction of breakthrough 
and of further operations in a breakout of encirclement in 
coordination with subunits conducting oncoming combat operations 
from the outer perimeter. If a company (battalion) is breaking 
out independently, the company (battalion) commander determines 
the direction for breakout and procedure for further operations. 
  Breaking out of encirclement in small groups and without 
armament usually leads to heavy losses and disruption of the 
organizational integrity of subunits, and therefore is 
impermissible. 
  In aligning the battle formation it should be taken into 
account that a company (battalion) not only has to break through 
the perimeter of envelopment, but also hold the strongpoint 
(area) for a certain time, secure flanks of subunits 
accomplishing the breakthrough and perform missions that arise 
suddenly. Therefore the company (battalion) battle formation 
should include the following: breakthrough subunits; subunits 
assigned to cover the breakthrough, including those assigned to 
secure flanks (screens); a reserve; and reinforcing weapons and 
subunits remaining directly subordinate to the company 
(battalion) commander. 
  At least half of all subunits and a large part of the 
artillery are assigned to break through the noose of 
encirclement. Motorized rifle (tank) subunits are reinforced by 
tanks (motorized rifle subunits), AT weapons, and mineclearing 
(obstacle breaching) equipment. The makeup of breakthrough 
subunits includes the most combat-effective forces and assets. 
  A minimum number of subunits remains on the rest of the 
perimeter of envelopment for covering the breakthrough with the 
mission of holding occupied positions, misleading the enemy by 
active operations, diverting a portion of his forces (reserves) 
from the breakthrough axis, prevent a narrowing of the perimeter 
of envelopment and of the breakthrough sector, and supporting 
the exit of all company (battalion) subunits from the noose of 
encirclement. Usually a platoon (company) and sometimes even 
more is assigned from the company (battalion) to the covering 
force. The least amount of forces and assets is assigned in 
those cases where the enemy shows no activeness and the breakout 
of encirclement is done at night or under conditions of poor 
visibility. As a rule, an MRP (TP), tanks, and BMP-equipped 
MRS's are assigned to screens. The number of screens depends on 
the depth of the perimeter of envelopment on the breakthrough 
axis. Screens are disposed at that distance from each other 
ensuring cover of flanks of subunits making the breakthrough on 
the most threatened axes. Screens operate as flank security 
elements after the company (battalion) breaks out of the noose 
of encirclement and until linkup with friendly troops. As a 
rule, screens are assigned from the makeup of subunits assigned 
as a covering force. 
  Subunits assigned as a covering force are reinforced by 
artillery, tanks (motorized rifle subunits), and subunits of 
engineer troops with obstacle assets. 
  A company reserve usually is established consisting of an 
MRS 
(tank), and a battalion reserve consisting of a platoon, 
intended for performing missions arising in the course of 
battle. It is disposed in that place from where there is an 
opportunity to support subunits assigned for the breakthrough in 
a short time, exploit their success and if necessary repel 
assaults of an enemy who has penetrated the defense of covering- 
force subunits. 
  Attached and organic artillery as well as artillery which 
has 
ended up in encirclement together with the company (battalion), 
with the exception of that assigned to reinforce covering 
forces, is used centrally on the axis of breakthrough of the 
perimeter of envelopment. 
  Artillery, other weapons and subunits remaining directly 
subordinate to the company (battalion) commander take up firing 
positions (areas) behind battle formations of subunits breaking 
through the perimeter of envelopment, in readiness to support 
their actions and the breakout of remaining forces and assets 
from encirclement through the breach formed. When the perimeter 
of envelopment is small, they may remain at occupied firing 
positions (or in occupied areas). 
  When a company (battalion) breaks out of encirclement as 
part 
of a battalion (regiment) in coordination with subunits 
conducting oncoming combat operations from the outer perimeter, 
the combat mission is assigned to the company (battalion) by the 
senior commander. With an independent breakout of encirclement 
by a company (battalion), its combat mission as a 
rule is specified by the commander of this company (battalion). 
A company is given an immediate mission and a direction for 
continuing the attack and a battalion is given an immediate and 
subsequent mission. 
  The battalion's immediate mission usually is to destroy the 
enemy on the breakthrough axis and breach the perimeter of 
envelopment. 
  The subsequent mission is for subunits to break out of 
encirclement and link up with troops operating toward them in 
assisting the breakout, or to take an area providing favorable 
conditions for further operations. 
  The company's immediate mission usually is to destroy the 
enemy on the breakthrough axis and breach the perimeter of 
envelopment. 
  The immediate mission of a company operating as part of a 
battalion will coincide with the battalion's immediate mission 
in depth, and so the direction for continuing the attack is 
determined so as to ensure performance of the battalion's 
subsequent mission. 
  In other cases this direction should ensure a linkup with 
subunits operating toward the company from the outer perimeter 
of envelopment or the company's breakout into an area favoring 
further operations. 
  The depth of the company (battalion) immediate mission will 
depend on the makeup and alignment of the enemy grouping on the 
axis of breakthrough of the perimeter of envelopment. 
  As shown by an analysis of enemy views on conduct of combat 
operations to destroy encircled groupings, the basis of troops 
forming the inner perimeter of envelopment usually consists of 
battalions (battalion task forces) whose battle formation is 
formed in one or two echelons depending on the makeup of the 
encircled grouping. In this case the depth of the perimeter of 
envelopment averages 3-5 km. The depth of the company 
(battalion) immediate mission accordingly will be the very same. 
  Enemy subunits making up the perimeter of envelopment as a 
rule are in an offensive grouping, and so a company (battalion) 
needs to create a superiority of no more than 1-1.5 times for 
success of the breakthrough. But in connection with the fact 
that in this case densities of enemy forces and assets are 
significantly higher than in the defense and subunits fighting 
the battle in encirclement have considerable losses, the 
breakthrough frontage of the company (battalion) usually is up 
to 500 (1,000) m. 
  Organizing the breakout of encirclement begins with receipt 
of the combat mission or with the senior commander's 
authorization to break out of encirclement. 
  The company (battalion) commander makes the decision from 
the 
map and updates it during ground reconnaissance of the 
breakthrough sector. 
  The very same questions are determined in the 
decision for breaking out of encirclement as in the 
decision for the attack: commander's concept, combat missions 
for subunits, the main questions of coordination, and 
organization of C[.sup]2[/]. 
  In the commander's concept the company (battalion) 
commander outlines the following: sector and axis for 
breakthrough of the perimeter of envelopment; methods of 
defeating the enemy (what enemy to defeat where, in what 
sequence and how, with an indication of the procedure for his 
engagement by fire of tanks, BMP's and other organic and 
attached weapons; measures for deception, including the sector 
and axis of diversionary actions; actions of subunits in 
breaking out of encirclement; and the order of withdrawal of 
subunits covering the breakthrough and assigned to screens); 
company (battalion) battle formation; forces and assets used for 
the breakthrough and for covering and securing flanks; attack 
position of subunits intended for the breakthrough and the 
procedure and time for occupying it. 
  The breakthrough axis should be selected where it is 
possible 
to concentrate forces and assets in the breakthrough sector 
covertly in a short time, where the enemy's perimeter of 
envelopment has least depth, and so as to provide for linkup 
over the shortest distance with subunits conducting oncoming 
combat operations from the outer perimeter. 
  Choosing the time for breaking through the perimeter of 
envelopment requires the company (battalion) commander to 
perform a thorough analysis of the situation at hand. It is most 
advantageous to begin the breakthrough at that moment when the 
enemy has ceased active operations to destroy the encircled 
subunits or has shifted to sealing them off, but has not managed 
to consolidate and change his battle formation and to create a 
defensive grouping. 
  Diversionary actions are conducted to mislead the enemy 
regarding the axis of the company (battalion) breakout of 
encirclement and to divert his reserves from the breakthrough 
sector. An axis and sector are designated for conducting 
diversionary actions; up to a platoon is assigned for this in 
the company and up to a company in the battalion with means of 
reinforcement, and they are supported by artillery fire. 
Diversionary actions may begin simultaneously with the 
breakthrough of the perimeter of envelopment or somewhat 
earlier, depending on the situation. If they precede the 
breakthrough, there is the possibility of diverting enemy 
reserves from the breakthrough sector, but at the same time the 
diversionary actions may give the enemy grounds to presume that 
a breakout of the company (battalion) from encirclement is 
imminent. 
  In his decision the company (battalion) commander assigns 
missions to subunits in the following sequence: 
breakthrough subunits; subunits for covering and securing 
flanks; the reserve; and reinforcing weapons and subunits 
remaining directly subordinate to him. 
  The main questions of coordination additionally 
reflect the procedure for coordinated operations of company 
(battalion) subunits with troops which are outside the perimeter 
of envelopment. 
  Subsequently the company (battalion) commander determines 
the 
following: missions by kinds of support to battle and 
organization of reconnaissance before and during the 
breakthrough of the perimeter of envelopment and in the course 
of further operations; and the procedure for expenditure of 
ammunition and fuel, evacuation of wounded and destruction of 
unserviceable vehicles and weapons. 
  In the course of ground reconnaissance he clarifies the 
following: enemy makeup, situation and nature of operations; 
whether the enemy is shifting to sealing off the encircled 
troops or is preparing repeat assaults; targets, attack position 
of subunits, procedure for occupying it, and method of assault; 
missions for breakthrough subunits, procedure for breaking out 
of encirclement, and questions of coordination among weapons and 
assaulting subunits. 
  With a breakout of encirclement at night the company 
(battalion) commander specifies the line which subunits must 
reach by dawn. 
  Combat missions are communicated to subunits in the form of 
an operation order and sometimes also by brief 
operational instructions. The following are indicated in 
assigning missions: 

  -  for subunits designated for the breakthrough-- 
means of reinforcement, missions, attack position for the 
breakthrough and time of occupying it; 
  -  for covering-force subunits--means of reinforcement, 
mission, sector of diversionary actions, what forces and assets 
to allocate for covering flanks (to screens), who is supporting, 
and the time and procedure for withdrawal; 
  -  for the reserve--makeup, assembly area and procedure 
for displacement; 
  -  for attached artillery subunit, mortar (SP artillery) 
battery, grenade launcher subunit, air defense subunit and AT 
subunit--missions for fire engagement of the enemy and for 
covering friendly subunits against air strikes, and the time and 
procedure for breaking out of encirclement. 


    After assigning combat missions the company commander issues 
coordination instructions, in which he first of all 
coordinates actions of subunits breaking through the perimeter 
of envelopment with each other, with weapons and with covering- 
force subunits. 
  Coordination of efforts with covering-force subunits 
consists 
of determining the method and procedure for them to hold 
positions and withdraw from line to line. The number of 
withdrawal lines depends on the nature of enemy pressure and 
terrain conditions. 
  Special attention is given to coordinating oncoming combat 
operations of friendly subunits and troops operating outside of 
encirclement in terms of time, axes of operations and the lines 
they capture, above all in the approach to the linkup point in 
order to preclude mutual engagement by fire. 
  After assigning combat missions and organizing coordination 
the company (battalion) commander issues instructions on 
organizing comprehensive support in which he establishes the 
following: missions for observers (for reconnaissance); measures 
for ensuring concealment and surprise of the breakthrough; 
nature and procedure of engineer preparation of terrain in the 
breakthrough sector and at the covering-force position 
(positions); places, time and methods of breaching enemy 
obstacles; what should be mined, demolished or destroyed and at 
what time; organization of C[.sup]2[/] during the 
breakthrough; procedure for marking one's position for aviation 
and for recognition of friendly troops operating from the outer 
perimeter of envelopment; procedure for evacuating wounded and 
sick as well as weapons and vehicles; and commanders responsible 
for fulfilling comprehensive support measures. 
  If the breakout of encirclement is done at night, the 
company 
(battalion) commander additionally indicates the procedure for 
illumination support of the attack and withdrawal, reference 
points, and azimuth (direction) of attack. Conventional signs 
which are placed on equipment and the personnel's clothing also 
are established. 
  Ammunition and fuel are redistributed, with the bulk 
allocated to subunits making the breakthrough of the perimeter 
of envelopment. 
  Organizing comprehensive support is an important moment in 
preparing for battle, since a successful breakout of subunits 
from encirclement depends on it to a considerable extent. 
  Conduct of battle when breaking out of encirclement is 
characterized by a short duration and extreme ferocity. In a 
short time the company (battalion) commander has to break 
through the perimeter of envelopment, create a breach in the 
noose of encirclement and support the breakout of all subunits 
at full strength with weapons. 
  Success in breaking out of encirclement depends largely on 
timely establishment of the battle formation, disengagement, and 
occupation of an attack position by breakthrough subunits. 
  Disengagement and occupation of an attack position by 
breakthrough subunits can be done simultaneously or successively 
with observance of maskirovka. Depending on terrain and 
visibility conditions, it is advisable to conceal these 
operations by use of smoke (aerosols) while preserving the 
regime of previous troop activity on the entire company 
(battalion) defense frontage. 
  Covering-force subunits conducting diversionary actions 
decisively assault the enemy at the prescribed time, supported 
by fire of attached artillery, and divert his reserves to 
themselves; if the assault is disrupted they conduct a 
firefight, denying the enemy an opportunity to execute a 
maneuver of forces and assets. 
  As a rule, the breakthrough begins with fire preparation. If 
fire preparation is not conducted, for example at night, then 
fire commences when breakthrough subunits launch the assault and 
artillery immediately accomplishes fire support of the assault. 
  Tanks may be used in fire preparation. 
  It is advisable to conduct the assault in BMP's (BTR's) for 
rapid exploitation of results of fire damage of the enemy. 
Subunits assault in dismounted formation if an assault in 
fighting vehicles is impossible or inadvisable because of 
situation conditions (terrain difficult of access, insufficient 
degree of damage of enemy AT weapons). 
  Subunits which are breaking through the perimeter of 
envelopment advance swiftly without allowing an enemy who has 
been neutralized by fire to restore combat effectiveness. 
Artillery and weapons assigned for direct fire neutralize and 
destroy enemy targets which have come alive or have been newly 
detected. 
  Subunits assigned for covering flanks (screens) consolidate 
at favorable lines as the breakthrough develops, in readiness to 
repel enemy assaults against the flank of the breakthrough 
subunits, and form a corridor into which company (battalion) 
subunits immediately begin moving in the previously established 
order. If necessary, screens are reinforced by the reserve. 
Technical support and rear subunits break out of encirclement 
immediately behind subunits making the breakthrough, and 
transportation assets are provided first of all for evacuating 
the wounded and sick. Weapons, vehicles, missiles, ammunition, 
fuel and other supplies which cannot be evacuated are destroyed 
only by order of the company (battalion) commander. 
  During the breakthrough, covering-force subunits hold 
occupied positions, not allowing a narrowing of the perimeter of 
envelopment, and withdraw only by order of the company 
(battalion) commander. The withdrawal is made from line to line 
under cover of fire of all kinds of weapons, aerosols (smoke), 
obstacles and screens, which withdraw only after withdrawal of 
covering-force subunits. If the distance of subunits attacking 
from the outer perimeter is significant, the withdrawal of 
covering-force subunits can begin only after breakthrough of the 
perimeter of envelopment. 
  With a short distance to troops operating from the outer 
perimeter of envelopment, covering-force subunits withdraw after 
the company (battalion) links up with friendly troops. 
  After the breakthrough the company (battalion) continues 
nonstop movement for linkup with friendly troops, using a 
portion of the forces to hold the breach which has formed until 
all subunits break out of the noose of encirclement. 
  Artillery concentrates efforts on destroying enemy weapons 
on 
flanks of the corridor, supporting the unhindered advance of 
columns of subunits breaking out of encirclement. Artillery from 
the makeup of breakthrough forces displaces as in offensive 
battle in such a way as to ensure continuous fire support of the 
assaulting subunits. Artillery and other weapons assigned to 
reinforce the covering forces change firing positions in advance 
before motorized rifle and tank subunits begin to withdraw. 
  AT and air defense subunits displace in battle formations of 
the assaulting subunits or immediately behind them at shortened 
distances. 
  During the breakout of encirclement the company (battalion) 
commander organizes march security using screens which have 
performed their mission, and conducts continuous reconnaissance. 
  Special subunits are assigned to preempt the enemy in 
capturing favorable lines, defiles, and crossings over water 
obstacles. These same subunits are first to move to the 
established linkup point with troops attacking from the outer 
perimeter. 
  When there is a threat of the enemy closing the breach and 
breaking up the company (battalion) battle formation, some of 
the subunits which have broken out of the noose of encirclement 
return and assault the enemy, restoring the corridor. The 
company (battalion) reserve is used for this same purpose. 
  The company (battalion) commander exercises C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits during the breakout of encirclement from his COP, 
located in a BMP (BTR, tank), and proceeds with subunits making 
the breakthrough. 
  As a rule, communications are maintained over wire means 
before the beginning of the breakthrough, and subsequently by 
radio. Radio operating data for communicating with troops 
operating from the outer perimeter are communicated to 
commanders of platoons (companies, separate platoons) in case of 
independent operations when communications are lost with the 
company (battalion) commander. 
  The company (battalion) is assigned a new combat mission 
after it breaks out of encirclement (links up with friendly 
troops, takes an area providing favorable conditions for further 
operations). 
<H5>  Chapter VIII - Movement </H5>
<H5>  1. Principles of Movement and the March </H5>
  A company (battalion) always must be ready for movement 
under 
conditions of the threat of enemy use of mass destruction and 
precision weapons and remote minelaying systems and the effect 
of his aviation, airborne assault forces, airmobile and raiding 
and reconnaissance parties, NBC contamination, and destructive 
damage of roads and crossings. 
  A company (battalion) may move under its own power (by 
march), be transported by rail or sea (river) transportation, or 
move by a combination method. In addition, an MRC (MRB) may be 
carried by air transport and a TC (TB) on trucktrailer rigs. 
  A march is the organized movement of subunits in 
columns along roads and cross-country routes for moving to a 
designated area or an indicated line. It is the basic method of 
company (battalion) movement. 
  Depending on the company (battalion) mission and its 
distance 
from the enemy, a march may be made in anticipation of 
engagement with the enemy or without the threat of a 
clash with him, and in terms of direction of movement it 
may be made toward or along the front or from front to rear. 
  In all cases a march must be made covertly, as a rule at 
night or under other conditions of limited visibility, and also 
during the day in a combat situation and in the deep rear of 
friendly troops. Under all situation conditions subunits must 
arrive in the designated area or at the indicated line promptly, 
at full strength and ready to perform the combat mission. 
  The company (battalion) marches as one column. The distance 
between vehicles and subunits in a column may be 25-50 m. 
Distances are increased when moving under conditions of limited 
visibility, along dusty roads, with ground surface icing, on 
steep upgrades, downgrades and turns, and at increased speed. 
Distances between combat vehicles may be 100-150 m when moving 
on open terrain when there is a threat of enemy use of precision 
weapons. 
  March capabilities of subunits and units are 
understood to mean the capability of covering the maximum 
possible distance under one's own power in one or more days with 
retention of combat effectiveness and full readiness to perform 
the assigned mission. Basic indicators of company (battalion) 
march capabilities are average rate of movement and amount of a 
day's march. Average rate of movement on a march not counting 
time for halts is the determining indicator. 
  The average rate of movement of an MRC or TC (MRB 
or TB) not counting time for halts may be 20-25 km/hr. It may be 
reduced to 15-20 km/hr when making a march in the mountains, 
deserts, northern areas, on marshy woodland, in the season of 
bad roads, in fog and under other unfavorable conditions. In all 
cases the march must be made at the maximum speed possible for 
given conditions. 
  In calculating the march the company (battalion) commander 
also determines rate of movement when forming up and 
concentrating the column. Experience shows that it is taken to 
be from 0.5 to 0.75 of the average rate of movement of a column 
on the march, i.e., approximately 10-12 km/hr. 
  The amount of a day's march is affected not only 
by average rate of movement, but also by the overall time of 
column movement in a 24 hour period. The experience of the Great 
Patriotic War and postwar exercises has established that drivers 
retain high working capacity during 10-12 hours of movement in a 
24 hour period. The amount of a day's march is determined with 
consideration of the established average rate of movement of 20- 
25 km/hr as well as the time of movement proper. 
  March capabilities of a company (battalion) in terms of fuel 
are determined from a calculation of the consumption only of its 
authorized unit reserves. They are figured by the ratio of the 
fuel reserve in vehicle tanks (less the minimum level of 
supply-- 0.2 of a fueling) to fuel consumption per kilometer of 
route and depend on fuel tank capacity (the fueling), fuel 
consumption per kilometer of route when moving in a column, and 
presence of unit- level supplies in the subunit. 
  On the march a company may operate in a forward, flank, or 
rear security element or march as part of a battalion column. A 
battalion may march as part of the regimental main body and also 
may operate in a forward detachment or advance guard. 
  The mission of a company (battalion) marching as part of the 
battalion (regimental) main body is to arrive on time in the 
designated area or at an indicated line in readiness to conduct 
battle. 
  A company operating in march security must support the 
unhindered movement of the main body, prevent penetration of 
enemy ground reconnaissance to it, preclude an enemy surprise 
attack and provide the protected column with favorable 
conditions for deploying and engaging. 
  The march formation of a company (battalion) on the march is 
a column. When a company operates in march security and a 
battalion operates in a forward detachment or advance guard, 
their march formation consists of a main body column and 
security elements. The march formation for a march in 
anticipation of engagement is formed based on the concept of 
upcoming battle and situation conditions; without the threat of 
an encounter with the enemy it is formed with consideration of 
convenience of movement and protection against enemy mass 
destruction and precision weapons and his technical 
reconnaissance assets. The more advisable place of organic and 
attached subunits of combat arms and special troops in the 
company (battalion) main body column is shown in Figs. 8 and 9. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-10L-135A>      Fig. 8. Alignment variations of company march formation for operating in forward security </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-10L-136A>      Fig. 9. Alignment variations of march formation of battalion in forward detachment: </FIG>


  a. Reinforced TB 
  b. Reinforced MRB&lt;/graphic&gt; 

  In anticipation of engagement a reconnaissance patrol is 
sent 
out from a battalion operating in a forward detachment, advance 
guard, or at the head of the regimental main body column. If the 
reconnaissance platoon is not sent out on patrol, it marches at 
the head of the battalion main body column, as a rule behind the 
COP. 
  A battalion intended for operations in a forward detachment 
or advance guard sends out a forward security element for column 
security made up of a reinforced platoon or a company to a 
distance of 5-10 km in the direction of movement, and if 
necessary sends a flank security element (rear security element) 
or patrol squads (tanks) toward the flanks and to the rear. A 
company operating in a forward security element sends out a 
point consisting of a platoon to a distance of 3-5 km in the 
direction of movement, and a forward security element up to a 
platoon in strength sends out a patrol squad (tank) to a 
distance ensuring observation of it and its support by fire. The 
distance away of march security depends on its makeup and the 
mission received and should enable conducting battle with the 
enemy independently until the approach of the main body. 
  The depth of the company (battalion) march formation is 
figured from the head of the march security to and including the 
trail vehicle (technical maintenance echelon). To calculate it, 
multiply the number of vehicles in the column (less one) by the 
prescribed distance between them, adding the distance of march 
security and the cumulative length of all vehicles in the column. 
  For the timely, organized beginning and end of the march, a 
battalion assigned to an advance guard and a company assigned to 
a forward security element is given a start point [iskhodnyy 
punkt] and control points [punkt regulirovaniya] and times of 
crossing them, and places and time of short halts and the day's 
(night's) rest halt (Diagram 21). The distance of the start 
point should ensure forming up the company (battalion) column 
from the disposition area and may be 5-10 km. 
  Short halts and the day (night) rest halt are designated for 
checking the condition of weapons and vehicles, for servicing 
and maintaining them, and for the personnel's meals and rest. 
The following are designated: short halts lasting up to one hour 
every 3-4 hours of movement, one lasting up to two hours in the 
second half of a day's march, and a day (night) rest halt at the 
end of each day's march. 
  Combat, technical and logistic support are of decisive 
importance in the company's (battalion's) successful performance 
of the mission on the march. 
  Reconnaissance is conducted on the march for timely 
collection of necessary intelligence on the enemy and terrain. 
The battalion commander sends out a reconnaissance patrol in 
anticipation of an encounter with the enemy. The company 
(battalion) commander receives data on the enemy and terrain 
from march security entities and also from the senior commander 
(chief) and reconnaissance entities. 
  Protection against mass destruction weapons is achieved by 
strict observance of prescribed distances; by preventing an 
accumulation of subunits ahead of the start point, at short 
halts and forced stops, when negotiating chokepoints, water 
obstacles and passes, and in rest areas; by skillful use of 
protective properties of combat vehicles, transport, the terrain 
and individual protective gear; and by engineer preparation of 
rest and concentration areas. 
  Concealment of the movement and concentration of company 
(battalion) subunits are goals of maskirovka on the march. This 
is achieved above all by choice of the movement route, short 
halts, and day (night) rest halt areas, with maximum advantage 
taken of the terrain's concealing properties and also by 
subunits' observance of camouflage discipline. 
  Engineer support must create conditions ensuring unhindered 
movement of the company (battalion) along the route at the 
prescribed speed and its timely arrival in the designated area 
or at the indicated line. It includes engineer reconnaissance; 
performance of engineer work on the route, in halt (rest) areas 
and in the concentration area; and accomplishment of maskirovka 
measures. 
  A forward security element at company strength usually is 
reinforced by a combat engineer squad, and an advance guard 
(forward detachment) by up to a combat engineer platoon with 
engineer assets (route clearance vehicles, bridgelayers and so 
on). In this case, the company commander usually assigns up to a 
combat engineer squad to the point to perform engineer 
reconnaissance and the battalion commander in addition assigns 
2- 3 combat engineers to the reconnaissance patrol. 
  Chemical warfare support on the march provides for 
conducting 
NBC reconnaissance of the movement route and adjoining terrain, 
at short halt sites, and in day (night) rest halt areas; 
accomplishing radiological monitoring of personnel exposure and 
contamination of equipment by radioactive substances, and 
chemical warfare monitoring of their contamination by chemical 
agents after enemy use of mass destruction weapons; performing 
decontamination of subunits and providing them with means of 
protection when preparing for the march. Chemical warfare 
support is accomplished by a specially trained squad (crew, 
team) in each company (battery), equipped with radiological and 
chemical reconnaissance devices. In some cases the radiological 
and chemical reconnaissance squad attached to the battalion may 
be included in the reconnaissance patrol or forward security 
element. 
  Technical and logistic support basically is achieved by the 
presence of the company (battalion) technical maintenance 
echelon, by making a visual inspection of weapons and vehicles 
at halts, by performing daily routine servicing and maintenance 
in the concentration area, and by organizing meals for personnel 
and medical aid for them if necessary. 
  Before the march the company (battalion) commander is 
obligated to take steps for timely replenishment of ammunition, 
fuel, food, medical equipment and supplies, and other supplies 
to prescribed norms. 
<H5>  2. Organization and Execution of the March </H5>
  Organization of the march. Successful performance 
of the mission on the march depends largely on skilled 
organization, which begins with the company (battalion) 
commander receiving the operation order or operational 
instructions. The procedure and content of his work are 
determined by the mission received, time available and the 
specific situation. In all cases the company (battalion) 
commander must analyze the mission, determine measures which 
must be taken immediately for most rapid preparation for the 
march, perform a time calculation, issue instructions to 
commanders of subordinate and attached subunits on preparing for 
the march, estimate the situation, make the decision, issue the 
operation order, organize coordination, and give instructions on 
organizing comprehensive support of the march, on C[.sup]2[/] 
and on political work. Then he directs immediate preparation of 
subunits for the march. 
  In analyzing the mission the following are studied 
from a map in addition to the usual questions: movement route, 
its length and passability, conditions for executing the march, 
lines and time of likely encounter with the enemy or for what 
actions to be ready, places and time of short halts, and also 
places, time and procedure for vehicle refueling, personnel 
messing, and replenishment of reserves of supplies consumed 
during the march. 
  Based on the mission analysis the company (battalion) 
commander determines the measures for preparing subunits for the 
march and performs a time calculation. The following 
may be such measures: familiarization of deputies and platoon 
(company) commanders with the combat mission received; issuing 
necessary instructions on preparing for the march and organizing 
reconnaissance; preparing subunits assigned to march security; 
replenishing reserves of ammunition, fuel and other supplies to 
prescribed norms; servicing and maintaining weapons and 
vehicles; evacuating the wounded and sick; and turning over 
unserviceable equipment which cannot be repaired by the 
beginning of the march. 
  The time the mission is received and the time of crossing 
the 
start point are the initial data for calculating the time for 
organizing the march. The overall time for organizing the march 
is determined based on these data and is allotted to the 
principal measures. Account is taken of the time for extending 
the company (battalion) column up to the start point. 
  Having calculated the time, with respect to questions of 
preparing for the march the commander indicates information on 
the enemy, actions for which the company (battalion) must be 
ready, procedure for preparing personnel, weapons and vehicles 
for the march and the time and place of arrival of means of 
reinforcement (if assigned). 
  In the situation estimate the company (battalion) 
commander studies march capabilities of organic and attached 
subunits; determines permissible rates of movement by route 
sectors and the distance between vehicles for purposes of 
protection against precision weapons and figures movement time 
along each sector; estimates the nature of terrain and 
conditions for protection and maskirovka in short halt and day 
(night) rest halt areas and the concentration area; determines 
the extent of their engineer preparation; performs other 
necessary calculations; and determines the procedure for 
observation and maintaining communications during the march. 
  In the course of estimating the situation the company 
(battalion) commander performs a march calculation. It consists 
of determining the length of the route, overall time for 
executing the march, average rate of movement and rate of 
movement in individual route sectors, time for crossing the 
start point and control points and time of arrival of march 
security entities in the designated area or at the indicated 
line, and places, time and duration of short halts for march 
security entities as well as for the main body column, if they 
were not indicated for the latter by the battalion (regimental) 
commander. 
  Based on analysis of the mission received, conclusions from 
the situation estimate and the march calculation, the company 
(battalion) commander makes his decision and formalizes it on 
the map. In the concept for the march the company 
(battalion) commander specifies the following: alignment of the 
march formation; makeup, missions and distance away of the march 
security; rate of movement along route sectors and distances 
between vehicles; procedure for repelling enemy air strikes; in 
addition, in anticipation of engagement with the enemy, the 
procedure for actions of the point (forward security element), 
patrol squads (tanks) and main body, alignment of the battle 
formation and form of maneuver. 
  In formalizing the decision the following are reflected 
on the map: situation of the enemy and troops operating in 
front; disposition area of the company (battalion) and its 
subunits; movement route broken down into sectors of 5-10 km 
each; start point, control points and time of crossing them by 
the column head of the point (forward security element) and main 
body; movement routes of flank security elements; locations of 
traffic control posts and commandant's posts; places, time and 
duration of short halts for the main body column and march 
security; area or line which subunits must reach after executing 
the march; probable company (battalion) deployment lines for 
battle in an encounter with the enemy and possible procedure for 
operations there by the point (forward security element) and 
main body column; movement routes of adjacent subunits and their 
missions. The following are plotted on the map in addition: 
march formation diagram indicating the distribution of forces 
and assets along the column, depth of the main body column and 
distance away of march security; route sectors in terms of 
movement conditions, and their size and rates of movement in 
each of them; overall time for the march, time for extending the 
column to the start point, and time for short halts and for 
movement; average rate of movement; and control signals. The 
combat mission is communicated to subordinates by operation 
order. 
  In the operation order for the march the company 
(battalion) commander indicates the following: 
  First paragraph--information on the enemy. 
  Second paragraph--missions of adjacent subunits. 
  Third paragraph--company (battalion) mission; 
movement route (direction of battalion operations in forward 
detachment); place of battalion (regiment) in march formation; 
concentration (rest) area or line; time of arrival at (movement 
to) designated area or indicated line and for what actions to be 
ready; start point, control points and time of crossing them; 
places and time of short halts; concept of the march. 
  Fourth paragraph--after the words "I 
order"--missions for subunits: 

  -  point (forward security element) and patrol squads 
(tanks)- -makeup, combat mission, time for crossing start point 
and control points and situation report procedure; 
  -  motorized rifle and tank platoons (companies)--means of 
reinforcement, mission, place in march column, procedure for 
commencing and conducting fire against airborne targets, and 
procedure for operations when making the march in anticipation 
of engagement with the enemy; 
  -  artillery subunits and other weapons--missions for the march 
and when engaging the enemy, place in march column and in 
formation; 
  -  air defense subunit--missions for covering-force subunits in 
movement, at short halts, in rest areas and in concentration 
area, place in march column, duty weapons (subunits) and their 
firing (launch) positions, time and degree of readiness; 
  -  other company (battalion) subunits and reinforcing subunits-- 
place in march column and missions which they must be ready to 
perform. 


    Fifth paragraph--places and procedure for 
refueling vehicles in the course of the march and, in 
anticipation of engagement in addition, ammunition and fuel 
consumption for mission performance. 
  Sixth paragraph--readiness time for the march. 
  Seventh paragraph--procedure for observation and 
communications in the course of the march, place of the company 
(battalion) commander's COP in the column, and deputies. 
  Having issued the operation order, he organizes 
coordination. Coordination instructions must reflect the 
following matters: procedure for extending the company 
(battalion) column and crossing the start point; procedure for 
movement, for observing march discipline and negotiating 
obstacles and destructive damage on the route; procedure for 
operations in an enemy air raid, when the enemy employs raiding 
and reconnaissance parties, airborne assault forces and 
airmobile subunits, and in an encounter with the enemy by the 
point (forward security element) and main body; warning, control 
and coordination signals and signals for recognition of friendly 
aircraft and helicopters, as well as methods for marking one's 
position in the course of the march and when conducting battle. 
  After organizing coordination the company (battalion) 
commander issues instructions on comprehensive support. He 
specifies the following in addition to the usual matters: 
procedure for negotiating obstacles, including those laid by the 
remote method, and areas of destructive damage on the route; 
extent of and procedure for engineer preparation of the day 
(night) rest halt (concentration) area; measures for protection 
against precision and incendiary weapons; procedure for using 
night vision (illumination) devices and for maskirovka, and also 
safety measures and procedures for maintaining march discipline. 
  Before the beginning of the march the company (battalion) 
commander organizes preparation of the subunits. At the 
prescribed time he reports readiness for the march to the 
battalion (regimental) commander. 
  Execution of the march. By the beginning of 
movement, at the commander's signal company (battalion) subunits 
and means of reinforcement take their places in the march 
formation in accordance with the issued order. The forward 
security element is first to move out. It advances at a rate so 
as to cross the start point at the prescribed time. Then comes 
the main body, the head of whose column crosses exactly at the 
designated time. The company (battalion) commander proceeds at 
the head of this column, compares the movement route with the 
map, maintains the prescribed march order and controls 
operations of march security. 
  Movement is made only on the right side of the road with 
observance of the prescribed rate of movement, distances between 
vehicles and safety measures. The company (battalion) column 
passes through chokepoints and tunnels and over bridges nonstop 
at maximum possible speed. 
  Radar dead ground formed by terrain folds and local 
features; 
built-up areas; and roadside vegetation are used for protection 
against enemy precision weapons. When moving along open, 
unconcealed route sectors, vehicles are not permitted to bunch 
up or columns to halt, and rate of movement and distances 
between vehicles are increased. 
  Vehicles move at night using night vision or blackout 
devices, and movement is made with external illumination devices 
completely off in sectors where terrain is viewed by the enemy 
and on a bright night. 
  Enemy air strikes on the march are repelled by fire in 
movement or from short halts by forces of air defense subunits 
and by fire of weapons of motorized rifle (tank) subunits 
assigned for this. Hatches of BMP's, BTR's and tanks, except 
those from which fire will be conducted, are closed. Subunit 
personnel shift protective masks to the ready position. 
  The company (battalion) continues movement in response to 
signals warning of NBC contamination. Before crossing a zone of 
contamination the hatches, doors, firing ports and louvers in 
BMP's, BTR's and tanks are closed and the system of protection 
against mass destruction weapons is turned on. When it is 
impossible to bypass zones with high radiation levels and areas 
of destructive damage, fires and floods, the company (battalion) 
crosses them at maximum speed using individual protective gear 
and systems of protection against mass destruction weapons 
present in the fighting vehicles. 
  Partial decontamination is performed after emerging from 
zones of radioactive contamination, and immediately when the 
enemy employs chemical agents. Complete decontamination is 
performed as a rule in the day (night) rest halt area or on 
arriving in the designated area. 
  In case the enemy delivers nuclear and chemical strikes 
against the column, the company (battalion) commander takes 
steps to restore combat effectiveness, mop up in the aftermath 
of the strikes and continue movement. 
  The hatches, firing ports and louvers of tanks, BMP's and 
BTR's are closed when the enemy employs incendiary weapons and 
also when forced to cross an area of fire. The company 
(battalion) commander quickly leads the column forward or toward 
the windward side out of the area of the fire, halts it by 
permission of the battalion (regimental) commander and organizes 
the extinguishing of centers of fire on combat and other 
vehicles, rescue of personnel, and first aid to victims. Then 
the column continues movement. 
  In the course of executing a march, raiding and 
reconnaissance parties are destroyed by march security and by 
subunits of the main body especially assigned for this purpose. 
Enemy tactical airborne assault forces or airmobile parties are 
destroyed by march security subunits or by the main body of a 
battalion operating in the advance guard or in a forward 
detachment. 
  Minefields laid by enemy remote minelaying systems are 
bypassed, and if impossible to bypass are crossed through 
passages made by attached engineer subunits, mineclearing teams 
of companies and the battalion obstacle clearing party. 
  Column alignment is not disrupted at short halts and 
vehicles 
stop on the right shoulder of the road no closer than 10 m from 
each other or at distances established by the commander. BMP's, 
BTR's and tanks are placed beneath crowns of trees and in the 
radar shadow of local features, and on open terrain are 
camouflaged by organic camouflage nets and local materials. 
  Observers, duty machinegunners (gunners) and radiotelephone 
operators (radio operator/loaders) of command vehicles remain in 
the vehicles. The duty air defense subunit takes up a firing 
(launch) position indicated by the commander in readiness to 
destroy enemy air targets. At their commanders' command, the 
remaining personnel exit the vehicles and dispose themselves to 
the right of the road. Vehicle crews (teams, drivers) perform a 
visual inspection of weapons and vehicles and perform servicing 
and maintenance together with personnel assigned to assist them. 
  Vehicles which became disabled during the march stop on the 
right shoulder of the road or are moved aside. Vehicle crews 
(drivers) determine the reasons for the malfunctions and take 
steps to remedy them. After malfunctions have been remedied the 
vehicles continue movement, joining a passing column, and take 
their places in their own subunit columns at short halts. 
  The battalion technical maintenance echelon assists crews 
(drivers) in remedying malfunctions, arranges for transfer of 
vehicles not subject to repair with their own resources and 
stuck vehicles to regimental recovery vehicle assets, and 
supports the arrival of remaining battalion vehicles in the 
designated area. The deputy company (battalion) commander for 
weapons (company senior technician) and subunit commanders 
personally report vehicles left en route to the company 
(battalion) commander. 
  Communications on the march is accomplished by mobile means, 
and in subunits in addition by prearranged signals. Radio 
equipment operates only on receive. During the march the 
battalion commander reports the number of his column and 
information on the status of the route sector that was covered 
and the situation on it via commandant's posts and dispatcher 
points, and receives instructions and orders which have arrived 
for him and information on the status of the next route sector 
and about detours from the senior member of the commandant's 
post (duty dispatcher). 
  A battalion is disposed by company in a day (night) rest 
halt 
area, dispersed with consideration for rapidly extending the 
march column. Companies are in columns along the route of 
forward movement. 
  Crews perform daily routine servicing and maintenance on 
vehicles, arrange for their refueling and remedy malfunctions 
which have been discovered under the direction of subunit 
commanders and their deputies for weapons (senior company 
technicians). The personnel are given a hot meal and a rest. 
  On receiving a new mission in the course of the march, the 
battalion commander halts the forward security element and 
indicates the procedure for further operations to it. The 
battalion is moved onto the new route by the shortest path in 
the previous march column or after a necessary change in 
formation and performs the assigned mission. 
  On encountering the enemy, the forward security element 
inflicts damage on his security. Employing decisive actions, the 
battalion main body immobilizes the enemy by battle, inflicts 
damage, and supports deployment and engagement of the regiment 
by stubbornly holding a favorable line. 
<H5>  3. March Under Special Conditions </H5>
  Preparation and execution of a march under special 
conditions 
are accomplished according to general rules, but with 
consideration of conditions typical of mountainous and desert 
terrain and the winter. 
  In decisionmaking for a march in the mountains, 
special attention is given to studying route sectors difficult 
to negotiate, determining the procedure for negotiating them and 
organizing traffic control in them. Measures are planned for 
covering flanks and rear and destroying enemy enveloping 
detachments, airborne assault forces and raiding and 
reconnaissance parties. Measures are envisaged which facilitate 
orientation and maintaining a direction of movement along routes 
at night and under other conditions of limited visibility. 
  Serviceability of vehicle running gear and steering gear is 
checked during routine servicing and maintenance of weapons and 
vehicles. For movement in high-mountain areas, personnel are 
provided with warm clothing, heating devices and sunglasses and 
vehicles are equipped with devices to increase offroad 
capability and special devices to keep them from rolling during 
stops on upgrades and downgrades. Each vehicle and the battalion 
technical maintenance echelon must have a reserve of coolant and 
distilled water. 
  As a rule, a motorized rifle subunit is assigned to march 
security. It operates at a lesser distance than under ordinary 
conditions. A security element up to a platoon in strength is 
assigned to guard the battalion column from the rear. Local 
security usually is sent out and observers are posted when 
moving along route sectors affording concealment, in places of 
possible landslides, rockfalls and talus, and in sectors where 
enemy emplacement of obstacles is possible. After the company 
(battalion) column passes, they continue moving behind it and 
join their own subunits at the next short halt. 
  Passes, gorges, mountain gaps, canyons and tunnels are 
crossed by subunits nonstop; if it is impossible to cross them 
from the move, subunits halt in a sheltered place without 
bunching up, camouflage themselves and prepare to make the 
passage in turn while preserving heightened vigilance. Personnel 
of motorized rifle subunits may dismount when crossing 
especially dangerous road sectors. 
  The battalion commander may halt the battalion column by 
authorization of the regimental commander to cool vehicle 
engines. Level roads sectors safe from rockfalls and avalanches 
are chosen for this. 
  In connection with a reduced range of radio operation in the 
mountains, it is necessary to provide for using march security 
radio equipment as an intermediate station to maintain 
communications with the reconnaissance patrol. 
  In making the decision for the march in the 
desert, the company (battalion) commander studies the 
movement route and trafficability conditions in its individual 
sectors in detail and clarifies the location of oases, hydraulic 
engineering works, water sources and fuel reserves. The azimuth 
of the direction of movement is calculated and the procedure is 
outlined for marking the route in sectors where orientation 
based on local features is hampered. The most likely avenues of 
enemy operations, lines of possible encounter with him, and 
measures to secure flanks and rear of the moving column are 
determined. Wide use of close and deep envelopments of exposed 
enemy flanks and operations along axes leading to vital enemy 
objectives are envisaged at lines of possible encounter with the 
enemy. 
  Before a march special attention is given to thorough 
preparation of weapons and vehicles for moving under conditions 
of high temperatures, no roads and sandy terrain, provision of 
additional containers, canteens and the necessary reserve of 
water and fuel to subunits, and measures for protecting 
personnel against heat stroke. 
  Distances between vehicles are increased to 100-150 m to 
ensure traffic safety during a march in a head wind and heavy 
dust content of the air. Under conditions of heavy dust 
formation, tanks move behind wheeled vehicles or to the leeward 
side of the movement route. The route axis is constantly shifted 
as soil on the movement route is destroyed. Movement may be 
stopped during sandstorms by permission of the battalion 
(regimental) commander. Steps are taken to protect personnel and 
vehicles, and observation and column security are beefed up. 
Movement is renewed by order of the commander who stopped the 
column. 
  In making a decision for a march in winter the 
company (battalion) commander thoroughly estimates the nature of 
terrain for the full depth of the march, clarifies route sectors 
difficult to negotiate and outlines the procedure for bypassing 
or negotiating them and places to prepare turnoffs from the road 
and detours of natural barriers. Measures are specified for 
supporting the movement of subunits in a snowstorm, blizzard, 
dense fog, bitter cold, deep snow cover and thaw. 
  Before the march weapons and vehicles are prepared for 
operation under lowtemperature conditions and steps are taken to 
prevent personnel frostbite and to supply vehicles with devices 
to improve their off-road capability. Additional reserves of 
ammunition, fuel and food are established. Vehicles equipped 
with bulldozer attachments are included in the march security if 
a march is being made under conditions of deep snow cover. 
  Movement may be suspended by permission of the battalion 
(regimental) commander in a heavy snowstorm, a blizzard and snow 
flurries. Under these conditions the company (battalion) 
commander brings up the remaining vehicles, arranges perimeter 
security, beefs up observation, and takes steps to warm the 
personnel. 
  Under all the most difficult situation conditions, the 
success of a march depends largely on skills and ability of the 
company (battalion) commander and the battalion staff to ready 
subunits for the march and control them during its execution. 
<H5>  4. Company Commander's Work To Organize the March and March </H5>
Security 
  [Begin side line] Organization and execution of the march of 
a company in march security have features stemming from the 
specifics of missions which it is performing: ensure unhindered 
movement of the protected column, preclude an enemy surprise 
attack and penetration of his ground reconnaissance, and create 
favorable conditions for engagement of the main body. 
  On receiving the mission the company commander analyzes it, 
determines measures for preparing the company to perform the 
mission and performs a time calculation. [End side line] 
  Mission analysis 
  1st MRC (TC), the forward security element, marches along 
the 
route Gorki, Nagornoye, Nikulino, Lipki, Gerasimovo and by 0600 
hours 23 August arrives at the line Tomino, north slopes of 
Kruglaya Hill with the mission of providing favorable conditions 
for battalion deployment and engagement. Length of route is 170 
km. 
  The company marches basically at night in anticipation of 
engaging the enemy. 
  In an encounter with the enemy the company has the mission 
of 
inflicting damage on his security elements, immobilizing the 
main body from the front and supporting deployment and 
commitment of the advance guard. 
  To perform the combat mission the company is reinforced by 
an 
artillery battery, TP (MRP), combat engineer squad and 
radiological and chemical reconnaissance squad. Reinforcing 
subunits will arrive in the vicinity of the forester's house by 
1000 22 August. 
  The company crosses the start point at 2000 22 August, 
control point No 1 at 2350 22 August, and control point No 2 at 
0440 hours 23 August. 
  Short halts: first from 2300 to 2340 22 August; second from 
0230 to 0430 23 August. 
  There are no subunits on the right. 1st/5th MRR is marching 
on the left with the mission of taking the line of west 
outskirts of Astakhovo, Tomino (excluded) by 0600 23 August. 
  The regimental reconnaissance detachment is conducting 
reconnaissance ahead along the company's movement route. 
  Time calculation 
  The mission for the march was received at 0900 hours 22 
August. Readiness for the march is at 1900 22 August. Cross 
start point at 2000 22 August. The company has 10 hours to 
prepare for the march. Allocate time as follows: 

  -  familiarization of subordinates with the mission received 
and issue of instructions for preparing for the march--30 
minutes (from 0930 to 1000); 
  -  situation estimate and march 
calculation--40 minutes (from 1000 to 1040); 
  -  decisionmaking and 
report to battalion commander--60 minutes (from 1040 to 1140); 
  -  issue operation order, organize coordination and 
C[.sup]2[/]- -20 minutes (from 1140 to 1200); 
  -  issue 
instructions on supporting the march and on political work--30 
minutes (from 1200 to 1230); 
  -  monitor and assist subunits in 
preparing for the march--390 minutes (from 1230 to 1900); 
  -  report readiness for march to battalion commander--1900. 


    [Begin side line] After calculating the time, the company 
commander issues instructions to subordinates for preparing for 
the march and estimates the situation. [End side line] 
  Instructions on preparing for the march 
  Organize fueling of vehicles in the following order: 1st MRP 
(TP), 2nd MRP (TP), 3rd MRP (TP). Refueling assets will arrive 
in the company disposition by 1000. 
  Replenish and load ammunition in the following sequence: 1st 
MRP (TP), 2nd MRP (TP), 3rd MRP (TP). Ammunition transport will 
arrive by 1200. 
  Check presence and stowage of protective and decontamination 
gear, clothing and related gear, and medical equipment and 
supplies and bring up to norm by 1330. 
  Check serviceability of weapons and combat vehicles and 
complete vehicle servicing and maintenance to the extent of 
daily routine servicing and maintenance by 1500 hours. 
  Hot meals will be brought to the company disposition by 
1630. 
Bring emergency rations up to norm. They will be delivered to 
company with delivery of hot meals. 
  Platoon commanders are to submit working maps with decision 
for the march by 1800. 
  Report readiness for the march at 1850. 
  Situation estimate (conclusions) 
  Align march formation with consideration for conducting 
meeting battle: point, COP, TP (MRP), 1st MRP (TP), 3rd MRP 
(TP), SP artillery battery. Execute march with measures of 
protection against mass destruction and precision weapons. 
  Have the following march security: point consisting of MRP 
(TP) and reinforced combat engineer squad. 
  On arriving at Nagornoye, send out patrol squad (patrol 
tank) 
in direction of Nagornoye, Nikulino, Lipki, Gerasimovo. 
  During the march receive data on the enemy from the senior 
commander, the point and by observation. During the march 
maintain communications with regimental reconnaissance 
detachment No 1. On approaching a line of likely encounter with 
the enemy establish communications with adjacent subunits for 
maintaining coordination during the conduct of battle. On 
discovering a zone of contamination, assign march security to 
reconnoiter a detour route. 
  Condition of the route permits moving in the Gorki, Nikulino 
sector at a speed of 25 km/hr, and in the Nikulino, Lipki sector 
at 20 km/hr. The march to Lipki is made in hours of darkness. 
  Favorable lines for deployment and assault of the enemy are 
the north edge of the grove (700 m north of Gerasimovo) and 
north slopes of Kruglaya Hill. Deploy company at these lines 
from behind the right (left) flank of the point. Bypass 
demolished (contaminated) route sectors in a column, and if it 
is necessary to cross them increase the rate of movement and 
distances between vehicles. 
  Then the company commander makes the decision, formalizes it 
on the map and reports to the battalion commander. After this he 
summons commanders of subordinate and attached subunits, issues 
the operation order, organizes coordination and gives 
instructions for organizing comprehensive support of the march, 
C[.sup]2[/] and political work. 
  Operation order 
  1. Having suffered defeat, the enemy is withdrawing to the 
west and at the same time moving up reserves from the depth. An 
encounter with his forward detachments is possible when moving 
toward Lipki. 
  2. Our units in front are holding the line along the 
Lazurnaya River. The regimental reconnaissance 
detachment is operating on the movement axis. On the left 2nd 
MRC (TC)--the forward security element of 1st MRB (TB), 5th MRR 
(TR)--is marching along the route Ilino, Dvorovoye, 
Tuzhilovo, Bugry and by 0600 23 August takes the line of 
the west outskirts of Astakhovo, Tomino (excluded). 
  3. 1st MRC (TC), an SP artillery battery, a TP (MRP), a 
combat engineer squad and a radiological and chemical 
reconnaissance squad are the forward security element. It 
marches along the route Gorki, Nagornoye, Nikulino, Lipki, 
Gerasimovo with the mission of supporting unhindered 
movement of the advance guard main body and by 0600 23 August 
taking the line Tomino, north slopes of 
Kruglaya Hill, supporting deployment and engagement 
of the battalion main body. It crosses the following points: 
start, 3 km south of Gorki, at 2000 hours; control 
point No 1, 1.5 km west of Nikulino, at 2350; control 
point No 2, 1 km north of Lipki, at 0440 hours. 
  Short halts: first, 2 km south of Nikulino--from 
2300 to 2340; second, 1 km south of Lipki--from 0230 
to 0430 23 August. 
  Form company main body column in following order: COP, TP 
(MRP), 1st MRP (TP), 3rd MRP (TP), SP artillery battery. 
  Have point consisting of 2nd MRP (TP) with combat engineer 
squad 3 km ahead along the movement route to support unhindered 
movement of forward security element main body. 
  Rate of movement: in Gorki, Nikulino sector--25 
km/hr, in Nikulino, Lipki sector--20 km/hr; distances 
between vehicles 25-50 m. 
  Commence fire against air enemy at my command and at 
commands 
of subunit commanders. If the point encounters the ground enemy, 
seize a favorable line, defeat enemy security in a meeting 
battle and support battalion deployment and engagement by a 
determined assault of the forward security element main body 
from behind the point's right flank. 
  4. I order: 

  -  2nd MRP (TP) with combat engineer squad, the point, is to 
march along the forward security element's route, prevent an 
enemy surprise attack and by 0550 23 August take the line 
Tomino, Gerasimovo (excluded), ensuring favorable 
conditions for deployment and engagement of the forward security 
element main body. Cross the points: start at 1950, control 
point No 1 at 2350, control point No 2 at 0440. Report passing 
of each line, condition of route and situation by prearranged 
signals, and immediately on encountering the enemy; 
  -  TP (MRP) is 
to march at head of company column and arrive on north slopes of 
Kruglaya Hill by 0600 23 August, having supported 
performance of company mission. Subsequently be ready to attack. 
On encountering the enemy assault him from behind the point's 
right (left) flank. On arriving at Nagornoye send out 
patrol tank (patrol squad) in the direction Nagornoye, 
Nikulino, Lipki; 
  -  1st MRP (TP) is to march behind TP (MRP) and arrive on west 
slopes of Kruglaya Hill by 0600 23 August, having 
supported performance of company mission. Subsequently be ready 
to attack. On encountering enemy, assault him from behind 
point's right (left) flank; 
  -  3rd MRP (TP) is to march behind 1st MRP (TP) and arrive at 
west 
outskirts of Gerasimovo by 0600 23 August, having 
supported performance of company mission. Subsequently be ready 
to attack. On encountering the enemy, assault him, operating on 
the right (left) flank of the company; 
  -  SP artillery battery is to march along company route behind 
3rd 
MRP (TP) and occupy firing positions in vicinity of southwest 
outskirts of Gerasimovo by 0600 23 August. On 
encountering enemy be ready to support battle of point and 
support the deployment and engagement of forward security 
element main body by fire. 


    5. Refuel fighting vehicles at second short halt in 
following 
order: point, TP (MRP), 1st and 3rd MRP's (TP's). Receive hot 
meals on completion of fueling. Ammunition consumption for 
performance of assigned mission is 0.5 unit of fire, and fuel 
consumption is 0.7 fueling. 
  6. Readiness for march 1900 hours. 
  7. Commanders of platoons and squads (crews) are to conduct 
observation during the march up to the line of likely encounter 
with the enemy, and after crossing it all personnel are to do 
so. Communications on the march: with point by radio using brief 
signals, with platoons in main body column by signaling devices, 
and by radio on engaging. 
  I am at the head of the main body column on the march, and 
behind 1st MRP (TP) on encountering the enemy. Deputy is 1st MRP 
(TP) commander. 
  Coordination instructions 
  Extend the company [column] to the start point in accordance 
with the march calculation at my signal. Cross start point as 
follows: point at 1950, main body at 2000. 
  During the march observe prescribed distances and rate of 
movement. Stop disabled vehicles on right shoulder of road and 
observe security and defense measures when remedying 
malfunctions. After restoration, vehicles take their places in 
the march formation only at short halts (stops); have distances 
of at least 10 m between vehicles at short halts. 
  Receive hot meals at the end of fueling. At night, march 
using night vision devices. 
  1st MRP (TP) is to be ready to destroy enemy raiding and 
reconnaissance parties during the march. 
  When the enemy employs nuclear weapons and with detection of 
radioactive (chemical) contamination, turn on the system of 
protection against mass destruction weapons, and personnel are 
to put on individual protective gear and continue performing the 
assigned mission. Bypass zones of contamination and areas of 
destructive damage, fires and floods along axes marked by the 
point; if it is impossible to bypass the zones, cross them in 
the shortest direction with an increase in rate of movement and 
distances between vehicles. Perform partial decontamination and 
extinguish centers of fire on combat vehicles at my command and 
at commands of platoon commanders. 
  In case it encounters the enemy the point is to inflict 
damage on his local security, take a favorable line and support 
deployment and engagement of the company main body. The forward 
security element is to assault the enemy swiftly, destroy him 
and continue movement. On encountering an enemy of superior 
force the forward security element is to assault him decisively 
in the flank, inflict damage on him and take a line providing 
favorable conditions for deployment and engagement of the 
battalion main body. 
  Warning, control and coordination signals are in accordance 
with the signal table. 
  Instructions on combat support of the march 
  Conduct reconnaissance of the air and ground enemy during 
the 
march as follows: in the direction of movement--point; to the 
sides--by observers from 1st and 3rd MRP's (TP's); to the rear 
by an observer from the SP artillery battery. Each squad (crew) 
is to conduct observation of the air enemy. Report immediately 
on encountering the enemy. 
  2nd MRS (crew) of 2nd MRP (TP) is to conduct radiological, 
chemical and nonspecific biological (bacteriological) 
reconnaissance on the march using onboard devices, and observers 
are to do so visually. In response to signals warning of NBC 
contamination, close firing ports and doors, on tanks close 
hatches and louvers, and turn on the system for protection 
against mass destruction weapons. 
  By 1300 check the presence, serviceability, working capacity 
and state of supply of radiological and chemical reconnaissance 
devices and individual protective gear and the airtightness of 
protective masks. Go to the battalion CW instructor to replace 
unserviceable ones. 
  Perform partial decontamination at my command. 
  Carry out radiological monitoring using dosimeters and 
radiological monitoring and survey devices. 
  Observe a regime of radio silence during the march. Turn off 
night vision devices when there is a warning about the threat of 
an enemy air attack and after passing Lipki. Prohibit starting 
bonfires and limit personnel movement at short halts. 
  Breach obstacles, destructive damage and barriers with your 
own forces together with the combat engineer squad using 
bulldozer attachments, built-in equipment and local materials. 
  In the course of the march accomplish security using the 
point, and in the area of short halts using patrols from 3rd MRP 
(TP). Be ready to combat enemy raiding and reconnaissance 
parties. 
  Instructions on technical and logistic support 
  By 1500 perform daily routine servicing and maintenance on 
weapons and vehicles, paying special attention to condition of 
running gear, steering gear and storage batteries. 
  Assemble weapons and vehicles not restored by the time of 
readiness for the march in the battalion rear disposition area 
by 1800 hours for turnover to the regimental maintenance company. 
  Vehicles which become disabled during the march and cannot 
be 
repaired by crew efforts are to await battalion repair assets. 
Organize their security and defense at the points where they 
stop. Continue movement after remedying the malfunction. They 
are to take their place in the company column at a short halt 
(stop). 
  Refuel in the company disposition area by 1100 and at the 
second short halt. 
  By 1300 bring reserves of ammunition and other supplies up 
to 
the norm. Transport with reserves will arrive in company 
disposition area. 
  Complete evacuating wounded and sick to battalion aid 
station 
by 1500. During the march give first aid in the form of self- 
administered and buddyadministered emergency first aid by 
platoon riflemen-medics and by the company medical corpsman 
NCOIC. 
  During the march hot food will be issued at the second short 
halt. 
  Company operations in march security on the 
march 
  The company begins the march by direction of the battalion 
commander. At the prescribed time the point crosses the start 
point and moves along the route at the indicated speed 3-5 km 
from the company main body. Proceeding at the head of the 
column, the company commander compares the movement route with 
the map and maintains the established march order. 
  A company assigned to a flank security element moves on line 
with the head of the protected column and up to 5 km away with 
the mission of preventing an enemy surprise attack from the 
flank. 
  In performing a mission as a stationary flank guard, the 
company moves to the line indicated for it to cover the flank of 
the protected column, deploys into battle formation fully or 
with a portion of the forces, organizes a defense and is at the 
line until the prescribed time. 
  A company assigned to a rear security element proceeds up to 
5 km behind the protected column in readiness to repel a 
possible enemy attack from the rear. 
  The forward security element passes through chokepoints and 
tunnels and across bridges nonstop, moving behind the point. 
Company personnel conduct continuous all-around observation for 
the ground and air enemy and of adjoining terrain. 
  The point bypasses demolished road sectors, bridges and 
abatis on the movement route and mined sectors, using markers to 
denote places of destructive damage (mining) and the direction 
for going around. The forward security element makes a passage 
if it is impossible to go around or when making a passage in 
destructive damage (abatis) requires less time than going 
around. With remote mining of the movement route, the forward 
security element exits the minefield as one column along a 
passage which has been made in the shortest direction. 
  The commander of the point (forward security element) 
reports 
contaminated sectors, obstacles, destructive damage, directions 
for their bypass, and an encounter with the enemy to the 
commander who sent him out. 
  At short halts the point (forward security element) stops on 
a favorable line, organizes observation and is in constant 
readiness to repel an enemy attack. On arriving in the rest area 
the forward security element takes up a designated line and 
performs the mission of security at the halt. In this area the 
security element may be replaced by security at the halt. 
  With a change in movement direction, the company column is 
moved to the new route by the shortest path in the previous 
march formation or after a necessary change of formation and 
performs the assigned mission. 
  On encountering the enemy the company immobilizes him by 
battle and, stubbornly holding a favorable line, supports the 
protected column's deployment and engagement. 
<H5>  5. Transport Movement of Subunits </H5>
  A battalion is moved by rail or sea (river) transport as one 
or two troop echelons [voinskiy eshelon], by air transport as 
several military teams [voinskaya komanda], and on heavy 
multiple truck-trailer rigs as a single column. 
  To shorten the time for organizing transport movement, the 
battalion commander must constantly have prepared variants of 
calculations for moving the battalion by various kinds of 
transport. The transport movement calculation is put together 
with consideration for preserving subunits' organizational 
integrity and ensuring their readiness for battle after 
unloading (disembarking). 
  A troop echelon is understood to mean a military 
unit, subunit, establishment as well as separate teams and 
groups of combat vehicles organized for transport movement in 
one train or on one vessel (self-propelled or nonself- 
propelled). A train with ten cars or more (in a two-axle 
calculation) occupied by subunits, teams or military cargoes is 
considered to be a troop train. 
  An echelon is given an appropriate number which it retains 
throughout the journey. An echelon must have necessary forces 
and assets for loading (unloading) vehicles and cargoes; for 
organizing air defense, communications, and NBC reconnaissance; 
for security and defense; and for providing personnel with hot 
meals and medical aid. 
  A battalion is given a loading (boarding) and unloading 
(disembarking) station, port (wharf) or airfield (site) for 
loading (boarding) flatcars (railcars), vessels and aircraft 
(helicopters) and unloading (disembarking) from them. Subunits 
are in a waiting area before loading (boarding) and they move to 
an assembly area after unloading (disembarking) (Diagram 22). 
  The distance of the waiting area and assembly area from the 
loading (boarding) and unloading (disembarking) site 
respectively is determined by terrain conditions providing for 
concealed disposition of subunits and protection against mass 
destruction and precision weapons, and may be 3-5 km (usually 10 
15 km with movement by air transport). 
  Final preparation of the company (battalion) for loading 
(boarding) occurs in waiting areas. Weapons and vehicles are 
prepared for transport movement and subsequent operations: 
refueling, usually daily routine servicing and maintenance, and 
if necessary repairs are carried out. The personnel's state of 
supply of individual protective gear is checked. 
  A chief, his deputy for political affairs, assistant for 
combat support, assistant for supply, chief of communications 
and physician (paramedic) are assigned in each troop echelon. A 
daily detail is appointed for performing routine garrison and 
guard duty. A senior person is appointed for the entire journey 
in each railcar (cabin, crew quarters and so on) from among 
junior officers or NCO's, and in addition stokers also are 
appointed from among the privates during movement by rail 
transport in winter. 
  Special teams are formed to perform the main tasks of 
supporting company (battalion) subunits and the echelon as a 
whole during loading (unloading) and en route: loading-unloading 
teams, communications teams, teams for mopping up in the 
aftermath of enemy use of mass destruction, precision and 
incendiary weapons and so on. 
  Loading-unloading teams are intended for loading tracked, 
wheeled and trailer equipment onto flatcars (into railcars) and 
for loading various cargoes in boxcars. The number of these 
teams is determined basically by the number of loading sites. In 
addition to loading (unloading), the loading-unloading team 
(teams) also is obligated to assemble and disassemble various 
gear and devices necessary for loading (unloading). 
  Weapons and combat and other vehicles are loaded and 
personnel put aboard strictly at the designated time, covertly, 
with observance of safety measures precluding a breakdown of 
weapons, vehicles and transportation assets. Weapons, combat and 
other vehicles, and reserves of ammunition, fuel and other 
supplies are loaded first. 
  As a rule, ammunition and fuel are loaded in different 
railcars (on different ships, in different aircraft and 
helicopters). Combat vehicles and air defense weapons assigned 
to cover the loading point area and also prime movers intended 
for supporting the rapid loading (unloading) of tracked 
equipment are loaded on flatcars (ships) last. 
  Equipment is fastened down on railcars by the vehicle crews, 
for which they prepare chocks and pads for vehicle rollers, 
tracks and wheels; wire; chocks and blocks; and metal stops in 
advance. 
  In forming a troop train, boxcars occupied by people and 
operating kitchens are placed in the middle of the train and 
flatcars and open cars in the front and rear. Railcars with 
dangerous cargoes are separated from the locomotive, the rear of 
the train, cars with personnel, cars with operating kitchens, 
and if necessary also one from another by a special protective 
cover. Flatcars with air defense weapons are placed at the front 
and rear of the train and, for convenience of conducting fire, 
they are separated from the diesel (electric) locomotive, 
boxcars or open cars by one or more flatcars with low cargo. 
  Personnel board railcars (ships, aircraft or helicopters) on 
completion of loading of weapons, combat and other vehicles, and 
property, usually immediately before departure of the troop 
echelon (team) or before the ship puts to sea, but no later than 
10 minutes before departure. 
  During movement by rail transport, personnel as a rule are 
carried in fouraxle boxcars figuring 64-72 persons in each. It 
is prohibited to use cars which have been used for acids, toxic 
agents and animals. A passenger car may be provided for officers 
of the echelon. As part of the train it is desirable to have an 
isolation car prepared, like the car for personnel, with 
removable military equipment. 
  Weapons, combat and other vehicles, and supplies loaded on 
rolling stock (on ships, aircraft, helicopters) are reliably 
fastened down, and in addition vehicles are braked and put in 
low gear. Rotating devices of turrets of fighting vehicles and 
guns are locked and hatches sealed. 
  Responsibility for loading, accommodating and fastening down 
of weapons, combat and other vehicles and for boarding personnel 
rests with the chief of the troop echelon, and with commanders 
of crews and of aircraft (helicopters) for movement by air 
transport. 
  A battalion being moved by rail or sea (river) transport is 
supported for the entire journey with en route and destination 
supplies of food in addition to unit-level supplies. A battalion 
aid station is set up for prompt medical aid during movement in 
a troop echelon (on a ship). Wounded and sick are evacuated from 
a troop echelon (ship) to the nearest medical facilities. 
  To preserve the personnel's strength and fighting vehicles' 
engine time and to reduce their wear (especially tracks) when 
making a march over great distances, it is advisable to 
transport tanks of a TC (TB) on heavy multiple truck-trailer 
rigs, which represent transportation complexes of wheeled prime 
movers and heavy-freight trailers. 
  A company (battalion) is assigned a primary and alternate 
loading point area for loading on heavy multiple truck- 
trailer rigs. The TC (TB) commander together with the motor 
transport subunit commander directs loading of tanks on 
trailers. A trained crew can load and secure a tank on a trailer 
in 10-15 minutes. With simultaneous loading a TC loads in 15-20 
minutes and a TB in 30-40 minutes; with successive loading a 
company will require one hour. Unloading a company may take an 
average of around 30 minutes and the battalion 45 minutes. 
  With the route in good condition, a column of trailers can 
develop a speed of 45-50 km/hr, but it is inadvisable to develop 
a column speed of over 30 km/hr because of the difficulty of 
controlling a trailer when transporting heavy equipment (the 
trailer with vehicles swerves with fast driving). Railroad 
crossings are crossed at a speed of no more than 15 km/hr. 
Distances between trailers can reach 50 m, and they increase on 
upgrades and downgrades. 
  Organization of transport movement depends on the specific 
situation, mission received and time available. On receipt of an 
operation order (operational instructions) for movement by rail 
(sea, river) transport the battalion commander (troop echelon 
commander) issues instructions on preparing for the transport 
movement; together with the military commandant of the rail 
(water) sector and station (port), he updates the calculation 
for transportation of subunit personnel, weapons, vehicles and 
property by railcars, flatcars, ships or ship spaces; draws up a 
plan for loading the troop echelon; establishes the sequence of 
loading (boarding) subunits and the time of its beginning and 
completion; determines the procedure for subunits to move up to 
loading (boarding) points; performs ground reconnaissance of the 
waiting area, the station (port, wharf), and forward movement 
routes of subunits to them and to loading (boarding) points, and 
assigns missions to subunits. 
  The battalion staff prepares calculations in advance for 
transport movement of the battalion, which permits the commander 
to reduce time for organizing it. 
  On receiving the order (operational instructions) for 
movement by air transport the MRC (MRB) commander issues 
instructions for preparing for the movement; together with the 
military transport (army) aviation subunit (unit) commander or 
civil aviation group (detachment) commander and airport military 
commandant, he updates the loading (boarding) order, ramp 
parking areas and side numbers of aircraft (helicopters); 
compiles the calculation for movement of subunit personnel, 
weapons, vehicles, missiles, ammunition, fuel and other supplies 
by aircraft (helicopters), the loading (boarding) plan and 
personnel rosters of the military teams for each aircraft 
(helicopter); determines the sequence and procedure for loading 
(boarding) and arrival of the subunits and the time of their 
beginning and completion; performs ground reconnaissance of the 
waiting area, airfield (landing sites), forward movement routes 
of subunits to them and to aircraft (helicopter) ramp parking 
areas, and assigns missions to subunits. 
  In the transport movement order the battalion 
commander indicates the following: 
  First paragraph--information on the enemy. 
  Second paragraph--battalion mission; number 
(numbers) of the troop echelon (team, teams); name of ship 
(ships) and side numbers of aircraft (helicopters); loading 
(boarding) station (port, wharf, airfield or landing site) and 
waiting area and forward movement routes to them; time for 
beginning and completion of loading. 
  Third paragraph, the transport movement concept-- 
distribution of subunits, personnel, weapons and vehicles by 
troop echelons (teams), railcars, flatcars (ships, ship spaces, 
aircraft or helicopters); sequence and procedure for subunit 
loading; organization of air defense (duty subunits, procedure 
for alert duty, for observation, and for commencing and 
conducting fire against airborne targets); and the number and 
makeup of the daily detail and loadingunloading teams. 
  Fourth paragraph--after the words I 
order, missions for subunits--places (quantity of railcars 
and flatcars, numbers of aircraft, helicopters, cabins, decks, 
holds and other spaces, numbers of military teams) for 
accommodating personnel, weapons and vehicles; sequence and 
procedure for loading (boarding); place in battalion march 
column when moving up from waiting area to loading (boarding) 
points and procedure for actions after unloading; for the air 
defense subunit in addition, missions for providing cover during 
loading, en route, and when unloading; and for subunits from 
which loading- unloading teams and the daily detail are 
assigned, makeup of the teams (detail), their missions and 
readiness time. 
  Fifth paragraph--readiness time for moving out of 
the waiting area and for loading. 
  Sixth paragraph--appointed persons of the echelon, 
their place in the echelon (aboard the ship) or the number of 
the aircraft (helicopter) in which they are proceeding, and 
warning and control signals. 
  The company commander issues the transport movement order in 
the very same sequence as the battalion commander, but in 
the fourth paragraph he usually indicates the following: 
places for accommodating platoon personnel, weapons and vehicles 
on rolling stock (on the ship, in the aircraft or helicopter); 
sequence and procedure for their loading (boarding); platoon 
places in the company column when moving up from the waiting 
area to the loading point, and to the assembly area after 
unloading; makeup of loadingunloading teams, who is senior, 
their missions, and time and procedure for them to perform 
missions; from whom and in what makeup to assign the daily 
detail and procedure for its preparation; safety measures during 
loading (boarding), en route and when unloading (disembarking). 
In addition, in the sixth paragraph of the order, instead of 
appointed persons of the echelon, he indicates senior persons of 
railcars and his own place in the train (on the ship) or the 
number of the aircraft (helicopter) in which he is proceeding. 
  Battalion commander's instructions on preparing 
for transport movement 
  (Variant) 
  Organize filling of vehicles with POL and coolant from 0930 
to 1130 20 June. 
  Receive and load ammunition from 1130 to 1330 in the 
following sequence--1st, 2nd, 3rd TC. 
  Complete loading of supplies on motor transport by 1400. 
  Deputy battalion commander for weapons is to organize 
routine 
servicing and maintenance of vehicles. Restore unserviceable 
equipment by 1630. By 1700 draw catwalks, clamps and nails at 
the loading station. 
  Subunit commanders prepare and check the presence of 
fastening materials and necessary devices for loading by 1630. 
  From 1330 to 1530 hold practical classes with personnel on 
rules for loading equipment on rolling stock and communicate 
safety measures and rules for the journey. 
  Readiness for transport movement is 1730. Issue hot food to 
personnel at 1600. 
  Departure for ground reconnaissance at 1230 from battalion 
COP. Deputies and commanders of companies and separate platoons 
are involved in ground reconnaissance. 
  TC commander's operation order for transport 
movement 
  (Variant) 
  1. Employing precision weapons, the enemy has halted the 
attack of our troops by operations of reserves which have come 
up and shifted to a defense along west bank of the Shirokaya 
River on the morning of 17 June. 
  Enemy aircraft are conducting aerial reconnaissance and 
delivering strikes against reserves and rear installations. 
  2. 2nd TC is moving by rail transport as part of the 
battalion and by 2000 hours 21 June assembles in the vicinity of 
Ternovskoye terrain feature. The troop echelon number is 12345. 
Boarding station is Sineglazovo. Waiting area is forest north of 
Voznesenskoye. Route of forward movement: Shumaki, Timofeyevka. 
Beginning of loading at 1800. Completion of loading at 1930. 
Departure at 2000. 
  3. Transport the personnel in second railcar. 
  Load equipment on 13th through 22nd flatcars in the 
following 
sequence: 1st, 2nd, 3rd TP. Assign lookouts for the air enemy 
and a duty tank from 1st TP. Commence fire against air enemy at 
the command of the echelon chief, or independently in a surprise 
attack. 
  Assign daily detail from 3rd TP. Have a loading-unloading 
team of six persons, two from each platoon. 
  4. I order: transport the company personnel in 
second railcar. 
  Accommodate equipment on the following flatcars: company 
commander's tank and 1st TP from 13th through 16th, 2nd TP from 
17th through 19th, 3rd TP from 20th through 22nd. Load from end 
(side) ramp. Move out of waiting area to loading point and to 
assembly area after unloading in the following order: company 
commander's tank, 1st, 2nd, 3rd TP. 
  Platoon commanders are to assign two persons each to the 
loading- unloading team. Senior person of team is a tank 
commander from 2nd TP. Mission: from 1730 to 1750 open sides of 
13th through 22nd flatcar for movement of combat vehicles along 
them. With beginning of loading of battalion wheeled vehicles, 
support their movement along the railcars (transfer connecting 
ramps to flatcar junctions). 
  Assign daily detail from 3rd TP made up of duty NCO--a 
sergeant, 
  and orderlies--two privates. 
  Observe prescribed safety measures when loading, en route, 
and 
  when unloading. 5. Readiness for moving out of waiting area 
  1630, and for loading 1730. 
  6. Senior person in car is company 1st sergeant. I am in 
15th 
  car. 
  Warning and control signals--according to signal table. 
  After issuing the transport movement order the battalion 
commander (chief of troop echelon) gives instructions on the 
procedure for preparing rolling stock for loading the echelon, 
on methods of accommodating and fastening weapons and vehicles 
on the rolling stock (ship), on organizing security in the 
echelon or on the ship (updates the makeup of the daily detail, 
time and procedure of its relief, post locations, duties of 
sentries and procedure for communications with them), on safety 
measures during loading (boarding) and transport movement, and 
on the procedure for actions in response to warning and control 
signals; he also gives instructions on organizing combat, 
technical and logistic support, fire protection (emergency 
rescue work) and political work for the period of the transport 
movement. 
  Before the beginning of forward movement from the waiting 
area for loading (boarding), the company (battalion) commander 
checks the personnel's knowledge of loading (boarding) rules and 
safety measures; of the procedure for accommodating and 
fastening weapons and vehicles in railcars and on flatcars (on 
ships, in aircraft and helicopters); of rules for their 
unloading and of rules of personnel conduct during the transport 
movement. A check is made of the readiness of weapons, vehicles, 
missiles, ammunition, fuel and other supplies for loading as 
well as the alignment of the company (battalion) column in 
accordance with the loading plan. Before loading, the battalion 
commander (chief of troop echelon) arrives at the loading point 
with appointed persons of the echelon, where he checks the 
presence of rolling stock; organizes receipt of railcars (ship 
spaces) and removable military equipment and preparation of 
rolling stock for loading the echelon; if necessary, he makes 
changes to the loading (boarding) plan and to the transport 
movement calculation and gives the command (signal) for subunits 
to move out to the loading (boarding) point. En route the 
battalion commander and staff (chief of troop echelon) as a rule 
are accommodated in the middle of the echelon during movement by 
rail transport. He must have telephone communications with the 
officer of the guard, with observation posts and with the diesel 
(electric) locomotive engineer. During movement by sea (river) 
transport the battalion commander is in one of the cabins or a 
separate ship space. 
  C[.sup]2[/] in a troop echelon (on a ship) is exercised 
using wire means of communication, by personal contact, by 
messengers and by light and sound signals. 
  Battalion subunits begin moving out of the waiting area in 
company columns (subunit columns) in accordance with the 
prescribed loading order. As a rule, their movement out of the 
area is directed by the battalion chief of staff. 
  The battalion commander meets subunits on the approach, 
gives instructions to commanders on the procedure for 
disposition near the loading point and reports readiness for 
loading to the military commandant. 
  The deputy company (battalion) commander for weapons 
(company senior technician) is responsible for overall direction 
of loading the equipment. The subunit commander is responsible 
for the loading of each subunit. He personally directs each 
vehicle's run onto the rolling stock. Further movement of the 
vehicle along the flatcars is directed by the vehicle commander, 
who has constant visual contact with the driver and observes 
safety measures. 
  During loading under nighttime conditions it is necessary to 
take advantage of fixed illumination, and in its absence one 
should organize illumination with headlights of specially 
assigned vehicles. 
  After loading, the loading-unloading devices are collected 
and piled in a place specified by the commander. 
  Subunit commanders with their deputies for weapons (company 
senior technicians) check the reliability and correctness of 
securing the equipment, that vehicles are braked and in low 
gear, and that fighting vehicle turrets and guns are locked; 
they seal vehicle hatches (doors); and report completion of 
loading through channels. 
  In case the enemy delivers nuclear strikes or employs 
precision, chemical and incendiary weapons during loading, 
subunits are led out of areas of bursts (fires, contamination) 
and subsequently continue loading at the previous place or move 
to another loading point depending on the situation. 
  After completion of loading the battalion commander, 
military 
commandant and the station chief check readiness of the echelon 
for movement. Special attention is given to firmness and 
correctness of fastening the sides of flatcars and the vehicles. 
  In the course of transport movement the company (battalion) 
commander receives data on the situation in the direction of 
movement via military commandants, the general warning network 
and senior commanders (chiefs), constantly keeps an eye on 
compliance with transport movement rules, and monitors the 
condition of subunits and observance of discipline and safety 
measures. 
  At a signal warning of the air enemy, the troop echelon 
(ship) continues movement. Doors, windows (portholes) and 
hatches of railcars (ship spaces) are closed and protective gear 
placed in the "ready" position. Air defense and other weapons 
assigned to repel an enemy air raid commence fire on command of 
the echelon chief (ship captain), and in a surprise attack they 
do so independently in accordance with instructions on the 
procedure for conducting fire. 
  In response to signals warning of NBC contamination, 
personnel put on protective masks (breathing masks) and other 
individual protective gear as well if necessary by order of 
subunit commanders. 
  During movement by rail and sea (river) transport, personnel 
cross zones of radioactive contamination of terrain and water 
areas contaminated by radioactive substances wearing individual 
protective gear. When a troop echelon passes through a zone of 
radioactive contamination, tank and other armored vehicle crews 
may be disposed in vehicles by instruction of the echelon chief 
(ship captain). After crossing the zone of contamination, 
partial decontamination of personnel, vehicles and means of 
transportation is performed if necessary. Complete 
decontamination of subunits and personnel is performed after 
unloading. 
  Depending on the situation at hand, the company (battalion) 
always must be ready en route for unloading at unprepared 
locations, proceeding to the destination by march, bypassing 
zones of contamination and areas of destructive damage, fires 
and floods, and engaging. 
  On arriving at the transport movement destination the 
company 
(battalion) quickly unloads and, observing combat support 
measures, moves into the assembly area in readiness to move out 
to the battalion (regimental) concentration area or for 
performing the combat mission. 
  Under present conditions subunits and units may make a 
combination movement. This is the movement of troops from one 
area to another in which different methods of movement are 
combined. A combination transport movement and a combination of 
a march and transport movement may be accomplished depending on 
distance of the movement, nature of lines of communication and 
presence and kinds of transportation assets used for movement. 
  The combination transport movement as a rule presumes a 
successive and sometimes also simultaneous combination of 
transport movement of subunits by different kinds of transport-- 
rail, water (sea, river), motor, air. 
  The simultaneous or successive combination of the march and 
transport movement may become widespread under present 
conditions. With simultaneous combination of the march and 
transport movement, one part of the subunits proceeds under its 
own power, and another (tanks, prime movers, heavy engineer 
vehicles, vehicles with little range and slow speed) is moved by 
rail or water (sea, river) transport. The advantage of that 
movement method is that capabilities of each kind of transport 
are used to the maximum. Its principal shortcomings are 
disruption of organizational integrity of subunits and 
difficulty of C[.sup]2[/]. In a successive combination, a 
march may precede transport movement or be employed after 
completion of transport movement. 
  Success of combination movement of subunits depends largely 
on the ability of the battalion commander and staff to provide 
in advance for measures ensuring a rapid transfer from movement 
by one kind of transport to movement by another kind of 
transport or to the march. With the simultaneous combination of 
march and transport movement, the art of the battalion commander 
and staff to coordinate actions of those subunits moving under 
their own power and those being conveyed acquires special 
importance. 
  Calculations for movement of subunits by different methods 
are coordinated with each other so that in case transport 
movement stops, all subunits can link up quickly and arrive 
simultaneously in the designated concentration area if possible. 
  If an abrupt situation change gives rise to an interruption 
in transport movement in the course of subunit movement by the 
combination method, subunits being moved by rail or water 
transport quickly unload from rolling stock or ships and proceed 
to a new loading point by march for continuing the transport 
movement. If the situation requires cessation of transport 
movement, subunits which have unloaded from transportation 
assets proceed independently under their own power to the 
designated concentration area or join subunits moving by march. 
<H5>  Chapter IX - Disposition at the Halt </H5>
<H5>  1. Company (Battalion) Disposition at the Halt </H5>
  A company (battalion) may be disposed at the halt in a 
concentration area, assembly area, waiting area and other areas. 
The disposition area as a rule is designated on terrain 
favorable for protection against mass destruction and precision 
weapons and for maskirovka of subunits. A subunit disposition 
area should not be designated near important installations 
(plants, rail junctions, railroad stations, bridges and so on) 
or built-up areas against which the enemy may deliver massed 
fire and nuclear strikes. 
  But we resort to disposing subunits in built-up areas under 
conditions of a severe winter or protracted bad weather when 
there is no time to perform laborious work of making shelters. 
  One should make skilled use of the nature and protective 
properties of terrain in disposing subunits. Thus, on wooded 
terrain it is more advisable to place subunits along forest 
roads, openings and treelines. Since COP's and technical support 
and rear subunits are most vulnerable to the shock wave and 
penetrating radiation of a nuclear burst, they should be located 
in ravines and deep cuts. On mountainous terrain it is advisable 
to take advantage of terrain folds, tunnels, mines, caves and 
areas not subject to avalanches, landslides or floods. In 
deserts and steppe, subunits should be disposed in a more 
dispersed manner, where possible near water sources and as a 
rule away from clear- cut reference points. 
  The duration of a company's (battalion's) disposition at the 
halt may be from several hours to several days depending on 
upcoming operations and situation conditions. 
  The long range of modern weapons and presence of a real 
possibility of enemy use of nuclear and precision weapons, 
airmobile troops and airborne assault forces to a considerable 
depth force subunits disposed at the halt to be in constant 
readiness to repel an attack by the air and ground enemy. 
  To provide protection for the company (battalion) against 
mass destruction weapons and consequently also for its 
survivability in the disposition area, it must be disposed in a 
dispersed manner and in an alignment supporting the execution of 
a maneuver and conduct of battle. Optimum limits of dispersal 
are set depending on the nature of upcoming operations, strength 
level of subunits and terrain conditions. Thus, according to 
existing views, the size of disposition areas may be 1.5-2 
km[.sup]2[/] for the company and up to 10 km[.sup]2[/] for 
the battalion. 
  Studies that have been performed and the experience of field 
training exercises show that the mutual distance between 
companies (batteries) must be 1-1.5 km, between platoons 300-400 
m, and between tanks and BMP's (BTR's) on open terrain 100-150 
m. With that dispersal of subunits a low (very low) yield 
nuclear weapon can put no more than one company (platoon) out of 
commission. 
  The configuration of the battalion disposition area depends 
on the nature of terrain, purpose of the disposition and nature 
of upcoming operations. For example, to occupy an assembly area 
during a hasty attack or a concentration area when disposed in 
the depth of the defense, it is advisable to designate an area 
corresponding to the zone of advance or the defense area. The 
configuration of day (night) or 24-hour rest halt areas should 
correspond approximately to the alignment of the march formation. 
  The order of placement of battalion subunits (Diagram 23) 
when disposed at the halt depends on upcoming operations, length 
of stay in the area, situation conditions and nature of terrain. 
Thus, when disposed at the halt for preparing to conduct battle 
involving forward movement, the disposition of subunits should 
correspond to their alignment for movement and engagement from 
the move. 
  Therefore subunits intended for operations in the first 
echelon of the battle formation are disposed in that part of the 
assembly area (concentration area) nearest the enemy and other 
subunits are disposed in its depth, and the company (battalion) 
is so disposed that subunits have an opportunity to deploy 
quickly and act together. The mortar (artillery) battery is 
disposed at full strength or by platoon on threatened axes, 
being in constant readiness to commence fire, and its COP is 
prepared together with the battalion COP. Air defense subunits 
take up launch (firing) positions in places convenient for 
conducting fire against enemy aircraft and helicopters and other 
airborne targets. A portion of air defense subunits may be 
attached to subunits of the security at the halt. The GLP and 
ATP usually are disposed with MRC's and the reconnaissance 
platoon near the COP. 
  The battalion support platoon is disposed with consideration 
for convenience of preparing battalion subunits for battle. The 
area of the platoon location may reach 1 km[.sup]2[/] and 
that of the squad 0.3 km[.sup]2[/]. Squads are disposed in a 
dispersed manner and distances between them should be 150200 m. 
  The battalion COP is prepared with consideration for 
ensuring 
continuous C[.sup]2[/] of subunits while in and when moving 
out of the disposition area. Communications with subunits 
usually is accomplished by mobile and wire means. Operation of 
radio equipment on transmit is permitted only for warning and 
for controlling the fire of air defense weapons. 
  A duty subunit consisting of a reinforced MRP is assigned in 
the battalion. As a rule, it is located near the COP in constant 
readiness to destroy enemy raiding and reconnaissance parties, 
perform other missions that arise suddenly and fight fires. 
  During disposition at the halt, troops are protected by 
local 
security, and also by security at the halt when there is a 
threat of enemy attack. Security at the halt must be all-around 
and intercept all main roads and approaches to the disposition 
area. 
  Security, communications between COP's, and warning of the 
air and ground enemy, NBC contamination, use of incendiary 
weapons and an immediate threat and beginning of enemy use of 
mass destruction and precision weapons are organized; maskirovka 
measures are conducted; and the movement of personnel and 
vehicles is restricted in the company (battalion). 
  In case the enemy uses mass destruction, precision and 
incendiary weapons or remote minelaying systems against the 
company (battalion) disposition area, the company (battalion) 
will be forced to change the area by direction or permission of 
the senior commander according to a previously developed plan, 
covertly, and in a short time. As a rule, subunits make the 
change of areas as part of their own units. The change of area 
also may be done by decision of the company (battalion) 
commander with surprise enemy use of mass destruction or 
incendiary weapons and the absence of an opportunity to report 
this promptly to the senior commander. Alternate areas and 
movement routes to them should be prepared in advance to support 
a subunit change of disposition areas. The advisability of a 
change in a battalion disposition area located in zones of 
contamination, fires and flooding is determined by the degree of 
danger of the situation at hand to personnel, weapons and 
vehicles. If their decontamination is required, it is done 
outside of new disposition areas. 
  With a change in area, one should pay attention to 
covertness 
of exiting the area, to movement and to occupation of the new 
one. As a rule, the change should be made at night or under 
other conditions of limited visibility. Allaround reconnaissance 
(observation) should be conducted in subunits and air defense 
weapons must be ready to repel a strike by enemy aircraft and 
helicopters. 
  Ground reconnaissance of the designated area is organized 
before the battalion moves out to it. Usually one of the 
battalion staff officers and one officer (warrant officer) or 
NCO from each company are included in the ground reconnaissance 
party. They clarify locations of companies, other organic and 
attached subunits, and COP's; the air defense subunit launch 
(firing) positions; and locations of technical support and rear 
subunits. They reconnoiter and mark access routes, meet their 
subunits and lead them to the designated places. Subunit columns 
are not permitted to halt on roads while awaiting disposition in 
the allotted area. 
  It is forbidden to make signs or put up markers with the 
name 
and numbering of subunits and their commanders' last names. 
  If it is proposed to dispose subunits in an area free of the 
enemy, first enemy raiding and reconnaissance parties and his 
reconnaissance-signaling devices are detected and destroyed, 
mined and contaminated terrain sectors are discovered and 
marked, and suitability of using water and the food remaining 
after the enemy's departure and the possibility of using other 
supplies is determined. 
  Areas with residual radiation as well as areas mined by the 
enemy as a rule are not occupied by troops. 
  The chief of staff prepares proposals for the battalion 
commander in advance for decisionmaking on disposition at the 
halt and draws up a report on the effective combat and numerical 
strength and a diagram of disposition area security and defense. 
The deputy commander for rear services submits a request for 
delivery of supplies, a report on battalion logistic support 
and, in addition, a diagram of the security and defense of 
disposition of battalion rear subunits; and the instructor 
(chemical warfare instructor) compiles a report on personnel 
radiation doses. 
  On receiving a mission for disposition at the halt the 
company (battalion) commander analyzes it and 
estimates the situation. In estimating the 
enemy, one determines his distance and the 
possibility of an attack and delivery of strikes by mass 
destruction weapons, aircraft, artillery and other weapons. 
Conclusions are drawn on this basis about the place, strength 
and makeup of security at the halt and about measures for 
protection against mass destruction weapons, air defense, 
maskirovka, the area's engineer preparation, and conduct of 
reconnaissance and security when moving forward to the 
disposition area. 
  In estimating his own subunits the commander takes 
into account the effect of their situation and makeup on the 
size of disposition areas. In estimating adjacent subunits, 
their primary and alternate disposition areas are studied and 
advisable locations (disposition areas) of one's own subunits 
are planned (if they were not given) and requirements for their 
preparation are specified with consideration of requirements for 
protection against mass destruction weapons. 
  In estimating the nature of terrain, the commander 
plans the locations (areas) and procedure for disposition of 
subunits, C[.sup]2[/] facilities, rear and technical support 
subunits and security at the halt in the battalion. The 
procedure for taking advantage of terrain properties and the 
measures for engineer preparation of the area are specified. 
  In estimating the NBC situation, the possibility 
of safest disposition of subunits and necessary measures for 
protecting personnel and vehicles are determined. 
  In the decision for disposition at the halt, the 
company (battalion) commander specifies the following: locations 
(disposition areas) of subunits and the procedure for moving to 
them; makeup, missions and lines of security at the halt (in the 
battalion) and from what subunits it is assigned; missions and 
places of air defense weapon launch (firing) positions; the duty 
subunit; measures for protecting against mass destruction 
weapons, supporting combat readiness, repelling an enemy 
surprise attack and engineer preparation of areas (primary and 
alternate); and locations of C[.sup]2[/] facilities. 
  Based on the decision the company (battalion) commander 
issues the operation order, in which he indicates the 
following in assigning missions: 

  -  for motorized rifle (tank) platoons (companies) and 
other organic and attached subunits--primary and alternate 
locations (disposition areas) and procedure for their occupation 
and engineer preparation; 
  -  for security--makeup and position of security 
(movement route of patrols) and time of occupying it (beginning 
of patrolling); mission, procedure for commencing and conducting 
fire, maintaining communications and reporting the enemy; relief 
procedure, and the password and reply; 
  -  for air defense subunit--launch (firing) positions, 
mission, and time and degree of combat readiness; 
  -  for duty subunit--makeup, for what actions to be 
ready, disposition area and signals for requesting the 
subunit. 


    In organizing comprehensive support, measures are provided 
for repelling an enemy ground attack. For these purposes MRC's 
(TC's) and the ATP are given deployment lines and missions, the 
mortar battery, GLP and attached artillery subunit are given 
firing positions, and the procedure for preparing firing 
positions (lines of deployment) and moving out of them and a 
possible maneuver of fire and subunits are determined. The 
company (battalion) commander determines what duty weapons to 
have in the subunits to repel an enemy air attack and indicates 
the procedure for conducting fire. 
  After assigning missions and organizing comprehensive 
support, the company (battalion) commander supervises 
preparation of the disposition area, servicing and maintenance 
of weapons and vehicles, replenishment of subunits' missiles, 
ammunition and other supplies, and maintenance of subunits' 
combat readiness. 
  The following documents are drawn up in the battalion for 
disposition at the halt: operation order for the disposition, 
diagram of battalion disposition area security and defense, 
request for logistic support of subunits, report on effective 
combat and numerical strength, report on logistic support, and 
report on radiation doses. 
  A company organizes local security, performed by patrols and 
by constant alert duty of observers at the company COP. Patrols 
perform duty by making the rounds of the company disposition. In 
addition, a daily detail is assigned for guarding personnel, 
weapons and military vehicles. 
  Battalion security at the halt is accomplished by security 
posts consisting of a squad (tank) put out at a distance of up 
to 1,500 m on threatened axes where necessary; on concealed 
approaches by listening posts of 2-3 persons put out up to 400 m 
from the battalion disposition area; and within the disposition 
area by local security, including two-man patrols and constant 
alert duty of observers at the battalion COP. 
  Subunits are disposed nearer the outskirts in built-up 
areas. 
Basement rooms of buildings, local bunkers and other sturdy 
structures are used as shelters. 
  Radio-frequency and heat emitting objects are camouflaged by 
special covers (screens), and dummy objects (decoy flares) are 
prepared near them. Routes for subunits' forward movement from 
the area and for maneuver in repelling an enemy attack are 
reconnoitered and prepared in and on approaches to the area. 
  A company (battalion) in a disposition area must be in 
constant readiness to repel an enemy ground and air attack and 
destroy his airborne and raiding and reconnaissance parties. 
<H5>  2. MRC or TC (MRB or TB) in a Security Detachment at the Halt </H5>
  Security at the halt usually is accomplished by security 
detachments at the halt and outposts. 
  The following are missions of a company (battalion) in a 
security detachment at the halt: promptly detect the appearance 
of the ground enemy and warn the protected regiment of this; 
prevent penetration of enemy reconnaissance in the designated 
security zone; not allow servicemen and subunits of their 
regiment who do not know the password, as well as all civilians, 
to travel (walk) across the line of security at the halt; in 
case of enemy attack, support the protected regiment's 
deployment and organized engagement. 
  To perform these missions an MRC (MRB) is reinforced by an 
artillery battery, AT weapon subunits, grenade launchers, air 
defense subunit, and combat engineer subunit; and a TC is 
reinforced by an artillery battery, motorized rifle subunit and 
combat engineer subunit. In all cases the company (battalion) is 
provided with the necessary number of radios, and telephone 
communications is established with it. 
  A security detachment at the halt is given a defense line 
and 
zone of responsibility [polosa okhraneniya i vedeniya razvedki] 
(diagrams 24 and 25). The zone of responsibility may reach up to 
5 km in frontage for a company and up to 10 km for a battalion. 
  The distance from the unit of a company assigned to security 
at the halt should ensure its execution of a maneuver and 
organized engagement and may be up to 10 km, and that of a 
battalion up to 15 km. 
  A security detachment at the halt occupies and prepares its 
indicated line for defense, covering the most important axes 
with outposts. The line must favor defense, provide a good field 
of view toward the enemy, be prepared with emplacements and 
covered by obstacles; emplacements are connected into a 
continuous trench when there is lengthy performance of security 
duty. 
  Primary positions, and alternate positions if time is 
available, are prepared in the zone of responsibility. Based on 
combat training experience, a company may prepare a defense 
position of up to 2.5 km in frontage and a battalion up to 7.5 
km on the main axis of its zone of responsibility. Gaps between 
outposts and likely avenues of tank approach are under 
continuous observation and covered by fire of artillery and 
other weapons. Tanks attached to an MRC also may be used in 
operations from ambushes. The artillery subunit is disposed in 
the depth of the company defense, as a rule on a likely avenue 
of tank approach, and prepares several lines for conducting 
creeping and standing barrier fire and direct fire. Security 
posts are put out for observing the terrain and warning of the 
enemy's appearance ahead and to the sides in the company zone of 
responsibility, and listening posts are put out on concealed 
approaches. Reconnaissance is accomplished by observation from 
all COP's. In addition, patrol squads (tanks) and sometimes also 
a combat reconnaissance patrol are sent out. 
  The security post position is selected so it provides good 
observation and enables its stubborn defense until the security 
detachment is ready for battle. 
  Patrols are sent out to inspect the terrain, check vigilance 
of duty performance by security posts and outposts, and for 
contact with adjacent subunits of security at the halt. 
Observers assigned for this keep a lookout for signals of 
security posts and outposts. 
  The company (battalion) reserve of up to a motorized rifle 
(tank) platoon (company) is disposed in the depth in readiness 
to maneuver to threatened axes. 
  A moving ground target radar reconnaissance post may be 
deployed in the company for prompt detection of an advancing 
enemy, especially from the direction of concealed approaches. 
  On receiving the mission, the company (battalion) commander 
analyzes it, estimates the situation, makes a decision from the 
map, communicates missions to subordinates, moves the company to 
the vicinity of the indicated line, organizes observation and 
security, performs ground reconnaissance, updates the decision, 
issues the operation order and organizes occupation of the 
indicated line. 
  In assigning missions the company (battalion) commander 
indicates the following in the operation order: 

  -  for outposts--means of reinforcement, zone of 
responsibility, positions and extent of their engineer 
preparation, where to place security posts, patrols and 
listening posts, the line up to which to conduct reconnaissance, 
and the procedure for actions in repelling an enemy attack; 
  -  for reserve--disposition area and for what actions 
to be ready; 
  -  for artillery subunits--firing 
positions and missions for supporting the battle of outposts; 
  -  for air defense subunit--launch (firing) positions, 
mission, time and degree of readiness; and for motorized rifle 
(tank) subunits--procedure for conducting fire against enemy 
airborne targets. 


    In the sixth paragraph of the operation order, in 
addition to time of readiness to perform the mission, the 
company (battalion) commander indicates the time for occupying 
positions and for readiness of the system of fire, and the 
sequence and time periods for engineer preparation of positions. 
  After assigning missions to subunits the company (battalion) 
commander organizes coordination; gives them instructions on 
comprehensive support to battle and protection against precision 
weapons; and specifies the procedure for maintaining 
communications with subunits. In addition, the reply also is 
given to commanders of outposts and of subunits assigned for 
conducting reconnaissance. 
  Missions for outposts and attached means of reinforcement as 
well as locations of observers (observation posts) are updated 
on the terrain during ground reconnaissance. 
  On receipt of data on the enemy's appearance, the company 
(battalion) commander reports this to the commander who sent out 
the security element and informs adjacent subunits. Small enemy 
groups attempting to penetrate to protected subunits are 
captured or destroyed by the security detachment. With an attack 
by superior enemy forces the company (battalion) stubbornly 
holds the line and supports the regiment's deployment and 
engagement. 
  In case of an enemy airborne assault force landing in the 
zone of responsibility, the company (battalion) commander takes 
steps to destroy it and reports to the commander who sent out 
the security element. 
<H5>  Chapter X - Combat Support </H5>
<H5>  1. General Provisions </H5>
  Combat support holds an important place among factors 
determining achievement of success in modern combined arms 
battle. It consists of the organization and accomplishment of 
measures aimed at precluding an enemy surprise attack, reducing 
the effectiveness of his fire and strikes against subunits, and 
creating favorable conditions for their organized, timely 
engagement and successful conduct of battle. 
  Reconnaissance, security, protection against mass 
destruction 
weapons, maskirovka, and engineer and chemical support are the 
basic kinds of combat support. In addition, electronic warfare 
is conducted in the battalion. Measures of protection against 
enemy precision weapons are accomplished in performing combat 
support measures. 
  The subunit (battalion, company and so on) commander 
organizes combat support in accordance with the decision which 
has been made and instructions of the higher staff (commander). 
Combat support in the battalion is organized directly by the 
chief of staff in accordance with the battalion commander's 
instructions. 
  The content of combat support measures is determined in the 
course of the situation estimate based on conclusions about the 
effect of particular situation conditions and features on 
upcoming subunit operations in order to take maximum advantage 
of favorable circumstances on the one hand and to reduce and 
neutralize negative circumstances on the other hand. 
Requirements for particular kinds of combat support and their 
elements are determined and their quantitative-qualitative data 
are established, and then a decision is made on the specific 
content of each kind of combat support based on an estimate of 
existing capabilities to satisfy these requirements: goal, 
missions, forces and assets, methods of operations, time, place, 
expected result, and procedure for reporting fulfillment of 
missions. 
  Missions in terms of kinds of combat support are 
communicated 
in the form of directions (instructions). This usually is done 
after assigning the combat mission and at the conclusion of 
organizing coordination. 
  Performance of assigned missions is monitored. In case of 
abrupt situation changes, missions in terms of kinds of combat 
support are promptly updated and new forces and assets assigned 
if necessary. Successful resolution of this matter is 
facilitated by foresight of commanders at all levels of possible 
situation changes and preparation of appropriate combat support 
measures in advance on this basis. 
<H5>  2. Reconnaissance </H5>
  Reconnaissance is one of the most important conditions for 
achieving success in all kinds of battle. It is difficult to 
make substantiated decisions for battle and for accomplishing 
planned operations without knowing the enemy and features of the 
real nature of terrain in an area of operations. Its purpose is 
to collect information on the enemy and terrain in a timely 
manner. 
  Ignorance and especially underestimation of the enemy as a 
rule leads to incorrect conclusions about him, his possible 
concept of operations and the methods, time and place of their 
accomplishment, and consequently also to unsubstantiated 
operations of friendly forces and assets both in terms of 
methods as well as in terms of goal, place and time. The result 
is failure. "The most dangerous thing in war . . .," Lenin 
pointed out, "is to underestimate the enemy and be content with 
the fact that we are stronger. This is the most dangerous thing 
that can cause defeat..."[.sup]1[/] 
  The content of reconnaissance missions is determined by the 
nature of subunit operations. In the defense, reconnaissance 
must uncover enemy preparation for an attack and the possible 
time of his readiness to attack, establish the makeup of the 
enemy grouping, and identify the axis of his main attack and 
nature of maneuver for a close or deep envelopment or for 
building up efforts. It is especially important to determine the 
possible time of an assault, locations of firing positions of 
artillery and other weapons, locations of C[.sup]2[/] 
facilities, the combat effectiveness of enemy troops and their 
affiliation. 
  In the attack, reconnaissance must establish the effective 
combat strength, affiliation, combat effectiveness, situation, 
possible concept of enemy operations, and whether or not he has 
nuclear and precision weapons; and discover firing positions of 
weapons, strongpoints and the system of fire in them, gaps, and 
the nature of engineer preparation of positions. It is 
especially important to precisely establish locations of AT 
missile systems and other AT weapons, tanks, and machinegun 
emplacements and the nature of engineer obstacles. It is 
important to identify features of terrain on the FEBA and in the 
depth from the standpoint of its passability by subunits and 
convenience of employing tanks and other vehicles; establish the 
presence on it of sectors which cannot be viewed visually or by 
radar devices and the presence of natural barriers; and 
determine possibilities of negotiating them. 
  The main demands place on reconnaissance are purposefulness, 
continuity, activeness, promptness, concealment, reliability, 
and accuracy in determining coordinates of reconnoitered 
objectives (targets). Attention should be given to timeliness of 
collecting data and transmitting it to the appropriate echelon. 
The transmission of data must conform to its importance. 
Especially important information is reported immediately. 
  Intelligence is collected by various methods. The 
main ones are observation, listening, reconnaissance ambushes 
and raids, questioning local residents, interrogating prisoners 
and defectors, and studying captured enemy documents. 
Information on the enemy also may be received from higher 
headquarters and adjacent subunits. 
  Reconnaissance in the company and in subunits below company 
is conducted ahead of one's frontage to the depth of the combat 
mission (reach of weapons). 
  A general [obzornaya] reconnaissance zone to a depth up to 
10 
km and a detailed [detalnaya] reconnaissance zone to a depth up 
to 5 km are designated in the battalion for conducting 
reconnaissance. The width of reconnaissance zones usually 
coincides with the frontage of battalion operations. 
  A company (battalion) may conduct reconnaissance in 
force, which is organized and conducted just as in an 
attack on a defending enemy from a position of direct contact. 
At this time reconnaissance of all kinds is conducted actively. 
Subunit commanders in a sector where reconnaissance in force is 
conducted observe the battle and study the enemy. 
  Subunits are prepared for a reconnaissance in force in a 
most 
thorough manner. As a rule, they are reinforced by additional 
weapons. 
  Tactical reconnaissance is conducted by reconnaissance 
patrols, combat reconnaissance patrols, patrol squads (tanks) 
and observation posts. A company (battalion) may be assigned to 
a reconnaissance detachment. Radar reconnaissance is conducted 
by moving ground target radar reconnaissance posts. Engineer 
reconnaissance is performed by tactical reconnaissance entities 
and attached subunits of engineer troops. Radiological and 
chemical reconnaissance is performed by specially trained 
squads, crews and teams. Artillery reconnaissance is conducted 
by organic and attached artillery subunits. 
  A reconnaissance patrol as a rule is sent out at 
reconnaissance platoon strength; in addition, it is also sent 
out at MRP (TP) strength from a reconnaissance detachment. Such 
a patrol operates up to 15 km from its subunits, and up to 10 km 
when assigned from a reconnaissance detachment. 
  The combat reconnaissance patrol is sent out at 
MRP (TP) strength to a distance ensuring observation of it and 
its support by fire. Out of contact with the enemy, the distance 
of a combat reconnaissance patrol may reach 10 km. 
  Patrols conduct reconnaissance by patrol squads (tanks), 
observers and foot patrols. They collect intelligence by 
observation, listening, reconnaissance ambushes, raids, 
questioning local residents, interrogating prisoners, and 
studying enemy documents, weapons and vehicles. In addition, a 
combat reconnaissance patrol collects information by battle. 
  A reconnaissance patrol is sent out in all kinds of battle, 
and a combat reconnaissance patrol as a rule in the attack. In 
the defense, for example, a combat reconnaissance patrol may be 
assigned both to flanks as well as to the rear of the defense 
area during a battle when there is a threat of an airborne 
assault force landing or penetration of airmobile and 
maneuvering parties. During movement they displace by bounds, 
from cover to cover. They perform reconnaissance by all 
personnel, basically by observation. A combat reconnaissance 
patrol employs fire if necessary, destroying enemy weapons and 
personnel hampering its operations. Operations of patrols must 
be distinguished by concealment on the one hand and by speed on 
the other. Their personnel are chosen and trained especially 
thoroughly, taking into account that the enemy also conducts 
reconnaissance and attempts to mislead the other side's 
reconnaissance. Data collected must be valid, and so it is 
rechecked. By the way, this also goes for other methods of 
obtaining reconnaissance information. 
  The reconnaissance ambush is conducted to capture 
prisoners, documents and models of enemy weapons and vehicles, 
and a raid in addition is conducted to destroy (disable) an 
installation. Usually a reconnaissance or motorized rifle (tank) 
subunit up to a platoon in strength or a team of specially 
chosen privates and NCO's is assigned to an ambush. The 
raid is conducted by subunits performing 
reconnaissance. 
  The ambush and raid are a very effective reconnaissance 
method, but they must be thoroughly prepared and supported, 
especially from the standpoint of achieving surprise and speed 
in performing the mission. In the Great Patriotic War an ambush 
was prepared based on careful observation of the enemy to 
determine the most advantageous place where it was possible to 
capture prisoners without losses. Such ambushes often were used 
to intercept enemy scouts. 
  The patrol squad (tank) is sent out from a subunit 
conducting reconnaissance or from a platoon (company) performing 
a combat mission in isolation from the main body in order to 
detect the enemy promptly and reconnoiter terrain. It operates 
at a distance ensuring observation of it and its support by 
fire. A patrol squad performs the mission by moving in a BMP 
(BTR) or motor vehicle or in dismounted formation, and in winter 
also on skis. Reconnaissance is conducted by observation and by 
foot patrols. A patrol tank conducts reconnaissance by 
observation. Patrol squads (a tank) may be assigned to set up a 
reconnaissance ambush. 
  A patrol squad (tank) usually operates off the road, moving 
from one point favorable (convenient) for concealed observation 
to another (structure, bushes, edge of grove, reverse slopes of 
hill or elevation, haystack and so on). 
  In case of an encounter with a small enemy group, the patrol 
squad (tank) lets it go by or, by direction of the commander who 
sent it out, organizes an ambush and captures prisoners, 
documents and models of weapons. When there is a surprise 
encounter and it is impossible to evade, the squad (tank) opens 
fire and thereby warns of the enemy's unexpected appearance. 
  Observation is the principal method of reconnaissance in 
subunits in all kinds of battle. It is conducted continuously by 
commanders personally, by observation posts, by observers of 
tanks, squads, platoons and companies and by duty weapon crews. 
  Observation is organized so as to ensure the best view of 
the 
enemy and terrain ahead of the front, on the flanks and in the 
rear to the greatest possible depth. Special attention must be 
given to sectors difficult to view and to conducting observation 
of their approaches. 
  For the most thorough observation, it should be conducted 
systematically, in a certain sequence of actions. Thus, it is 
advisable to have observers conduct it in sectors and to divide 
a sector conditionally into zones: near, middle and far. 
  First it is desirable to inspect each zone rapidly so as not 
to miss prominent objects which may disappear in time. Then 
observation continues in the zones-first the near, then the 
middle and so on. Objects in zones should be inspected from 
right to left with consideration of terrain relief and the 
presence of local features, where disposition of particular 
enemy forces, installations and assets is possible. 
  Observation is conducted at night and under other conditions 
of limited visibility using night vision device, moving ground 
target reconnaissance radars, and terrain illumination assets 
and is supplemented by listening. 
  Observation of the air enemy is conducted by air observation 
posts of air defense subunits, by the company (battalion) 
recognition and identification point (post), and by observers 
and observation posts. Radiological and chemical observation is 
conducted by chemical observers of companies and by battalion 
observation posts. 
  In the defense (Diagram 25) the company posts one or two 
observers and a chemical observer and the battalion posts one or 
two observation posts and one chemical observation post when 
preparing the attack and during disposition at the halt. 
Observers and a chemical observer are assigned in the company 
(battalion) during an attack, meeting battle, withdrawal and on 
the march. An observer is assigned in the platoon in all cases. 
  An observation (chemical observation) post 
consists of 2-3 observers (chemical observers). They are 
equipped with observation devices, a map or terrain diagram, 
observation log, means of communication, and means of giving 
warning signals, and the chemical observation post in addition 
is equipped with chemical and radiological reconnaissance 
devices. 
  The moving ground target radar reconnaissance post 
usually is deployed together with the company (battalion) 
observer (observation post). It is attended by a specially 
trained company operator or by one assigned from the 
reconnaissance platoon. 
  The observation (chemical observation) post and moving 
ground 
target radar reconnaissance post conduct continuous observation 
and register detected instances of enemy activity right down to 
what are at first glance phenomena of little significance, which 
with subsequent comparison with each other and with other data 
may lead to important conclusions about enemy actions being 
taken or prepared. One should adhere to the rule that there are 
no trifles in reconnaissance. 
  A company (battalion) may operate as a reconnaissance 
detachment. In a reconnaissance detachment, reconnaissance 
is conducted by observation, reconnaissance ambushes, raids and 
if necessary also in force. Reconnaissance patrols and patrol 
squads (tanks) are sent out from a reconnaissance detachment. 
  A reconnaissance detachment is formed in the defense and 
offense. In the defense it is sent out in the absence of direct 
contact with the enemy for timely detection of his forward 
movement and deployment and for determining the makeup and 
direction of operations of the main enemy grouping, firing 
positions of weapons and locations of C[.sup]2[/] facilities. 
In the attack a reconnaissance detachment takes advantage of 
gaps and exposed enemy flanks to penetrate into the depth of his 
defense, reconnoiters positions and strongpoints, determines 
locations and directions of forward movement of reserves, 
uncovers the system of obstacles and fortification, and 
determines firing positions of weapons and locations of 
C[.sup]2[/] facilities. 
  A reconnaissance detachment also may perform an active 
mission such as seizure of crossings, passes, road junctions and 
other important objectives. 
  In an encounter with the enemy a reconnaissance detachment 
goes around his reconnaissance and security elements and 
covertly moves up to the main body to reconnoiter its makeup, 
direction of operations, time of passing important lines, 
deployment locations, and occupation of firing positions by 
weapons. 
  On approaching a water obstacle a reconnaissance detachment 
operates broadly and covertly, attempts to detect the enemy's 
presence on it, determines favorable sectors for operations of 
friendly forces, and determines the actual characteristics of 
the obstacle (width, depth), current velocity, steepness of 
banks, presence of fords and other crossings, presence of 
obstacles and so on. 
  In performing missions at night, in a built-up area, in the 
mountains and in the forest, a reconnaissance detachment should 
take into account features of situation conditions and employ 
advisable reconnaissance methods in accordance with them. 
  Under present conditions special attention must be given to 
the preparation and support of personnel of reconnaissance 
subunits and entities when they perform combat missions at 
night. The following is necessary in this connection: thorough 
outfitting with personal gear and equipping of reconnaissance 
entities with moving ground target reconnaissance radars and 
night vision devices; a check of their serviceability; and the 
ability of scouts to conduct observation at night, competently 
select a place for observers and posts, and have a good 
knowledge of revealing signs of targets and other objectives. 
  For example, at night the terrain is better viewed from a 
hollow inasmuch as in this case the object of observation is 
projected against the background of the sky. It is possible to 
determine the distance to it based on a light source. 
  But at night it is possible to have an error of 50 percent 
or 
more in determining a specific distance to a light source. 
  Sounds can be a good source of information at night. For 
example, a conversation is audible at 200-300 m, the sound of 
axe blows at 300-400 m, small arms being loaded up to 500 m, 
operation of a tank engine in place up to 1,000 m, a rifle shot 
up to 2-3 km and a round from an artillery piece up to 5 km. 
  The ability to orient oneself well in the darkness and use 
of 
various methods for this--azimuth, relief, roads, edges of 
groves, outskirts of built-up areas, high-voltage transmission 
lines, telegraph poles, streams and stars-play an exceptionally 
important role for successful performance of night 
reconnaissance missions. 
<H5>  3. Security </H5>
  Security is organized and accomplished in all forms of 
combat 
activity. It has the purpose of preventing penetration of enemy 
reconnaissance into the operating (disposition) area of friendly 
subunits, precluding a surprise attack of the ground enemy and 
of his airborne assault forces (airmobile groups) on them, and 
giving protected subunits time and favorable conditions for 
deployment (placing themselves in combat readiness) and 
engagement. 
  Depending on the nature of missions performed, subunits are 
secured as follows: in battle by combat security 
outposts, on the march by march security, during 
disposition at the halt by security at the halt. In 
addition, local security is organized in all cases. 
  A combat security outpost is sent out by direction 
of the senior commander or by decision of the company 
(battalion) commander. March security and security at the halt 
is sent out by direction of the senior commander, or 
independently during operations in isolation from the main body. 
Local security is organized by subunit commanders depending on 
the mission being performed, situation conditions and the senior 
commander's instructions. It is performed by sentries, patrols 
and listening posts with consideration of the organization of 
alert duty of weapons, observation, and commandant's service. 
  In organizing security it is necessary to indicate the 
following: axes on which special attention must be concentrated; 
place to have security and its makeup; time for sending it out 
(posting it) and missions; password and reply. 
  Constant combat readiness, strict observance of the 
prescribed procedure for alert duty and actions, observance of 
maskirovka measures, and a display of high vigilance as well as 
decisiveness and staunchness are required of security personnel. 
All security personnel must know the password. The reply is 
given to commanders of security subunits. 
  Usually a platoon is assigned to a combat security outpost 
from a battalion in the defense. This platoon is given a 
position up to 2 km from the FEBA. The platoon establishes a 
strongpoint at this position and conducts defense in accordance 
with requirements and provisions of the tactics of defensive 
battle. Missions of the combat security outpost are to secure 
the battalion main body against an enemy surprise attack and 
prohibit him from conducting reconnaissance. 
  In the attack, combat security outpost missions are assigned 
basically to combat reconnaissance patrols. 
  March security is an element of the march 
formation. In addition to security, it also performs the task of 
reconnaissance. A battalion usually sends out a combat 
reconnaissance patrol. In an encounter with the enemy, march 
security destroys his security element and reconnaissance, moves 
to the enemy main body and immobilizes it, providing favorable 
conditions for operations of the battalion (company) main body. 
  Security at the halt is intended for security of 
subunits during their disposition at the halt. In the battalion 
it is accomplished by security posts and listening posts. In a 
company assigned to an outpost it is accomplished by security 
posts. Obstacles are emplaced, listening posts, observation 
posts and two-man patrols are sent out and technical signaling 
devices are used ahead of the FEBA and in gaps between positions 
of security at the halt. 
  Local security is organized and accomplished 
constantly under all conditions regardless of the nature of 
actions being performed, how far off the enemy is, and the time 
of year and day. 
<H5>  4. Protection Against Mass Destruction Weapons </H5>
  Armies of the United States and other NATO countries 
continue 
to rely on use of nuclear and chemical weapons in war. Both the 
munitions as well as their delivery vehicles are constantly 
being improved. All this makes protection of troops against 
these weapons especially important. 
  Protection against mass destruction weapons is organized and 
accomplished for maximum weakening of the effect of enemy NBC 
weapons and results of destruction of enterprises of the nuclear 
and chemical industry, and for preserving combat effectiveness 
and ensuring successful performance of combat missions by 
subunits. It should be organized to the full extent in 
conducting battle both with and without the use of mass 
destruction weapons. 
  It includes the following: dispersal of subunits and a 
periodic change of the areas they occupy, and sometimes also of 
their positions; fortification of one's areas (positions) and 
preparation of maneuver routes; warning subunits about the 
immediate threat and beginning of enemy use of mass destruction 
weapons, about destruction of enterprises of the nuclear power 
and chemical industry, and about friendly nuclear strikes, and 
also warning the personnel about NBC contamination. It also 
includes accomplishment of antiepidemic, sanitary-hygienic, and 
special preventive medicine measures, identifying and mopping up 
the consequences of enemy use of mass destruction weapons, and 
assurance of personnel security and protection during operations 
in zones of contamination and areas of destructive damage, fires 
and flooding. 
  Protection against mass destruction weapons is organized and 
accomplished based on the subunit commander's decision and 
senior commander's instructions with consideration of the nature 
of the mission being performed and actions being accomplished. 
The commander usually indicates: procedure for 
dispersal of subunits, change of disposition areas, and use of 
protective properties of terrain and equipment; procedure for 
warning of the immediate threat and beginning of enemy use of 
mass destruction weapons; signals warning of NBC contamination 
and procedure of actions in response to them; time periods for 
conducting antiepidemic, sanitary-hygienic and special 
preventive medicine measures; procedure for mopping up in the 
aftermath of enemy use of mass destruction weapons; safety 
measures during operations in zones of contamination and areas 
of destructive damage, fires and flooding. 
  The specific content of each of the indicated measures 
depends on situation conditions, and particularly on missions 
being performed, the subunit's situation and makeup, missions 
and operations of adjacent subunits, nature of terrain, weather 
and time of year. 
  Dispersal, a change of areas (positions) and their 
fortification are among the most important measures of 
protection. Thus, dispersal should reduce losses of subunits and 
simultaneously ensure firm C[.sup]2[/], coordination and 
successful conduct of battle. 
  Platoons (companies) are the elements to be dispersed in the 
company (battalion). In the defense gaps may be up to 300 m 
between platoon strongpoints and up to 1,000 m between company 
strongpoints. Dispersal in depth is achieved by disposing a 
portion of the forces behind subunits defending in the first and 
second trenches. For example, the second echelon company in the 
battalion may be up to 400-600 m from first echelon companies. 
In the attack, lateral dispersal is ensured by an interval of 
50-100 m or more between vehicles and platoons (in the 
assaulting line). Dispersal in depth is achieved by the position 
of platoons (companies) in the battle formation as an echelon or 
wedge, and in the battalion in addition by the distance of the 
second echelon (reserve) and artillery from the assaulting line. 
  A change of areas (positions) is envisaged and carried out 
under the outlined plan and by direction of the senior 
commander. It is accomplished covertly and in a short time. 
Subunits usually change areas successively so a high degree of 
combat readiness is preserved on the one hand and maskirovka 
both of the portion of forces remaining in the occupied area as 
well as of subunits moving into another area is ensured on the 
other hand. The other part of subunit forces does not begin 
moving until completion of the move to the new area, 
consolidation in it, and full maskirovka. Areas left by the 
subunit should be maintained as real ones by simulating 
occupation, i.e., they become dummy ones. 
  Positions and areas are fortified and maneuver routes 
prepared in accordance with directions of company (battalion) 
commanders on engineer support. In particular, in the defense 
emplacements, trenches, communication trenches, dugouts and 
bunkers for personnel and emplacements and shelters for weapons 
and vehicles are prepared at positions and in strongpoints and 
areas. Bunkers with special equipment should support the safe 
presence of personnel in them without individual protective gear. 
  Fortification should begin immediately on subunits' arrival 
at the position or in the designated area. Fortification 
structures reduce penetrating radiation by tens of times, 
protect against thermal radiation of nuclear bursts, and protect 
against liquid-droplet chemical agents. Thus, with an air burst 
of a 20 KT nuclear weapon, the radius of the combined casualty 
zone for personnel in the open is around 1,500 m and the area of 
the zone is around 8 km[.sup]2[/]. But if personnel are in 
emplacements, slit trenches or trenches during the burst, then 
the radius of the combined casualty zone is reduced to 1,000 m 
and the area of the zone to 3 km[.sup]2[/]. Consequently, 
even very simple fortification structures reduce the area of the 
personnel casualty zone from a nuclear strike by approximately 
2.8 times. With respect to protection by such structures as 
dugouts, the casualty area of personnel in this case is reduced 
by 25 times compared with their being in the open. 
  In all cases, especially with a shortage of time, it is 
necessary to take advantage of protective and concealing 
properties of terrain--forest tracts, ravines, hollows, caves, 
mines (quarries) and other natural cover. But taking into 
account that woods, hollows and ravines facilitate persistence 
of chemical agent vapors and biological aerosols, it is also 
necessary to check such terrain features carefully. 
  With the appearance of the immediate threat and beginning of 
enemy use of mass destruction weapons or delivery of friendly 
nuclear strikes, subunits are warned by the company (battalion) 
commander by direction of (at a signal from) the battalion 
(regimental) staff based on intelligence. Subunits are notified 
immediately over all means of communication by unified signals 
constantly in effect. 
  Steps are taken ensuring protection of subunits on receiving 
a signal warning of NBC contamination. Personnel in the open put 
on individual protective gear and those in closed fighting 
vehicles (BTR's) put on breathing masks (protective masks). 
  Hatches, doors and firing ports in fighting vehicles and 
tanks are closed and the system of protection against mass 
destruction weapons is turned on. Personnel in protective 
shelters turn on the collective protection system. 
  For antiepidemic, sanitary-hygienic and preventive purposes, 
protective inoculations are given, careful monitoring of all 
servicemen's observance of rules of personal and social hygiene 
is organized, and special protective drugs (antidotes, 
antibiotics, antiradiation and other drugs) are used based on a 
comprehensive estimate of the possible situation in case of the 
use of mass destruction weapons. These measures are carried out 
by direction of the senior commander or independently when there 
is immediate danger. 
  In case of enemy use of mass destruction weapons it is 
necessary to identify the consequences without delay: determine 
losses, the personnel's morale and the scale and nature of 
contamination, destructive damages, fires and flooding. This is 
done based on subunit commanders' personal observation, reports 
from subunits and the data of various kinds of reconnaissance 
and of radiological and chemical monitoring. Based on the data 
received and their estimate, the subunit commander makes a 
decision in which he determines the procedure for moving 
subunits out of the danger area, restoring combat effectiveness, 
mopping up in the aftermath of enemy use of mass destruction 
weapons, as well as further actions. And it is important 
initially to determine the combat-effective subunits and methods 
of their actions in the situation at hand, and then the specific 
content of measures for mopping up in the aftermath of the use 
of mass destruction weapons and the procedure for carrying them 
out. 
  In mopping up in the aftermath of enemy use of mass 
destruction weapons it is necessary to reconnoiter the stricken 
area, organize rescue operations, give first aid to victims, 
transport or carry them out of the casualty (contamination) 
zone, evacuate them to aid stations and perform emergency 
prevention. Then perform decontamination of subunits and 
personnel. Simultaneously with this, one should clear rubble, 
organize the extinguishing of fires and perform restrictive 
isolation measures. 
  Partial decontamination of subunits and personnel should be 
carried out by order of the commander without ceasing to perform 
the combat mission. Complete decontamination is performed by 
order of the senior commander. 
  In connection with the vastness of zones of contamination 
and 
destructive damage, a subunit often may end up in them at full 
strength. Under these conditions it is necessary to take steps 
to ensure safety and protect personnel. For this it is necessary 
to constantly keep an eye on the NBC situation in the area of 
operations, changes on the terrain and the degree of personnel 
exposure. In case the danger of personnel injuries appears, 
promptly use protective gear, clarify the method of actions and 
strictly monitor the personnel's observance of rules of conduct 
on contaminated terrain. 
  In a situation where a subunit has to cross a zone with a 
high level of contamination, it is advisable to go around it. 
But if that is impossible, such a zone should be crossed at 
maximum speed along axes ensuring least injury and contamination 
of personnel and vehicles. In all cases reconnaissance should be 
carried out for this purpose, such as sending out a specially 
trained patrol squad (tank). 
  Maintaining direct contact with the enemy is an indirect 
measure of ensuring personnel safety from injury by mass 
destruction weapons; this will hamper him in employing his 
weapons because of the threat of injury to his own troops. 
Therefore in the attack, for example, one should close quickly 
with the enemy and pursue him relentlessly. 
  In all cases, increased safety of friendly subunits is 
ensured by thorough measures of maskirovka, use of natural 
cover, and rapid execution of a maneuver. 
  Under present conditions not only weapons of mass 
destruction, but also conventional precision weapons have begun 
to possess great casualty and damage effect. According to 
foreign specialists' views, to a certain extent their combat 
effectiveness is even becoming comparable with low-yield 
tactical nuclear weapons. Thus, just one T-22 or T-16 rocket of 
the J-SAK reconnaissance-strike complex (of the Assault Breaker 
type) is capable of killing around ten armored targets with high 
probability (0.7-0.8). Accordingly, just one salvo of a 
battalion of such rockets (6 launchers) potentially can disable 
almost up to two tank battalions. Aviation and field artillery 
presently have precision guided homing weapons. AT precision 
weapons (AT guided missiles) have become especially numerous in 
combat arms subunits and units. 
  It is obvious that without taking effective steps to counter 
enemy use of such weapons and to reduce their effectiveness 
against a subunit, it is difficult to ensure preservation of 
combat effectiveness on the modern battlefield even when nuclear 
weapons are not used. Therefore along with measures of 
protection against mass destruction weapons there also has to be 
protection against precision weapons. 
  In principle, some of the measures of protection against 
mass 
destruction weapons as well as measures of electronic warfare 
and maskirovka also provide protection against precision 
weapons. In all cases capable use of protective properties of 
terrain and combat vehicles, skilled use of maneuver and 
thorough air defense organization also serve the purposes of 
effective protection against mass destruction and precision 
weapons. 
<H5>  5. Electronic Warfare </H5>
  Various electronic equipment is playing an ever larger role 
in development of means of warfare, especially systems and 
methods of C[.sup]2[/] of subunits and units in battle. Under 
present conditions C[.sup]2[/] of subunits and weapons 
essentially is based completely on the use of various electronic 
equipment. These are the radios of command and staff vehicles, 
tanks and BMP's (BTR's) and the electronic equipment of AT 
missile systems, air defense subunits, aircraft, helicopters, 
and artillery, reconnaissance and other subunits. The use of 
electronic equipment for reconnaissance, C[.sup]2[/] and 
precise guidance in particular permitted realizing modern 
precision weapons systems. Such systems include the J-SAK 
reconnaissance-strike complex (Assault Breaker program), which 
uses an airborne radar system for reconnaissance and weapon 
guidance, an automated system for transmitting commands to 
weapons, and homing submunitions of the Skeet or Gem type 
delivered to the target by ground or air-launched missiles with 
cluster warheads. ATGM's also are included among precision 
weapons. Thus, the TOW ATGM has a semiactive opto-electronic 
guidance system and a range of fire up to 4 km and the Hellfire 
ATGM has a laser active guidance system and a range up to 6 km 
(in the future 8-10 km or more). The electronic guidance system 
permits having a hit probability on an armored target by an 
artillery projectile of 0.5-0.6 or more at a range around 16 km 
(Copperhead projectile and so on). 
  The use of electronic equipment in modern battle took on a 
broad character and began to characterize the so-called 
electronic environment. 
  In connection with the fact that use of electronic equipment 
led to a considerable increase in quality and reliability of 
C[.sup]2[/] and to a sharp growth in effectiveness of 
weapons, it is possible to substantially hamper reconnaissance 
and C[.sup]2[/] and reduce the effectiveness of weapons and 
other combat assets by affecting electronic equipment. Therefore 
along with inflicting direct damage on the enemy by fire and 
strikes, in accomplishing the most varied combat missions each 
of the opposing sides also will attempt to disrupt or hamper the 
operation of enemy electronic equipment and systems while 
simultaneously taking all steps to ensure stable operation of 
his similar equipment. As a result a new phenomenon arises in 
conduct of modern combat operations-- electronic warfare [EW] 
[radioelektronnaya borba]. 
  EW represents a complex of subunits' measures and actions 
interrelated by goal, missions, place and time and directed 
toward detection and subsequent destruction and electronic 
suppression [radioelektronnoye podavleniye] of enemy electronic 
equipment, and also electronic protection [radioelektronnaya 
zashchita] of friendly means of C[.sup]2[/] and fire control, 
and opposition [protivodeystviye] to enemy technical 
reconnaissance equipment. Its importance received special 
confirmation during local wars in Southeast Asia and in the Near 
East, where successful performance of EW missions had a very 
direct influence on the course and outcome of combat operations. 
  EW is organized and conducted in the battalion to 
disorganize 
C[.sup]2[/] of opposing enemy subunits, degrade the 
effectiveness of employment of his weapons and technical 
reconnaissance equipment, and also ensure stable operation of 
means of C[.sup]2[/] of friendly subunits and of fire 
control. It is accomplished in close combination with fire 
damage and destruction of the principal enemy means of 
C[.sup]2[/] of subunits and weapons. It is conducted by 
fulfilling certain measures of electronic suppression, 
electronic protection of friendly means of C[.sup]2[/] of 
subunits and weapons, and opposition to enemy technical 
reconnaissance equipment. It is also conducted in coordination 
with performance of reconnaissance and maskirovka missions. 
  The battalion commander organizes conduct of EW in subunits. 
He should provide for and organize fulfillment of such measures 
as detection (reconnaissance) of enemy electronic targets and 
their engagement by fire of available weapons, electronic 
suppression of enemy electronic equipment, opposition to his 
technical reconnaissance equipment, and protection of friendly 
electronic equipment and other installations. 
  To resolve these matters back when analyzing the mission 
that 
was received it is necessary to understand the following: what 
EW measures are being planned by the senior commander and what 
is the mission of one's own subunit in their fulfillment; and 
what is to be done in what time periods, by what means, and by 
what methods. 
  In the course of the situation estimate, along with other 
matters the battalion commander also should determine whether or 
not the enemy has guided weapons, what their strong and weak 
points are under given conditions, locations of C[.sup]2[/] 
facilities and observation posts, and locations of his 
electronic equipment and, based on this, outline conditions and 
the advisable method and procedure of combating that equipment. 
  It is especially important to correctly estimate the terrain 
and the effect of weather and time of year and day and to 
determine on what lines and at what time it is advisable to lay 
smoke screens and turn on IR searchlights, and at what places it 
is advantageous to use concealing and camouflaging properties of 
terrain for protection against enemy technical reconnaissance 
equipment. 
  In estimating friendly subunits, one should determine the 
vulnerability of friendly guided weapon systems and necessary 
measures for their electronic protection and for ensuring stable 
C[.sup]2[/] of friendly subunits under conditions of enemy 
ECM [radioelektronnoye protivodeystviye]. It is necessary to 
take into account the operation of electronic equipment of 
adjacent subunits and of friendly troops and determine how to 
avoid mutual interference with that equipment during 
simultaneous operation. 
  In organizing EW the battalion commander indicates 
the following: what enemy C[.sup]2[/] facilities and 
installations are to be destroyed by fire or captured (disabled) 
and at what time, and the forces and assets to be used for this; 
procedure for employing electronic suppression assets; missions 
for electronic protection and for opposition to enemy technical 
reconnaissance equipment; and readiness times. 
  EW measures are reflected on working maps of subunit 
commanders, where one should indicate fire damage of enemy 
electronic targets, the lines, time and methods of laying smoke 
screens, lines and time for turning on IR searchlights, areas 
and lines for radar and thermal maskirovka, dummy C[.sup]2[/] 
facilities and positions, and places for setting up decoy flares. 
  In conducting EW in the battle of motorized rifle and tank 
subunits, the primary targets for fire engagement should be 
considered the electronic equipment of C[.sup]2[/] facilities 
of enemy mechanized infantry (tank) companies and battalions, 
artillery battalions (batteries) and air defense subunits with 
their electronic equipment, reconnaissance subunits (entities) 
employing electronic equipment for surveillance (detection, 
intersection) and communications, AT subunits as a whole, 
individual ATGM systems on an armor base, portable ATGM systems, 
as well as facilities for C[.sup]2[/] of aviation (forward 
air controller points). 
  An electronic target [radioelektronnyy obyekt] is understood 
to mean one of the elements of the system for C[.sup]2[/] of 
troops (subunits) and weapons outfitted with electronic 
equipment. Thus, in the battalion C[.sup]2[/] system of 
armies of the United States and FRG the primary electronic 
targets are the communications center of the battalion command 
(observation) post and the moving ground target reconnaissance 
radar (AN/PPS-5), as well as communications centers of command 
posts of artillery battalion C[.sup]2[/], mortar locating 
radars (AN/TPQ-36) and artillery locating radars (AN/TPQ-37) 
included in the Firefinder non-visual target acquisition system, 
which in turn operate as part of the TACFIRE field artillery 
automated C[.sup]2[/] system (USA). 
  In the course of battle those targets are disposed as 
follows: battalion (mechanized infantry battalion, tank 
battalion) CP 2-4 km from forward subunits in the defense and 
0.5-1.5 km in the offense; 155-mm SP howitzer artillery 
battalion CP 3-8 km from the FEBA; and field artillery radar 
positions are selected within 3-10 km from the FEBA. 
  In addition, three radio nets are established in battalions 
for C[.sup]2[/] of subunits: command, intelligence and rear. 
Communications with subordinate subunits is accomplished only 
with radios in the UHF frequency band (30-76 MHz). With 
introduction of the TACFIRE and Adler automated field artillery 
fire control systems in armies of the United States and FRG, the 
electronics of these systems accommodated at battery CP's and 
firing positions and at forward observation posts also should be 
regarded as electronic targets to be affected at the company 
(battalion) level. As we know, the TACFIRE (Adler) system 
enables rapid computer-assisted processing of target data and 
calculation of firing data at the battery-artillery group level 
in a matter of seconds. Therefore timely detection and 
destruction of its electronic targets is an important condition 
for sharply degrading the effectiveness of enemy field artillery 
fire. 
  Forward air controllers are in battle formations of first 
echelon battalions (1-2 km from the line of forward subunits, 
including at CP's of these battalions). They help aircraft 
locate targets and vector them to targets. Forward control posts 
equipped with radios for communicating with ground air control 
facilities and with aircraft are technical air control entities 
usually disposed in operation areas of first echelon battalions 
(brigades). Laser target designation devices for illuminating 
ground targets also are installed at the forward control posts 
in support of aimed strikes by aircraft using aircraft weapons 
with laser guidance systems. 
  CP's of Chaparral-Vulcan and Stinger batteries located 2-4 
km 
from the FEBA should be considered electronic targets in the 
enemy air defense system. They have some of the elements of the 
AN/MPQ-49 radar system for acquisition of low-flying targets-- 
the AN/TPQ-32 radars. 
  MRC's (TC's) and MRB's (TB's) can successfully engage all 
the 
aforementioned targets by fire of their supporting artillery 
subunits (batteries, battalions). Performing EW missions by fire 
damage of enemy electronic targets is part of overall fire 
damage of the enemy carried out in accordance with the 
commander's concept. 
  In determining the procedure for fire damage of a target, it 
should be taken into account that a battalion CP usually is 
disposed in an area of around 1.52 hectares and up to 300 rounds 
(6 artillery pieces) are necessary for its destruction in 
shelters. At the same time it should be taken into account that 
the fire of one battery with that ammunition expenditure 
sometimes will require a time of several tens of minutes, and in 
this interval the CP may change places (move out from under the 
strike). Therefore in a number of cases it is more advantageous 
to deliver a fire strike against a CP not with a battery, but 
with a battalion. The mission will be executed faster and the 
target will not manage to get out from under the strike. 
  Engaging an artillery battalion CP (the area is the very 
same-- 1.5-2 hectares) requires around 500 rounds and conduct of 
fire by a battery or battalion. Engaging the CP of a 
Chaparral-Vulcan or Stinger battery, forward air controllers and 
radars requires around 200-220 rounds and conduct of fire by a 
battery (six pieces). Engaging those targets disposed in the 
open requires an ammunition expenditure approximately 3-4 times 
less. 
  Electronic suppression is conducted in the 
battalion to disrupt operation of enemy infrared and laser 
reconnaissance and weapon control equipment by using active and 
passive jammers mounted on the vehicles (objects) being 
protected. To perform missions of electronic suppression of 
enemy electronic equipment in the company (battalion), it is 
necessary to use tank and BMP thermal smoke apparatus, the smoke 
grenade launching system, IR searchlights and smoke hand 
grenades (smokepots) and also employ artillery smoke ammunition 
of supporting artillery subunits. Use of these assets is 
especially effective in combating enemy AT weapons such as 
ATGM's. 
  It is common knowledge that it is typical of the ATGM 
control 
system that the missile is tracked automatically during flight 
using the infrared coordinator of a device guiding on signals of 
the missile's onboard tracking flare. Based on data of the IR 
coordinator, the guidance device computer automatically produces 
commands transmitted to the missile over a wire communication 
line (at the present time) and which adjust its flight along the 
line of sight with the target. 
  Such a control system has three basic functional channels: 
target sighting (tracking), missile tracking, and transmission 
of signals--guidance commands. The first two channels are the 
most vulnerable: they have an open atmospheric sector and by 
affecting it with smoke it is possible to disrupt or hamper 
control of the missile and thereby sharply degrade its hit 
probability. Another vulnerable element of the sighting channel 
is the optical sightoperator link, which can be affected by 
blinding-type interference (such as flashes of firing or a 
shellburst) and by creating heat-emitting decoys in case a 
thermal-imaging night sight is used. Creation of interference 
using an IR searchlight which simulates missile tracking flare 
emissions is an effective form of jamming the guidance device's 
IR coordinator. 
  Interference with the new Hellfire ATGM with semiactive 
laser 
homing head also can be created successfully by electronic 
suppression assets. Vulnerable spots of this system are channels 
for laser illumination and for target tracking from aboard a 
helicopter and by the missile homing head. Operation of these 
channels can be disrupted by remote laying of smoke screens by 
artillery rounds and by creating smoke screens near the target 
using thermal smoke apparatus of tanks and BMP's. It is also 
advisable to create heatemitting decoys inasmuch as this may 
help reduce the effectiveness of Hellfire missiles and of homing 
submunitions of cluster warheads on the missiles of 
reconnaissance-strike complexes. Infrared pyrotechnic cartridges 
and smoke grenades fired from tanks (BMP's) as well as burning 
smokepots, which are a source of thermal emissions, can be such 
heat-emitting decoys. 
  Protection of friendly electronic equipment 
against damage by enemy munitions which home on emissions, 
against enemy electronic suppression, and against the effect of 
ionizing and electromagnetic emissions of nuclear bursts is an 
important component of EW. 
  The principal method of protecting company (battalion) 
electronic equipment against damage by enemy munitions which 
home on emissions is by rigid regulation of their operation. 
This is achieved, for example, by turning on electronic 
equipment only for the time necessary for performing the combat 
mission, by using intermittent emission modes, by changing 
operating frequencies and by employing diversionary (imitative) 
sources of electromagnetic emissions. Using directional 
antennas, selecting frequencies favorable (stable) for given 
conditions, maneuvering operating frequencies and radio 
operating data in a timely manner, operating radio equipment on 
reduced power, and siting operating radio equipment with 
consideration of the terrain's screening properties and of the 
location and power of adjacent radios and other sources of 
electromagnetic emissions also are advisable. 
  One should pay attention to the following in considering 
questions of protecting friendly electronic equipment. In 
conducting EW support measures [radiotekhnicheskaya razvedka] 
and in jamming, NATO armies attach great importance to 
"compelling" radio operators of the net being reconnoitered to 
shift to clear-text transmissions. it is believed that along 
with a terrain relief analysis, intercepting the names of built- 
up areas, reference points and directions mentioned in such 
transmissions can substantially facilitate reconnaissance 
missions. 
  It is obvious that one of the simplest but very important 
requirements for ensuring good protection of friendly electronic 
equipment against enemy jamming is strict observance of rules of 
radio traffic and maximum reduction of the time of going on the 
air to transmit, basically by using brief signals and commands. 
The use of redundant communication channels and signaling 
devices was a very effective measure based on the past war's 
experience. 
  Opposition to enemy technical reconnaissance 
assets is one of the most important components of 
electronic warfare. The essence of such opposition is the 
elimination (weakening) of revealing signs of friendly subunits, 
installations, weapons and measures being carried out, and also 
special protection for technical means of data processing and 
transmission. 
  The enemy can conduct space, aerial and ground 
reconnaissance 
using technical means. Radiotechnical, radar, photographic, 
television, thermal, infrared, laser, radiation, acoustic, 
magnetometric, seismic and other means are used for this. 
  Subunits and weapons are concealed and revealing signs of 
their installations and measures being carried out are 
eliminated or weakened by using means of maskirovka and 
simulation of military vehicles, by using the terrain's 
concealing properties, by fulfilling requirements of secure 
C[.sup]2[/], by creating interference to technical means of 
reconnaissance using smoke, by reducing the level of combat 
vehicle thermal emissions, and by other maskirovka measures. 
  The use of radio signaling gear (REMBASS) by the enemy may 
become widespread. He can emplace radio signaling devices on 
probable movement routes and in concentration areas. Subunits 
must constantly observe the surrounding terrain to detect and 
destroy them promptly. 
  The measures for conducting EW examined above are carried 
out 
in all kinds of battle and in other operations to the full 
extent, but with emphasis on those most essential for specific 
situation conditions. Thus, the entire enumerated set of EW 
measures may be used in the defense. In accordance with senior 
commanders' instructions, it is necessary to set up vertical 
screen camouflage nets [maska-ekran], decoy flares, and corner 
reflectors at the places planned for this. Concealing properties 
of terrain are used to the maximum extent. Radar, optical and 
thermal maskirovka measures are carried out to the full extent 
in preparing emplacements and positions in addition to 
maskirovka using improvised materials. It is advisable to create 
a low-density concealing area smoke screen ("smoke haze") and to 
create dummy installations and thermal emission sources. 
  Electronic targets detected in the course of battle should 
be 
destroyed quickly by fire of supporting artillery and mortars 
and also by fire of organic weapons, and smoke screens should be 
used to blind them (in the disposition area of the targets). 
  The necessary maneuver, a change of positions, movement to a 
line of firing positions or launching of a counterattack should 
be carried out using terrain sectors sheltered from observation 
from the enemy's direction, edges of groves, embankments, dams 
and ravines. Use smoke screens in open sectors. 
  In addition to general measures in the attack, the following 
are specific measures: moving to the line of departure using 
terrain sectors sheltered from the enemy's direction, edges of 
groves, hollows and reverse slopes; firing smoke grenades 
against terrain in the direction of enemy EW support and 
surveillance equipment, including helicopters employing ATGM's; 
and deploying and assaulting under cover of smoke screens 
(placed by supporting artillery and organic assets) ahead of the 
FEBA and on flanks. 
  It is advisable to carry out an assault of the enemy FEBA 
and 
penetration of his defense with IR searchlights switched on. 
During the assault and battle in the depth it is advisable to 
make wide use of smoke to blind the enemy and cover friendly 
subunits. It is desirable to create smoke screens in the depth 
at 2-3 lines successively 600-800 m from each other using 
organic equipment of tanks and BMP's. Smoke screens also should 
be created actively during counterattacks of the enemy and when 
going around his strongpoints on the flanks. In assigning 
missions to subunits for operations in the depth, especially for 
the pursuit, it is also necessary to assign them the mission of 
destroying enemy CP's, OP's and radars by a surprise assault, 
and assign some of the subunits (a squad, a platoon) to destroy 
detected targets (electronic equipment) by an assault. 
  When the battalion or company is in the attack position or 
disposition area, and also for countering technical means of 
reconnaissance, subunits should be placed covertly and the 
conduct of radio conversations should be completely precluded. 
Corner reflectors and thermal decoys are set up to simulate 
targets by direction of senior commanders. If the situation 
permits, smoke may be used, but on condition that it not reveal 
yourself or adjacent subunits. 
<H5>  6. Tactical Maskirovka </H5>
  The purpose of maskirovka is to achieve surprise of subunit 
operations and preserve their combat effectiveness. Maskirovka 
missions consist of ensuring concealment of friendly subunits 
and misleading the enemy regarding their makeup, situation and 
the commander's concept. The most important requirements for 
maskirovka are continuity, persuasiveness, variety and 
activeness. Maskirovka measures are carried out immediately by 
subunits when they take up a particular position and are 
accomplished in all kinds of battle and in other operations. 
  Maskirovka missions are performed by a set of measures for 
concealing the simulation and by decoy actions. The set of these 
measures includes the following: use of concealing properties of 
terrain and conditions of limited visibility; use of authorized 
means of maskirovka, local materials and aerosols (smoke); 
modifying the appearance (shape) of weapons and vehicles (by 
setting up various structures on them which change the object's 
external appearance); painting weapons and vehicles to resemble 
the background of surrounding terrain; and preparing (erecting) 
dummy installations, structures, emplacements and so on. 
  Goals of maskirovka also are served by a timely warning to 
subunits about operations of enemy reconnaissance assets and by 
observance of rules of secure C[.sup]2[/], especially of the 
previously established regime of activity in an area or at a 
position. An important role is played by strictly fulfilling 
measures and rules of light, thermal, sound, radio, 
radiotechnical and radar discipline and requirements of 
maskirovka discipline, and by promptly detecting and eliminating 
revealing signs. 
  The subunit commander organizes maskirovka. In so doing he 
indicates basic maskirovka measures; the extent, time 
periods and procedure of fulfilling them; forces and assets for 
accomplishing maskirovka measures; and procedure for observing 
maskirovka discipline in the subunit. 
  Adopting maskirovka measures to protect weapons and military 
vehicles against precision weapons plays an important role. For 
this one should use ravines, reverse hillslopes, radar dead 
ground and other concealing properties of terrain and should 
carry out measures for reducing the radar, thermal and optical 
signature of fighting vehicles with respect to the surrounding 
terrain background. It is advisable to install heat-dissipating 
screens (covers) over heat-emitting surfaces (places) of 
fighting vehicles (tanks, BMP's and so on). There should be wide 
use of thermal simulators (decoy flares) and radar and laser 
reflectors. 
  In the interests of concealment, in organizing for battle it 
is necessary to keep preparatory measures secret and preclude a 
leak of information about upcoming operations--place, times, 
methods, and especially measures for deceiving the enemy. It is 
important that maskirovka measures in turn not draw enemy 
attention (for example, by their simultaneous active 
accomplishment in certain areas). 
  In this connection, to mislead the enemy one should carry 
out 
all maskirovka measures considering the likelihood of their 
perception by the enemy, i.e., one should conjecture what he may 
take to be simulation or a dummy installation and what he may 
take to be real. Decoy actions, a deliberate display of activity 
of real forces and assets on a dummy axis or in a dummy area, 
and simulation of real installations, positions and emplacements 
by creating dummy ones, where the alleged presence and 
functioning of particular assets or subunits is shown by 
recreating appropriate revealing signs, are especially effective 
in this regard. These measures must be determined and carried 
out in accordance with the commander's concept and with the idea 
of deceiving the enemy. 
  It should be borne in mind that decoy actions, simulation, 
and creation of dummy installations of some one subunit should 
not disrupt another subunit's similar measures and not come into 
contradiction with corresponding measures under the senior 
commander's plan. Therefore they must be carried out with his 
authorization. 
  Conducting measures which would create a distorted 
impression 
on the enemy's part about the system of fire and obstacles, 
FEBA, trench trace, location of emplacements of main weapons, 
and about boundaries and flanks is of special significance in 
the defense. To this end an appropriate procedure should be 
thought out for conduct of fire by various weapons before the 
beginning of battle, their maneuver, a change of locations, and 
a change of concealing devices to change the shape of the 
general background at the position, in the defense area, in the 
strongpoint and in gaps between them. One must ensure that the 
enemy forms a distorted impression of the defense alignment or 
is constantly uncertain about its particular status. It is 
especially important to carefully conceal main forces and 
assets, fire sacks, fire ambushes and reserves. 
  In choosing maskirovka methods and means, one should 
consider 
the feature of specific situation conditions: nature of relief, 
coloration of vegetation, and color background of grass. On open 
terrain, for example, it is advisable to camouflage emplacements 
and shelters to resemble spots of bare soil. Open sectors 
unoccupied by subunits are spotted for purposes of maskirovka. 
The number of spots on the terrain should be greater than the 
number of installations being concealed. 
  Camouflage painting of equipment and structures--protective, 
imitative and disruptive--presently is widely used. For example, 
tricolor camouflage painting (black, brown, green) of combat 
vehicles almost doubles the time it takes to detect the object 
and reduces the likelihood of its visual detection by one and 
one- half times compared with single-color painting.[.sup]2[/] 
  Strictest observance of maskirovka discipline is necessary 
in 
all kinds of battle. For example, one must constantly watch to 
prevent revealing signs when on defense, especially in direct 
contact with the enemy. One should not allow excessive 
movements, preclude them in open places, not give commands in a 
loud voice and not light fires at night. In this case even a 
smoldering cigarette can be noticed at a distance up to 500 m, 
and a lit match up to 1.5 km. 
  Disturbed maskirovka should be restored without delay in the 
course of defensive battle. Carry out movements and change 
positions using sheltered routes. Simultaneously with this, 
leave either some assets or a simulation of them at previous 
positions so as not to cause the enemy to suspect a possible 
maneuver. 
  Creating dummy strongpoints, positions, installations and 
movement routes is especially effective in the defense for 
maskirovka of its true alignment. One always should bear in mind 
that dummy installations should not differ from real ones and 
their number must be such that they reliably mislead the enemy. 
  In the attack it is important to conceal preparation for it 
and the place and time of the assault and ensure its surprise. 
For this it is necessary to take advantage of natural concealing 
properties and, where they are insufficient, to employ smoke 
screening and installation of camouflage nets. Smoke screening 
and installation of camouflage nets also should be used 
especially actively on a dummy axis, where an assault also is 
possible. Moreover, it is on such a dummy axis that one must 
show it is the primary axis by means of intensive firing, engine 
noise, movements, radio conversations, conduct of reconnaissance 
and so on. 
<H5>  7. Engineer Support </H5>
  The purpose of engineer support is to create necessary 
conditions for subunits' prompt, concealed forward movement, 
deployment and maneuver; for increased protection of personnel, 
weapons and vehicles against all weapons; and for inflicting 
losses on the enemy and hampering his operations. Engineer 
support in the company (battalion) includes engineer 
reconnaissance, fortification, engineer measures for maskirovka 
and protection against precision weapons, emplacing engineer 
obstacles, breaching obstacles and rubble, making crossings over 
barriers, preparing and maintaining crossings, obtaining and 
purifying water, and preparing water supply points. 
  Successful performance of engineer support missions is 
achieved by having them properly understood by all subunit 
commanders and personnel, by a high level of the personnel's 
engineer training, by skillful use of available means of 
performing engineer work (authorized and improvised equipment 
and material), and by continuous conduct of engineer 
reconnaissance of the enemy and terrain. 
  The subunit commander organizes engineer support. To this 
end, in organizing the defense he indicates the 
following: nature and time periods of fortification and 
maskirovka of positions, strongpoints and disposition areas; 
main axes which must be covered by obstacles; what installations 
must be demolished (prepared for demolition) and the time and 
methods of performing these tasks; and what maneuver routes to 
prepare. The commander of an engineer subunit (if it is 
attached) is told the procedure for using engineer vehicles and 
explosives, places and times for laying minefields and the 
procedure for the engineer subunit's coordination with motorized 
rifle (tank) and other subunits. 
  Positions, strongpoints and defense (disposition) areas are 
fortified by efforts of the subunits themselves with maximum use 
of heavy equipment, with use of explosive charges, local 
materials, constructions and factory-made structures, and with 
consideration of protective properties of terrain. The procedure 
for fortifying strongpoints (positions, areas) and the sequence, 
time periods and extent should be determined based on the 
requirement of the subunit's constant readiness for battle and a 
build-up of the protection of personnel, weapons and vehicles 
against all weapons. 
  Fortification increases survivability of a subunit in the 
defense severalfold. The more time there is, naturally the 
higher the degree of preparation of a position or area. 
  The increase in subunit survivability is determined by the 
fact that as fortification of positions and areas is upgraded, 
personnel will be disposed in ever stronger structures. 
  Engineer measures of maskirovka and protection against 
precision weapons are carried out with consideration of the time 
of year and in accordance with situation conditions, basically 
by using authorized camouflage gear and means of simulation and 
the installation of overhead cover and heat-dissipating screens 
and covers over heat-emitting surfaces of armored equipment. 
  Engineer obstacles are arranged ahead of the FEBA, on 
flanks, 
around weapon emplacements and sometimes also in the depth. 
Subunits emplace mainly explosive obstacles (minefields, mine 
clusters, mined abatis and so on) and nonexplosive obstacles 
(wire fences and entanglements, knife rests, hedgehogs and so 
on). They should be emplaced with consideration of the system of 
fire so that each minefield and other barrier or obstacle is 
covered by fire, especially fire of AT weapons. 
  In organizing the attack the subunit commander indicates the 
following: nature, sequence and time periods for fortification 
and maskirovka of subunit disposition areas in the attack 
position (assembly area); number, places, time and methods of 
breaching passages in enemy obstacles and obstacles ahead of the 
friendly FEBA, and the procedure for marking and maintaining 
them and passing subunits through them; procedure and methods 
for crossing minefields laid by remote minelaying equipment and 
for negotiating difficult sectors; places, kinds and readiness 
time of crossings over water obstacles; forces and assets for 
performing engineer support missions; and the procedure for 
using engineer subunits and their vehicles if they are attached. 
  In the attack it is especially important to organize and 
support the breaching of obstacles and destructive damage and 
the arrangement of crossings over barriers. This mission is 
performed by the subunits themselves and by attached subunits of 
engineer troops. 
  Remotely laid minefields are bypassed along reconnoitered 
axes or, when impossible to bypass, they are crossed through 
breached passages. 
  Non-T/O mineclearing teams at squad (crew) strength usually 
are formed in companies for breaching minefields laid by remote 
minelaying equipment. The team must be trained in mineclearing 
methods. It is provided with a transportable mineclearing set 
and explosive charges. In particular, the team should have a 
mine detector, probe, grappling hook, 10-15 TNT blocks, 10-15 
safety fuze detonator sets and 8-10 standard markers. 
  An obstacle clearing party is formed in the battalion. For 
this the party may be reinforced by a combat engineer platoon, 
bridgelayer (MTU-20), mineclearing unit (UR-77), obstacle 
clearing engineer vehicle (BAT-2 route clearance vehicle), and 
tank with KMT-6 [type of tank mineclearing attachment]. If 
necessary the obstacle clearing party is reinforced by a combat 
arms subunit. Based on experience, such a party advances 400-600 
m behind battalion first echelon battle formations. 
  The preparation and maintenance of crossings in authorized 
amphibious combat vehicles by fording and crossings of tanks 
fully submerged consist of determining and marking sectors 
convenient for forcing a water obstacle, preparing descents into 
and exits from the water, maskirovka and security of crossings, 
commandant's service there, and breaching of obstacles on banks 
and in the water. Existing bridges on a water obstacle often 
will be partially or fully demolished. In the first case it will 
be necessary to strengthen and reinforce them. In the second 
case, if it is a major bridge, reconnaissance is conducted to 
locate and prepare a ford or another accessible method of 
crossing the water obstacle is prepared. Most often in this case 
subunits cross over crossings prepared by the senior commander's 
forces and assets. 
  Engineer subunits also are assigned the task of demolishing 
installations on water obstacles if they may be used by the 
enemy for his own purposes. 
  The battalion obtains and purifies water and prepares water 
supply points by its own efforts using authorized field water 
supply equipment. 
<H5>  8. Chemical Support </H5>
  Chemical support is organized and carried out in motorized 
rifle (tank) subunits to preclude or minimize losses from NBC 
contamination, provide maskirovka by aerosols (smoke), and 
inflict losses on the enemy by incendiary weapons. Chemical 
support includes the following: radiological and chemical 
reconnaissance; prompt use of individual and collective 
protective gear; radiological and chemical monitoring; 
decontamination of subunits; and use of aerosols (smoke) and 
incendiary weapons. Chemical support measures are performed by 
forces and assets of company (battalion) subunits, but its most 
difficult and specific measures are performed by subunits of 
chemical troops. 
  In resolving problems of chemical support the company 
(battalion) commander determines and issues 
instructions on the procedure for performing radiological 
and chemical reconnaissance and on the place, time and procedure 
for conducting decontamination of subunits. He also indicates 
the procedure and time periods for conducting measures for 
maskirovka of subunits by aerosols (smoke) and the forces and 
assets to be assigned for this, procedure for using attached 
flamethrower subunits, and the procedure for technical 
inspection of protective masks and for providing subunits with 
protective gear. 
  Radiological and chemical reconnaissance is organized to 
provide the commander with prompt data on the radiation and 
chemical situation and warn subunits of terrain contamination. 
It is conducted continuously. A chemical observer is appointed 
for this in the company and a chemical observation post in the 
battalion. Radiological and chemical reconnaissance devices 
which are in combat vehicles (tanks, BMP's and so on) also are 
used. 
  When there is a threat of injury, personnel make use of 
protective gear at the subunit commander's command based on 
reconnaissance data and an estimate of the chemical and 
radiation situation. For prompt use, protective masks and 
breathing masks must be constantly in a traveling position (on 
the person), protective ponchos, footwear and gloves should be 
in vehicles when operating in vehicles and should be with the 
person when operating outside the vehicles. 
  Skilled use of individual and collective protective gear 
plays an important role in protecting personnel against NBC 
contamination. This is achieved by constantly drilling personnel 
in its use and by properly determining the lines and time for 
transferring it to a particular position. 
  Radiological and chemical monitoring also must be constant 
and regular, inasmuch as a conclusion is drawn on its basis 
about combat effectiveness of personnel and the subunit as a 
whole, the possibility of removing individual protective gear, 
and the extent of decontamination. Radiological and chemical 
monitoring is performed by the CW instructor and specially 
trained servicemen. A dose rate meter (ID-1) is issued during 
operations by officers, NCO's and privates performing missions 
apart from the subunit. 
  The subunit keeps a record of the personnel's radiation 
exposure levels: in the company for all personnel, and in the 
battalion an average for the platoon. Chemical monitoring is 
performed in the automatic mode using radiological and chemical 
reconnaissance devices installed in tanks and BMP's. 
  Partial or complete decontamination is performed in 
subunits. 
It consists of NBC decontamination of weapons, equipment, 
clothing, gear, protective gear and supplies. 
  Partial decontamination is organized by order of the company 
(battalion) commander. It is performed by the personnel during 
performance of the mission using authorized means. The 
appropriate chemical decontamination devices and sets (TDP [tank 
decontamination device], DK-4 and so on) available on tanks, 
BMP's, BTR's and trucks are used. Individual chemical 
decontamination devices (of the IDPS-69 type) issued to each 
serviceman are used for decontaminating personal weapons. 
Decontamination is performed immediately when contaminated by 
chemical agents. 
  Complete decontamination of subunits is done by order of the 
senior commander in areas occupied by the subunits or in 
decontamination areas, as a rule after performance of the combat 
mission. Subunits of chemical troops with special vehicles-- 
spray trucks (ARS-14, ARS-15) and chemical decontamination sets 
(DKV)--usually are used to perform it. Crews of tanks (BMP's, 
BTR's) perform the decontamination. Several objects (usually 
four) are processed simultaneously using the spray truck. 
  Use of aerosols (smoke) is organized for maskirovka of 
friendly subunits and also for countering enemy technical means 
of reconnaissance and his means of weapon guidance (homing). The 
following smoke producing munitions and equipment are used for 
smoke generation: white and black smoke grenades, incendiary 
smoke cartridges, thermal smoke apparatus, and an armored 
vehicle smoke grenade launching system. With an oblique wind it 
is advisable to carry out smoke maskirovka by turning on the 
thermal smoke apparatus, and with a head wind toward the enemy 
by using the smoke grenade launching system. With consideration 
of the flight range of smoke grenades (around 300 m), it is 
possible to create a "smoke barrier" for supporting (covering) a 
forward dash to assault the enemy or to execute a maneuver. 
  Thermal smoke apparatus is turned on by the driver and smoke 
grenades are launched by the tank (BMP) gunner on command when 
it is necessary to conceal a crew exit from the vehicle, 
simulate a burning vehicle or cover its maneuver to another 
position. 
  Incendiary weapons are used to engage enemy personnel, 
weapons, vehicles and supplies and create centers of fire in his 
operations area. They are employed in the company (battalion) by 
attached flamethrower subunits. 
Footnotes 
  1. V. I. Lenin, "Polnoye sobraniye sochineniy" [Complete 
Collected Works], Vol 41, p 144. 
  2. See "Inzhenernoye obespecheniye boya" [Engineer Support 
to 
Battle], Moscow, Voyenizdat, 1988, p 239. 
<H5>  Chapter XI - Technical and Logistic Support </H5>
<H5>  1. Technical Support </H5>
  Uninterrupted technical support is one of the basic 
conditions for successful conduct of battle. It consists of the 
organization and accomplishment of technically correct use of 
weapons and vehicles, providing subunits with weapons, vehicles, 
missiles, ammunition and military-technical property, promptly 
replenishing their expenditure and losses, and rapidly restoring 
disabled weapons and vehicles. 
  The scope and content of technical support to subunits 
depend 
on many factors: nature of combat operations, mission being 
performed, subunit's place in the unit battle formation, nature 
of terrain, time of year and day, and so on. But there are 
general principles which are the basis for organizing and 
accomplishing technical support. 
  The following are such general principles: performance of 
technical support missions directly in the course of battle; 
priority performance of primary missions; bringing technical 
support forces and assets as close to subunits as possible and 
their broad maneuver in the course of battle. 
  Technical support missions are performed in the company 
(battery) by vehicle crews (teams, drivers) using spare parts, 
tools and accessories available in each tank, BMP, BTR and motor 
vehicle, with the artillery piece, and in the battery. 
  The battalion has a servicing and maintenance platoon for 
performing technical support missions. The MRB maintenance 
platoon consists of an armored equipment servicing and 
maintenance squad and a motor transport vehicles servicing and 
maintenance squad. The TB servicing and maintenance platoon has 
a servicing and maintenance squad and recovery squad with an 
armored recovery vehicle. 
  Maintenance squads are intended for helping crews (drivers) 
perform servicing and maintenance, remedying minor malfunctions 
and performing nonlaborintensive routine maintenance on weapons, 
vehicles and communications equipment. Equipment of the 
maintenance and service shop permits performing the operations 
of washing filters; checking and adjusting assemblies, machine 
units and mechanisms; remedying failures and malfunctions; 
replacing assemblies and machine units; and touch-up painting, 
external washing and filling vehicles with POL. 
  A battalion may be reinforced by regimental recovery and 
repair assets when operating on a separate axis. 
  The company (battalion) commander is responsible for timely 
technical support of subordinate subunits. He is obligated to 
take steps to keep weapons and vehicles in constant readiness 
for combat use, rapidly restore them when disabled, and provide 
subunits with missiles, ammunition and other militarytechnical 
property. 
  In organizing for battle, in questions of technical support 
the company (battalion) commander usually indicates 
the following: time, place and extent of servicing and 
maintenance; procedure for recovery and repair of weapons and 
vehicles during preparation for and in the course of battle; 
size of reserves of missiles, ammunition and military-technical 
property, time periods for establishing them, their expenditure 
rates and supply procedure; places for deploying the battalion 
servicing and maintenance subunit and procedure for its 
displacement in the course of battle (march); place, time and 
procedure for replenishing subunits' missiles and ammunition; 
procedure for security and defense and for maintaining 
communications with technical support subunits; and he also 
announces disposition areas of maintenance company subunits, 
location of the disabled vehicle collecting point, and the 
regimental evacuation route. 
  In determining the time, procedure and extent of servicing 
and maintenance, the battalion commander proceeds from the 
nature of upcoming battle, his own decision, and the technical 
condition, types and makes of vehicles. 
  Four kinds of servicing and maintenance are established for 
armored equipment and motor vehicles: visual inspection, daily 
routine servicing and maintenance, TO [periodic servicing and 
maintenance inspection] No 1 and TO No 2. 
  The visual inspection is performed at short halts (stops) in 
the course of a march and sometimes also in battle. It averages 
15- 30 minutes for all makes and types of vehicles. 
  As a rule, TO No 1 or 2 is performed depending on engine use 
in preparing for battle to ensure reliable operation of armament 
and vehicles under conditions of lengthy, intensive operation in 
a combat situation. 
  The periodicity and duration of servicing and maintenance of 
armored equipment and motor transport vehicles are given in 
Table 5. 


Table 5 - Periodicity and Duration of Servicing and Maintenance of Weapons and 
Vehicles 

Vehicle      Daily Routine   TO No 1                        TO No 2 
Make         Servicing and 
             Maintenance 

Duration,    Periodicity,    Duration,      Periodicity,    Duration, 
hrs          km              hrs            km              hrs 

T-72         1.5             1,600-1,800    4.5-5.5         3,300-3,500    10-12 

T-64         3.5             2,500          9-10            5,000          13-14 

T-62         2.5-3.5         1,000          5-6.5           2,000          8-12 

BMP          2-3             2,500- 2,600   5-6             4,800-5,000    8-10 


BTR-80       1.1- 1.6        2,000          1.8-2           6,000          6.4-6.6 

BTR- 70      3               2,000          7-8             6,000          14 

Motor        1-2             1,200-1,800    5-6             6,000-9,000    14 
vehicles 


  Experience of the Great Patriotic War and postwar field 
training exercises permitted developing principles of servicing 
and maintenance and of recovery and repair of weapons and 
vehicles under combat conditions. The main ones are the 
following: routine servicing and maintenance of vehicles is 
performed directly in battle formations without removing them to 
the rear, servicing and maintenance assets are brought to the 
vehicles to be serviced, and servicing and maintenance is 
performed by the crews (drivers) using the vehicles' spare 
parts, tools and accessories and with involvement of battalion 
and sometimes also regimental servicing and maintenance 
personnel and assets; vehicles requiring the least amount of 
repair work are evacuated first from under enemy fire to the 
nearest shelters and help is given to lightly stuck vehicles; 
vehicles intended for C[.sup]2[/] of subunits and for 
conducting fire (command and staff vehicles, tanks, BMP's) and 
requiring the least volume of work are repaired initially; 
repair assets are brought to vehicles to be repaired. 
  Technical reconnaissance and control of battalion technical 
support in the course of battle are accomplished from the 
technical observation post, which is headed by the deputy 
battalion commander for weapons. Reserve crew members may be at 
the technical observation post in addition to deputy company 
commanders for weapons (company senior technicians). A technical 
observation post also may be established in a company when it 
operates on a separate axis. The technical observation post is 
located behind battle formations of first echelon companies near 
the battalion (company) COP. Technical reconnaissance is 
performed for prompt detection of disabled weapons and vehicles; 
determination of the causes, nature and degree of their damages; 
determination of the extent of restoration work and necessary 
amount of forces and assets for this; determination of locations 
of the recovery and repair team or repair party. The technical 
observation post maintains constant communications with the 
battalion (company) COP, the recovery and repair team (repair 
party), fighting vehicle commanders, the regimental recovery and 
repair team and the deputy regimental (battalion) commander for 
weapons. 
  A battalion recovery and repair team or repair party is 
established for the time of combat operations from battalion 
servicing and maintenance assets. They perform routine 
maintenance on damaged weapons and vehicles at the places they 
are disabled or in the nearest shelters. 
  In determining the size of and time periods for establishing 
ammunition reserves, its expenditure rates and delivery 
procedure, the battalion commander is guided by the order 
establishing norms of unit-level supplies in the battalion and 
the regimental commander's instructions on ammunition supply and 
consumption norms in a given kind of battle and the procedure 
for their delivery. 
  An ammunition supply point is deployed in the battalion and 
company (during operations in defense) for replenishing tank, 
BMP and BTR ammunition in the course of battle. 
  Local security and defense of disposition areas (locations) 
of technical support subunits and protection against mass 
destruction and precision weapons are accomplished with their 
own forces and assets and within the regiment's overall system. 
  Technical support is organized by the deputy company 
(battalion) commander for weapons (company senior technician) 
based on the commander's decision for battle, his instructions 
on technical support, and instructions of the senior commander 
(chief). 
  The deputy company (battalion) commander for weapons 
(company 
senior technician) is obligated to do the following: constantly 
know the company (battalion) mission, its strength level in 
weapons and vehicles and their technical condition, and state of 
supply of missiles, ammunition and militarytechnical property; 
direct preparation of weapons and vehicles for battle (march) 
and their servicing and maintenance; organize and conduct 
observation of fighting vehicles in battle and determine the 
reasons for their being out of commission; organize the recovery 
and repair of weapons and vehicles, their timely return to duty 
and the transfer of disabled vehicles to the senior commander's 
assets; maintain constant communications with the deputy 
battalion (regimental) commander for weapons and the recovery 
and repair team (repair party), and report to them and his 
commander about the number, location and technical condition of 
disabled weapons and vehicles and steps taken for their 
restoration. 
  In the course of battle the company (battalion) commander 
personally (through the chief of staff, deputy for weapons and 
commanders of platoons or companies) monitors the technical 
condition and combat readiness of weapons and vehicles and the 
expenditure of missiles and ammunition and their timely delivery 
to the subunits, reports on this to the battalion (regimental) 
commander or his deputy for weapons and submits requests for 
replenishing subunits with necessary supplies. 
  Technical support in main forms of battle. In the 
defense the conditions of subunits' shift to the defense exert a 
substantial effect on organization and accomplishment of their 
technical support. 
  The most favorable conditions are created with the advance 
shift of a company (battalion) to the defense or when it is in 
the regimental reserve. In this case there is more time for 
performing technical support measures (Diagram 26). 
  Shifting to a defense in direct contact with the enemy 
hampers the resolution of matters of organizing and 
accomplishing servicing and maintenance. In this situation the 
time for servicing and maintenance of weapons and vehicles will 
be limited and many vehicles will have a considerable 
expenditure of engine time. In addition, vehicle crews (drivers) 
will be engaged in organizing the system of fire and engineer 
preparation of firing positions, shelters and emplacements for 
vehicles and will not be able to take part at full strength in 
the work of servicing and maintenance of weapons and vehicles. 
  The following factors basically influence organization of 
servicing and maintenance under the conditions in question: a 
subunit's defense frontage, nature of terrain, technical 
condition of vehicles, level of training of crews (drivers) and 
the presence of servicing and maintenance and of recovery and 
repair assets. 
  Servicing and maintenance of tanks, BMP's and BTR's when 
shifting to the defense begins with their fueling and 
replenishment of ammunition, performance of visual inspection 
and remedying of detected malfunctions. The procedure for 
fueling vehicles and replenishing ammunition is established by 
the company (battalion) commander and the procedure for using 
means of refueling and ammunition supply by the deputy for 
weapons. 
  Servicing and maintenance is accomplished basically by 
vehicle crews (drivers) with the involvement of the battalion 
maintenance platoon. Sometimes motorized riflemen also may be 
used to assist BMP (BTR) drivers by direction of the company 
commander. 
  The procedure for using the servicing and maintenance 
platoon 
by companies and other subunits is established by the deputy 
battalion commander for weapons, and within companies by the 
commanders and their deputies for weapons (company senior 
technicians). Assets are assigned first to subunits which are 
shifting to defense in the first echelon. 
  Vehicles usually are serviced and maintained directly in 
subunit battle formations. The sequence of servicing and 
maintenance and time allocated are established by the company 
(battalion) commander depending on the situation. The extent of 
servicing and maintenance is determined by the deputy company 
(battalion) commander for weapons (company senior technician). 
  Work connected with partial disassembly of vehicles and 
their 
loss of mobility as well as with moving them to the nearest 
shelters for servicing and maintenance is done only by 
permission of the company (battalion) commander. In all cases, 
at least two- thirds of the vehicles must be in full combat 
readiness when performing servicing and maintenance. 
  Additional ammunition reserves are established in organizing 
defense in subunits and at tank and BMP firing positions. It is 
replenished as expended. Ammunition reserves in subunits are 
immediately replenished after repelling enemy assaults. 
  Recovery and repair of weapons and vehicles in the course of 
battle are done by the battalion recovery and repair team, which 
is located behind the first echelon. Damaged vehicles with 
serviceable weapons capable of fighting are left in the battle 
formation and recovered only by permission of the battalion 
commander. 
  The recovery of damaged tanks, BMP's and BTR's within the 
battalion defense area is done by organic prime movers, and 
recovery to the regimental disabled vehicle collecting point by 
regimental recovery assets. Motor vehicles are recovered by 
battalion assets and also by incidental regimental transport 
delivering supplies, and by vehicles specially assigned for this. 
  With enemy penetration, damaged fighting vehicles are 
evacuated from under fire under cover of the regimental second 
echelon or reserve. In this case fighting vehicles also may be 
used for recovery by permission of the battalion (regimental) 
commander. 
  The procedure for work of commanders and their deputies for 
weapons and the extent of technical support measures taken 
depend on the time allotted for preparing subunits for battle. 
  The following basic measures usually are carried out before 
the beginning of an attack: technical preparation of personnel, 
servicing and maintenance of weapons and vehicles to ensure 
reliable operation in the course of battle, their repair, 
replenishment of ammunition and replenishment of vehicle spare 
parts, tools and accessories. If there is to be a forcing, tanks 
are prepared for a fully submerged crossing of water obstacles 
and the seal of hulls and operation of water jets are checked on 
amphibious BTR's. 
  If the attack is made from a position of direct contact with 
the enemy and tank subunits are moving forward from assembly 
positions, a visual inspection of weapons and vehicles usually 
is made before battle. In a hasty attack, their servicing and 
maintenance is performed in the assembly area, as a rule to the 
extent of daily routine servicing and maintenance. Unserviceable 
fighting vehicles and weapons which cannot be repaired in the 
company and battalion are transferred to assets of the senior 
commander (chief) for repair. 
  A battalion's hasty attack begins with forward movement to 
the line of departure. At this time the support platoon makes up 
the battalion technical maintenance echelon and performs the 
following missions: establishes the places and causes of vehicle 
halts; determines methods of remedying malfunctions; provides 
technical assistance to crews (drivers) of damaged vehicles and 
issues spare parts to them; recovers unserviceable vehicles and 
lightly stuck vehicles from movement routes. 
  Battalion technical maintenance echelon assets are not used 
for repairing vehicles on the march, but move up to the line of 
departure together with the subunits. The technical support 
procedure in the course of battle is shown in Diagram 27. 
  With the beginning of an assault the technical maintenance 
echelon begins performing missions of a recovery and repair team 
or repair party. In the course of battle the recovery and repair 
team recovers damaged vehicles out from under enemy fire, 
performs routine maintenance on them, and extracts lightly stuck 
vehicles. If it is impossible to repair vehicles with one's own 
assets, they are transferred to the regimental disabled vehicle 
collecting point. After repair, weapons and combat and other 
vehicles are immediately returned to their subunits. 
  The duration of work by the recovery and repair team is 
established so as to ensure its arrival at the battalion battle 
formation by the moment the battalion is performing the next 
mission. Duration of the battalion recovery and repair team work 
may be 2-3 hours depending on depth of the mission and planned 
rates of advance. 
  When an MRC attacks in dismounted formation or is on 
defense, 
i.e., when a company ammunition supply point has been 
established, ammunition goes directly to the point and then is 
delivered by ammunition bearers to battle formations of platoons 
and squads and to the BMP's (BTR's). 
  In tank subunits in all cases and in motorized rifle 
subunits 
when attacking in BMP's (BTR's), combat vehicles are replenished 
with ammunition in the course of battle by platoon or by 
vehicle, usually in battle formations and also in breaks between 
battles. 
  After mission accomplishment the battalion commander reports 
the presence and technical condition of weapons and vehicles and 
the state of ammunition supply to the regimental commander and 
gives instructions on the procedure for repairing vehicles for 
the next day of combat operations. 
  Daily routine servicing and maintenance usually is conducted 
on all equipment and weapons of the battalion by day's end. As a 
rule, fighting vehicles are replenished with ammunition and 
filled with fuel and lubricants first. 
  Technical support on the march. Maximum exertion 
of personnel efforts and a large expenditure of engine time will 
be required in a relatively short time interval during a march. 
During 10-12 hours of movement at a speed of 20-25 km/hr, the 
average daily engine expenditure may be 200-250 km or more. 
Therefore technical support during preparation for and in the 
course of the march is one of the deciding factors on which 
company (battalion) combat effectiveness largely depends at the 
line of probable encounter with the enemy or in the 
concentration area. 
  When preparing for the march, reserves of ammunition, fuel 
and technical property are replenished to prescribed norms, 
weapons and vehicles are serviced and maintained and 
unserviceable vehicles which cannot be repaired by the beginning 
of the march are evacuated. Subunits intended for operating in 
reconnaissance and security are serviced first. 
  Before making a march under conditions of difficult terrain, 
special attention is given to preparing devices to increase 
vehicle off-road capability and to the presence and 
serviceability of devices and entrenching tools. The servicing 
and maintenance platoon and vehicles with spare parts and fuel 
are assigned to the technical maintenance echelon. 
  In questions of technical support the deputy commander for 
weapons indicates the following: extent of work of servicing and 
maintenance of weapons and vehicles on the march, methods and 
places for conducting it and assets used; makeup and missions of 
the technical maintenance echelon, its place en route, procedure 
for transferring vehicles not being repaired by one's own 
resources to the senior chief's assets. The makeup and missions 
of the recovery and repair team and the battalion technical 
observation post, their possible locations by the beginning of a 
meeting battle, and direction of displacement in battle are 
determined in addition under conditions of a probable encounter 
with the enemy. 
  In the course of a march the company (battalion) commander 
proceeds at the head of the column and his deputy for weapons in 
the last vehicle in the company or with the technical 
maintenance echelon at the tail of the battalion column. 
  Technical support on the march (Diagram 28) is performed 
directly on the route, at short halts and in the day (night) 
rest halt area. Weapons and vehicles are serviced and maintained 
every 3-4 hours of movement at short halts to the extent of a 
visual inspection; in addition, vehicles are refueled in the 
second half of a day's march and they are serviced and 
maintained to the extent of daily routine servicing and 
maintenance in day (night) rest halt areas. 
  Combat and other vehicles disabled during the march stop on 
the right shoulder of the road. The crew (driver) determines the 
cause of the malfunction and takes steps to remedy it. The 
deputy company (battalion) commander for weapons estimates the 
extent and nature of repair work. If the crew is capable of 
remedying the malfunction, it is issued spare parts and briefed 
on the procedure for performing the work. If necessary, one or 
more specialists are left for the repair. The duration of 
vehicle repair by the technical maintenance echelon on the route 
usually should not exceed the time necessary for the next 
battalion column to approach. 
  In the day (night) rest halt area the deputy company 
(battalion) commander for weapons organizes preparation of 
vehicles for the next day's march or for battle. Fighting 
vehicles which cannot be restored by the technical maintenance 
echelon are transferred to regimental repair assets or recovered 
from the route to shelters. After repair, vehicles continue 
moving and join a passing column. They take their place in the 
subunit at short halts. It is prohibited to overtake columns in 
movement. 
  The deputy company (battalion) commander for weapons reports 
vehicles left en route, steps taken, and the presence and 
technical condition of weapons and vehicles to the company 
(battalion) commander and senior chief. 
<H5>  2. Logistic Support </H5>
  Logistic support is one of the main conditions for 
successful 
battle by a company (battalion). It includes the delivery of all 
kinds of supplies and satisfaction of subunits' needs for them; 
organization and accomplishment of fueling of combat and other 
vehicles; meals for personnel; and medical support. To perform 
these missions the battalion has a support platoon with reserves 
of supplies and an aid station. Logistic support in the company 
is performed by the first sergeant, and in the MRC in addition 
also by the medical party NCOIC. 
  The support platoon consists of a motor transport squad and 
supply squad. The motor transport squad is intended for receipt, 
upkeep and delivery of battalion ammunition and fuel reserves 
and the fueling of vehicles. The supply squad receives and 
maintains reserves of food, delivers and issues it to subunits, 
prepares hot meals and safeguards servicemen's personal articles. 
  The following are deployed to perform logistic support 
missions in battle: in the company during operations 
in defense--ammunition supply point and aid station; 
in the battalion-ammunition supply point, 
refueling point, ration distribution point, and in the 
defense in addition an aid station. 
  Ammunition supply points are intended for replenishing 
subunit ammunition, the refueling point for refueling vehicles, 
and the ration distribution point for preparing hot meals and 
supplying personnel with water. The company aid station and 
battalion aid station determine the sick, search for wounded, 
collect and carry or transport them from the battlefield and 
from stricken areas, give first aid to the wounded and sick and 
prepare them for further evacuation. In addition, where possible 
the battalion aid station gives paramedic assistance and 
accomplishes sanitary-hygienic and anti-epidemic measures, 
medical reconnaissance, and the receipt, storage and issue of 
medical equipment and supplies to subunits. 
  Unit-level reserves are established in prescribed amounts 
for 
uninterrupted support of the company (battalion) with supplies. 
They are kept in fighting vehicles, with the weapons and 
personnel, and in battalion transport. 
  Reserves are divided into expendable supplies and emergency 
reserve (for fuel, a minimum level of supply), which is used by 
authorization of the regimental commander or, in a case brooking 
no delay, by authorization of the battalion commander with a 
subsequent report about this to the senior commander. 
  The requirement for missiles, ammunition, fuel and other 
supplies, their state of supply to subunits and expenditure 
rates are figured in supply units (units of fire, fuelings, 
rations, sets) and other measurement units. The requirement for 
supplies for battle is determined with consideration of their 
established expenditure and the presence of reserves in 
necessary amounts by the end of battle. 
  The amount of missiles and ammunition established per weapon 
or per fighting vehicle is called the unit of fire. 
  The amount of fuel contained in a vehicle (generator) fuel 
system or ensuring its prescribed range (time of operation) is 
called a fueling. 
  A ration is the amount of food prescribed under 
established norms for feeding one person in a 24-hour period. It 
is figured for the roster strength of a subunit. 
  A set of spare parts, tools and accessories for 
weapons and vehicles as well as of clothing, medical and other 
property consists of a set of items according to a specific list 
and in an established amount. 
  Company and battalion needs for supplies are met through 
their own unit-level reserves and by delivery from unit depots. 
If necessary, additional reserves of ammunition, fuel and other 
supplies may be established in the battalion by authorization of 
the senior commander. They are established in battalion 
transport by compact stowage or by freeing up a portion of the 
transport, and before battle also at firing positions of 
artillery and mortars participating in artillery preparation of 
the assault. 
  In the course of battle the expenditure of supplies is 
strictly limited by the having the senior commander (chief) 
establish their consumption rates, especially for ammunition and 
fuel. If it is necessary to replenish subunit ammunition in the 
course of battle the chief of the battalion ammunition supply 
point arranges for delivery (issue) of missiles and ammunition 
by order of the battalion commander (chief of staff). The 
delivery of missiles and ammunition to platoons and to fighting 
vehicles in the company is arranged by the first sergeant by 
direction of the company commander and is carried out by 
appointed ammunition bearers. 
  Replenishment of ammunition and refueling of tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's) in the course of battle is done directly in battle 
formations. If it is impossible to deliver supplies to combat 
vehicles, transportation assets with ammunition and fuel come as 
close to them as possible. Tanks and BMP's (BTR's) take turns 
moving covertly to locations of the transportation assets, 
replenish ammunition and refuel. The support platoon commander 
is responsible for delivering supplies to battalion subunits, 
and subunit commanders are responsible for replenishing 
ammunition and refueling vehicles. 
  Supply delivery usually is by regimental transport to the 
support platoon and from the latter to companies by battalion 
transport. In some cases battalion transportation assets are 
used for delivering supplies from the logistic support company 
to subunits. Missiles, ammunition and fuel are delivered based 
on verbal requests of commanders of companies and separate 
platoons and by order of the battalion commander (chief of 
staff). Stockpiles in subunits should be replenished to unit- 
level norms by the end of the day (or the battle). 
  Personnel are supplied with hot meals through the ration 
point, as a rule three times a day. If it is impossible to 
arrange three meals, personnel are provided with hot meals twice 
a day and a portion of the daily food norm is issued in dry form 
by permission of the battalion (regimental) commander. 
Preparation, delivery and issue of food to subunits is organized 
by the chief of the ration point in accordance with instructions 
of the deputy battalion commander for rear, who determines for 
what number of personnel, for which subunits and by what time to 
prepare food and the procedure for delivering (issuing) it to 
battalion subunits. The first sergeant receives and issues food 
to personnel in accordance with the company commander's 
instructions. 
  With forced organization of meals in zones of radioactive 
contamination the preparation, issue and eating of food is 
accomplished as follows: with a radiation up to 1 rad/hr, in the 
usual manner; from 1 to 5 rads/hr, in radiologically 
decontaminated covered structures. Under these conditions, only 
canned and concentrated food in protected containers and 
packaging is used to prepare meals. In areas contaminated by 
chemical agents it is permitted to prepare and eat food only in 
special structures equipped with air filtration and ventilation 
systems. On terrain contaminated by biological (bacterial) 
agents, meals are prepared and eaten after thorough biological 
decontamination of the grounds, field kitchens and equipment as 
well as complete decontamination of personnel. 
  Subunits are supplied with water from the battalion water 
supply (diversion) point. Delivery of water is organized as a 
rule by the deputy battalion commander for rear. Water for 
preparing food in zones of contamination is delivered in sealed 
containers. 
  Medical support is organized directly in the battalion by 
the 
paramedic; in MRC's (MRP's) by the medical party NCOIC (by 
riflemen-medics); and in TC's and other subunits by their 
commanders. 
  First aid is given to wounded and sick in the form of self- 
administered and buddy-administered emergency first aid, by 
riflemen-medics of platoons and by company medical party NCOIC's 
at the spot of the wound, in the nearest shelter or at the 
company aid station, and also by personnel of subunits assigned 
for rescue operations and for treatment and evacuation measures 
in stricken areas. Paramedic assistance is given at the 
battalion aid station and emergency medical treatment at the 
regimental aid station and at battalion aid stations headed by 
physicians. 
  The wounded are collected and carried or transported from 
the 
battlefield (from stricken areas) with their personal weapons 
and protective masks by battalion aid station forces and assets, 
and if necessary by personnel and transportation assets 
additionally assigned by the battalion (company) commander. When 
there is a significant number of wounded and sick in the 
battalion, the seriously-wounded and seriously-ill are subject 
to evacuation first. Lightly-wounded persons not requiring 
hospitalization are sent to their subunits after being given 
medical aid. 
  The company commander organizes logistic support personally, 
through the first sergeant and through platoon commanders; the 
battalion commander does so through the deputy for rear and the 
company commanders. 
  In questions of logistic support the company (battalion) 
commander usually indicates: size and times for 
establishing reserves of fuel, food, medical equipment and 
supplies, and other supplies, their consumption rates and 
delivery procedure; procedure for searching for, collecting and 
evacuating wounded and sick; places for deployment of battalion 
rear subunits and procedure for their displacement in the course 
of battle (or march); places, time and sequence for refueling 
equipment and vehicles; organization of meals for personnel; 
procedure for security and defense and for maintaining 
communications with rear subunits; and he also announces the 
disposition areas of the regimental logistic support company and 
maneuver, delivery and evacuation routes. 
  During battle the company (battalion) commander monitors 
fuel 
and food consumption and its timely delivery to subunits; 
reports to the battalion commander (regimental commander or his 
deputy for rear) on the supply of fuel and other supplies and on 
the presence of wounded and sick; and submits requests for 
replenishing subunits with necessary supplies. 
  Logistic support in principal forms of battle. The 
scope, times and procedure for carrying out measures for 
preparing the battalion rear depend on the nature of the combat 
mission, status of rear subunits, time available for preparation 
and other factors. When disposed in a defense area, rear 
subunits are reliably sheltered and carefully camouflaged and 
their protection against mass destruction and precision weapons 
and their security and defense are organized. 
  In the period of preparation for battle, reserves of 
supplies 
are built up to prescribed norms in battalion transport, in 
companies and in separate platoons. Battalion subunits and the 
aid station are cleared of wounded and sick. 
  The location of the battalion rear must ensure the 
following: 
rapid, effective use of its forces and assets; possibility of 
executing a flexible maneuver; close coordination of battalion 
rear subunits with each other and with corresponding regimental 
rear subunits; firm C[.sup]2[/]; and a decrease in losses 
from enemy effect. The procedure for battalion logistic support 
in the defense is shown in Diagram 29. Battalion rear subunits, 
including the aid station, are disposed behind its battle 
formation. This is dictated by the need for creating favorable 
conditions for their operation in case the enemy penetrates. 
  Tanks, BMP's (BTR's) and other vehicles are fueled directly 
in battle formations in lulls between battles, as a rule at 
night and under other conditions of limited visibility. 
  In both defensive as well as offensive battle meals are 
organized for personnel so the principal messing falls in hours 
of a drop in combat intensity. The issue to personnel of 
prepared food that has been checked by the paramedic is done by 
permission of the battalion commander or his deputy for rear. 
For this the truck-mounted field kitchen moves to the company, 
where it is met by a guide and directed to cover nearest the 
battle formation. The company first sergeant organizes the issue 
of food by bearers assigned from platoons, who receive it in 
insulated food containers and deliver it directly to the 
personnel. 
  Artillery and mortar subunits attached to the company as a 
rule are fed through their own subunit ration points and the 
others are fed together with the company. 
  Water usually is delivered from the battalion ration point 
simultaneously with hot food. 
  Organization of medical support depends chiefly on 
conditions 
in which subunits shift to the defense and the sanitary 
condition of terrain. 
  When shifting to a defense in direct contact with the enemy, 
evacuation of wounded and sick is organized above all from 
subunits actively fighting the enemy. Trenches and communication 
trenches are widely used in evacuation. 
  An aid station with reserves of means for giving first aid 
and of potable water is prepared in each company for temporary 
shelter of wounded and sick. It usually is located in a 
sheltered spot with consideration of the possibility of 
concealed carrying (transporting) of wounded and sick from 
platoons, evacuating them to the battalion aid station and 
maintaining stable communications with the company commander. As 
a rule, the battalion aid station is deployed near the rear 
boundary of the battalion defense area. 
  After enemy conduct of fire preparation and the beginning of 
the assault, subunit commanders, riflemen-medics, medical party 
NCOIC's and the paramedic clarify the sick and wounded and 
arrange for their first aid, for carrying (transporting) them 
from the battlefield and for evacuation to aid stations. Self- 
administered and buddy-administered emergency first aid is given 
where the wound was received. Then riflemen-medics and medical 
party NCOIC's supplement the first aid, shelter the wounded and 
sick from getting wounded again and evacuate them to the 
battalion and regimental aid station at the first opportunity. 
  At the battalion aid station the wounded and sick are 
examined directly in the motor vehicles where possible and those 
in acute need are given assistance and sent to the regimental 
aid station. 
  The battalion rear proceeds behind the combat subunits in a 
hasty attack when moving up to the line of deployment into 
company columns. It is advisable to align its column in the 
following sequence: aid station, motor vehicles with ammunition 
and fuel, and supply squad motor vehicles. The procedure for 
logistic support of the battalion in the attack is shown in 
Diagram 30. 
  By the beginning of the assault the battalion aid station is 
disposed directly behind battle formations of first echelon 
companies on the axis of the presumed greatest casualties of 
assaulting subunit personnel at a distance ensuring protection 
against small arms fire. The ammunition supply point, ration 
distribution point and refueling point displace behind battalion 
second echelon subunits. 
  Before an attack from a position of direct contact with the 
enemy, vehicles usually are refueled in the assembly area (at 
the assembly position), using the senior chief's assets as a 
rule. During the attack refueling is accomplished if necessary 
directly in battle formations of companies (in places not viewed 
by the enemy), with refueling assets coming up to the vehicles. 
The most favorable conditions for refueling fighting vehicles 
may be when the company (battalion) is in the second echelon or 
reserve. All vehicles must be fully refueled by the end of the 
day (battle). 
  In organizing medical support in the attack, main attention 
is devoted to giving first aid to wounded and sick, collecting 
them, and carrying (transporting) and evacuating them from the 
battlefield, especially at the dismount line and during the 
battle to take enemy strongpoints on the FEBA and in the depth 
of his defense. 
  In the course of an attack the wounded and sick are given 
first aid directly on vehicles in the form of self-administered 
and buddy-administered emergency first aid. If necessary they 
are transferred to battalion (regimental) medical transport or 
evacuated to the nearest deployed aid stations. 
  During operations in dismounted formation, riflemen-medics 
of 
platoons and medical party NCOIC's of companies who are 
advancing behind their subunits observe the battlefield, note 
places where personnel have become casualties, locate the 
wounded, give them first aid and concentrate them in the nearest 
shelter for subsequent evacuation to the battalion and 
regimental aid station. 
  As a rule battalion rear subunits displace during an attack 
as combat subunits advance so the uninterrupted nature of their 
logistic and medical support is not disturbed. 
  With beginning of pursuit of a withdrawing enemy the 
battalion rear comes closer to the subunits and steps are taken 
to clear the battalion aid station of wounded and sick. During a 
pursuit it is advisable to displace the rear at full strength in 
a column immediately behind combat subunits. 
  Logistic support on the march. In preparing for 
the march, special attention is given to establishing additional 
reserves of fuel and to accomplishing measures for improving 
off- road capability of transport. 
  On the march, logistic subunits usually proceed at the rear 
of the battalion main body column. When movement of motor 
transport behind tanks and BMP's will be difficult, the rear can 
proceed as a separate column where possible, in constant 
readiness to move forward rapidly onto the main body's route. 
  When making a march the ammunition of tanks and BMP's 
(BTR's) 
is replenished and they are refueled in areas of short halts and 
the day (night) rest halt area and on arrival in the designated 
area. 
  Organization of refueling of vehicles on the march is 
determined by the length of the march and conditions for making 
it, the number of vehicles in the company (battalion), and 
availability of refueling equipment. At short halts it is 
advisable to perform refueling with the senior chief's assets. 
Regimental and division fuel tanker trucks are included in the 
battalion column for this. Subsequently all vehicles are 
refueled in day (night) rest halt areas and on arrival in the 
designated area using all refueling assets. 
  Refueling on the march may be done by various methods. The 
most characteristic ones are when refueling assets approach 
subunit vehicles or visa versa. A mixed method also may be used, 
where some fighting vehicles are fueled by the first method and 
others by the second. The procedure for refueling a company at a 
short halt is shown in Diagram 28. 
  During a march being made over a great distance, by 
direction 
of the regimental commander, refueling of all or some groups of 
battalion vehicles may be done at field fueling points deployed 
along the movement route by forces and assets of senior chiefs. 
Characteristics of field fueling points and the duration of 
subunit refueling are shown in tables 6 and 7. 


Table 6 - Basic Tactical-Technical Characteristics of Field Fueling Points 

Characteristics            PZP-10            PZP-10A            PZP- 20 

Number of fueling points   10                10                 20 


Overall capacity, l/min    1200              1000               2400 

Fueling capacity of one    120               100                120 
point, l/min 

Deployment time, min       20                5-7                30 




Table 7 - Duration of Refueling Subunits Using Field Fueling Points 

                                Refueling Time, min 

Subunit         Type of field   25% Fueling     50% Fueling     80% Fueling 
                fueling point 


TC              PZP-10          8               10              13 

MRC             PZP-10          4               5               7 

TB              PZP-20          20              25              30 

MRB             PZP-20          20              25              30 


  Messing for personnel on the march is organized in rest halt 
areas, concentration areas, and during a two-hour halt. Under 
favorable situation conditions, during a day (night) rest halt 
and two-hour halt some or all company (battalion) personnel may 
receive hot food in mess tins directly from field kitchens 
located at the battalion ration distribution point or in 
companies moved to a disposition area. Under other situation 
conditions, hot food is issued to company first sergeants 
(deputy commanders of separate platoons), who come to the ration 
distribution point together with bearers from platoons. 
  Companies (artillery batteries) attached to the battalion as 
a rule are provided with meals through the ration distribution 
points of their own subunits (units), and smaller subunits 
(platoons, squads) do so through the battalion ration 
distribution point. Subunits (up to a platoon) attached to the 
company receive hot food and other food products together with 
company personnel. Larger subunits (up to a company) operating 
with it receive food from ration distribution points of their 
own battalions (artillery battalions). 
  During the march first aid is given to wounded and sick 
directly in BMP's (BTR's), tanks, motor vehicles and at short 
halts. Wounded and sick needing emergency medical treatment and 
subsequent evacuation are transferred by the company medical 
party NCOIC and battalion paramedic to temporary aid stations 
deployed near their movement route by forces and assets of 
senior chiefs, or to local military and civilian medical 
facilities. The battalion aid station proceeds in the column, in 
readiness to assist injured personnel in case the enemy delivers 
air strikes and uses mass destruction weapons. 
  Battalion commander's instructions on technical 
and logistic support on defense 
  (Variant) 
  Deputy battalion commanders for weapons and rear, and 
subunit 
commanders are to conduct daily routine servicing and 
maintenance of weapons and vehicles with occupation of firing 
positions. In conducting servicing and maintenance have two- 
thirds of vehicles in constant readiness to repel possible enemy 
assaults. Evacuate BMP No 223 (2nd MRC) to regimental disabled 
vehicle collecting point in area 700 m south of Dubrovka. 
  Weapons and vehicles are to be restored in the course of 
battle by the battalion recovery and repair team at locations 
where disabled and in nearest cover. Transfer vehicles that 
cannot be restored to the regimental disabled vehicle collecting 
point. 
  By 1600 12 June replenish ammunition and fuel, above all for 
1st and 2nd MRC's. Ammunition and fuel reserves in the battalion 
will be concentrated in area 1 km east of Astakhovo by 1530 12 
June. Ammunition expenditure norms: artillery 1.0 unit of fire, 
small arms 0.3 unit of fire; fuel 0.2 fueling. 
  During battle company commanders are to replenish ammunition 
from the battalion ammunition supply point. Refuel fighting 
vehicles at firing positions at night by platoon. Send wounded 
and sick to Kruglaya Grove to battalion aid station before 1800 
12 June. 
  Wounded are to be evacuated to company aid stations by 
riflemen- medics in the course of battle. 
  Deploy battalion technical observation post and recovery and 
repair team behind 2nd MRC by 1600 12 June, and battalion aid 
station and other support platoon subunits behind second echelon 
in Kruglaya Grove. 
  Deploy ammunition supply points and aid stations of 
companies 
in strongpoints by 1500 12 July. 
  Chief of ration distribution point is to provide three hot 
meals a day to personnel. 
  Organize security and defense of technical and logistic 
support subunits with own forces and resources. 
  Accomplish communications of technical observation post and 
recovery and repair team with battalion COP by mobile equipment 
and, with initiation of battle, by radio. 
  Regimental technical and logistic support subunits are 
located as follows: disabled vehicle collecting point on east 
outskirts of Rubtsovo, rear subunits in Redkiy Forest, 
regimental aid station 3 km south of Glinki. 
  Battalion commander's instructions on technical 
and logistic support in the attack 
  (Variant) 
  Deputy battalion commanders for weapons and rear, and 
subunit 
commanders are to complete preparation of weapons and vehicles 
and perform TO No 1 by 1900 23 August. Vehicles requiring 
routine maintenance are to be restored by own resources before 
1900 23 August. Transfer BMP No 213 (1st MRC) to regimental 
maintenance company. 
  Perform daily routine servicing and maintenance of weapons 
and vehicles by end of day (battle) by decision of subunit 
commanders. 
  During the attack the recovery and repair team is to perform 
the following: evacuation of damaged vehicles out from under 
enemy fire to cover and to sites of repair by battalion assets; 
perform routine maintenance on weapons and vehicles lasting up 
to 3 hours. 
  Company commanders are to replenish reserves of ammunition, 
fuel and other supplies to unit-level norms by 1900 23 August. 
  Establish consumption norms of ammunition and supplies for 
performing the combat mission as follows: artillery ammunition 
1.8 units of fire; small arms ammunition 0.4 unit of fire; fuel- 
-0.3 fueling. 
  Ammunition will be delivered directly to companies by 
regimental transport before the beginning of the attack. 
Organize its replenishment from the battalion ammunition supply 
point during battle. 
  Vehicles will be refueled in assembly area by regimental 
assets from 1800 to 1900 23 August. 
  Collect wounded on the battlefield using riflemen-medics and 
subsequently evacuate them to the battalion aid station by 
battalion assets. 
  The technical observation post, recovery and repair team and 
battalion aid station are to move behind 3rd MRC in the 
battalion column, and when subunits arrive at the line of 
departure they are to be disposed in Figurnaya Grove. Have the 
other logistic support points 2 km southwest of Strelkovo by the 
beginning of the assault. Displace in the direction Stepnoye, 
Ivanovo during battle. 
  Chief of ration distribution point is to arrange hot meals 
for personnel twice a day: at 0500 24 August in the assembly 
area and at 1900 at my command, and issue the remaining part of 
the day's norm of food products in dry form. 
  Provide security and defense of technical and logistic 
support subunits with own forces and assets. 
  Communications with technical observation post and recovery 
and repair team is by radio and signaling devices. 
  From H plus 1 hour 30 minutes regimental disabled vehicle 
collecting point deploys 1.5 km east of Hill 112.6; with 
launching of assault the regimental aid station deploys on south 
outskirts of Klinkovo; regimental rear subunits are located in 
Redkiy Forest. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
